Honeywell Sine is now Honeywell Forge Visitor and Contractor Management
LEARN MORE
Sine Core licences purchased after January 29 2025, and all users who have a free Sine User account, will be subject to the following terms:
#
Terms
Location
1
General Terms and Conditions
https://hwll.co/gtcs
2
SaaS Terms
https://hwll.co/saasterms
3
Hardware Terms
https://hwll.co/productterms
4
Professional Service Terms
https://hwll.co/prosvcterms
5
Offering Specific Terms
https://hwll.co/VCM_Sine_offeringterms
("Sine/Honeywell Modular Terms").
The terms listed on this page (i.e.
https://www.sine.co/terms/
) will remain in full force and effect and continue to govern for anyone who purchased a multi-year contract prior to January 29, 2025. Please note that if you have purchased any services or offerings under the Sine terms appearing below, your contract will transition to the Sine/Honeywell Modular Terms, as per your invoice, at the time of your contract renewal.
Privacy Policy
Our collection of information
Our use of information
Automated decision-making
Anonymizing information
How long we keep information
Disclosure of information
International transfers
Security
Your rights
Children's information
Links to other websites
Contact us
Last updated 4 November 2021; Version 2
Introduction
Sine Group Pty Ltd A.C.N, a wholly owned subsidiary of Honeywell International Inc. (“
Sine
”, “
our
”, “
us
”, or “
we
”), is the "data controller" of the personal information we collect about you when you visit or use any of our websites, or use products, services and applications that are linked to this Privacy Statement (collectively, our “
Services
”). This Privacy Statement explains how we collect, share and use your personal information collected in this way and how you can exercise your privacy rights.
When we interact with you, we may also provide you with additional privacy notices about specific processing activities or offer you additional choices about how Sine processes your personal information at that particular point in time.
This Privacy Statement does not apply when we process personal information on behalf of our customers as a “data processor.” For more information please refer to “Information we process on behalf of our customers.
Our collection of information
Information collected directly from you
. We may ask you for personal information to provide a service or carry out a transaction that you have requested. You may also provide personal information to us when you contact or engage with us (e.g., with a comment, inquiry or customer support request, or as a visitor to a Honeywell location) or register for an account to use our Sites. This personal information may include:
Identity data,
such as your name, title, company/organization name, e-mail address, telephone numbers and physical address (including street, city, state, postal or zip code, and/or country);
Registration data,
provided by you when you register for an account to use our Services, including usernames and passwords;
Recruitment data,
includinginformation submitted in connection with a job application or inquiry (as described below);
Business contact data
, such as information related to other employees, owners, directors, officers, or contractors of a third-party organization (e.g., business, company, partnership, sole proprietorship, non-profit, or government agency);
Marketing and communications data,
including your marketing preferences and your subscriptions to our publications;
Financial information,
including billing and other financial information for the purpose of enabling us to facilitate your purchase of Company products and services that may be available on our Services;
Export control information,
such as your nationality, citizenship and country of residence, that allows us to determine your eligibility under export control regulations to receive information about certain technologies;
Transaction data,
includinginquiries about and orders for our products and services and details of payments to and from you, including purchase order history and information needed to facilitate payment transactions;
Event registration information,
including information you provide when filling in e-registration forms; and
Your feedback,
including surveys, recommendations, or other feedback from you about our Services as well as our products and services generally.
When you do not provide requested information, we may not be able to provide you the requested service or complete your transaction.
Information we collect automatically about you
. We collect certain information about your visit to our Services using cookies and similar tracking technologies. We will always respect any legal rights you may have to prevent us doing this. Data collected in this way includes:
Usage data,
including information about how you use our Services, what pages you view, the number of bytes transferred, the links you click, the materials you access, the date and time you access the Site, the website from which you linked to one of our Services and other actions taken within the Services; and
Technical data,
such as your Internet Protocol (IP) address, your browser type, capabilities, language and your operating system.
For information about the cookies and other similar tracking technologies we use on our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Geo-location information.
For certain Services, withyour consent, we may collect the precise, real-time location (i.e., geo-location) of your mobile device. This information will be used only for purposes of facilitating your use of the Services including by our service providers who may process this information in connection with providing services on our behalf. If given, you may adjust this consent by managing your Location Services preferences through the settings of your mobile device.
Information collected from third parties.
In accordance with applicable law, we may collect personal information about you from third parties, such as social media websites and applications and combine it with information we already hold, to help us improve and customize our Services to your preferences and for other purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement. We may also collect your business contact information from your employer or other third parties to facilitate or otherwise engage in traditional business activities and similar administrative matters.
Information we process on behalf of our customers.
In the course of using our solutions, our customers may collect personal information about you and provide it to Sine for processing on their behalf. This personal information is processed by us on behalf of the customer and in accordance with the terms of our contract with the customer. This Privacy Statement does not apply when we process personal information on behalf of our customers as a “data processor.” Data processed in this way includes:
Facial recognition.
If our customer has enabled a Sine facial recognition solution (e.g., “Face Check”, your biometric information may be collected if you choose to opt into facial recognition. Our customers control whether Face Check is enabled, and it is subject to their privacy policies, not this Privacy Statement.
Check-in/out Workflows.
Our customers may also create customized, personal information collections using the visitor management Check-in and Check-out forms. Examples include when we provide solutions that help our customers customise and manage visitor check-ins, optimize workflows, and manage contractors and staff. In these and similar situations, our customer decides how your personal information is collected and processed.
Sensitive Personal Data.
As part of Check-in and Check-out forms, a Sine customer may also choose to collect personal data that may be considered “special” or “sensitive”, such as your temperature, vaccination status and health information for its own purposes. Sine does not request the collection of sensitive personal data and we will only process sensitive personal data as a processor for the limited purposes set out by our customers. Our customers are responsible for ensuring their collection of sensitive personal data complies with applicable laws which is subject to their privacy policies, not this Privacy Statement
.
We have no control over and are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our customers, which may differ from those described in this Privacy Statement. If you have any questions or concerns about how your personal information is handled by Sine when processed on behalf of our customer, you should contact the person or entity that contracted with Sine to provide the solutions and to process this information on their behalf (e.g. your employer or organization).
Our use of information
We may use the personal information collected via our Services or when you contact us for purposes that include:
Business Contact Data
. Sine collects and uses business contact data to engage in communications or transactions, including for conducting due diligence regarding, or providing or receiving, a product or service. For example, Sine may collect and use this business contact data in order to facilitate and manage orders, contracts, warranties, maintenance, and similar business functions, for credit analysis and collection purposes, to assist with our own internal compliance and legal requirements, and (if necessary) to defend our interests and claims.
Services and transactions.
We may use your personal information to deliver services to you or carry out transactions you have requested, including, but not limited to, providing information on Company products or services you have purchased or otherwise use, registering purchased products, processing product orders, handling warranty claims, replacing product manuals, answering customer service requests and facilitating the use of our Services.
Administering and protecting our business and Services.
We may use your personal information to administer and protect our business and our Services, including troubleshooting, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data.
Improving our business, products and Services.
We may use your personal information to perform business analyses or for other purposes that help us to develop and improve the quality of our business, Services, products and services (including new products and services), for example, by customizing our Services to your particular preferences or interests.
Marketing.
In accordance with applicable laws and regulations, we may use your personal information to inform you of products or services which may be of interest to you, and to otherwise communicate with you about offerings, events and news, surveys, special offers, and related topics. You are able to opt-out from marketing communications sent via e-mail at any time, free of charge by using the “unsubscribe” link in any e-mail marketing materials you receive from us, or by contacting us using the contact information listed in this Privacy Statement. Depending on your country of residence, you may also be able to opt out of other types of marketing communications; please contact us using the contact information listed in the Privacy Statement for more information. Some jurisdictions provide individuals (e.g., California residents) with the right to request certain information regarding our disclosure of personal information to third parties for the third party’s direct marketing purposes.  For more information on our data disclosure practices for marketing purposes, please contact us in accordance with the instructions listed below.
Interest-Based Advertising.
We collect data about your online activities and identify your interests so that we can provide advertising that is most relevant to you. You can opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from us as described in our
Cookie Notice
.
Financial Incentive and Loyalty Programs
. We collect and use personal information to maintain and administer our financial incentive and loyalty programs. We use the personal information you provide in these programs to offer unique rewards, track your program status, and to facilitate the exchange of program points for products, promotional materials, training workshops, and other items. To the extent permitted by law, we may also use any personal information that you provide in the context of a financial incentive program for any other purpose set forth in this Privacy Statement. Please review the terms and conditions of each financial incentive program in which you would like to register or participate as such terms and conditions may be narrowly tailored to the applicable program. If you consent to participate in these programs, you may withdrawal that consent at any time by contacting us using the contact details at the end of this Privacy Statement or in accordance with the instructions set forth in the applicable program’s terms and conditions.
Employment applications.
In connection with a job application or inquiry, you may provide us with information about yourself, such as a resume/curriculum vitae, professional references, information about education and job background, and information about professional training and certifications. We and members of our group may use this information for the purpose of employment consideration, background checks and employment eligibility, and as otherwise set forth in any separate privacy statement or other notice made available to in connection with your application. We may use a third party (e.g., job recruiter) or social media platform to solicit, collect, and retain employment applications. For more information, please read our
Applicant Privacy Notice
.
Research and analysis.
We may use your personal information to conduct research and analysis to help us analyse your purchasing preferences, identify the products and services that best meet your requirements and measure the effectiveness of the advertising we serve you.
Enforcement:
We may use the personal information we collect in order to detect, prevent and respond to fraud, intellectual property infringement, violations of our terms and conditions, violations of law or other misuse of our Services.
Where permitted by law, we may combine the information that we collect via our Services with other information we hold about you (such as information about your use of our products and services) in order to offer you an improved and consistent customer experience when interacting with us or for other purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement.
Automated decision-making
Automated decision-making is the process of making a decision by automated means without any human involvement. We may in some cases use automated decision-making (for example, we process your geolocation data which compares to pre-set GPS longitude and latitude site coordinates to determine whether you are at or near a location you have previously visited to commence the check in procedure in accordance with the requirements determined by our customer). Where we use automated decision-making we will only do so where you have provided an explicit consent or if it is necessary for the performance of a contract with our customer.
The legal basis on which we process information
Where required by law, we will ensure there is a legal basis for the processing of your personal information. In most cases our legal basis will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
Contract
: the processing is necessary for the performance of the services we provide to you, or in order to take steps (at your request) prior to, and anticipation of, performing, such services;
Legal obligation
: the processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations, including compliance with applicable laws, regulations, governmental and quasi-governmental requests, court orders or subpoenas;
Consent
: the processing is based on your consent to the processing of your personal information for one or more specified purposes (e.g. marketing);
Legitimate interests:
the processing is necessary to meet our legitimate interests, for example to develop and improve our Services, products and/or services for the benefit of our customers; or
Vital interests
: the processing is necessary to protect your vital interests (for example, health and safety reasons if you attend a meeting at a Sine location). If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please send an email to
[email protected]
Anonymizing information
In accordance with applicable law, we may anonymize your personal information so that it can no longer be used to identify you. Anonymized information is not considered personal information and is therefore not subject to this Privacy Statement. We may collect, use, aggregate and share anonymized information for any purpose.
How long we keep information
The period during which we store your personal information varies depending on the purpose for the processing including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. For example, we store personal information needed to provide you with products and services, to facilitate transactions you have requested, or if you submit an employment application via our Services, we will retain details of your application as set forth in the privacy notice made available to you in connection with your application or as otherwise required by law. In all other cases, we store your personal information for as long as is needed to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Statement, following which time it is either anonymized (where permitted by applicable law), deleted or destroyed. For more information on how long we retain your personal information please contact us at
[email protected]
.
Disclosure of information
We may share your personal information with selected third parties in accordance with applicable law, including as set out below:
Our group companies.
We may share your personal information with our affiliates and group companies as reasonably necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement.
Service providers.
We may share your personal information with companies with which we have contracted to provide services on our behalf, such as hosting websites, conducting surveys, processing transactions, analyzing our Services and performing analyses to improve the quality of our business, Services, products and services. We require these service providers to protect the confidentiality of your personal information.
Distributors and other trusted business partners.
We may share your personal information with third parties that distribute our products and other trusted business partners for purposes that include allowing those third parties to send marketing communications to you. Such sharing of personal information for marketing purposes will be performed in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.
Disclosure in connection with transactions.
In connection with certain transactions, we may disclose some or all of your personal information to financial institutions, government entities and shipping companies or postal services involved in fulfilment of the transaction.
Disclosures in connection with acquisitions or divestitures.
Circumstances may arise where for strategic or other business reasons Sine decides to sell, buy, divest, merge or otherwise reorganize businesses in some countries. We may disclose information we maintain about you to the extent reasonably necessary to proceed with the negotiation or completion of a merger, acquisition, divestiture or sale of all or a portion of Sine’s assets.
Disclosure for other reasons.
We may disclose personal information if required or authorized to do so by law or in the good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with legal requirements or with legal process served on us, to protect and defend our rights or property or, in urgent circumstances, to protect the personal safety of any individual.
International transfers
Sine is subsidiary of Honeywell. Honeywell is a global organization and your personal information may be transferred to, held, stored or used across various locations worldwide such as the US, England, the Philippines, Brazil and Singapore in accordance with applicable law. This means that when we collect your personal information it may be processed in countries that may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country. However, we will always take reasonable steps to protect your privacy and to provide a level of protection of personal information that is comparable to that of your country of residence which include implementing the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses. For more information on the appropriate safeguards in place to protect your personal information, please contact us at
[email protected]
.
Security
We are committed to protecting the security of your personal information. We use technical and organisational measures to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information. For more information on how we protect your personal information please contact us at
[email protected]
Your rights
Depending on applicable law, you may have certain rights with respect to your personal information.
You may have the right to
access, correct, update
or
request deletion
of your personal information.
You can
object
to the processing of your personal information, ask us to
restrict
processing of your personal information or request
portability
of your personal information.
You may have the right
not to have a decision made about you that is based solely on automated processing, including profiling
if that decision produces legal effects about you or significantly affects you.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal information with your consent, then
you can withdraw your consent at any time
. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You may have the rightto
opt-out of the sale of your personal information
. We do not sell your personal information to third parties for profit. However, we do share or otherwise disclose your personal information to third parties in accordance with this Privacy Statement and our
Cookie Notice
. For example, we engage with third parties to distribute our products, provide you with technical assistance, operate website analytical tools and features, and engage in marketing and sales of our products and services. Such activities may involve the disclosure of your personal information to third parties and may be considered a “sale” of data under certain (but not all) data protection laws.
You have the right to
complain
to a data protection authority responsible for overseeing compliance with data protection law in your jurisdiction about our collection and use of your personal information if you believe our processing of your personal information does not comply with data protection law. For example, individuals in the EEA have the right to lodge a complaint with the competent Data Protection Authority, a list of which can be accessed at: https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en.  We would however appreciate the chance to address your concerns, so please feel free to contact us regarding any complaint you may have.  We will not discriminate against individuals for exercising their data privacy rights.
We will facilitate your exercise of the rights that apply to you in accordance with applicable law. However, even if your personal information is not afforded protection under, or otherwise subject to, a data protection law, we may seek to accommodate any request or inquiry you may have with regard to our data processing activities. If you have questions about your rights or wish to exercise your rights, you can contact us at
[email protected]
or submit privacy questions via our interactive webform at the following link:
https://honeywellhub.secure.force.com
Children's information
Unless specifically stated, our Services are not directed to, and should not be used by, children under the age of sixteen (16) and we do not knowingly collect, use or sell information from such individuals. If you are a minor as understood by laws of your country, please do not submit any personal information through our Services
Links to other websites
Our Services may contain links to third-party websites, products and services. We have no liability or responsibility for those websites, products and services, their policies, or their collection or other processing of your personal information. The practices of those third parties is governed by their own privacy policies. We encourage you to learn about the privacy policies of those third parties
Contact us
If you have questions regarding this Privacy Statement or our handling of your personal information, would like to lodge a complaint, or wish to contact our Data Protection Officer, please contact us using the contact information listed below. We will promptly address your concern and strive to reach a satisfactory resolution.
Interactive Webform:
https://honeywellhub.secure.force.com
Email:
[email protected]
Mailing Address :
Honeywell Privacy
4D5
115 Tabor Road
Morris Plains, NJ 07950
Toll-Free Number
844 774 8634
If you wish to make a complaint to us regarding your privacy and personal information please do so in writing addressed to our Privacy Officer. If you need help lodging a complaint, please feel free to contact us. We take all complaints seriously, and will respond to your complaint within a reasonable period. We will determine what (if any) action we should take to resolve the complaint. If you are not satisfied with our response to the complaint, you may pursue it further with the relevant government or regulatory body. In Australia, this body is the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Changes to this Privacy Statement
We may occasionally update this Privacy Statement. When we do, we will revise the "last updated" date at the top of the Privacy Statement and take such additional steps as may be required by law.
Subscribe to an RSS feed to be notified when we updated Privacy Policy. You will need to copy and paste the URL into an RSS reader to receive updates: http://fetchrss.com/rss/618da106340ea763371c78e2618da12e29898904347951a2.xml
Solutions
Features
resources
get app
company
Your Privacy Choices
linkedin-square
angle-down
cross
menu
We use cookies to improve website performance, facilitate information sharing on social media and offer advertising tailored to your interests. For more information, see our
Cookie Notice
. You can also customize your browser’s cookie settings. Please note that if you refuse cookies, it may affect site functionality and performance.
Manage Cookies
Reject All
Accept All
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Performance Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.  If you are a California resident, toggling off these cookies will opt you out of online tracking used to customize ads to you that may constitute a sale or sharing under California law.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.honeywell.com/us/en/applicant-privacy-notice:
Language
English
Chinese
Czech
Danish
Dutch
Finnish
French
French-Canadian
German
Hungarian
Italian
Japanese
Korean
Norwegian
Polish
Portuguese
Romanian
Russian
Slovak
Spanish
Swedish
Turkish
Updated:  1 January 2023
This Applicant Privacy Notice (“Privacy Notice”) describes how Honeywell International, Inc. and its
affiliates
(collectively “
Honeywell
”, "
us
" or “
we
”) process your personal information when you join our Talent Community, search or apply for a job and submit personal information to us via our portal, websites or other recruitment mediums, whether online or offline (the "
Services
"). We are the controllers of your personal information for the purposes of applicable data protection laws.
Please note that if you are already a Honeywell employee you can also refer to the Honeywell Global Data Privacy Policy and the Employee Privacy Notice where one exists for your jurisdiction. The aim of this Privacy Notice is to give you more detailed information about our processing of your personal information in relation to your application.
Personal Information We Collect
To process your application, we ask you to provide the personal information about yourself, for example when you apply for a particular job vacancy through our website/portal or, in case that you already are a Honeywell employee, during your employment relationship. All information is provided on a voluntary basis and you determine the extent of information you provide to Honeywell.
Please bear in mind that some information may be necessary to complete an evaluation of your application and if it is not provided, our ability to consider you as a candidate may be limited.
(i)   Personal information
We may collect the following personal information about you:
Personal details and contact information including email address, telephone number(s), and photograph;
Professional and educational information related to your occupation, such as your current or previous employers, your job title, or other information about the organization with which you are affiliated. You may also provide your CV/resume and information about your qualifications or your education, such as your degrees, fields of study, the institutions you’ve attended, languages, professional memberships, certifications, details on performance management ratings and compensation;
Career preferences (e.g., short-term and long-term goals, willingness to relocate, date available to relocate and location preferences);
Personal information derived from your participation in our recruitment process, such as, for example, those obtained during interviews, the emails we exchange with you regarding your application or the conversations we have with you through our online Chatbot.
Audio and visual information, such as your voice and likeness as captured in photographs, video or audio recordings if you participate in a phone or video interview, or if you visit our offices;
Any other personal information that you voluntarily choose to provide to us.
(ii)  Sensitive personal information
We may also collect special categories of personal information about you (also known as “special categories of personal information”) where we have a legal obligation to do so, or the information is relevant to your future working environment at Honeywell, or for the future provision of employment benefits, or with your explicit consent such as:
Government-issued identification number (such as a social security number);
Demographic information, which may include information about protected classifications, such as your age, gender, race, disabilities, sexual orientation, marital status, or veteran status;
Health information (for example, to accommodate any disability you may have or dietary restrictions);
Information relating to a person's political opinions or religious beliefs or trade union membership;
Information about an individual's criminal offences or convictions, as well as any other information deemed sensitive under applicable data protection laws. Where permitted by law and to the extent applicable, Honeywell may also need to carry out background and/or criminal checks to determine your suitability for an open position or opportunity at Honeywell.
We do not require you to provide us with sensitive personal information unless it is necessary for the purposes of carrying out our regulatory obligations (e..g., for equal opportunity monitoring), or unless you have provided your explicit consent. Except to the extent required by law, the provision of this information will be entirely voluntary. Honeywell is committed to a true inclusive and diverse workforce. By providing us with your equal opportunity data, you allow us to better understand our employee profile in terms of equal opportunities data and the action we need to take to attract, promote and retain a diverse workforce regardless of age, disability, gender, race, religious or philosophical beliefs and sexual orientation.
(iii) Personal information we collect automatically from you
We may automatically collect certain information from you about your visit to our websites using "cookies" and other similar tracking technologies. For further information about the cookies we use on the website through which you submit your application, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
Sources of Personal Information
We may collect your personal information directly from you or indirectly from third parties who are lawfully entitled to share your information with us such as:
Employment agencies, background/employment check or identity verification service providers;
Recruitment agencies (for example, when a recruitment agency identifies you as a potential candidate);
Publicly available information about you from sites such as LinkedIn or your current employer's website. You may also choose to provide us with access to certain personal information stored by third parties (for example, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google or Facebook). By authorizing Honeywell to have access to this information, you agree that we may collect, store and use this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice;
By reference or word of mouth (for example, through a referral from a current or former employee). For referrals, the person who is referring you will be responsible for obtaining your consent to provide us with your personal information.
Purposes for which Personal Information is used
We use your personal information for the following purposes:
To evaluate your application and make hiring decisions;
Communicate with you and to inform you about the recruitment and/or your application(s) or any other required communications;
Comply with applicable legal and regulatory requirements and in order for us to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim;
Employment and corporate management (for example, establish a basic employment record if you are hired);
To carry out aggregated reports / analysis regarding candidates’ activity data (e.g. career site traffic, candidate funnel, source of hire, recruiting campaign success);
For Honeywell employees only:
To automatically exclude you from being proactively suggested for consideration to recruiters for a job opportunity and are not eligible for consideration per your current HPD 9-block rating (which will never be revealed to anyone outside Honeywell). However, you will always be able to directly apply for any job opportunity available and your specific situation will be considered by a recruiter.
Only where you are a resident of the United States:
To send you communications via SMS, specifically:
(i)     1-1 SMS communications in connection with your application to a particular job vacancy; and/or
(ii)    subject to your express consent, SMS campaign communications about employment opportunities, job affairs and application updates.
You will be able to opt out and/or revoke your consent for receiving the abovementioned communications following the instructions given in your profile.
If you are offered and accept employment with Honeywell, the information collected during the application and recruitment process will become part of your employment record.
Automated Processing and Profiling
Subject to your express consent (which you voluntarily provide when joining our Talent Community or when checking the appropriate consent box during the application process), we conduct 'profiling' to evaluate your suitability for particular job opportunities. This involves using a matching algorithm that is able to evaluate your employment profile and predict your eligibility for a particular job opportunity. We carry out this automated processing for the purposes of:
helping recruiters match candidates’ profiles to job opportunities by suggesting candidates for consideration for a specific job opportunity; and
sending personalized job recommendations to you based on your profile and/or preferences or other information that may be of interest for you such as Honeywell news, webinars and events.
Please note that based on this profiling, you may not be considered for certain job opportunities unless you have applied for them directly.
We do not make hiring decisions based solely on automated decision-making processes and/or profiling. Your personal information will be subjected to human-made decisions as the ultimate hiring decision will be made by the recruiters or hiring manager.
The Legal Bases for Processing Your Personal Information
Certain jurisdictions require Honeywell to have a legal basis for processing your personal information. Where applicable law requires us to justify our processing activities, our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
Consent.
In general, we will normally collect personal information from you where we have your consent to do so and where we need your personal information to process your application. By accessing our website/portal, joining our Talent Community or applying for one of our job positions, you provide your consent to Honeywell to collect and further process the personal information described above for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice. You may
withdraw your consent
at any time by making submitting a request through our data subject request portal at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or sending us an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitimate interests.
In Honeywell’s legitimate interests, namely the recruitment, selection, evaluation and appointment of new employees and the management and administration of the recruitment and the HR process to the extent our legitimate interests are not overridden by your fundamental rights and freedoms.
Legal obligations
. Compliance with Honeywell’s legal obligations where employment law or other laws require the processing of your personal information (for example to the extent the law requires the monitoring equality of opportunity and diversity).
Vital interests.
We may also need your personal information to protect your
vital interests (for example, health and safety reasons if you attend an interview at our site)
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Who We Share Your Personal Information With
Honeywell will only share your personal information with third parties under the following circumstances:
Honeywell group entities
. We may share your personal information with other group entities located in jurisdictions around the world for evaluating your profile and consideration for any recruitment opportunities at a group level.
Service providers
We may specifically share your personal information with third party service providers that perform specific services on our behalf (for example, recruitment and outsourcing staffing providers and analytics providers). Such third parties may vary depending on your country and will change from time to time but may include Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc., and their respective third-party providers.
Honeywell employees.
If you are already a Honeywell employee, please note that some sections on your profile are public and, therefore, visible to all Honeywell employees (specifically, your name, title, photograph, skills, interest areas, work experience and education). However, such sections are editable and you will be able to choose which information about you is shown in your profile. Please note that the career goals, relocations and profile status "open to new opportunities" sections will not be public and, therefore, not visible to all Honeywell employees (only to Honeywell's Talent Team).
Other third parties.
Honeywell may share your personal information with any competent law enforcement body, regulator, government agency, court or third party where we believe the disclosure is necessary under applicable law or in the good-faith belief that such action is necessary to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights or to protect your vital interests or those of another person. We may also share your personal information with others with your consent or at your direction (e.g. a referee or professional association).
International Transfers of Personal Information
Honeywell is a global organization and your personal information may be transferred to, held, stored or used across various locations worldwide such as the US and India. This means that when we collect your personal information it may be processed in countries that may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country. However, Honeywell will always take reasonable steps to protect your privacy and to provide a level of protection of personal information that is comparable to that of your country of residence which include implementing the
European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses
which may be found at the Commission's website at
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retention
We will retain your personal information for as long as necessary in connection with the purposes described in this Privacy Notice and in accordance with Honeywell's Record Retention Schedule or as required by applicable law.
Your Rights
Depending on applicable law, you may have certain rights with respect to your personal information. If you are a Californian resident please refer to “
Additional Information for California Residents
” below.
You may have the right to
access, correct, update
or request
deletion
of your personal information;
You can
object
to the processing of your personal information, ask us to
restrict
processing of your personal information or request
portability
of your personal information;
You may have the right not to have a decision made about you that is based solely on automated processing, including
profiling if that decision produces legal effects about you or significantly affects you.
Honeywell does not, as part of its recruitment process, make solely automated decisions about candidates.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal information with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent; and
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information.
We will facilitate your exercise of the rights that apply to you in accordance with applicable law. To exercise any of your rights relating to your personal information, please contact us through HR Help, or the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Additional Information for California Residents
If you are a resident of the State of California, this section supplements Honeywell’s Applicant Privacy Notice.
(i)      Categories of Personal Information Collected and Disclosed
Honeywell has collected and disclosed the following categories of personal information for our business purposes in the preceding twelve-months:
Previous column
Next column
Categories
We collect
A.
Identifiers such as name, date of birth, gender, email address, telephone numbers, postal address, online identifiers, social media account and other identifiers.
Yes
C.
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law such as race, ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, health data, biometric information, genetic data, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, personal mail, email and text messages (unless Honeywell is the intended recipient), government identifiers (e.g., social security number), driver’s license, passport, financial and banking information.
Yes
F.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as browsing history, interactions with Honeywell websites, email and text messaging services.
Yes
G.
Geolocation data, such as device location and IP location.
Yes
H.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal or similar information, such as your voice and image, video or audio recordings if you participate in a phone or video interview or if you visit our offices.
Yes
I.
Professional or employment-related information such as your occupation, current or previous employers, job title, educational history, academic and professional qualifications, resume, job history, hiring references, interview notes and assessments, languages, professional memberships, certifications, performance management ratings, compensation, location preferences and  travel preferences.
Yes
K.
Inferences drawn from any of the personal information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics.
Yes
Load More
(ii)      Your rights
You have the right to send us a request for the following rights covering the twelve-month period that precedes your request. Please note that these rights are not absolute and in certain cases are subject to limitations as specified in applicable law:
The right to know what personal information we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected your personal information; the business or commercial purpose for which we collected your personal information for, and the categories of third parties with which we disclose your personal information;
The right to delete your personal information;
The right to correct inaccurate personal information about you;
The right to opt out of the sale or sharing of your personal information;
The right to limit the processing of your sensitive personal information;
The right to be free from unlawful discrimination for exercising your rights under applicable laws.
We will facilitate your exercise of the rights that apply to you in accordance with applicable law and, considering the type and sensitivity of the personal information subject to the request, for your protection, we may need to request verify your identity and request additional information from you.
To exercise any of your rights relating to your personal Information, please contact us through the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. If you are already a Honeywell employee you may contact us at
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contact Us
If you have any question or complaints about how your personal information is processed or wish to exercise your rights, please contact:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(only if you already are a Honeywell employee) or our Data Protection Officer at
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
You may also contact us through the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
已更新：2023 年 1 月 1 日
本《求职者隐私声明》（以下简称 "隐私声明"）介绍了霍尼韦尔国际公司及其
关联公司
（以下统称 "
霍尼韦尔
"、"
我们
"或 "
我们
"）在您加入我们的人才社区、搜索或申请职位以及通过我们的门户网站、网站或其他招聘媒介（无论是在线还是离线）向我们提交个人信息时（以下简称 "
服务
"）如何处理您的个人信息。根据适用的数据保护法，我们是您个人信息的控制者。
请注意，如果您已经是霍尼韦尔的员工，您也可以参考霍尼韦尔全球数据隐私政策和员工隐私声明（如果您所在的司法管辖区有）。本隐私声明旨在向您提供更详细的信息，说明我们如何处理与您的申请相关的个人信息。
我们收集的个人信息
为了处理您的申请，我们会要求您提供有关您的个人信息，例如，当您通过我们的网站/门户申请某个职位空缺时，或者，如果您已经是霍尼韦尔的员工，在您的雇佣关系存续期间，我们会要求您提供有关您的个人信息。所有信息都是在自愿的基础上提供的，您可以决定向霍尼韦尔提供信息的范围。
请注意，有些信息可能是完成申请评估所必需的，如果不提供这些信息，我们考虑您作为候选人的能力可能会受到限制。
(i)   个人信息
我们可能会收集您的以下个人信息：
个人信息和联系方式，包括电子邮件地址、电话号码和照片；
与您的职业相关的专业和教育信息，例如您目前或以前的雇主、您的职称或有关您所属组织的其他信息。您还可以提供您的简历和有关您的资历或教育背景的信息，例如您的学位、学习领域、就读院校、语言、专业会员资格、认证、绩效管理评级和报酬的详细信息；
职业偏好（如短期和长期目标、搬迁意愿、可搬迁日期和地点偏好）；
您在参与我们的招聘过程中获得的个人信息，例如，在面试过程中获得的信息、我们与您就您的申请交换的电子邮件或我们通过在线聊天机器人与您进行的对话。
音频和视频信息，例如，如果您参加电话或视频访谈，或如果您访问我们的办公室，照片、视频或音频记录中捕捉到的您的声音和肖像；
您自愿提供给我们的任何其他个人信息。
(ii)  敏感个人信息
在以下情况下，我们也可能收集您的特殊类别个人信息（又称 "特殊类别个人信息"）：我们有法律义务这样做，或 与您未来在霍尼韦尔的工作环境相关的信息，或与未来提供就业福利相关的信息，或经您明确同意的信息，如
政府颁发的身份证号码（如社会保险号）；
人口统计信息，其中可能包括受保护类别的信息，如您的年龄、性别、种族、残疾、性取向、婚姻状况或退伍军人身份；
健康信息（例如，为了照顾您的残疾或饮食限制）；
有关个人政治观点、宗教信仰或工会会员身份的信息；
有关个人刑事犯罪或定罪的信息，以及适用的数据保护法认为敏感的任何其他信息。在法律允许和适用的范围内，霍尼韦尔可能还需要进行背景和/或刑事调查，以确定您是否适合霍尼韦尔的空缺职位或机会。
我们不会要求您提供敏感的个人信息，除非是为了履行我们的监管义务（例如，用于平等机会监控），或者您已明确表示同意。除非法律要求，否则提供此类信息完全出于自愿。霍尼韦尔致力于打造一支真正具有包容性和多样性的员工队伍。通过向我们提供您的平等机会数据，我们可以更好地了解我们的员工在平等机会数据方面的情况，以及我们为吸引、晋升和留住不同年龄、残疾、性别、种族、宗教或哲学信仰以及性取向的员工而需要采取的行动。
(iii) 我们自动向您收集的个人信息
我们可能会使用 "cookies "和其他类似跟踪技术自动收集您访问我们网站的某些信息。如需进一步了解我们在您提交申请的网站上使用的 Cookie，请阅读我们的
Cookie 通知
。
个人信息来源
我们可能直接从您那里收集您的个人信息，也可能间接从有权合法与我们共享您的信息的第三方那里收集您的个人信息，例如： 我们可能直接从您那里收集您的个人信息，也可能间接从有权合法与我们共享您的信息的第三方那里收集您的个人信息：
职业介绍所、背景/就业调查或身份验证服务提供商；
招聘机构（例如，当招聘机构将您确定为潜在候选人时）；
从 LinkedIn 或您当前雇主的网站上公开获得的关于您的信息。您也可以选择让我们访问第三方（例如 LinkedIn、Twitter、Google 或 Facebook）存储的某些个人信息。授权霍尼韦尔访问这些信息，即表示您同意我们根据本隐私声明收集、存储和使用这些信息；
推荐或口口相传（例如，通过现任或前任员工的介绍）。对于推荐人，推荐人将负责征得您的同意，向我们提供您的个人信息。
个人信息的使用目的
我们将您的个人信息用于以下目的：
评估您的申请并做出聘用决定；
与您联系，向您通报招聘信息和/或您的申请信息或任何其他必要的信息；
遵守适用的法律和监管要求，以便我们确立、行使或维护法律索赔；
就业和企业管理（例如，如果您被录用，建立基本的就业记录）；
对候选人的活动数据（如职业网站流量、候选人漏斗、聘用来源、招聘活动成功率）进行汇总报告/分析；
仅适用于霍尼韦尔员工
：
自动排除您被主动推荐给招聘人员考虑的工作机会，并且根据您当前的 HPD 9 块评级，您没有资格被考虑（不会向霍尼韦尔以外的任何人透露）。但是，您始终可以直接申请任何工作机会，招聘人员会考虑您的具体情况。
仅限于您是美国居民的情况
：
通过短信向您发送信息，特别是
(i)     与您申请特定职位空缺有关的 1-1 条短信通信；和/或
(ii)    在您明确同意的情况下，发送有关就业机会、工作事务和申请更新的短信。
您可以按照个人资料中的说明选择退出和/或撤销同意接收上述通信。
如果您获得并接受霍尼韦尔的聘用，在申请和招聘过程中收集的信息将成为您工作记录的一部分。
自动处理和特征分析
在您明确同意的前提下（您在加入我们的人才社区或在申请过程中勾选相应的同意框时自愿提供），我们会进行 "特征分析"，以评估您是否适合特定的工作机会。这包括使用匹配算法来评估您的就业情况，并预测您是否有资格获得特定的工作机会。我们进行这种自动处理的目的如下
通过推荐候选人考虑特定的工作机会，帮助招聘人员将候选人的资料与工作机会相匹配；以及
根据您的个人资料和/或偏好或您可能感兴趣的其他信息（如霍尼韦尔新闻、网络研讨会和活动），向您发送个性化的工作推荐。
请注意，除非您直接提出申请，否则某些工作机会可能不会考虑您。
我们不会仅根据自动决策程序和/或特征分析做出招聘决定。您的个人信息将受到人工决策的影响，因为最终的招聘决定将由招聘人员或招聘经理做出。
处理您个人信息的法律依据
某些司法管辖区要求霍尼韦尔在处理您的个人信息时有法律依据。在适用法律要求我们证明我们的处理活动合理的情况下，我们收集和使用本隐私声明中所述您的个人信息的法律依据将取决于相关个人信息以及我们收集信息的具体情况。
同意。
一般情况下，我们在征得您的同意并需要您的个人信息来处理您的申请时，通常会收集您的个人信息。访问我们的网站/门户、加入我们的人才社区或申请我们的职位，即表示您同意霍尼韦尔出于本隐私声明所述目的收集并进一步处理上述个人信息。您可以随时通过我们的数据主体请求门户网站
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
提交请求，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
，撤回您的同意。
合法权益。
符合霍尼韦尔的合法利益，即招聘、选拔、评估和任命新员工，以及招聘和人力资源流程的管理和行政，但我们的合法利益不得超越您的基本权利和自由。
法律义务。
在就业法或其他法律要求处理您的个人信息的情况下（例如，在法律要求监督机会平等和多样性的情况下），遵守霍尼韦尔的法律义务。
重要利益。
我们还可能需要您的个人信息来保护您的重要利益（例如，如果您在我们公司参加面试，出于健康和安全考虑）
如果您对我们收集和使用您个人信息的法律依据有任何疑问或需要更多信息，请发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。
我们与谁共享您的个人信息
霍尼韦尔只会在以下情况下与第三方共享您的个人信息：
霍尼韦尔集团实体。
我们可能会与位于世界各地的其他集团实体共享您的个人信息，以便对您的个人资料进行评估，并考虑在集团层面提供任何招聘机会。
服务提供商
我们可能会专门与代表我们提供特定服务的第三方服务提供商（例如，招聘和外包人员提供商和分析提供商）共享您的个人信息。此类第三方可能会根据您所在国家的不同而有所不同，并且会不时变更，但可能包括 Phenom People, Inc.、Cornerstone OnDemand Inc.
霍尼韦尔员工。
如果您已经是霍尼韦尔员工，请注意您个人资料中的某些部分是公开的，因此所有霍尼韦尔员工都可以看到（特别是您的姓名、职位、照片、技能、兴趣领域、工作经验和教育背景）。但是，这些部分是可以编辑的，您可以选择在个人资料中显示哪些有关您的信息。请注意，职业目标、工作地点和个人资料状态 "接受新机会 "部分不会公开，因此，霍尼韦尔的所有员工都无法看到（只有霍尼韦尔的人才团队可以看到）。
其他第三方。
霍尼韦尔可能会与任何主管执法机构、监管机构、政府机构、法院或第三方共享您的个人信息，前提是我们认为根据适用法律有必要披露您的个人信息，或真诚地认为有必要采取此类行动来行使、确立或捍卫我们的合法权利，或保护您或他人的重要利益。我们也可能在征得您的同意或在您的指示下与他人共享您的个人信息（例如裁判或专业协会）。
个人信息的国际传输
霍尼韦尔是一家全球性企业，您的个人信息可能会被传输、保存、存储或在美国和印度等世界各地使用。这意味着，当我们收集您的个人信息时，可能会在数据保护法律与您所在国家法律不同的国家进行处理。但是，霍尼韦尔将始终采取合理措施保护您的隐私，并提供与您所在国家相当的个人信息保护水平，其中包括执行
欧盟委员会的标准合同条款
，该条款可在欧盟委员会网站
https://ec.europa.eu
上找到。
保留
我们将根据本《隐私声明》所述目的、霍尼韦尔记录保留时间表或适用法律的要求，在必要的时间内保留您的个人信息。
您的权利
根据适用法律，您可能对您的个人信息享有某些权利。如果您是加州居民，请参阅下面的 "
加州居民附加信息
"。
您有权
访问、更正、更新
或要求
删除
您的个人信息；
您可以反对处理您的个人信息，要求我们
限制
处理您的个人信息。处理您的个人信息，或要求
移植
您的个人信息；
您有权不接受完全基于自动化处理（包括个人资料分析）做出的关于您的决定，如果该决定对您产生法律效力或重大影响。
作为招聘流程的一部分，霍尼韦尔不会仅对应聘者做出自动化决定。
同样，如果我们在征得您同意的情况下收集并处理您的个人信息，您可以随时撤销同意。撤销同意不会影响我们在您撤销同意之前进行的任何处理的合法性，也不会影响我们根据除同意之外的其他合法处理理由对您的个人信息进行的处理；以及
您有权就我们收集和使用您个人信息的行为向数据保护机构投诉。
我们将根据适用法律为您行使适用于您的权利提供便利。如需行使与个人信息相关的任何权利，请通过人力资源帮助或
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy- 声明
中的数据主体申请表联系我们，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。
加州居民的其他信息
如果您是加利福尼亚州居民，本部分将补充霍尼韦尔的《申请人隐私声明》。
(i)      收集和披露的个人信息类别
霍尼韦尔在过去 12 个月中出于业务目的收集并披露了以下各类个人信息：
Previous column
Next column
类别
我们收集
A.
身份识别信息，如姓名、出生日期、性别、电子邮件地址、电话号码、邮政地址、在线身份识别信息、社交媒体账户及其他身份识别信息。
是
C.
受加州或联邦法律保护的分类特征，如种族、民族、宗教或哲学信仰、工会会员身份、健康数据、生物识别信息、基因数据、残疾、退伍军人身份、性取向、个人邮件、电子邮件和短信（除非霍尼韦尔是预定收件人）、政府标识符（如社会保险号）、驾驶执照、护照、财务和银行信息。
是
F.
互联网或其他电子网络活动信息，如浏览历史记录、与霍尼韦尔网站、电子邮件和短信服务的互动。
是
G.
地理位置数据，如设备位置和 IP 位置。
是
H.
音频、电子、视觉、热敏或类似信息，例如您的声音和图像，如果您参加电话或视频访谈，或如果您访问我们的办事处，则会有视频或音频记录。
是
I.
专业或就业相关信息，如您的职业、现任或前任雇主、职称、教育经历、学历和专业资 格、简历、工作经历、招聘推荐信、面试记录和评估、语言、专业会员资格、认证、绩 效管理评级、薪酬、地点偏好和旅行偏好。
是
K.
根据上述任何个人信息进行推断，以创建有关个人喜好和特征等的概况或摘要。
是
Load More
(ii)      您的权利
您有权向我们提出申请，要求在您提出申请之前的 12 个月内享有以下权利。请注意，这些权利不是绝对的，在某些情况下会受到适用法律规定的限制：
有权知道我们收集了您的哪些个人信息、我们收集您的个人信息的来源类别、我们收集您的个人信息的业务或商业目的，以及我们向哪些类别的第三方披露您的个人信息；
删除个人信息的权利；
更正有关您的不准确个人信息的权利；
有权拒绝出售或共享您的个人信息；
限制处理敏感个人信息的权利；
在行使适用法律规定的权利时不受非法歧视的权利。
我们将根据适用法律为您行使适用于您的权利提供便利，考虑到请求所涉个人信息的类型和敏感性，为保护您的利益，我们可能需要请求核实您的身份并要求您提供更多信息。
如需行使与个人信息相关的任何权利，请通过
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
上的数据主体申请表联系我们，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。如果您已是霍尼韦尔员工，则可通过
HRhelp@honeywell.com
与我们联系。
联系我们
如果您对个人信息的处理方式有任何疑问或投诉，或希望行使您的权利，请联系
HRhelp@honeywell.com
（仅限于您已是霍尼韦尔员工的情况）或我们的数据保护官（
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
）。您也可以通过
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
上的数据主体申请表联系我们。
Aktualizováno: 1. ledna 2023
Toto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů uchazečů (dále jen "oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů") popisuje, jak společnost Honeywell International, Inc. a její
přidružené společnosti
(souhrnně "
Honeywell
", "
my
" nebo "
nás
") zpracovávají vaše osobní údaje, když se připojíte k naší komunitě talentů, hledáte nebo se ucházíte o zaměstnání a poskytujete nám osobní údaje prostřednictvím našeho portálu, webových stránek nebo jiných náborových médií, ať už online nebo offline (dále jen "
služby
"). Pro účely platných zákonů o ochraně osobních údajů jsme správci vašich osobních údajů.
Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, můžete se také seznámit s globálními zásadami ochrany osobních údajů společnosti Honeywell a s oznámením o ochraně osobních údajů zaměstnanců, pokud pro vaši jurisdikci existuje. Cílem tohoto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů je poskytnout vám podrobnější informace o zpracování vašich osobních údajů v souvislosti s vaší žádostí.
Osobní údaje, které shromažďujeme
Abychom mohli zpracovat vaši žádost, požádáme vás o poskytnutí osobních údajů, například když se ucházíte o konkrétní volné pracovní místo prostřednictvím našich webových stránek/portálu nebo v případě, že jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, v průběhu vašeho pracovního poměru. Všechny informace jsou poskytovány dobrovolně a vy určujete rozsah informací, které společnosti Honeywell poskytnete.
Mějte prosím na paměti, že některé informace mohou být nezbytné k dokončení hodnocení vaší žádosti a v případě jejich neposkytnutí může být naše schopnost posoudit vás jako kandidáta omezena.
(i)   Osobní údaje
Můžeme o vás shromažďovat následující osobní údaje:
Osobní údaje a kontaktní informace včetně e-mailové adresy, telefonního čísla (čísel) a fotografie;
profesní a vzdělanostní informace související s vaším povoláním, jako jsou vaši současní nebo předchozí zaměstnavatelé, vaše pracovní pozice nebo jiné informace o organizaci, se kterou jste spojeni. Můžete také poskytnout svůj životopis/životopis a informace o své kvalifikaci nebo vzdělání, jako jsou tituly, studijní obory, instituce, které jste navštěvovali, jazyky, profesní členství, certifikace, podrobnosti o hodnocení řízení výkonu a odměňování;
Kariérní preference (např. krátkodobé a dlouhodobé cíle, ochota přestěhovat se, datum, kdy je možné se přestěhovat, a preference místa);
Osobní údaje získané z vaší účasti v našem náborovém procesu, jako jsou například údaje získané během pohovorů, e-maily, které si s vámi vyměníme ohledně vaší žádosti, nebo konverzace, kterou s vámi vedeme prostřednictvím našeho online chatbota.
Zvukové a vizuální informace, jako je váš hlas a podoba zachycená na fotografiích, videozáznamech nebo zvukových nahrávkách, pokud se účastníte telefonického nebo video rozhovoru nebo pokud navštívíte naše kanceláře;
Jakékoli další osobní údaje, které se nám dobrovolně rozhodnete poskytnout.
(ii)  Citlivé osobní údaje
Můžeme o vás také shromažďovat zvláštní kategorie osobních údajů (známé také jako "zvláštní kategorie osobních údajů"), pokud k tomu máme zákonnou povinnost nebo pokud to vyžaduje informace jsou relevantní pro vaše budoucí pracovní prostředí ve společnosti Honeywell nebo pro budoucí poskytování zaměstnaneckých výhod, nebo s vaším výslovným souhlasem, jako například:
identifikační číslo vydané vládou (např. číslo sociálního pojištění);
Demografické údaje, které mohou zahrnovat informace o chráněných klasifikacích, jako je váš věk, pohlaví, rasa, zdravotní postižení, sexuální orientace, rodinný stav nebo status veterána;
informace o zdravotním stavu (například pro přizpůsobení se vašemu zdravotnímu postižení nebo dietním omezením);
Informace týkající se politických názorů, náboženského přesvědčení nebo členství v odborech;
Informace o trestných činech nebo odsouzeních jednotlivce, jakož i jakékoli další informace považované za citlivé podle platných zákonů o ochraně údajů. V případech povolených zákonem a v příslušném rozsahu může společnost Honeywell rovněž potřebovat provést prověrku vaší minulosti a/nebo trestněprávní prověrku, aby zjistila vaši vhodnost pro otevřenou pozici nebo příležitost ve společnosti Honeywell.
Nepožadujeme, abyste nám poskytli citlivé osobní údaje, pokud to není nezbytné pro účely plnění našich zákonných povinností (např. pro sledování rovných příležitostí) nebo pokud jste nám k tomu neposkytli svůj výslovný souhlas. S výjimkou případů, kdy to vyžaduje zákon, je poskytnutí těchto informací zcela dobrovolné. Společnost Honeywell se zavázala ke skutečné inkluzivitě a rozmanitosti zaměstnanců. Tím, že nám poskytnete své údaje o rovných příležitostech, nám umožníte lépe porozumět profilu našich zaměstnanců z hlediska údajů o rovných příležitostech a opatřením, která musíme přijmout, abychom přilákali, podpořili a udrželi různorodou pracovní sílu bez ohledu na věk, zdravotní postižení, pohlaví, rasu, náboženské nebo filozofické přesvědčení a sexuální orientaci.
(iii) Osobní údaje, které od vás automaticky shromažďujeme
Můžeme od vás automaticky shromažďovat určité informace o vaší návštěvě našich webových stránek pomocí souborů cookie a jiných podobných technologií sledování. Další informace o souborech cookie, které používáme na webových stránkách, prostřednictvím kterých podáváte žádost, naleznete v našem
oznámení o souborech cookie
.
Zdroje osobních informací
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme shromažďovat přímo od vás nebo nepřímo od třetích stran, které jsou oprávněny sdílet vaše údaje s námi, jako jsou:
Pracovní agentury, poskytovatelé služeb prověřování minulosti/zaměstnání nebo ověřování totožnosti;
personální agentury (například když vás personální agentura identifikuje jako potenciálního kandidáta);
Veřejně dostupné informace o vás ze stránek, jako je LinkedIn nebo webové stránky vašeho současného zaměstnavatele. Můžete se také rozhodnout, že nám poskytnete přístup k určitým osobním údajům uloženým třetími stranami (například LinkedIn, Twitter, Google nebo Facebook). Tím, že společnosti Honeywell povolíte přístup k těmto informacím, souhlasíte s tím, že tyto informace můžeme shromažďovat, uchovávat a používat v souladu s tímto oznámením o ochraně osobních údajů;
Na základě reference nebo ústního sdělení (například doporučení od současného nebo bývalého zaměstnance). V případě doporučení je osoba, která vás doporučuje, odpovědná za získání vašeho souhlasu s poskytnutím vašich osobních údajů.
Účely použití osobních údajů
Vaše osobní údaje používáme k následujícím účelům:
Vyhodnocení vaší žádosti a rozhodnutí o přijetí do zaměstnání;
komunikovat s vámi a informovat vás o náboru a/nebo vaší přihlášce (přihláškách) nebo o jiných požadovaných sděleních;
splnění platných právních a regulačních požadavků a za účelem zjištění, uplatnění nebo obhajoby právních nároků;
Zaměstnání a řízení společnosti (například vytvoření základního záznamu o zaměstnání, pokud jste přijati);
Provádět souhrnné zprávy / analýzy týkající se údajů o činnosti uchazečů (např. návštěvnost kariérních stránek, trychtýř uchazečů, zdroj náboru, úspěšnost náborových kampaní);
Pouze pro zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell
: Abyste byli automaticky vyloučeni z proaktivního navrhování náborářům pro pracovní příležitosti a nebyli způsobilí pro zvážení podle vašeho aktuálního hodnocení HPD 9-block (které nebude nikdy odhaleno nikomu mimo Honeywell). Vždy se však budete moci přímo ucházet o jakoukoli dostupnou pracovní příležitost a vaše konkrétní situace bude náborovým pracovníkem posouzena.
Pouze v případě, že jste rezidentem Spojených států
: Pro zasílání sdělení prostřednictvím SMS, konkrétně:
(i)     1-1 SMS komunikace v souvislosti s vaší žádostí o konkrétní volné pracovní místo; a/nebo
(ii)    s vaším výslovným souhlasem, sdělení SMS kampaní o pracovních příležitostech, pracovních záležitostech a aktualizacích žádostí.
Svůj souhlas se zasíláním výše uvedených sdělení budete moci odmítnout a/nebo odvolat podle pokynů uvedených ve vašem profilu.
Pokud vám bude nabídnuto zaměstnání u společnosti Honeywell a vy ho přijmete, stanou se informace shromážděné během procesu podávání žádosti a náboru součástí vaší pracovní dokumentace.
Automatizované zpracování a profilování
S vaším výslovným souhlasem (který nám dobrovolně poskytnete při vstupu do naší komunity talentů nebo při zaškrtnutí příslušného políčka souhlasu během procesu podávání žádosti) provádíme "profilování", abychom vyhodnotili vaši vhodnost pro konkrétní pracovní příležitosti. Jedná se o použití párovacího algoritmu, který je schopen vyhodnotit váš pracovní profil a předpovědět vaši vhodnost pro konkrétní pracovní příležitost. Toto automatizované zpracování provádíme za účelem:
pomáhat náborovým pracovníkům přiřadit profily uchazečů k pracovním příležitostem tím, že navrhují kandidáty, kteří by se mohli ucházet o konkrétní pracovní příležitost, a
zasílání personalizovaných pracovních doporučení na základě vašeho profilu a/nebo preferencí nebo jiných informací, které by vás mohly zajímat, jako jsou novinky, webináře a události společnosti Honeywell.
Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že na základě tohoto profilování nemusíte být pro některé pracovní příležitosti vybráni, pokud jste se o ně přímo nepřihlásili.
O náboru zaměstnanců nerozhodujeme pouze na základě automatizovaných rozhodovacích procesů a/nebo profilování. O vašich osobních údajích bude rozhodovat člověk, protože konečné rozhodnutí o přijetí do zaměstnání učiní náboroví pracovníci nebo vedoucí náboru.
Právní základy pro zpracování vašich osobních údajů
Některé jurisdikce vyžadují, aby společnost Honeywell měla právní základ pro zpracování vašich osobních údajů. Pokud platné právní předpisy vyžadují, abychom zdůvodnili naše činnosti zpracování, bude náš právní základ pro shromažďování a používání vašich osobních údajů, jak je popsáno v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů, záviset na příslušných osobních údajích a konkrétním kontextu, v němž je shromažďujeme.
Souhlas.
Obecně platí, že od vás budeme obvykle shromažďovat osobní údaje, pokud k tomu máme váš souhlas a pokud vaše osobní údaje potřebujeme ke zpracování vaší žádosti. Přístupem na naše webové stránky/portál, připojením se k naší komunitě talentů nebo podáním žádosti o některou z našich pracovních pozic udělujete společnosti Honeywell souhlas se shromažďováním a dalším zpracováním výše popsaných osobních údajů pro účely popsané v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů.
Svůj souhlas
můžete kdykoli
odvolat
podáním žádosti prostřednictvím našeho portálu pro žádosti subjektů údajů na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
nebo zasláním e-mailu na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oprávněné zájmy.
Oprávněné zájmy společnosti Honeywell, konkrétně nábor, výběr, hodnocení a jmenování nových zaměstnanců a řízení a správa náboru a personálního procesu v rozsahu, v jakém nad našimi oprávněnými zájmy nepřevažují vaše základní práva a svobody.
Právní povinnosti.
Dodržování zákonných povinností společnosti Honeywell v případech, kdy pracovní právo nebo jiné zákony vyžadují zpracování vašich osobních údajů (například v rozsahu, v jakém zákon vyžaduje sledování rovnosti příležitostí a rozmanitosti).
Životní zájmy.
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme také potřebovat k ochraně vašich životně důležitých zájmů (například z důvodů ochrany zdraví a bezpečnosti, pokud se účastníte pohovoru na našem pracovišti).
Pokud máte jakékoli dotazy nebo potřebujete další informace o právním základu, na jehož základě shromažďujeme a používáme vaše osobní údaje, zašlete nám prosím e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com,
S kým sdílíme vaše osobní údaje
Společnost Honeywell bude sdílet vaše osobní údaje s třetími stranami pouze za následujících okolností:
Subjekty skupiny Honeywell
. Vaše osobní údaje můžeme sdílet s dalšími subjekty skupiny nacházejícími se v jurisdikcích po celém světě za účelem vyhodnocení vašeho profilu a zvážení případných náborových příležitostí na úrovni skupiny.
Poskytovatelé služeb
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme konkrétně sdílet s poskytovateli služeb třetích stran, kteří pro nás vykonávají konkrétní služby (například poskytovatelé náboru a outsourcingu zaměstnanců a poskytovatelé analytických služeb). Tyto třetí strany se mohou lišit v závislosti na vaší zemi a čas od času se budou měnit, ale mohou zahrnovat společnosti Phenom People, Inc. a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. a jejich příslušné poskytovatele třetích stran.
Zaměstnanci společnosti Honeywell.
Pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, mějte na paměti, že některé části vašeho profilu jsou veřejné, a tudíž viditelné pro všechny zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell (konkrétně vaše jméno, titul, fotografie, dovednosti, oblasti zájmů, pracovní zkušenosti a vzdělání). Tyto sekce však lze upravovat a vy si budete moci zvolit, které informace o vás se ve vašem profilu zobrazí. Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že kariérní cíle, přemístění a sekce stavu profilu "otevřeno novým příležitostem" nebudou veřejné, a tudíž nebudou viditelné pro všechny zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell (pouze pro tým talentů společnosti Honeywell).
Ostatní třetí strany.
Společnost Honeywell může sdílet vaše osobní údaje s jakýmkoli příslušným orgánem činným v trestním řízení, regulačním orgánem, vládní agenturou, soudem nebo třetí stranou, pokud se domníváme, že je to nezbytné podle platných právních předpisů nebo v dobré víře, že je to nezbytné k výkonu, určení nebo obraně našich zákonných práv nebo k ochraně vašich životních zájmů nebo zájmů jiné osoby. Vaše osobní údaje můžeme také s vaším souhlasem nebo na váš pokyn sdílet s dalšími osobami (např. s rozhodčím nebo profesním sdružením).
Mezinárodní přenosy osobních údajů
Společnost Honeywell je globální organizace a vaše osobní údaje mohou být přenášeny, uchovávány, ukládány nebo používány na různých místech po celém světě, například v USA a Indii. To znamená, že když shromažďujeme vaše osobní údaje, mohou být zpracovávány v zemích, které mohou mít zákony na ochranu osobních údajů odlišné od zákonů vaší země. Společnost Honeywell však vždy podnikne přiměřené kroky k ochraně vašeho soukromí a k zajištění takové úrovně ochrany osobních údajů, která je srovnatelná s úrovní ochrany ve vaší zemi bydliště, což zahrnuje implementaci
standardních smluvních doložek Evropské komise,
které lze nalézt na webových stránkách Komise na adrese
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retence
Vaše osobní údaje budeme uchovávat tak dlouho, jak bude nutné v souvislosti s účely popsanými v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů a v souladu s harmonogramem uchovávání záznamů společnosti Honeywell nebo v souladu s požadavky platných právních předpisů.
Vaše práva
V závislosti na platných zákonech můžete mít určitá práva týkající se vašich osobních údajů. Pokud jste obyvatelem Kalifornie, přečtěte si níže uvedené “
Další informace pro obyvatele Kalifornie
”
Máte právo na
přístup ke
svým osobním údajům, jejich
opravu
,
aktualizaci
nebo
vymazání;
Můžete
vznést námitku proti
zpracování svých osobních údajů, požádat nás o
omezení jejich
zpracování. zpracování vašich osobních údajů nebo požádat o přenositelnost vašich osobních údajů;
Můžete mít právo na to, aby o vás nebylo učiněno rozhodnutí, které je založeno výhradně na automatizovaném zpracování, včetně profilování, pokud toto rozhodnutí má pro vás právní účinky nebo se vás významně dotýká.
Společnost Honeywell v rámci náborového procesu neprovádí výhradně automatizované rozhodování o uchazečích.
Pokud jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili a zpracováváme s vaším souhlasem, můžete ho kdykoli odvolat. Odvolání vašeho souhlasu nebude mít vliv na zákonnost zpracování, které jsme provedli před jeho odvoláním, ani na zpracování vašich osobních údajů prováděné na základě jiných zákonných důvodů zpracování, než je souhlas; a
Máte právo podat stížnost na naše shromažďování a používání vašich osobních údajů u úřadu pro ochranu osobních údajů.
Usnadníme vám uplatnění práv, která se na vás vztahují, v souladu s platnými právními předpisy. Chcete-li uplatnit kterékoli ze svých práv týkajících se vašich osobních údajů, kontaktujte nás prostřednictvím nápovědy pro lidské zdroje nebo formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy- statement,
nebo zašlete e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Další informace pro obyvatele Kalifornie
Pokud jste obyvatelem státu Kalifornie, tato část doplňuje oznámení společnosti Honeywell o ochraně osobních údajů žadatelů.
(i)      Kategorie shromažďovaných a zveřejňovaných osobních údajů
Společnost Honeywell v uplynulých dvanácti měsících shromáždila a zveřejnila následující kategorie osobních údajů pro naše obchodní účely:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorie
Shromažďujeme
A.
Identifikátory, jako je jméno, datum narození, pohlaví, e-mailová adresa, telefonní čísla, poštovní adresa, online identifikátory, účet na sociálních sítích a další identifikátory.
Ano
C.
Charakteristiky chráněných klasifikací podle kalifornských nebo federálních zákonů, jako je rasa, etnický původ, náboženské nebo filozofické přesvědčení, členství v odborech, zdravotní údaje, biometrické údaje, genetické údaje, zdravotní postižení, status veterána, sexuální orientace, osobní pošta, e-mailové a textové zprávy (pokud společnost Honeywell není jejich příjemcem), vládní identifikátory (např. číslo sociálního pojištění), řidičský průkaz, pas, finanční a bankovní informace.
Ano
F.
Informace o aktivitách na internetu nebo jiných elektronických sítích, jako je historie prohlížení, interakce s webovými stránkami společnosti Honeywell, e-mail a textové zprávy.
Ano
G.
Geolokační údaje, jako je poloha zařízení a IP poloha.
Ano
H.
Zvukové, elektronické, vizuální, tepelné nebo podobné informace, jako je váš hlas a obraz, videozáznam nebo zvukový záznam, pokud se účastníte telefonického nebo videorozhovoru nebo pokud navštívíte naše kanceláře.
Ano
I.
Informace týkající se profese nebo zaměstnání, jako je vaše povolání, současný nebo předchozí zaměstnavatel, pracovní pozice, historie vzdělání, akademická a odborná kvalifikace, životopis, historie zaměstnání, reference o přijetí do zaměstnání, poznámky a hodnocení z pohovorů, jazyky, profesní členství, certifikace, hodnocení řízení výkonu, odměna, preference místa a cestovní preference.
Ano
K.
Závěry vyvozené z jakýchkoli výše uvedených osobních údajů za účelem vytvoření profilu nebo shrnutí například preferencí a charakteristik jednotlivce.
Ano
Load More
(ii)      Vaše práva
Máte právo zaslat nám žádost o následující práva, která se týkají dvanáctiměsíčního období, které předchází vaší žádosti. Upozorňujeme, že tato práva nejsou absolutní a v některých případech podléhají omezením stanoveným platnými právními předpisy:
Právo vědět, jaké osobní údaje jsme o vás shromáždili, kategorie zdrojů, z nichž jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili, obchodní nebo komerční účel, pro který jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili, a kategorie třetích stran, kterým vaše osobní údaje poskytujeme;
Právo na vymazání vašich osobních údajů;
Právo na opravu nepřesných osobních údajů o vás;
Právo odmítnout prodej nebo sdílení vašich osobních údajů;
Právo na omezení zpracování vašich citlivých osobních údajů;
Právo nebýt nezákonně diskriminován při uplatňování svých práv podle platných zákonů.
Usnadníme vám uplatnění práv, která se na vás vztahují, v souladu s platnými právními předpisy a vzhledem k typu a citlivosti osobních údajů, které jsou předmětem žádosti, můžeme v zájmu vaší ochrany požádat o ověření vaší totožnosti a vyžádat si od vás další informace.
Chcete-li uplatnit některá ze svých práv týkajících se vašich osobních údajů, kontaktujte nás prostřednictvím formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na
adrese https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, nebo nám zašlete e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, můžete nás kontaktovat na adrese
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontaktujte nás
Máte-li jakékoli dotazy nebo stížnosti týkající se zpracování vašich osobních údajů nebo chcete-li uplatnit svá práva, obraťte se na:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(pouze pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell) nebo našeho pověřence pro ochranu osobních údajů na adrese
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Můžete nás také kontaktovat prostřednictvím formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Opdateret: 1. januar 2023
Denne meddelelse om databeskyttelse for ansøgere ("meddelelse om databeskyttelse") beskriver, hvordan Honeywell International, Inc. og dets
tilknyttede selskaber
(samlet "
Honeywell
", "
os
" eller "
vi
") behandler dine personlige oplysninger, når du tilmelder dig vores Talent Community, søger eller ansøger om et job og indsender personlige oplysninger til os via vores portal, websteder eller andre rekrutteringsmedier, uanset om de er online eller offline ("
tjenesterne
"). Vi er de dataansvarlige for dine personlige oplysninger i henhold til gældende databeskyttelseslove.
Bemærk, at hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, kan du også henvise til Honeywells globale databeskyttelsespolitik og medarbejdernes databeskyttelseserklæring, hvor en sådan findes for din jurisdiktion. Formålet med denne fortrolighedserklæring er at give dig mere detaljerede oplysninger om vores behandling af dine personlige oplysninger i forbindelse med din ansøgning.
Personlige oplysninger, vi indsamler
For at behandle din ansøgning beder vi dig om at give personlige oplysninger om dig selv, f.eks. når du ansøger om en bestemt ledig stilling via vores websted/portal, eller hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, under dit ansættelsesforhold. Alle oplysninger gives på frivillig basis, og du bestemmer selv omfanget af de oplysninger, du giver til Honeywell.
Vær opmærksom på, at nogle oplysninger kan være nødvendige for at gennemføre en evaluering af din ansøgning, og hvis de ikke gives, kan vores mulighed for at overveje dig som kandidat være begrænset.
(i)   Personlige oplysninger
Vi kan indsamle følgende personlige oplysninger om dig:
Personlige oplysninger og kontaktoplysninger, herunder e-mailadresse, telefonnummer(-er) og foto;
Professionelle og uddannelsesmæssige oplysninger relateret til din beskæftigelse, såsom dine nuværende eller tidligere arbejdsgivere, din jobtitel eller andre oplysninger om den organisation, du er tilknyttet. Du kan også angive dit CV og oplysninger om dine kvalifikationer eller din uddannelse, f.eks. dine grader, studieretninger, de institutioner, du har gået på, sprog, faglige medlemskaber, certificeringer, oplysninger om performance management ratings og kompensation;
Karrierepræferencer (f.eks. kortsigtede og langsigtede mål, villighed til at flytte, tilgængelig dato for flytning og præferencer for placering);
Personlige oplysninger, der stammer fra din deltagelse i vores rekrutteringsproces, som f.eks. dem, der opnås under interviews, de e-mails, vi udveksler med dig vedrørende din ansøgning, eller de samtaler, vi har med dig via vores online Chatbot.
Lyd- og billedoplysninger, f.eks. din stemme og dit billede, som er optaget på fotografier, video- eller lydoptagelser, hvis du deltager i et telefon- eller videointerview, eller hvis du besøger vores kontorer;
Alle andre personlige oplysninger, som du frivilligt vælger at give os.
(ii)  Følsomme personlige oplysninger
Vi kan også indsamle særlige kategorier af personlige oplysninger om dig (også kendt som "særlige kategorier af personlige oplysninger"), hvor vi har en juridisk forpligtelse til at gøre det, eller hvoroplysninger er relevante for dit fremtidige arbejdsmiljø hos Honeywell eller for fremtidig levering af ansættelsesfordele, eller med dit udtrykkelige samtykke, f.eks:
Statsligt udstedt identifikationsnummer (f.eks. et CPR-nummer);
Demografiske oplysninger, som kan omfatte oplysninger om beskyttede klassifikationer, såsom din alder, køn, race, handicap, seksuelle orientering, ægteskabelige status eller veteranstatus;
Helbredsoplysninger (for eksempel for at imødekomme et handicap, du måtte have, eller kostrestriktioner);
Oplysninger om en persons politiske holdninger, religiøse overbevisning eller medlemskab af en fagforening;
Oplysninger om en persons strafbare handlinger eller domme samt alle andre oplysninger, der anses for følsomme i henhold til gældende databeskyttelseslove. Hvor loven tillader det, og i det omfang det er relevant, kan Honeywell også være nødt til at udføre baggrunds- og/eller straffetjek for at afgøre din egnethed til en åben stilling eller mulighed hos Honeywell.
Vi kræver ikke, at du giver os følsomme personlige oplysninger, medmindre det er nødvendigt for at opfylde vores lovmæssige forpligtelser (f.eks. til overvågning af lige muligheder), eller medmindre du har givet dit udtrykkelige samtykke. Bortset fra i det omfang, det er påkrævet ved lov, vil afgivelsen af disse oplysninger være helt frivillig. Honeywell er forpligtet til at have en inkluderende og mangfoldig arbejdsstyrke. Ved at give os dine data om lige muligheder giver du os mulighed for bedre at forstå vores medarbejderprofil med hensyn til data om lige muligheder og de foranstaltninger, vi skal træffe for at tiltrække, fremme og fastholde en mangfoldig arbejdsstyrke uanset alder, handicap, køn, race, religiøse eller filosofiske overbevisninger og seksuel orientering.
(iii) Personlige oplysninger, som vi indsamler automatisk fra dig
Vi kan automatisk indsamle visse oplysninger fra dig om dit besøg på vores hjemmesider ved hjælp af "cookies" og andre lignende sporingsteknologier. For yderligere oplysninger om de cookies, vi bruger på den hjemmeside, hvor du indsender din ansøgning, bedes du læse vores
Cookie Notice
.
Kilder til personlige oplysninger
Vi kan indsamle dine personlige oplysninger direkte fra dig eller indirekte fra tredjeparter, der er lovligt berettiget til at dele dine oplysninger med os, f.eks:
Arbejdsformidlinger, udbydere af baggrunds-/ansættelsestjek eller identitetsbekræftelse;
Rekrutteringsbureauer (f.eks. når et rekrutteringsbureau identificerer dig som en potentiel kandidat);
Offentligt tilgængelige oplysninger om dig fra sider som LinkedIn eller din nuværende arbejdsgivers hjemmeside. Du kan også vælge at give os adgang til visse personlige oplysninger, der er gemt af tredjeparter (f.eks. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Ved at give Honeywell tilladelse til at få adgang til disse oplysninger accepterer du, at vi kan indsamle, opbevare og bruge disse oplysninger i overensstemmelse med denne fortrolighedserklæring;
Ved henvisning eller mund til mund (f.eks. gennem en henvisning fra en nuværende eller tidligere medarbejder). Ved henvisninger vil den person, der henviser dig, være ansvarlig for at indhente dit samtykke til at give os dine personlige oplysninger.
Formål, som personlige oplysninger bruges til
Vi bruger dine personlige oplysninger til følgende formål:
At evaluere din ansøgning og træffe beslutninger om ansættelse;
Kommunikere med dig og informere dig om rekrutteringen og/eller din(e) ansøgning(er) eller andre nødvendige meddelelser;
Overholde gældende juridiske og lovgivningsmæssige krav, og for at vi kan etablere, udøve eller forsvare et juridisk krav;
Ansættelse og virksomhedsledelse (f.eks. oprettelse af en grundlæggende ansættelsesjournal, hvis du bliver ansat);
At udføre aggregerede rapporter/analyser vedrørende kandidaternes aktivitetsdata (f.eks. trafik på karrieresiden, kandidattragt, ansættelseskilde, rekrutteringskampagnesucces);
Kun for Honeywell-medarbejdere:
For automatisk at udelukke dig fra at blive proaktivt foreslået til overvejelse til rekrutteringsfolk for en jobmulighed og er ikke berettiget til overvejelse i henhold til din nuværende HPD 9-block rating (som aldrig vil blive afsløret for nogen uden for Honeywell). Du vil dog altid kunne ansøge direkte om en ledig stilling, og din specifikke situation vil blive overvejet af en rekrutteringsmedarbejder.
Kun hvis du er bosiddende i USA:
For at sende dig kommunikation via SMS, specifikt:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikation i forbindelse med din ansøgning til en bestemt ledig stilling; og/eller
(ii)    med forbehold for dit udtrykkelige samtykke, SMS-kampagnekommunikation om beskæftigelsesmuligheder, jobanliggender og opdateringer af ansøgninger.
Du vil kunne fravælge og/eller tilbagekalde dit samtykke til at modtage ovennævnte kommunikation ved at følge instruktionerne i din profil.
Hvis du bliver tilbudt og accepterer ansættelse hos Honeywell, vil de oplysninger, der indsamles under ansøgnings- og rekrutteringsprocessen, blive en del af din ansættelsesjournal.
Automatiseret behandling og profilering
Med forbehold for dit udtrykkelige samtykke (som du frivilligt giver, når du tilmelder dig vores Talent Community, eller når du markerer det relevante samtykkefelt under ansøgningsprocessen), foretager vi "profilering" for at vurdere din egnethed til bestemte jobmuligheder. Dette indebærer brug af en matchende algoritme, der er i stand til at evaluere din beskæftigelsesprofil og forudsige din berettigelse til en bestemt jobmulighed. Vi udfører denne automatiserede behandling med henblik på:
hjælpe rekrutteringsmedarbejdere med at matche kandidatprofiler med jobmuligheder ved at foreslå kandidater, der kan komme i betragtning til en specifik jobmulighed; og
sende personlige jobanbefalinger til dig baseret på din profil og/eller dine præferencer eller andre oplysninger, der kan være af interesse for dig, såsom Honeywell-nyheder, webinarer og begivenheder.
Bemærk venligst, at du på baggrund af denne profilering muligvis ikke kommer i betragtning til visse jobmuligheder, medmindre du har søgt dem direkte.
Vi træffer ikke ansættelsesbeslutninger udelukkende baseret på automatiserede beslutningsprocesser og/eller profilering. Dine personlige oplysninger vil blive udsat for menneskeskabte beslutninger, da den endelige ansættelsesbeslutning vil blive truffet af de rekrutteringsansvarlige eller den ansættende leder.
Det juridiske grundlag for behandling af dine personlige oplysninger
Visse jurisdiktioner kræver, at Honeywell har et juridisk grundlag for at behandle dine personlige oplysninger. Hvor gældende lov kræver, at vi retfærdiggør vores behandlingsaktiviteter, vil vores juridiske grundlag for at indsamle og bruge dine personlige oplysninger som beskrevet i denne fortrolighedserklæring afhænge af de pågældende personlige oplysninger og den specifikke kontekst, hvor vi indsamler dem.
Samtykke.
Generelt vil vi normalt indsamle personlige oplysninger fra dig, hvor vi har dit samtykke til at gøre det, og hvor vi har brug for dine personlige oplysninger til at behandle din ansøgning. Ved at tilgå vores hjemmeside/portal, tilmelde dig vores Talent Community eller ansøge om en af vores stillinger, giver du dit samtykke til, at Honeywell kan indsamle og yderligere behandle de personlige oplysninger, der er beskrevet ovenfor, til de formål, der er beskrevet i denne fortrolighedserklæring. Du kan til enhver tid
trække dit samtykke tilbage
ved at indsende en anmodning via vores portal for anmodninger fra registrerede på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende os en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitime interesser.
I Honeywells legitime interesser, nemlig rekruttering, udvælgelse, evaluering og udnævnelse af nye medarbejdere og ledelse og administration af rekrutterings- og HR-processen i det omfang, vores legitime interesser ikke tilsidesættes af dine grundlæggende rettigheder og friheder.
Juridiske forpligtelser
. Overholdelse af Honeywells juridiske forpligtelser, hvor ansættelsesret eller andre love kræver behandling af dine personlige oplysninger (f.eks. i det omfang loven kræver overvågning af lige muligheder og mangfoldighed).
Vitale interesser.
Vi kan også have brug for dine personlige oplysninger for at beskytte dine vitale interesser (f.eks. af sundheds- og sikkerhedsmæssige årsager, hvis du deltager i et interview hos os).
Hvis du har spørgsmål om eller brug for yderligere oplysninger om det juridiske grundlag, hvorpå vi indsamler og bruger dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Hvem deler vi dine personlige oplysninger med?
Honeywell vil kun dele dine personlige oplysninger med tredjeparter under følgende omstændigheder:
Enheder i Honeywell-koncernen
. Vi kan dele dine personlige oplysninger med andre koncernenheder i jurisdiktioner rundt om i verden for at evaluere din profil og overveje eventuelle rekrutteringsmuligheder på koncernniveau.
Tjenesteudbydere
Vi kan specifikt dele dine personlige oplysninger med tredjeparts tjenesteudbydere, der udfører specifikke tjenester på vores vegne (for eksempel rekruttering og outsourcing af personaleudbydere og analyseudbydere). Sådanne tredjeparter kan variere afhængigt af dit land og vil ændre sig fra tid til anden, men kan omfatte Phenom People, Inc, Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. og deres respektive tredjepartsudbydere.
Medarbejdere hos Honeywell.
Hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, skal du være opmærksom på, at nogle dele af din profil er offentlige og derfor synlige for alle Honeywell-medarbejdere (især dit navn, titel, foto, færdigheder, interesseområder, erhvervserfaring og uddannelse). Sådanne sektioner kan dog redigeres, og du vil kunne vælge, hvilke oplysninger om dig der skal vises i din profil. Bemærk venligst, at karrieremål, flytningerog profilstatus "åben for nye muligheder" vil ikke være offentlige og derfor ikke synlige for alle Honeywell-medarbejdere (kun for Honeywells Talent Team).
Andre tredjeparter.
Honeywell kan dele dine personlige oplysninger med ethvert kompetent retshåndhævende organ, tilsynsmyndighed, regeringsorgan, domstol eller tredjepart, hvor vi mener, at videregivelsen er nødvendig i henhold til gældende lov eller i god tro om, at en sådan handling er nødvendig for at udøve, etablere eller forsvare vores juridiske rettigheder eller for at beskytte dine vitale interesser eller en anden persons. Vi kan også dele dine personlige oplysninger med andre med dit samtykke eller efter din anvisning (f.eks. en dommer eller en faglig sammenslutning).
Internationale overførsler af personlige oplysninger
Honeywell er en global organisation, og dine personlige oplysninger kan blive overført til, opbevaret, lagret eller brugt på forskellige steder i verden, f.eks. i USA og Indien. Det betyder, at når vi indsamler dine personlige oplysninger, kan de blive behandlet i lande, der kan have databeskyttelseslove, der er forskellige fra lovene i dit land. Honeywell vil dog altid tage rimelige skridt til at beskytte dit privatliv og give et niveau af beskyttelse af personlige oplysninger, der er sammenligneligt med det i dit bopælsland, hvilket omfatter implementering af
Europa-Kommissionens standardkontraktbestemmelser,
som kan findes på Kommissionens websted på
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Fastholdelse
Vi opbevarer dine personlige oplysninger, så længe det er nødvendigt i forbindelse med de formål, der er beskrevet i denne meddelelse om beskyttelse af personlige oplysninger, og i overensstemmelse med Honeywells tidsplan for opbevaring af optegnelser eller som krævet af gældende lovgivning.
Dine rettigheder
Afhængigt af gældende lovgivning kan du have visse rettigheder med hensyn til dine personlige oplysninger. Hvis du er bosiddende i Californien, bedes du læse “
Yderligere oplysninger for bosiddende i Californien
” nedenfor.
Du kan have ret til at få
adgang til, rette, opdatere
eller anmode om
sletning
af dine personlige oplysninger;
Du kan gøre
indsigelse
mod behandlingen af dine personlige oplysninger, bede os om at
begrænse
behandling af dine personlige oplysninger eller anmode om portabilitet af dine personlige oplysninger;
Du kan have ret til ikke at få truffet en beslutning om dig, der udelukkende er baseret på automatiseret behandling, herunder profilering, hvis denne beslutning har retsvirkninger for dig eller påvirker dig væsentligt.
Honeywell træffer ikke, som en del af sin rekrutteringsproces, udelukkende automatiserede beslutninger om kandidater.
Tilsvarende, hvis vi har indsamlet og behandlet dine personlige oplysninger med dit samtykke, kan du til enhver tid trække dit samtykke tilbage. Tilbagetrækning af dit samtykke vil ikke påvirke lovligheden af nogen behandling, vi har foretaget før din tilbagetrækning, og det vil heller ikke påvirke behandlingen af dine personlige oplysninger, der udføres i tillid til andre lovlige behandlingsgrunde end samtykke; og
Du har ret til at klage til en databeskyttelsesmyndighed over vores indsamling og brug af dine personlige oplysninger.
Vi vil lette din udøvelse af de rettigheder, der gælder for dig i overensstemmelse med gældende lovgivning. Hvis du vil udøve nogen af dine rettigheder i forbindelse med dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte os via HR Help eller formularen til anmodning om oplysninger, som du finder på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy,
eller sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Yderligere information til indbyggere i Californien
Hvis du er bosiddende i staten Californien, supplerer dette afsnit Honeywells meddelelse om beskyttelse af personoplysninger for ansøgere.
(i)      Kategorier af personlige oplysninger, der indsamles og videregives
Honeywell har indsamlet og videregivet følgende kategorier af personlige oplysninger til vores forretningsformål i de foregående tolv måneder:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi indsamler
A.
Identifikatorer såsom navn, fødselsdato, køn, e-mailadresse, telefonnumre, postadresse, online-identifikatorer, konto på sociale medier og andre identifikatorer.
Ja
C.
Karakteristika for beskyttede klassifikationer i henhold til californisk eller føderal lovgivning, såsom race, etnicitet, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning, fagforeningsmedlemskab, sundhedsdata, biometriske oplysninger, genetiske data, handicap, veteranstatus, seksuel orientering, personlig post, e-mail og sms-beskeder (medmindre Honeywell er den tilsigtede modtager), offentlige identifikatorer (f.eks. personnummer), kørekort, pas, finansielle oplysninger og bankoplysninger.
Ja
F.
Oplysninger om internet- eller andre elektroniske netværksaktiviteter, f.eks. browserhistorik, interaktioner med Honeywell-websteder, e-mail- og tekstbeskedtjenester.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, såsom enhedens placering og IP-placering.
Ja
H.
Lyd-, elektroniske, visuelle, termiske eller lignende oplysninger, såsom din stemme og dit billede, video- eller lydoptagelser, hvis du deltager i et telefon- eller videointerview, eller hvis du besøger vores kontorer.
Ja
I.
Professionelle eller ansættelsesrelaterede oplysninger såsom din beskæftigelse, nuværende eller tidligere arbejdsgivere, jobtitel, uddannelseshistorik, akademiske og professionelle kvalifikationer, CV, jobhistorik, ansættelsesreferencer, interviewnoter og -vurderinger, sprog, professionelle medlemskaber, certificeringer, performance management ratings, kompensation, lokationspræferencer og rejsepræferencer.
Ja
K.
Slutninger, der drages fra enhver af de personlige oplysninger, der er anført ovenfor, for at skabe en profil eller et resumé om f.eks. en persons præferencer og karakteristika.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dine rettigheder
Du har ret til at sende os en anmodning om følgende rettigheder, der dækker den tolvmåneders periode, der går forud for din anmodning. Bemærk venligst, at disse rettigheder ikke er absolutte og i visse tilfælde er underlagt begrænsninger som angivet i gældende lovgivning:
Retten til at vide, hvilke personlige oplysninger vi har indsamlet om dig, de kategorier af kilder, hvorfra vi har indsamlet dine personlige oplysninger, det forretningsmæssige eller kommercielle formål, som vi har indsamlet dine personlige oplysninger til, og de kategorier af tredjeparter, som vi videregiver dine personlige oplysninger til;
Retten til at slette dine personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at rette unøjagtige personlige oplysninger om dig;
Retten til at fravælge salg eller deling af dine personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at begrænse behandlingen af dine følsomme personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at være fri for ulovlig diskrimination, når du udøver dine rettigheder i henhold til gældende love.
Vi vil lette din udøvelse af de rettigheder, der gælder for dig i overensstemmelse med gældende lovgivning, og i betragtning af typen og følsomheden af de personlige oplysninger, der er genstand for anmodningen, kan vi af hensyn til din beskyttelse være nødt til at anmode om verificering af din identitet og anmode om yderligere oplysninger fra dig.
Hvis du vil udøve nogen af dine rettigheder i forbindelse med dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte os via formularen til anmodning om dataemne, der findes på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, kan du kontakte os på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt os
Hvis du har spørgsmål eller klager over, hvordan dine personlige oplysninger behandles, eller ønsker at udøve dine rettigheder, bedes du kontakte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(kun hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell) eller vores databeskyttelsesansvarlige på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan også kontakte os via formularen til anmodning fra den registrerede, som du finder på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Bijgewerkt: 1 januari 2023
In deze Privacykennisgeving voor sollicitanten ("Privacykennisgeving") wordt beschreven hoe Honeywell International, Inc. en haar
dochterondernemingen
(gezamenlijk "
Honeywell
", "
wij
" of "
wij
") uw persoonsgegevens verwerken wanneer u lid wordt van onze Talent Community, een functie zoekt of solliciteert en persoonsgegevens aan ons verstrekt via onze portal, websites of andere wervingsmedia, zowel online als offline (de "
Services
"). Wij zijn de beheerders van uw persoonsgegevens voor de doeleinden van de toepasselijke wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming.
Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, kunt u ook het privacybeleid voor wereldwijde gegevens van Honeywell en het privacybeleid voor medewerkers raadplegen, indien dit voor uw rechtsgebied bestaat. Het doel van deze Privacykennisgeving is om u meer gedetailleerde informatie te geven over onze verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens in verband met uw sollicitatie.
Persoonlijke gegevens die we verzamelen
Om uw sollicitatie te verwerken, vragen wij u om persoonsgegevens over uzelf te verstrekken, bijvoorbeeld wanneer u solliciteert op een bepaalde vacature via onze website/portaal of, als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, tijdens uw arbeidsrelatie. Alle gegevens worden op vrijwillige basis verstrekt en u bepaalt zelf hoeveel gegevens u aan Honeywell verstrekt.
Houd er rekening mee dat sommige informatie nodig kan zijn om een evaluatie van uw sollicitatie te voltooien en als deze informatie niet wordt verstrekt, kunnen onze mogelijkheden om u als kandidaat in aanmerking te nemen worden beperkt.
(i)   Persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen de volgende persoonlijke gegevens over u verzamelen:
Persoonlijke gegevens en contactgegevens zoals e-mailadres, telefoonnummer(s) en foto;
Professionele en educatieve informatie met betrekking tot uw beroep, zoals uw huidige of vorige werkgevers, uw functietitel of andere informatie over de organisatie waaraan u verbonden bent. U kunt ook uw cv en informatie over uw kwalificaties of opleiding verstrekken, zoals uw diploma's, studierichtingen, de instellingen die u hebt bezocht, talen, professionele lidmaatschappen, certificeringen, details over prestatiebeheer en compensatie;
Carrièrevoorkeuren (bv. doelen op korte en lange termijn, bereidheid om te verhuizen, datum beschikbaar om te verhuizen en locatievoorkeuren);
Persoonsgegevens die zijn afgeleid van uw deelname aan ons wervingsproces, zoals bijvoorbeeld de gegevens die zijn verkregen tijdens sollicitatiegesprekken, de e-mails die we met u uitwisselen over uw sollicitatie of de gesprekken die we met u voeren via onze online Chatbot.
Audio- en visuele informatie, zoals uw stem en beeltenis zoals vastgelegd op foto's, video- of audio-opnamen als u deelneemt aan een telefoon- of video-interview of als u onze kantoren bezoekt;
Alle andere persoonlijke informatie die u vrijwillig aan ons verstrekt.
(ii)  Gevoelige persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen ook speciale categorieën van persoonlijke gegevens over u verzamelen (ook wel "speciale categorieën van persoonlijke gegevens" genoemd) wanneer we hiertoe wettelijk verplicht zijn, of de gegevens relevant zijn voor uw toekomstige werkomgeving bij Honeywell of voor de toekomstige verstrekking van arbeidsvoorwaarden, of met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming, zoals:
Door de overheid uitgegeven identificatienummer (zoals een burgerservicenummer);
Demografische informatie, die informatie kan bevatten over beschermde classificaties, zoals uw leeftijd, geslacht, ras, handicap, seksuele geaardheid, burgerlijke staat of veteranenstatus;
Gezondheidsinformatie (bijvoorbeeld om rekening te houden met een eventuele handicap of dieetbeperkingen);
Informatie met betrekking tot iemands politieke opvattingen of religieuze overtuigingen of lidmaatschap van een vakbond;
Informatie over strafbare feiten of veroordelingen van een persoon, evenals andere informatie die als gevoelig wordt beschouwd onder de toepasselijke wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming. Indien wettelijk toegestaan en voor zover van toepassing, moet Honeywell mogelijk ook achtergrond- en/of strafrechtelijke controles uitvoeren om uw geschiktheid voor een open functie of mogelijkheid bij Honeywell te bepalen.
We vragen je niet om ons gevoelige persoonlijke informatie te verstrekken, tenzij dit noodzakelijk is voor het uitvoeren van onze wettelijke verplichtingen (bijv. voor het monitoren van gelijke kansen), of tenzij je hiervoor expliciet toestemming hebt gegeven. Tenzij dit wettelijk verplicht is, is het verstrekken van deze gegevens geheel vrijwillig. Honeywell streeft naar een echt inclusief en divers personeelsbestand. Door ons uw gegevens over gelijke kansen te verstrekken, stelt u ons in staat een beter inzicht te krijgen in ons werknemersprofiel op het gebied van gelijke kansen en de maatregelen die wij moeten nemen om een divers personeelsbestand aan te trekken, te bevorderen en te behouden, ongeacht leeftijd, handicap, geslacht, ras, religieuze of filosofische overtuigingen en seksuele geaardheid.
(iii) Persoonlijke gegevens die we automatisch van u verzamelen
Wij kunnen automatisch bepaalde informatie over uw bezoek aan onze websites verzamelen met behulp van "cookies" en andere soortgelijke traceertechnologieën. Voor meer informatie over de cookies die wij gebruiken op de website via welke u uw sollicitatie indient, kunt u onze
Cookie Notice
lezen.
Bronnen van persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens direct van u verzamelen of indirect van derden die wettelijk gerechtigd zijn om uw gegevens met ons te delen, zoals:
Uitzendbureaus, dienstverleners op het gebied van antecedentenonderzoek of identiteitscontrole;
Wervingsbureaus (bijvoorbeeld wanneer een wervingsbureau u als potentiële kandidaat identificeert);
Openbaar beschikbare informatie over jou van sites zoals LinkedIn of de website van je huidige werkgever. U kunt er ook voor kiezen om ons toegang te geven tot bepaalde persoonsgegevens die zijn opgeslagen door derden (bijvoorbeeld LinkedIn, Twitter, Google of Facebook). Door Honeywell toestemming te geven voor toegang tot deze gegevens, gaat u ermee akkoord dat wij deze gegevens kunnen verzamelen, opslaan en gebruiken in overeenstemming met dit Privacybericht;
Door referentie of mond-tot-mondreclame (bijvoorbeeld door een verwijzing van een huidige of voormalige werknemer). Bij doorverwijzingen is de persoon die u doorverwijst verantwoordelijk voor het verkrijgen van uw toestemming om uw persoonlijke gegevens aan ons te verstrekken.
Doeleinden waarvoor persoonlijke informatie wordt gebruikt
Wij gebruiken uw persoonlijke gegevens voor de volgende doeleinden:
Om je sollicitatie te evalueren en beslissingen over aanwerving te nemen;
Met u communiceren en u informeren over de werving en/of uw sollicitatie(s) of andere vereiste communicatie;
Voldoen aan toepasselijke wettelijke en regelgevende vereisten en om ons in staat te stellen een rechtsvordering in te stellen, uit te oefenen of te verdedigen;
Tewerkstelling en bedrijfsmanagement (bijvoorbeeld een basis arbeidsverleden opstellen als je wordt aangenomen);
Samengevoegde rapporten / analyses uitvoeren met betrekking tot de activiteitsgegevens van kandidaten (bijv. verkeer op carrièresites, kandidaatfunnel, bron van aanwerving, succes van wervingscampagnes);
Alleen voor werknemers van Honeywell
:
Om u automatisch uit te sluiten van proactief voorstellen aan recruiters voor een vacature en niet in aanmerking te laten komen voor een overweging op basis van uw huidige HPD 9-blokkenscore (die nooit zal worden onthuld aan iemand buiten Honeywell). U kunt echter altijd rechtstreeks solliciteren naar elke beschikbare vacature en uw specifieke situatie zal worden bekeken door een recruiter.
Alleen als u een inwoner van de Verenigde Staten bent
:
Om u berichten te sturen via SMS, met name:
(i)     1-1 SMS-communicatie in verband met uw sollicitatie naar een bepaalde vacature; en/of
(ii)    met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming, SMS-campagneberichten over vacatures, vacatures en sollicitatie-updates.
Je kunt je afmelden en/of je toestemming voor het ontvangen van de bovengenoemde communicatie intrekken door de instructies in je profiel te volgen.
Als u een baan bij Honeywell krijgt aangeboden en accepteert, worden de gegevens die tijdens de sollicitatie- en wervingsprocedure zijn verzameld, onderdeel van uw personeelsdossier.
Geautomatiseerde verwerking en profilering
Met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming (die u vrijwillig geeft wanneer u lid wordt van onze Talent Community of wanneer u het betreffende toestemmingsvakje aanvinkt tijdens de sollicitatieprocedure), voeren we 'profilering' uit om uw geschiktheid voor bepaalde vacatures te beoordelen. Hierbij wordt gebruik gemaakt van een matching-algoritme dat in staat is om uw werkgelegenheidsprofiel te evalueren en te voorspellen of u in aanmerking komt voor een bepaalde vacature. Wij voeren deze geautomatiseerde verwerking uit met het oog op:
recruiters helpen het profiel van kandidaten af te stemmen op vacatures door kandidaten voor te stellen voor een specifieke vacature; en
het verzenden van gepersonaliseerde functieaanbevelingen aan u op basis van uw profiel en/of voorkeuren of andere informatie die voor u interessant kan zijn, zoals Honeywell-nieuws, webinars en evenementen.
Houd er rekening mee dat je op basis van deze profilering mogelijk niet in aanmerking komt voor bepaalde vacatures, tenzij je er direct naar hebt gesolliciteerd.
We nemen geen wervingsbeslissingen uitsluitend op basis van geautomatiseerde besluitvormingsprocessen en/of profilering. Uw persoonlijke gegevens worden onderworpen aan menselijke beslissingen, aangezien de uiteindelijke aanwervingsbeslissing wordt genomen door de recruiters of de aanwervende manager.
De rechtsgrondslagen voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens
Bepaalde rechtsgebieden vereisen dat Honeywell een rechtsgrondslag heeft voor de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens. Wanneer de toepasselijke wetgeving vereist dat wij onze verwerkingsactiviteiten rechtvaardigen, is onze rechtsgrondslag voor het verzamelen en gebruiken van uw persoonsgegevens zoals beschreven in dit Privacy notice afhankelijk van de betreffende persoonsgegevens en de specifieke context waarin wij deze verzamelen.
Toestemming.
Over het algemeen verzamelen wij persoonsgegevens van u wanneer wij hiervoor uw toestemming hebben en wanneer wij uw persoonsgegevens nodig hebben om uw sollicitatie te verwerken. Door onze website/portaal te bezoeken, lid te worden van onze Talent Community of te solliciteren op een van onze vacatures, geeft u Honeywell toestemming om de hierboven beschreven persoonsgegevens te verzamelen en verder te verwerken voor de in dit Privacy notice beschreven doeleinden. U kunt uw toestemming op elk gewenst moment intrekken door een verzoek in te dienen via onze portal voor het aanvragen van gegevens door betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
of door een e-mail te sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitieme belangen.
In het legitieme belang van Honeywell, namelijk de werving, selectie, evaluatie en aanstelling van nieuwe werknemers en het beheer en de administratie van de werving en het HR-proces, voor zover onze legitieme belangen niet zwaarder wegen dan uw fundamentele rechten en vrijheden.
Wettelijke verplichtingen
. Voldoen aan de wettelijke verplichtingen van Honeywell wanneer de arbeidswetgeving of andere wetten de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens vereisen (bijvoorbeeld voor zover de wet het toezicht op gelijke kansen en diversiteit vereist).
Vitale belangen.
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens ook nodig hebben om uw vitale belangen te beschermen (bijvoorbeeld gezondheids- en veiligheidsredenen als u een interview bijwoont op onze locatie)
Als u vragen hebt over of meer informatie wilt over de rechtsgrondslag waarop we uw persoonlijke gegevens verzamelen en gebruiken, stuur dan een e-mail naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Met wie we uw persoonlijke gegevens delen
Honeywell deelt uw persoonsgegevens alleen onder de volgende omstandigheden met derden:
Honeywell groepsentiteiten
. Wij kunnen uw persoonsgegevens delen met andere groepsentiteiten in rechtsgebieden over de hele wereld om uw profiel te evalueren en in aanmerking te komen voor wervingsmogelijkheden op groepsniveau.
Serviceproviders
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens specifiek delen met externe serviceproviders die specifieke diensten namens ons uitvoeren (bijvoorbeeld leveranciers van wervings- en outsourcingpersoneel en analyseproviders). Dergelijke derden kunnen variëren afhankelijk van uw land en zullen van tijd tot tijd veranderen, maar kunnen Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. en hun respectieve externe leveranciers omvatten.
Honeywell-werknemers.
Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, moet u er rekening mee houden dat sommige gedeelten van uw profiel openbaar zijn en dus zichtbaar voor alle medewerkers van Honeywell (met name uw naam, titel, foto, vaardigheden, interessegebieden, werkervaring en opleiding). Deze secties kunnen echter worden bewerkt en u kunt kiezen welke informatie over u wordt weergegeven op uw profiel. Houd er rekening mee dat de carrièredoelen, verhuizingenen profielstatus "open voor nieuwe mogelijkheden" zijn niet openbaar en daarom niet zichtbaar voor alle medewerkers van Honeywell (alleen voor het Talent Team van Honeywell).
Andere derden.
Honeywell kan uw persoonsgegevens delen met een bevoegde wetshandhavingsinstantie, toezichthouder, overheidsinstantie, rechtbank of derde partij wanneer wij van mening zijn dat de openbaarmaking noodzakelijk is volgens de toepasselijke wetgeving of wanneer wij te goeder trouw geloven dat een dergelijke actie noodzakelijk is om onze wettelijke rechten uit te oefenen, vast te stellen of te verdedigen of om uw vitale belangen of die van een andere persoon te beschermen. We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens ook delen met anderen met uw toestemming of op uw aanwijzing (bijvoorbeeld een scheidsrechter of beroepsvereniging).
Internationale overdracht van persoonlijke gegevens
Honeywell is een wereldwijde organisatie en uw persoonsgegevens kunnen worden overgedragen naar, bewaard, opgeslagen of gebruikt op verschillende locaties wereldwijd, zoals de VS en India. Dit betekent dat wanneer wij uw persoonsgegevens verzamelen, deze kunnen worden verwerkt in landen waar de wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming mogelijk afwijkt van de wetgeving in uw land. Honeywell zal echter altijd redelijke maatregelen nemen om uw privacy te beschermen en een niveau van bescherming van persoonsgegevens te bieden dat vergelijkbaar is met dat van het land waarin u woont, zoals het implementeren van
de standaardcontractbepalingen van de Europese Commissie
die te vinden zijn op de website van de Commissie op
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Behoud
Wij bewaren uw persoonsgegevens zo lang als nodig is in verband met de in dit Privacybericht beschreven doeleinden en in overeenstemming met het schema voor het bewaren van gegevens van Honeywell of zoals vereist door de toepasselijke wetgeving.
Uw rechten
Afhankelijk van de toepasselijke wetgeving kunt u bepaalde rechten hebben met betrekking tot uw persoonlijke gegevens. Als u in Californië woont, raadpleeg dan “
Aanvullende informatie voor inwoners van Californië
” hieronder.
U kunt het recht hebben om uw persoonlijke gegevens
in te zien, te corrigeren, bij te werken
of te laten
verwijderen
;
U kunt
bezwaar maken
tegen de verwerking van uw persoonlijke gegevens, ons vragen om verwerking van uw persoonlijke gegevens of verzoeken om
overdraagbaarheid
van uw persoonlijke gegevens;
U hebt mogelijk het recht om een besluit over u dat uitsluitend is gebaseerd op geautomatiseerde verwerking, waaronder profilering, te weigeren als dat besluit rechtsgevolgen voor u heeft of aanzienlijke gevolgen voor u heeft.
Honeywell neemt, als onderdeel van het wervingsproces, geen uitsluitend geautomatiseerde beslissingen over kandidaten
.
Ook als we uw persoonsgegevens met uw toestemming hebben verzameld en verwerkt, kunt u uw toestemming te allen tijde intrekken. Het intrekken van uw toestemming heeft geen invloed op de rechtmatigheid van de verwerking die we hebben uitgevoerd voordat u uw toestemming introk, noch op de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens op andere rechtmatige verwerkingsgronden dan toestemming; en
U hebt het recht om een klacht in te dienen bij een gegevensbeschermingsautoriteit over het verzamelen en gebruiken van uw persoonlijke gegevens door ons.
We zullen u helpen bij het uitoefenen van de rechten die op u van toepassing zijn in overeenstemming met de toepasselijke wetgeving. Als u gebruik wilt maken van uw rechten met betrekking tot uw persoonlijke gegevens, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via HR Help of het formulier voor het aanvragen van gegevens op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy
of een e-mail sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Aanvullende informatie voor inwoners van Californië
Als u inwoner bent van de staat Californië, is dit gedeelte een aanvulling op de Privacykennisgeving voor aanvragers van Honeywell.
(i)      Categorieën van verzamelde en openbaar gemaakte persoonlijke gegevens
Honeywell heeft in de afgelopen twaalf maanden de volgende categorieën persoonsgegevens verzameld en verstrekt voor onze bedrijfsdoeleinden:
Previous column
Next column
Categorieën
We verzamelen
A.
Identificatiegegevens zoals naam, geboortedatum, geslacht, e-mailadres, telefoonnummers, postadres, online identificatiegegevens, social media-account en andere identificatiegegevens.
Ja
C.
Kenmerken van beschermde classificaties onder Californische of federale wetgeving, zoals ras, etniciteit, religieuze of filosofische overtuigingen, lidmaatschap van een vakbond, gezondheidsgegevens, biometrische informatie, genetische gegevens, handicap, veteranenstatus, seksuele geaardheid, persoonlijke post, e-mail en sms-berichten (tenzij Honeywell de beoogde ontvanger is), identificatiegegevens van de overheid (bijv. sofi-nummer), rijbewijs, paspoort, financiële en bankgegevens.
Ja
F.
Gegevens over internet- of andere elektronische netwerkactiviteiten, zoals browsergeschiedenis, interacties met websites van Honeywell, e-mail en sms-services.
Ja
G.
Geolocatiegegevens, zoals apparaatlocatie en IP-locatie.
Ja
H.
Audio-, elektronische, visuele, thermische of soortgelijke informatie, zoals uw stem en beeld, video- of audio-opnames als u deelneemt aan een telefoon- of video-interview of als u onze kantoren bezoekt.
Ja
I.
Professionele of werkgerelateerde informatie zoals uw beroep, huidige of vorige werkgevers, functietitel, onderwijsgeschiedenis, academische en professionele kwalificaties, cv, functiegeschiedenis, aanwervingsreferenties, gespreksnotities en beoordelingen, talen, professionele lidmaatschappen, certificeringen, prestatiemanagementbeoordelingen, compensatie, locatievoorkeuren en reisvoorkeuren.
Ja
K.
Conclusies die worden getrokken uit de bovenstaande persoonlijke informatie om een profiel of samenvatting te maken over bijvoorbeeld de voorkeuren en kenmerken van een persoon.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Uw rechten
U hebt het recht om ons een verzoek te sturen voor de volgende rechten met betrekking tot de periode van twaalf maanden die voorafgaat aan uw verzoek. Houd er rekening mee dat deze rechten niet absoluut zijn en in bepaalde gevallen onderworpen zijn aan beperkingen zoals gespecificeerd in de toepasselijke wetgeving:
Het recht om te weten welke persoonlijke gegevens we over u hebben verzameld, de categorieën bronnen waarvan we uw persoonlijke gegevens hebben verzameld, het zakelijke of commerciële doel waarvoor we uw persoonlijke gegevens hebben verzameld en de categorieën derden waarmee we uw persoonlijke gegevens openbaar maken;
Het recht om uw persoonlijke gegevens te verwijderen;
Het recht om onjuiste persoonlijke informatie over u te corrigeren;
Het recht om af te zien van de verkoop of het delen van uw persoonlijke gegevens;
Het recht om de verwerking van uw gevoelige persoonlijke gegevens te beperken;
Het recht om gevrijwaard te blijven van onwettige discriminatie bij het uitoefenen van uw rechten onder de toepasselijke wetgeving.
We zullen u helpen bij het uitoefenen van de rechten die op u van toepassing zijn in overeenstemming met de toepasselijke wetgeving en, gezien het type en de gevoeligheid van de persoonlijke informatie waarop het verzoek betrekking heeft, kan het voor uw bescherming nodig zijn dat we uw identiteit verifiëren en u om aanvullende informatie vragen.
Als u uw rechten met betrekking tot uw persoonsgegevens wilt uitoefenen, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via het aanvraagformulier voor betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
of een e-mail sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Neem contact met ons op
Als u vragen of klachten hebt over de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens of als u uw rechten wilt uitoefenen, kunt u contact opnemen met:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(alleen als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent) of onze functionaris voor gegevensbescherming op
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
U kunt ook contact met ons opnemen via het aanvraagformulier voor betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Päivitetty: 1 tammikuuta 2023
Tässä hakijoiden tietosuojailmoituksessa ("tietosuojailmoitus") kuvataan, miten Honeywell International, Inc. ja sen
tytäryhtiöt
(yhdessä "
Honeywell
", "
me
" tai "
me
") käsittelevät henkilötietojasi, kun liityt osaajayhteisöömme, haet tai haet työpaikkaa ja toimitat meille henkilötietojasi portaalimme, verkkosivujemme tai muiden rekrytointivälineiden kautta, joko verkossa tai muualla ("
palvelut
"). Me olemme henkilötietojesi rekisterinpitäjiä sovellettavien tietosuojalakien mukaisesti.
Huomaa, että jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, voit tutustua myös Honeywellin maailmanlaajuiseen tietosuojakäytäntöön ja työntekijän tietosuojailmoitukseen, jos sellainen on olemassa omalla alueellasi. Tämän tietosuojailmoituksen tarkoituksena on antaa sinulle yksityiskohtaisempaa tietoa siitä, miten käsittelemme henkilötietojasi hakemuksesi yhteydessä.
Keräämämme henkilötiedot
Hakemuksesi käsittelyä varten pyydämme sinua antamaan henkilökohtaisia tietoja itsestäsi esimerkiksi silloin, kun haet tiettyä avointa työpaikkaa verkkosivustomme/portaalimme kautta tai, jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, työsuhteen aikana. Kaikkien tietojen antaminen on vapaaehtoista, ja sinä päätät, kuinka paljon tietoja annat Honeywellille.
Muistathan, että jotkin tiedot saattavat olla tarpeen hakemuksesi arvioimiseksi, ja jos niitä ei toimiteta, voimme rajoittaa mahdollisuuksiamme ottaa sinut huomioon hakijana.
(i)   Henkilökohtaiset tiedot
Saatamme kerätä sinusta seuraavia henkilötietoja:
Henkilö- ja yhteystiedot, mukaan lukien sähköpostiosoite, puhelinnumero(t) ja valokuva;
Ammattiisi liittyvät ammatti- ja koulutustiedot, kuten nykyiset tai aiemmat työnantajasi, ammattinimikkeesi tai muut tiedot organisaatiosta, johon olet yhteydessä. Voit myös antaa ansioluettelosi/ansioluettelosi ja tietoja pätevyydestäsi tai koulutuksestasi, kuten tutkintosi, opintoalasi, oppilaitokset, joissa olet opiskellut, kielet, ammattijäsenyydet, todistukset, tiedot suorituksenhallinnan arvioinneista ja korvauksista;
uratoiveet (esim. lyhyen ja pitkän aikavälin tavoitteet, halukkuus siirtyä muualle, mahdollinen siirtymisajankohta ja sijaintivalinnat);
Henkilötiedot, jotka ovat peräisin osallistumisestasi rekrytointiprosessiimme, kuten esimerkiksi haastattelujen aikana saadut tiedot, sähköpostiviestit, joita vaihdamme kanssasi hakemukseesi liittyen, tai keskustelut, joita käymme kanssasi verkkokeskustelurobotin kautta.
Ääni- ja kuvatiedot, kuten äänesi ja kuvasi valokuvissa, video- tai äänitallenteissa, jos osallistut puhelin- tai videohaastatteluun tai jos vierailet toimistossamme;
muut henkilötiedot, jotka annat meille vapaaehtoisesti.
(ii)  Arkaluonteiset henkilötiedot
Voimme myös kerätä sinusta erityisiä henkilötietoryhmiä (tunnetaan myös nimellä "erityiset henkilötietoryhmät"), jos meillä on lakisääteinen velvollisuus tehdä niin tai jos tiedot ovat merkityksellisiä tulevan työympäristösi kannalta Honeywellissä tai työsuhde-etuuksien tarjoamiseksi tulevaisuudessa tai nimenomaisella suostumuksellasi, kuten:
Valtion myöntämä tunnistenumero (kuten sosiaaliturvatunnus);
Demografiset tiedot, jotka voivat sisältää tietoja suojatuista luokituksista, kuten iästäsi, sukupuolestasi, rodustasi, vammaisuudestasi, seksuaalisesta suuntautumisestasi, siviilisäädystäsi tai veteraanistasi;
Terveystiedot (esimerkiksi mahdollisen vamman tai ruokavaliorajoitusten huomioon ottamiseksi);
Henkilön poliittisia mielipiteitä tai uskonnollista vakaumusta tai ammattiyhdistyksen jäsenyyttä koskevat tiedot;
tiedot henkilön rikoksista tai tuomioista sekä muut tiedot, joita pidetään arkaluonteisina sovellettavien tietosuojalakien nojalla. Lain sallimissa rajoissa ja soveltuvin osin Honeywell saattaa myös joutua tekemään taustatutkimuksia ja/tai rikostutkimuksia määrittääkseen, soveltuuko henkilö Honeywellin avoinna olevaan tehtävään tai tilaisuuteen.
Emme vaadi sinua antamaan meille arkaluonteisia henkilötietoja, paitsi jos se on tarpeen lakisääteisten velvoitteidemme täyttämiseksi (esim. yhtäläisten mahdollisuuksien valvomiseksi) tai jos et ole antanut siihen nimenomaista suostumustasi. Näiden tietojen antaminen on täysin vapaaehtoista, ellei laki sitä vaadi. Honeywell on sitoutunut todella osallistavaan ja monimuotoiseen työvoimaan. Antamalla meille tasa-arvotietosi annat meille mahdollisuuden ymmärtää paremmin työntekijäprofiiliamme tasa-arvotietojen kannalta ja toimia, joita meidän on toteutettava houkutellaksemme, edistääkseen ja pitääkksemme monipuolisen työvoiman iästä, vammaisuudesta, sukupuolesta, rodusta, uskonnollisesta tai filosofisesta vakaumuksesta ja seksuaalisesta suuntautumisesta riippumatta.
(iii) Henkilötiedot, joita keräämme sinulta automaattisesti
Saatamme automaattisesti kerätä sinulta tiettyjä tietoja vierailustasi verkkosivustoillamme käyttämällä "evästeitä" ja muita vastaavia seurantatekniikoita. Lisätietoja evästeistä, joita käytämme verkkosivustolla, jonka kautta lähetät hakemuksesi, saat
evästeitä koskevasta ilmoituksestamme
.
Henkilötietojen lähteet
Voimme kerätä henkilötietojasi suoraan sinulta tai välillisesti kolmansilta osapuolilta, joilla on laillinen oikeus jakaa tietojasi kanssamme, kuten:
Työnvälitystoimistot, tausta-/työllistämistarkastusten tai henkilöllisyyden todentamispalvelujen tarjoajat;
Rekrytointitoimistot (esimerkiksi kun rekrytointitoimisto tunnistaa sinut potentiaalisena ehdokkaana);
Julkisesti saatavilla olevat tiedot sinusta esimerkiksi LinkedInin tai nykyisen työnantajasi verkkosivuston kaltaisilta sivustoilta. Voit myös halutessasi antaa meille pääsyn tiettyihin kolmansien osapuolten (esimerkiksi LinkedIn, Twitter, Google tai Facebook) tallentamiin henkilötietoihin. Antaessasi Honeywellille luvan päästä käsiksi näihin tietoihin hyväksyt, että voimme kerätä, tallentaa ja käyttää näitä tietoja tämän tietosuojailmoituksen mukaisesti;
Referenssin tai suullisen tiedon perusteella (esimerkiksi nykyisen tai entisen työntekijän suosittelemana). Kun kyseessä on suosittelu, suositteleva henkilö on vastuussa siitä, että saat suostumuksesi henkilötietojesi toimittamiseen meille.
Henkilötietojen käyttötarkoitukset
Käytämme henkilötietojasi seuraaviin tarkoituksiin:
Hakemuksesi arvioimiseksi ja työhönottopäätösten tekemiseksi;
yhteydenpito sinuun ja tiedottaminen rekrytoinnista ja/tai hakemuksestasi (hakemuksistasi) tai muusta tarvittavasta viestinnästä;
Sovellettavien oikeudellisten ja sääntelyvaatimusten noudattaminen ja oikeudellisen vaateen laatiminen, käyttäminen tai puolustaminen;
Työsuhde- ja yritysjohtaminen (esimerkiksi perustyörekisterin laatiminen, jos sinut palkataan);
Ehdokkaiden toimintatietoja koskevien yhteenlaskettujen raporttien/analyysien laatiminen (esim. urasivuston kävijämäärät, ehdokkaiden kanavointi, palkkauksen lähde, rekrytointikampanjan onnistuminen);
Vain Honeywellin työntekijöille
:
HPD 9-block -luokituksesi perusteella (jota ei koskaan paljasteta kenellekään Honeywellin ulkopuoliselle). Voit kuitenkin aina hakea suoraan mitä tahansa tarjolla olevaa työpaikkaa, ja rekrytoija harkitsee erityistilanteesi.
Vain jos asut Yhdysvalloissa
:
Erityisesti viestinnän lähettämiseksi sinulle tekstiviestillä:
(i)     1-1 tekstiviestiviestintä, joka liittyy hakemukseesi tiettyyn avoinna olevaan työpaikkaan; ja/tai
(ii)    nimenomaisella
suostumuksellasi
tekstiviestikampanjaviestintä työllistymismahdollisuuksista, työasioista ja hakuilmoitusten päivityksistä.
Voit kieltäytyä vastaanottamasta edellä mainittuja viestejä ja/tai peruuttaa suostumuksesi niiden vastaanottamiseen profiilissasi annettujen ohjeiden mukaisesti.
Jos sinulle tarjotaan työtä Honeywellin palveluksessa ja hyväksyt sen, hakemus- ja rekrytointiprosessin aikana kerätyistä tiedoista tulee osa työrekisteriasi.
Automatisoitu käsittely ja profilointi
Edellyttäen, että annat siihen nimenomaisen suostumuksesi (jonka annat vapaaehtoisesti liittyessäsi Talent-yhteisöömme tai merkitessäsi asianmukaisen suostumusruutuun hakuprosessin aikana), teemme profilointia arvioidaksemme soveltuvuuttasi tiettyihin työmahdollisuuksiin. Tässä yhteydessä käytetään algoritmia, joka pystyy arvioimaan työprofiilisi ja ennustamaan soveltuvuutesi tiettyyn työmahdollisuuteen. Suoritamme tätä automaattista käsittelyä seuraavia tarkoituksia varten:
auttaa rekrytoijia sovittamaan ehdokkaiden profiilit yhteen työtilaisuuksien kanssa ehdottamalla ehdokkaita harkittavaksi tiettyyn työtilaisuuteen; ja
henkilökohtaisten työsuositusten lähettäminen sinulle profiilisi ja/tai mieltymystesi perusteella tai muiden sinua mahdollisesti kiinnostavien tietojen, kuten Honeywellin uutisten, webinaarien ja tapahtumien, lähettäminen.
Huomaa, että tämän profiloinnin perusteella sinua ei välttämättä oteta huomioon tietyissä työmahdollisuuksissa, ellet ole hakenut niitä suoraan.
Emme tee työhönottopäätöksiä, jotka perustuvat yksinomaan automatisoituihin päätöksentekoprosesseihin ja/tai profilointiin. Henkilötietojasi koskevat inhimilliset päätökset, sillä rekrytoijat tai rekrytointipäällikkö tekevät lopullisen rekrytointipäätöksen.
Henkilökohtaisten tietojesi käsittelyn oikeusperustat
Tietyillä lainkäyttöalueilla Honeywelliltä vaaditaan oikeusperusta henkilötietojesi käsittelylle. Jos sovellettava laki edellyttää, että meidän on perusteltava käsittelytoimintamme, oikeusperustamme henkilötietojesi keräämiselle ja käyttämiselle tässä tietosuojailmoituksessa kuvatulla tavalla riippuu kyseisistä henkilötiedoista ja erityisestä asiayhteydestä, jossa keräämme niitä.
Suostumus.
Yleisesti ottaen keräämme henkilötietojasi yleensä silloin, kun meillä on siihen suostumuksesi ja kun tarvitsemme henkilötietojasi hakemuksesi käsittelyä varten. Käyttämällä verkkosivustoamme/portaaliamme, liittymällä Talent-yhteisöömme tai hakemalla johonkin työpaikkaamme annat Honeywellille suostumuksesi kerätä ja käsitellä edelleen edellä kuvattuja henkilötietoja tässä tietosuojaselosteessa kuvattuihin tarkoituksiin. Voit peruuttaa suostumuksesi milloin tahansa lähettämällä pyynnön rekisteröityjen pyyntöportaalimme kautta osoitteessa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
tai lähettämällä meille sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oikeutetut edut.
Honeywellin oikeutetut edut, eli uusien työntekijöiden rekrytointi, valinta, arviointi ja nimittäminen sekä rekrytointi- ja henkilöstöprosessin hallinta ja hallinnointi, siinä määrin kuin perusoikeutesi ja -vapauksiesi ei syrjäytä oikeutettuja etujamme.
Lakisääteiset velvoitteet
. Honeywellin lakisääteisten velvoitteiden noudattaminen silloin, kun työlainsäädäntö tai muut lait edellyttävät henkilötietojesi käsittelyä (esimerkiksi siinä määrin kuin laki edellyttää yhtäläisten mahdollisuuksien ja monimuotoisuuden seurantaa).
Elintärkeät edut.
Saatamme tarvita henkilötietojasi myös elintärkeiden etujesi suojaamiseksi (esimerkiksi terveys- ja turvallisuussyistä, jos osallistut haastatteluun toimipaikassamme).
Jos sinulla on kysyttävää tai tarvitset lisätietoja siitä, millä oikeusperustalla keräämme ja käytämme henkilötietojasi, lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Kenen kanssa jaamme henkilötietojasi
Honeywell jakaa henkilötietojasi kolmansille osapuolille vain seuraavissa tapauksissa:
Honeywell-konsernin yksiköt
. Saatamme jakaa henkilötietojasi muille konsernin yksiköille, jotka sijaitsevat eri puolilla maailmaa sijaitsevilla lainkäyttöalueilla, jotta voimme arvioida profiiliasi ja harkita mahdollisia rekrytointimahdollisuuksia konsernitasolla.
Palveluntarjoajat
Saatamme erityisesti jakaa henkilötietojasi kolmansien osapuolten palveluntarjoajille, jotka suorittavat tiettyjä palveluja puolestamme (esimerkiksi rekrytointi- ja ulkoistamispalvelujen tarjoajat ja analytiikan tarjoajat). Tällaiset kolmannet osapuolet voivat vaihdella maastasi riippuen ja muuttua aika ajoin, mutta niihin voivat kuulua Phenom People, Inc. ja Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. sekä niiden vastaavat kolmannen osapuolen palveluntarjoajat.
Honeywellin työntekijät.
Jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, ota huomioon, että jotkin profiilisi kohdat ovat julkisia ja siten kaikkien Honeywellin työntekijöiden nähtävissä (erityisesti nimesi, tittelisi, valokuvasi, taitosi, kiinnostuksen kohteesi, työkokemuksesi ja koulutuksesi). Näitä osioita voi kuitenkin muokata, ja voit valita, mitä tietoja sinusta näytetään profiilissasi. Huomioithan, että uratavoitteet, muutot ja profiilin tila "avoin uusille mahdollisuuksille" -osiot eivät ole julkisia eivätkä näin ollen näy kaikille Honeywellin työntekijöille (ainoastaan Honeywellin Talent Teamille).
Muut kolmannet osapuolet.
Honeywell voi luovuttaa henkilötietojasi toimivaltaiselle lainvalvontaviranomaiselle, sääntelyviranomaiselle, valtion virastolle, tuomioistuimelle tai kolmannelle osapuolelle, jos uskomme, että luovuttaminen on tarpeen sovellettavan lain nojalla tai jos uskomme vilpittömässä mielessä, että tällainen toiminta on tarpeen laillisten oikeuksiemme käyttämiseksi, vahvistamiseksi tai puolustamiseksi tai sinun tai jonkun muun henkilön elintärkeiden etujen suojaamiseksi. Voimme myös jakaa henkilötietojasi muiden kanssa suostumuksellasi tai ohjeistuksestasi (esim. erotuomari tai ammattiyhdistys).
Henkilötietojen kansainväliset siirrot
Honeywell on maailmanlaajuinen organisaatio, ja henkilötietojasi voidaan siirtää, säilyttää, tallentaa tai käyttää eri puolilla maailmaa, kuten Yhdysvalloissa ja Intiassa. Tämä tarkoittaa, että kun keräämme henkilötietojasi, niitä saatetaan käsitellä maissa, joiden tietosuojalainsäädäntö saattaa poiketa sinun maasi lainsäädännöstä. Honeywell ryhtyy kuitenkin aina kohtuullisiin toimenpiteisiin suojellakseen yksityisyyttäsi ja tarjotakseen henkilötietojen suojan tason, joka on verrattavissa asuinmaasi suojaan. Näihin toimenpiteisiin kuuluu
Euroopan komission vakiosopimuslausekkeiden
täytäntöönpano, jotka löytyvät komission verkkosivuilta osoitteesta
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Säilyttäminen
Säilytämme henkilötietojasi niin kauan kuin se on tarpeen tässä tietosuojailmoituksessa kuvattujen tarkoitusten toteuttamiseksi ja Honeywellin asiakirjojen säilytysaikataulun mukaisesti tai sovellettavan lain edellyttämällä tavalla.
Oikeutesi
Sovellettavasta lainsäädännöstä riippuen sinulla voi olla tiettyjä henkilötietojasi koskevia oikeuksia. Jos asut Kaliforniassa, katso alla oleva kohta “
Lisätietoja Kalifornian asukkaille
”.
Sinulla voi olla oikeus
tutustua
henkilötietoihisi,
korjata
,
päivittää
tai pyytää niiden
poistamista
;
Voit vastustaa
henkilötietojesi
käsittelyä, pyytää meitä rajoittamaan henkilötietojesi käsittelyä tai pyytää henkilötietojesi
siirrettävyyttä
;
Sinulla voi olla oikeus olla tekemättä sinusta päätöstä, joka perustuu yksinomaan automaattiseen käsittelyyn, mukaan lukien profilointi, jos kyseinen päätös tuottaa sinuun kohdistuvia oikeusvaikutuksia tai vaikuttaa sinuun merkittävästi.
Honeywell ei tee rekrytointiprosessinsa yhteydessä yksinomaan automatisoituja päätöksiä hakijoista.
Jos olemme keränneet ja käsitelleet henkilötietojasi suostumuksellasi, voit peruuttaa suostumuksesi milloin tahansa. Suostumuksesi peruuttaminen ei vaikuta ennen peruuttamistasi suorittamamme käsittelyn laillisuuteen, eikä se vaikuta henkilötietojesi käsittelyyn, joka on suoritettu muiden laillisten käsittelyperusteiden kuin suostumuksen perusteella; ja
Sinulla on oikeus valittaa tietosuojaviranomaiselle henkilötietojesi keräämisestä ja käytöstä.
Helpotamme sinua käyttämään sinua koskevia oikeuksia sovellettavan lainsäädännön mukaisesti. Jos haluat käyttää mitä tahansa henkilötietoihisi liittyviä oikeuksiasi, ota meihin yhteyttä HR Help -palvelun kautta tai rekisteröidyn pyyntöä koskevalla lomakkeella, joka löytyy osoitteesta
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
tai lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Lisätietoja Kalifornian asukkaille
Jos asut Kalifornian osavaltiossa, tämä osio täydentää Honeywellin hakijoiden tietosuojailmoitusta.
(i)      Kerättyjen ja luovutettujen henkilötietojen luokat
Honeywell on kerännyt ja luovuttanut seuraavia henkilötietoryhmiä liiketoimintatarkoituksiin edellisen kahdentoista kuukauden aikana:
Previous column
Next column
Kategoriat
Keräämme
A.
Tunnisteet, kuten nimi, syntymäaika, sukupuoli, sähköpostiosoite, puhelinnumerot, postiosoite, verkkotunnisteet, sosiaalisen median tilit ja muut tunnisteet.
Kyllä
C.
Kalifornian tai liittovaltion lainsäädännön nojalla suojattujen luokitusten piirteet, kuten rotu, etninen alkuperä, uskonnolliset tai filosofiset vakaumukset, ammattiyhdistyksen jäsenyys, terveystiedot, biometriset tiedot, geneettiset tiedot, vammaisuus, veteraaniasema, seksuaalinen suuntautuminen, henkilökohtainen posti, sähköposti- ja tekstiviestit (ellei Honeywell ole tarkoitettu vastaanottaja), julkiset tunnisteet (esim. sosiaaliturvatunnus), ajokortti, passi, rahoitus- ja pankkitiedot.
Kyllä
F.
Internetin tai muun sähköisen verkon toimintatiedot, kuten selaushistoria, vuorovaikutus Honeywellin verkkosivustojen, sähköpostin ja tekstiviestipalvelujen kanssa.
Kyllä
G.
Paikannustiedot, kuten laitteen sijainti ja IP-sijainti.
Kyllä
H.
Ääni-, elektroniset, visuaaliset, lämpö- tai muut vastaavat tiedot, kuten äänesi ja kuvasi, video- tai äänitallenteet, jos osallistut puhelin- tai videohaastatteluun tai jos vierailet toimistossamme.
Kyllä
I.
Ammatilliset tai työhön liittyvät tiedot, kuten ammatti, nykyinen tai aiemmat työnantajat, tehtävänimike, koulutushistoria, akateeminen ja ammatillinen pätevyys, ansioluettelo, työhistoria, työhönottoa koskevat suositukset, haastattelumuistiinpanot ja -arvioinnit, kielet, ammatilliset jäsenyydet, todistukset, suorituksenhallinta-arvioinnit, korvaukset, sijaintitiedot ja matkustusmieltymykset.
Kyllä
K.
Edellä luetelluista henkilötiedoista tehtävät johtopäätökset profiilin tai yhteenvedon luomiseksi esimerkiksi yksilön mieltymyksistä ja ominaisuuksista.
Kyllä
Load More
(ii)      Sinun oikeutesi
Sinulla on oikeus lähettää meille pyyntö seuraavista oikeuksista, jotka kattavat pyyntöäsi edeltävän kahdentoista kuukauden ajanjakson. Huomaa, että nämä oikeudet eivät ole ehdottomia ja että joissakin tapauksissa niihin sovelletaan sovellettavassa lainsäädännössä määriteltyjä rajoituksia:
Oikeus tietää, mitä henkilötietoja olemme keränneet sinusta, mistä lähteistä olemme keränneet henkilötietojasi, mitä liiketoiminnallista tai kaupallista tarkoitusta varten olemme keränneet henkilötietojasi ja minkälaisille kolmansille osapuolille olemme luovuttaneet henkilötietojasi;
Oikeus poistaa henkilötietosi;
Oikeus oikaista sinua koskevat virheelliset henkilötiedot;
Oikeus kieltäytyä henkilötietojesi myynnistä tai jakamisesta;
Oikeus rajoittaa arkaluonteisten henkilötietojesi käsittelyä;
Oikeus olla joutumatta laittoman syrjinnän kohteeksi käyttäessään sovellettavien lakien mukaisia oikeuksiaan.
Helpotamme sinua käyttämään sinua koskevia oikeuksia sovellettavan lainsäädännön mukaisesti, ja ottaen huomioon pyynnön kohteena olevien henkilötietojen tyypin ja arkaluonteisuuden saatamme sinun suojelemisesi vuoksi joutua pyytämään henkilöllisyytesi tarkistamista ja pyytämään sinulta lisätietoja.
Jos haluat käyttää mitä tahansa henkilötietoihisi liittyviä oikeuksiasi, ota meihin yhteyttä osoitteessa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
olevan rekisteröityjen pyyntölomakkeen kautta tai lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, voit ottaa meihin yhteyttä osoitteessa
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Ota yhteyttä
Jos sinulla on kysymyksiä tai valituksia siitä, miten henkilötietojasi käsitellään, tai jos haluat käyttää oikeuksiasi, ota yhteyttä:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(vain jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä) tai tietosuojavastaavaamme osoitteessa
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Voit ottaa meihin yhteyttä myös rekisteröityjen pyyntöjen lomakkeella, joka löytyy osoitteesta
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Mise à jour : 1er janvier 2023
Le présent avis de confidentialité des candidats (" avis de confidentialité ") décrit la manière dont Honeywell International, Inc. et ses
filiales
(collectivement "
Honeywell
", "
nous
" ou "
notre
") traitent vos informations personnelles lorsque vous rejoignez notre communauté de talents, recherchez ou postulez à un emploi et nous soumettez des informations personnelles via notre portail, nos sites Web ou d'autres supports de recrutement, que ce soit en ligne ou hors ligne (les "
services
"). Nous sommes les responsables du traitement de vos informations personnelles aux fins des lois applicables en matière de protection des données.
Veuillez noter que si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, vous pouvez également vous référer à la politique mondiale de confidentialité des données d'Honeywell et à l'avis de confidentialité des employés, s'il en existe un dans votre juridiction. L'objectif de cet avis de confidentialité est de vous fournir des informations plus détaillées sur le traitement de vos données personnelles dans le cadre de votre candidature.
Informations personnelles que nous recueillons
Pour traiter votre candidature, nous vous demandons de fournir des informations personnelles vous concernant, par exemple lorsque vous postulez à une offre d'emploi particulière sur notre site Web/portail ou, si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, au cours de votre relation de travail. Toutes les informations sont fournies sur une base volontaire et c'est vous qui déterminez l'étendue des informations que vous fournissez à Honeywell.
N'oubliez pas que certaines informations peuvent être nécessaires à l'évaluation de votre candidature et que, si elles ne sont pas fournies, notre capacité à examiner votre candidature peut être limitée.
(i)   Informations personnelles
Nous pouvons recueillir les informations personnelles suivantes à votre sujet :
Détails personnels et informations de contact, y compris l'adresse électronique, le(s) numéro(s) de téléphone et la photographie ;
Des informations professionnelles et éducatives liées à votre profession, telles que votre employeur actuel ou précédent, votre titre de poste ou d'autres informations sur l'organisation à laquelle vous êtes affilié(e). Vous pouvez également fournir votre CV et des informations sur vos qualifications ou votre formation, telles que vos diplômes, vos domaines d'études, les établissements que vous avez fréquentés, vos langues, vos affiliations professionnelles, vos certifications, des détails sur les évaluations de la gestion des performances et votre rémunération ;
les préférences professionnelles (par exemple, les objectifs à court et à long terme, la volonté de déménager, la date à laquelle il est possible de déménager et les préférences en matière de lieu de travail) ;
Les informations personnelles dérivées de votre participation à notre processus de recrutement, telles que, par exemple, celles obtenues lors des entretiens, les courriels que nous échangeons avec vous concernant votre candidature ou les conversations que nous avons avec vous par le biais de notre Chatbot en ligne.
Des informations audio et visuelles, telles que votre voix et votre image capturées sur des photographies, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo, ou si vous vous rendez dans nos bureaux ;
Toute autre information personnelle que vous choisissez volontairement de nous fournir.
(ii)  Informations personnelles sensibles
Nous pouvons également collecter des catégories spéciales d'informations personnelles vous concernant (également appelées "catégories spéciales d'informations personnelles") lorsque nous avons une obligation légale de le faire, ou que l'autorité compétente de l'État membre a l'intention d'utiliser ces informations. les informations sont pertinentes pour votre futur environnement de travail chez Honeywell, ou pour la fourniture future d'avantages sociaux, ou avec votre consentement explicite, comme par exemple:
Numéro d'identification délivré par le gouvernement (tel que le numéro de sécurité sociale) ;
Les informations démographiques, qui peuvent inclure des informations sur des classifications protégées, telles que l'âge, le sexe, la race, les handicaps, l'orientation sexuelle, l'état matrimonial ou le statut de vétéran ;
Informations relatives à la santé (par exemple, pour tenir compte d'un éventuel handicap ou de restrictions alimentaires) ;
Informations relatives aux opinions politiques, aux croyances religieuses ou à l'appartenance syndicale d'une personne ;
les informations relatives aux infractions ou condamnations pénales d'une personne, ainsi que toute autre information jugée sensible en vertu des lois applicables en matière de protection des données. Lorsque la loi le permet et dans la mesure où cela est applicable, Honeywell peut également avoir besoin de vérifier vos antécédents et/ou votre casier judiciaire afin de déterminer si vous êtes apte à occuper un poste vacant ou à saisir une opportunité chez Honeywell.
Nous ne vous demandons pas de nous fournir des informations personnelles sensibles, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour remplir nos obligations réglementaires (par exemple, pour le contrôle de l'égalité des chances), ou si vous avez donné votre consentement explicite. Sauf dans la mesure où la loi l'exige, la fourniture de ces informations est entièrement volontaire. Honeywell s'engage à ce que sa main-d'œuvre soit réellement inclusive et diversifiée. En nous fournissant vos données relatives à l'égalité des chances, vous nous permettez de mieux comprendre le profil de nos employés en termes de données relatives à l'égalité des chances et les mesures que nous devons prendre pour attirer, promouvoir et conserver une main-d'œuvre diversifiée, indépendamment de l'âge, du handicap, du sexe, de la race, des croyances religieuses ou philosophiques et de l'orientation sexuelle.
(iii) Informations personnelles que nous recueillons automatiquement auprès de vous
Nous pouvons collecter automatiquement certaines informations concernant votre visite sur nos sites web en utilisant des "cookies" et d'autres technologies de suivi similaires. Pour plus d'informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons sur le site web par l'intermédiaire duquel vous soumettez votre candidature, veuillez lire notre
avis sur les cookies
.
Sources d'informations personnelles
Nous pouvons collecter vos informations personnelles directement auprès de vous ou indirectement auprès de tiers qui sont légalement autorisés à partager vos informations avec nous :
Les agences pour l'emploi, les fournisseurs de services de vérification des antécédents/de l'emploi ou de l'identité ;
Agences de recrutement (par exemple, lorsqu'une agence de recrutement vous identifie comme candidat potentiel) ;
des informations publiques vous concernant provenant de sites tels que LinkedIn ou le site web de votre employeur actuel. Vous pouvez également choisir de nous donner accès à certaines informations personnelles stockées par des tiers (par exemple, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). En autorisant Honeywell à accéder à ces informations, vous acceptez que nous puissions les collecter, les stocker et les utiliser conformément au présent avis de confidentialité ;
par référence ou bouche à oreille (par exemple, par l'intermédiaire d'un employé actuel ou ancien). Dans ce cas, il incombe à la personne qui vous recommande d'obtenir votre consentement pour nous fournir vos informations personnelles.
Finalités de l'utilisation des données personnelles
Nous utilisons vos informations personnelles aux fins suivantes :
Pour évaluer votre candidature et prendre des décisions d'embauche ;
Communiquer avec vous et vous informer sur le recrutement et/ou votre/vos candidature(s) ou toute autre communication requise ;
se conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires applicables et nous permettre d'établir, d'exercer ou de défendre une réclamation légale ;
Emploi et gestion d'entreprise (par exemple, établir un dossier d'emploi de base si vous êtes embauché) ;
réaliser des rapports/analyses agrégés concernant les données d'activité des candidats (par exemple, trafic sur le site de carrière, entonnoir des candidats, source d'embauche, succès de la campagne de recrutement) ;
Réservé aux employés d'Honeywell :
Vous êtes automatiquement exclu(e) des propositions proactives faites aux recruteurs pour une offre d'emploi et vous ne pouvez pas être pris(e) en considération en fonction de votre notation actuelle (qui ne sera jamais révélée à quiconque en dehors d'Honeywell). Toutefois, vous pourrez toujours postuler directement à toute offre d'emploi disponible et votre situation spécifique sera examinée par un recruteur.
Uniquement si vous résidez aux États-Unis
: Pour vous envoyer des communications par SMS, en particulier :
(i)     1-1 les communications par SMS en rapport avec votre candidature à une offre d'emploi particulière ; et/ou
(ii)    sous réserve de votre consentement explicite, des campagnes de communication par SMS sur les possibilités d'emploi, les offres d'emploi et les mises à jour des candidatures.
Vous pourrez refuser et/ou révoquer votre consentement à recevoir les communications susmentionnées en suivant les instructions données dans votre profil.
Si Honeywell vous propose un emploi et que vous l'acceptez, les informations recueillies au cours du processus de candidature et de recrutement seront intégrées à votre dossier d'emploi.
Traitement automatisé et profilage
Sous réserve de votre consentement explicite (que vous donnez volontairement en rejoignant notre communauté de talents ou en cochant la case de consentement appropriée au cours de la procédure de candidature), nous procédons à un "profilage" pour évaluer votre aptitude à répondre à des offres d'emploi particulières. Cela implique l'utilisation d'un algorithme de correspondance capable d'évaluer votre profil professionnel et de prédire votre éligibilité à une offre d'emploi particulière. Nous effectuons ce traitement automatisé aux fins suivantes :
aider les recruteurs à faire correspondre les profils des candidats aux offres d'emploi en suggérant des candidats à prendre en considération pour une offre d'emploi spécifique ; et
vous envoyer des recommandations d'emploi personnalisées en fonction de votre profil et/ou de vos préférences ou d'autres informations susceptibles de vous intéresser, telles que les actualités, les webinaires et les événements de Honeywell.
Veuillez noter que, sur la base de ce profilage, il se peut que vous ne soyez pas pris en considération pour certaines offres d'emploi, à moins que vous n'ayez postulé directement.
Nous ne prenons pas de décisions d'embauche fondées uniquement sur des processus de prise de décision automatisés et/ou sur le profilage. Vos informations personnelles seront soumises à des décisions humaines, car la décision d'embauche finale sera prise par les recruteurs ou le responsable de l'embauche.
Bases juridiques du traitement de vos données personnelles
Certaines juridictions exigent qu'Honeywell dispose d'une base juridique pour le traitement de vos informations personnelles. Lorsque la législation applicable exige que nous justifiions nos activités de traitement, notre base juridique pour la collecte et l'utilisation de vos informations personnelles, telle que décrite dans le présent avis de confidentialité, dépendra des informations personnelles concernées et du contexte spécifique dans lequel nous les collectons.
Consentement.
En règle générale, nous recueillons des informations personnelles lorsque nous avons votre consentement et lorsque nous avons besoin de ces informations pour traiter votre candidature. En accédant à notre site/portail, en rejoignant notre communauté de talents ou en postulant à l'un de nos postes, vous donnez votre consentement à Honeywell pour collecter et traiter les informations personnelles décrites ci-dessus aux fins décrites dans le présent avis de confidentialité. Vous pouvez
retirer votre consentement à tout moment
en soumettant une demande par le biais de notre portail de demande des personnes concernées à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou en nous envoyant un courrier électronique à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intérêts légitimes.
Dans l'intérêt légitime d'Honeywell, à savoir le recrutement, la sélection, l'évaluation et la nomination de nouveaux employés, ainsi que la gestion et l'administration du processus de recrutement et de ressources humaines, dans la mesure où vos libertés et droits fondamentaux ne prévalent pas sur nos intérêts légitimes.
Obligations légales
. Respect des obligations légales d'Honeywell lorsque le droit du travail ou d'autres lois exigent le traitement de vos informations personnelles (par exemple, dans la mesure où la loi exige le contrôle de l'égalité des chances et de la diversité).
Intérêts vitaux.
Nous pouvons également avoir besoin de vos données personnelles pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux (par exemple, pour des raisons de santé et de sécurité si vous participez à un entretien sur notre site).
Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez obtenir de plus amples informations concernant la base juridique sur laquelle nous collectons et utilisons vos informations personnelles, veuillez envoyer un courrier électronique à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Avec qui partageons-nous vos informations personnelles ?
Honeywell ne partagera vos informations personnelles avec des tiers que dans les circonstances suivantes :
Entités du groupe Honeywell
. Nous pouvons partager vos informations personnelles avec d'autres entités du groupe situées dans des juridictions du monde entier afin d'évaluer votre profil et de prendre en considération toute opportunité de recrutement au niveau du groupe.
Prestataires de services
Nous pouvons spécifiquement partager vos informations personnelles avec des prestataires de services tiers qui fournissent des services spécifiques en notre nom (par exemple, des prestataires de services de recrutement et d'externalisation et des prestataires de services d'analyse). Ces tiers peuvent varier en fonction de votre pays et changer de temps à autre, mais peuvent inclure Phenom People, Inc. et Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. ainsi que leurs fournisseurs tiers respectifs.
Employés d'Honeywell.
Si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, veuillez noter que certaines sections de votre profil sont publiques et donc visibles par tous les employés d'Honeywell (en particulier, votre nom, votre titre, votre photographie, vos compétences, vos centres d'intérêt, votre expérience professionnelle et votre formation). Toutefois, ces sections sont modifiables et vous pourrez choisir les informations vous concernant qui seront affichées dans votre profil. Veuillez noter que les informations relatives aux objectifs de carrière, aux déménagements, à la formation et à l'expérience professionnelle ne sont pas publiées dans votre profil. et le statut du profil "ouvert à de nouvelles opportunités" ne seront pas publics et, par conséquent, ne seront pas visibles par tous les employés d'Honeywell (uniquement par l'équipe "Talents" d'Honeywell).
Autres tiers.
Honeywell peut partager vos informations personnelles avec tout organisme compétent chargé de l'application de la loi, tout régulateur, toute agence gouvernementale, tout tribunal ou toute tierce partie lorsque nous estimons que la divulgation est nécessaire en vertu de la loi applicable ou lorsque nous pensons de bonne foi qu'une telle action est nécessaire pour exercer, établir ou défendre nos droits légaux ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d'une autre personne. Nous pouvons également partager vos informations personnelles avec d'autres personnes avec votre consentement ou selon vos instructions (par exemple, un arbitre ou une association professionnelle).
Transferts internationaux de données à caractère personnel
Honeywell est une organisation mondiale et vos informations personnelles peuvent être transférées, détenues, stockées ou utilisées dans différents endroits du monde, tels que les États-Unis et l'Inde. Cela signifie que lorsque nous recueillons vos informations personnelles, celles-ci peuvent être traitées dans des pays dont les lois sur la protection des données diffèrent de celles de votre pays. Cependant, Honeywell prendra toujours des mesures raisonnables pour protéger votre vie privée et assurer un niveau de protection des informations personnelles comparable à celui de votre pays de résidence, notamment en appliquant les
Clauses contractuelles types de la Commission européenne
, qui peuvent être consultées sur le site Web de la Commission à l'adresse
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Rétention
Nous conserverons vos informations personnelles aussi longtemps que nécessaire en rapport avec les objectifs décrits dans le présent avis de confidentialité et conformément au calendrier de conservation des dossiers d'Honeywell ou comme l'exige la législation en vigueur.
Vos droits
En fonction de la législation applicable, vous pouvez disposer de certains droits en ce qui concerne vos informations personnelles. Si vous êtes résident californien, veuillez vous référer à la section “
Informations supplémentaires pour les résidents californiens
” ci-dessous.
Vous pouvez avoir le droit d'accéder à vos informations personnelles,
de les corriger, de les mettre à jour
ou de demander leur
suppression
;
Vous pouvez
vous opposer
au traitement de vos données personnelles, nous demander de
restreindre le
traitement de vos données personnelles. le traitement de vos informations personnelles ou demander la
portabilité de
vos informations personnelles ;
Vous pouvez avoir le droit de refuser qu'une décision soit prise à votre sujet sur la seule base d'un traitement automatisé, y compris le profilage, si cette décision produit des effets juridiques à votre sujet ou vous affecte de manière significative.
Honeywell ne prend pas, dans le cadre de son processus de recrutement, de décisions exclusivement automatisées concernant les candidats.
De même, si nous avons recueilli et traité vos informations personnelles avec votre consentement, vous pouvez le retirer à tout moment. Le retrait de votre consentement n'affectera pas la légalité du traitement que nous avons effectué avant votre retrait, ni le traitement de vos informations à caractère personnel effectué sur la base de motifs de traitement légitimes autres que le consentement ; et
Vous avez le droit de vous plaindre auprès d'une autorité de protection des données concernant notre collecte et notre utilisation de vos informations personnelles.
Nous vous faciliterons l'exercice des droits qui vous sont applicables conformément à la législation en vigueur. Pour exercer l'un de vos droits relatifs à vos informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter par l'intermédiaire de l'aide RH ou du formulaire de demande de la personne concernée qui se trouve à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envoyez un courriel à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informations complémentaires pour les résidents de Californie
Si vous êtes résident de l'État de Californie, cette section complète l'avis de confidentialité de Honeywell à l'intention des candidats.
(i)      Catégories d'informations personnelles collectées et divulguées
Au cours des douze derniers mois, Honeywell a collecté et divulgué les catégories suivantes d'informations personnelles à des fins commerciales :
Previous column
Next column
Catégories
Nous collectons
A.
Identifiants tels que le nom, la date de naissance, le sexe, l'adresse électronique, les numéros de téléphone, l'adresse postale, les identifiants en ligne, les comptes de médias sociaux et autres identifiants.
Oui
C.
Caractéristiques des catégories protégées en vertu de la législation californienne ou fédérale, telles que la race, l'origine ethnique, les croyances religieuses ou philosophiques, l'appartenance à un syndicat, les données de santé, les informations biométriques, les données génétiques, le handicap, le statut d'ancien combattant, l'orientation sexuelle, le courrier personnel, les courriels et les messages textuels (sauf si Honeywell en est le destinataire), les identifiants gouvernementaux (par exemple, le numéro de sécurité sociale), le permis de conduire, le passeport, les informations financières et bancaires.
Oui
F.
Informations relatives à l'activité sur Internet ou sur d'autres réseaux électroniques, telles que l'historique de navigation, les interactions avec les sites Web de Honeywell, le courrier électronique et les services de messagerie textuelle.
Oui
G.
Données de géolocalisation, telles que l'emplacement de l'appareil et l'emplacement IP.
Oui
H.
Informations audio, électroniques, visuelles, thermiques ou similaires, telles que votre voix et votre image, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo ou si vous vous rendez dans nos bureaux.
Oui
I.
Informations professionnelles ou liées à l'emploi, telles que votre profession, vos employeurs actuels ou précédents, votre titre de poste, votre parcours scolaire, vos qualifications académiques et professionnelles, votre curriculum vitae, vos antécédents professionnels, vos références d'embauche, vos notes d'entretien et vos évaluations, vos langues, vos adhésions professionnelles, vos certifications, vos évaluations de gestion des performances, votre rémunération, vos préférences en matière de lieu de travail et de voyage.
Oui
K.
Déductions tirées de toute information personnelle énumérée ci-dessus pour créer un profil ou un résumé concernant, par exemple, les préférences et les caractéristiques d'une personne.
Oui
Load More
(ii)      Vos droits
Vous avez le droit de nous envoyer une demande pour les droits suivants couvrant la période de douze mois qui précède votre demande. Veuillez noter que ces droits ne sont pas absolus et que, dans certains cas, ils sont soumis aux limitations prévues par la législation applicable :
Le droit de savoir quelles informations personnelles nous avons collectées à votre sujet, les catégories de sources auprès desquelles nous avons collecté vos informations personnelles, l'objectif professionnel ou commercial pour lequel nous avons collecté vos informations personnelles, et les catégories de tiers avec lesquels nous divulguons vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de supprimer vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de corriger les informations personnelles inexactes vous concernant ;
Le droit de refuser la vente ou le partage de vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de limiter le traitement de vos informations personnelles sensibles ;
Le droit de ne pas faire l'objet d'une discrimination illégale pour avoir exercé ses droits en vertu des lois applicables.
Nous vous faciliterons l'exercice des droits qui vous sont applicables conformément à la législation en vigueur et, compte tenu du type et de la sensibilité des informations personnelles faisant l'objet de la demande, nous pourrons être amenés, pour votre protection, à vérifier votre identité et à vous demander des informations complémentaires.
Pour exercer l'un de vos droits relatifs à vos informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande d'informations à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envoyez un courrier électronique à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez nous contacter à l'adresse
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Nous contacter
Si vous avez des questions ou des réclamations concernant le traitement de vos informations personnelles ou si vous souhaitez exercer vos droits, veuillez contacter :
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(uniquement si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell) ou notre délégué à la protection des données à l'adresse
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Vous pouvez également nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande d'information des personnes concernées, disponible à l'adresse suivante :
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Mise à jour: 1er janvier 2023
L’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des candidats (« Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels ») décrit la façon dont Honeywell International, Inc. et ses
filiales
(collectivement «
Honeywell
», ou «
nous
» traitent vos renseignements personnels lorsque vous vous joignez à notre communauté de talents, cherchez un emploi ou postulez à un emploi et nous soumettez des renseignements personnels par l’intermédiaire de notre portail, de nos sites Web ou d’autres moyens de recrutement, que ce soit en ligne ou hors ligne [les «
Services
»]. Nous sommes les responsables du traitement de vos renseignements personnels en vertu des lois applicables sur la protection des données.
Veuillez noter que si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez également consulter la Politique mondiale sur la protection des renseignements personnels de Honeywell et l’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des employés s’il en existe un pour votre juridiction. Le but de cet Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels est de vous donner des informations plus détaillées sur le traitement de vos renseignements personnels dans le cadre de votre candidature.
Renseignements personnels que nous recueillons
Pour traiter votre candidature, nous vous demandons de fournir des renseignements à votre sujet, par exemple lorsque vous postulez à une offre d’emploi particulière par l’entremise de notre site Web/portail ou, si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, pendant votre relation d’emploi. Tous les renseignements sont fournis sur une base volontaire et vous déterminez l’étendue des informations que vous fournissez à Honeywell.
N’oubliez pas que certains renseignements peuvent être nécessaires à l’évaluation de votre candidature et que s’ils ne sont pas fournis, notre capacité à vous considérer comme un candidat peut être limitée.
(i)   Renseignements personnels
Nous pouvons recueillir les renseignements personnels suivants à votre sujet:
Renseignements personnels et coordonnées, y compris l’adresse électronique, le(s) numéro(s) de téléphone et une photographie;
Renseignements professionnels et scolaires liés à votre profession, tels que vos employeurs actuel ou précédents, votre titre de poste ou d’autres informations sur l’organisation à laquelle vous êtes affilié. Vous pouvez également fournir votre CV et des renseignements sur vos qualifications ou votre formation, tels que vos diplômes, vos domaines d’études, les établissements que vous avez fréquentés, les langues, l’adhésion à des associations professionnelles, les accréditations, les détails sur les évaluations de rendement et la rémunération;
Préférences de carrière (par ex., objectifs à court et à long terme, volonté de déménager, date disponible pour déménager et préférences en matière de lieu de travail);
Renseignements personnels découlant de votre participation à notre processus de recrutement, tels que, par exemple, ceux obtenus lors des entretiens, les courriels que nous échangeons avec vous concernant votre candidature ou les conversations que nous avons avec vous par le biais de notre boîte de clavardage en ligne.
Renseignements audio et visuels, tels que votre voix et votre apparence capturée dans des photographies, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo, ou si vous visitez nos bureaux;
Toute autre information personnelle que vous choisissez librement de nous fournir.
(ii)  Renseignements personnels sensibles
Nous pouvons également recueillir des catégories spéciales de renseignements personnels à votre sujet [également appelées « catégories spéciales de renseignements personnels »] lorsque nous sommes légalement tenus de le faire, ou que les renseignements sont pertinents pour votre futur environnement de travail chez Honeywell, ou pour la fourniture future d’avantages sociaux, ou avec votre consentement explicite, par exemple:
Un numéro d’identification émis par le gouvernement (tel qu’un numéro de sécurité sociale);
Des données démographiques, qui peuvent inclure des renseignements sur des classifications protégées, telles que votre âge, votre sexe, votre race, vos handicaps, votre orientation sexuelle, votre état civil ou votre statut de vétéran;
Des renseignements sur la santé (par exemple, pour tenir compte d’un éventuel handicap ou de restrictions alimentaires);
Des enseignements relatifs aux opinions politiques ou aux croyances religieuses d’une personne ou à son adhésion à un syndicat;
Des renseignements sur les infractions pénales ou les condamnations d’une personne, ainsi que toute autre information jugée sensible en vertu des lois applicables en matière de protection des données. Lorsque la loi l’autorise et dans la mesure où cela est applicable, Honeywell peut également avoir besoin de procéder à des vérifications d’antécédents et/ou de casier judiciaire afin de déterminer votre aptitude à occuper un poste ou une fonction à pourvoir chez Honeywell.
Nous ne vous demandons pas de nous fournir des renseignements personnels sensibles, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour nous acquitter de nos obligations réglementaires (par exemple, pour la surveillance de l’égalité des chances), ou si vous avez donné votre consentement explicite. Sauf dans la mesure où la loi l’exige, la fourniture de ces renseignements sera entièrement volontaire. Honeywell s’engage à offrir une main-d’œuvre véritablement inclusive et diversifiée. En nous fournissant vos données sur l’égalité des chances, vous nous permettez de mieux comprendre le profil de nos employés en fonction des données sur l’égalité des chances et les mesures que nous devons prendre pour attirer, promouvoir et conserver une main-d’œuvre diversifiée, indépendamment de l’âge, du handicap, du sexe, de la race, des croyances religieuses ou philosophiques et de l’orientation sexuelle.
(iii) Renseignements personnels que nous recueillons automatiquement de vous
Nous pouvons recueillir automatiquement certains renseignements concernant votre visite sur nos sites Web à l’aide de « témoins » et d’autres technologies de suivi similaires. Pour plus d’informations sur les témoins que nous utilisons sur le site Web par lequel vous soumettez votre candidature, veuillez lire notre
Avis sur les témoins
.
Sources de renseignements personnels
Nous pouvons recueillir vos renseignements personnels directement auprès de vous ou indirectement auprès de tiers qui sont légalement autorisés à transmettre ces renseignements, par exemple:
Les agences de recrutement, les fournisseurs de services de vérification des antécédents/de l’emploi ou de l’identité;
Les agences de recrutement (par exemple, lorsqu’une agence de recrutement vous désigne comme un candidat potentiel);
Les informations publiques à votre sujet provenant de sites tels que LinkedIn ou le site Web de votre employeur actuel. Vous pouvez également choisir de nous donner accès à certains renseignements personnels stockés par des tiers (par exemple, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). En autorisant Honeywell à avoir accès à ces renseignements, vous acceptez que nous puissions recueillir, stocker et utiliser ces informations conformément au présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels;
Par recommandation ou de bouche à oreille (par exemple, par le biais d’une recommandation d’un employé actuel ou ancien). Dans le cas d’une recommandation, la personne qui vous recommande sera chargée d’obtenir votre consentement pour nous fournir vos renseignements personnels.
Fins auxquelles les renseignements personnels sont utilisés
Nous utilisons vos renseignements personnels aux fins suivantes:
Pour évaluer votre candidature et prendre des décisions d’embauche;
Pour communiquer avec vous et vous informer sur le recrutement et/ou votre/vos candidature(s) ou toute autre communication requise;
Pour se conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires applicables et pour nous permettre d’établir, d’exercer ou de défendre une réclamation fondée en droit;
Pour assurer la gestion d’emploi et générale (par exemple, établir un dossier d’emploi de base si vous êtes embauché);
Pour effectuer des rapports/analyses consolidés concernant les données d’activité des candidats (ex. (par exemple, le trafic sur le site de carrière, l’entonnoir des candidats, la source d’embauche, le succès des campagnes de recrutement);
Réservé aux employés de Honeywell:
Pour vous exclure automatiquement d’une proposition proactive aux recruteurs pour une possibilité d’emploi et si vous n’êtes pas admissible à la prise en considération selon votre évaluation 9 blocs HPD actuelle en (qui ne sera jamais révélée à quiconque hors de Honeywell). Toutefois, vous pourrez toujours postuler directement à toute offre d’emploi et votre situation précise sera examinée par un recruteur.
Seulement si vous êtes résident des États-Unis:
Pour vous envoyer des communications par message texte, notamment:
(i)     des communications par messages textes individualisées en rapport avec votre candidature à une offre d’emploi particulière; et/ou
(ii)    sous réserve de votre consentement exprès, des communications dans le cadre d’une campagne de messages textes sur les offres d’emploi, les affaires professionnelles et les dernières mises à jour des candidatures.
Vous pourrez refuser et/ou révoquer votre consentement à recevoir les communications précitées en suivant les instructions fournies dans votre profil.
Si vous êtes proposé et acceptez un emploi chez Honeywell, les renseignements recueillis au cours du processus de candidature et de recrutement feront partie de votre dossier d’emploi.
Traitement et profils automatisés
Sous réserve de votre consentement exprès (que vous donnez volontairement en vous joignant à notre communauté de talents ou en cochant la case appropriée au cours du processus de candidature), nous établissons un « profil » afin d’évaluer votre adéquation à des offres d’emploi particulières. Cela implique l’utilisation d’un algorithme de jumelage capable d’évaluer votre profil d’emploi et de prédire votre admissibilité à une offre d’emploi particulière. Nous effectuons ce traitement automatisé afin:
d’aider les recruteurs à jumeler les profils des candidats aux offres d’emploi en suggérant des candidats à prendre en considération pour une offre d’emploi spécifique; et
de vous envoyer des recommandations d’emploi personnalisées en fonction de votre profil et/ou de vos préférences ou d’autres renseignements susceptibles de vous intéresser, tels que les actualités, les webinaires et les événements de Honeywell.
Veuillez noter que, sur la base de ce profil, il se peut que vous ne soyez pas pris en considération pour certaines offres d’emploi, à moins que vous n’y ayez directement postulé.
Nous ne prenons pas de décisions d’embauche fondées uniquement sur des processus décisionnels automatisés et/ou sur le profil. Vos renseignements personnels seront soumis à des décisions humaines, car la décision finale d’embauche sera prise par les recruteurs ou le responsable du recrutement.
Motifs juridiques du traitement de vos renseignements personnels
Certaines juridictions exigent que Honeywell ait un motif juridique pour traiter vos renseignements personnels. Lorsque la loi applicable nous oblige à justifier nos activités de traitement, notre motif juridique pour la collecte et l’utilisation de vos renseignements personnels comme il est décrit dans le présent avis de confidentialité dépendra des renseignements personnels concernés et du contexte spécifique dans lequel nous les recueillons.
Consentement.
En général, nous recueillons normalement des renseignements personnels à votre sujet lorsque nous avons votre consentement pour le faire et lorsque nous en avons besoin pour traiter votre demande. En accédant à notre site Web/portail, en vous joignant à notre communauté de talents ou en soumettant votre candidature à l’un de nos postes, vous autorisez Honeywell à recueillir et à traiter les renseignements personnels décrits ci-dessus aux fins indiquées dans le présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels. Vous pouvez
retirer votre consentement
à tout moment en soumettant une demande par le biais de notre portail de demande de données à l’adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/us/en/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou en nous envoyant un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intérêts légitimes.
Nous travaillons selon les intérêts légitimes d’Honeywell, à savoir pour le recrutement, la sélection, l’évaluation et la nomination de nouveaux employés ainsi que la gestion et l’administration du recrutement et du processus RH, dans la mesure où nos intérêts légitimes ne l’emportent pas sur vos droits et libertés fondamentaux.
Obligations juridiques
. Nous respectons les obligations juridiques de Honeywell lorsque le droit du travail ou d’autres lois exigent le traitement de vos renseignements personnels (par exemple, dans la mesure où la loi exige la surveillance de l’égalité des chances et de la diversité).
Intérêts vitaux.
Nous pouvons également avoir besoin de vos renseignements personnels pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux (par exemple, pour des raisons de santé et de sécurité si vous participez à un entretien sur notre site).
Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez obtenir de plus amples renseignements concernant le motif juridique selon lequel nous recueillons et utilisons vos renseignements personnels, veuillez envoyer un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Avec qui partageons-nous vos renseignements personnels
Honeywell ne transmettra vos renseignements personnels à des tiers uniquement dans les circonstances suivantes:
Entités du groupe Honeywell
. Nous pouvons transmettre vos renseignements personnels à d’autres entités du groupe situées dans des juridictions du monde entier afin d’évaluer votre profil et d’envisager toute possibilité de recrutement au sein du groupe.
Fournisseurs de services
Nous pouvons transmettre vos renseignements personnels à des fournisseurs de services tiers qui proposent des services spécifiques en notre nom (par exemple, des fournisseurs de personnel de recrutement et de sous-traitance et des fournisseurs d’analyses). Ces tiers peuvent varier en fonction de votre pays et changeront de temps à autre, mais peuvent inclure Phenom People, Inc. et Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. et leurs fournisseurs tiers respectifs.
Employés de Honeywell.
Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, veuillez noter que certaines sections de votre profil sont publiques et, par conséquent, visibles par tous les employés de Honeywell (en particulier, votre nom, votre titre, votre photographie, vos compétences, vos centres d’intérêt, votre expérience professionnelle et votre formation). Toutefois, ces sections sont modifiables et vous pourrez choisir les renseignements à votre sujet qui figurent dans votre profil. Veuillez noter que les sections objectifs de carrière, réinstallations et statut de profil « ouvert à de nouvelles possibilités » ne seront pas publiques et, par conséquent, ne seront pas visibles par tous les employés de Honeywell (seulement par l’équipe des talents de Honeywell).
Autres tiers.
Honeywell peut transmettre vos renseignements personnels à tout organisme compétent chargé de l’application de la loi, régulateur, organisme gouvernemental, tribunal ou tiers lorsque nous estimons que la divulgation est nécessaire en vertu de la loi applicable ou lorsque nous croyons de bonne foi qu’une telle action est nécessaire pour exercer, établir ou défendre nos droits conférés par la loi ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d’une autre personne. Nous pouvons également transmettre vos renseignements personnels à d’autres personnes avec votre consentement ou sur vos instructions (par exemple, un arbitre ou une association professionnelle).
Transferts internationaux de renseignements personnels
Honeywell est une entreprise mondiale et vos renseignements personnels peuvent être transférés, conservés, stockés ou utilisés dans divers endroits du monde, comme les États-Unis et l’Inde. Cela signifie que lorsque nous recueillons vos renseignements personnels, ils peuvent être traités dans des pays dont les lois sur la protection des données peuvent être différentes de celles de votre pays. Toutefois, Honeywell prendra toujours des mesures raisonnables pour protéger vos renseignements personnels et fournir un niveau de protection des renseignements personnels comparable à celui de votre pays de résidence, ce qui inclut la mise en œuvre des
Clauses contractuelles types de la Commission européenne
qui peuvent être consultées sur le site Web de la Commission à l’adresse https://ec.europa.eu.
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Conservation
Nous conserverons vos renseignements personnels aussi longtemps que nécessaire aux fins décrites dans le présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels et conformément au Calendrier de conservation des dossiers de Honeywell ou aux exigences de la loi applicable.
Vos droits
En fonction de la loi applicable, vous pouvez avoir certains droits concernant vos renseignements personnels. Si vous êtes un résident californien, veuillez consulter les «
Renseignements supplémentaires pour les résidents californiens
» ci-dessous.
Vous pouvez avoir le droit d’accéder à vos renseignements personnels, de les
corriger, de les mettre à jour
ou de demander leur
suppression;
Vous pouvez vous
opposer
au traitement de vos renseignements personnels, nous demander de
restreindre
leur traitement ou demander la
portabilité
de vos renseignements personnels;
Vous pouvez avoir le droit de refuser qu’une décision soit prise à votre sujet sur la seule base d’un traitement automatisé, y compris le profilage, si cette décision produit des effets juridiques à votre sujet ou a une incidence significative sur vous.
Honeywell ne prend pas, dans le cadre de son processus de recrutement, de décisions exclusivement automatisées concernant les candidats.
De même, si nous avons recueilli et traité vos renseignements personnels avec votre consentement, vous pouvez retirer votre consentement à tout moment. Le retrait de votre consentement est sans effet sur la légalité de tout traitement que nous avons effectué avant votre retrait ni sur le traitement de vos renseignements personnels effectué sur la base de motifs de traitement légaux autres que le consentement; et
Vous avez le droit de vous plaindre auprès d’une autorité de protection des données au sujet de notre collecte et de notre utilisation de vos renseignements personnels.
Nous faciliterons l’exercice des droits qui s’appliquent à vous conformément à la loi en vigueur. Pour exercer tout droit relatif à vos renseignements personnels, veuillez nous contacter par l’intermédiaire de HR Help ou du formulaire de demande de données qui se trouve à l’adresse suivante:
https://www.honeywell.com/us/en/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou envoyez un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Renseignements supplémentaires pour les résidents de la Californie
Si vous êtes un résident de l’État de Californie, cette section complète l’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des candidats de Honeywell.
(i)      Catégories de renseignements personnels recueillis et divulgués
Honeywell a recueilli et divulgué les catégories suivantes de renseignements personnels à des fins commerciales au cours des douze derniers mois:
Previous column
Next column
Catégories que nous recueillons
Recueillis
A.
Les identifiants tels que le nom, la date de naissance, le sexe, l’adresse électronique, les numéros de téléphone, l’adresse postale, les identifiants en ligne, les comptes de médias sociaux et autres identifiants.
Oui
C.
Les caractéristiques des classifications protégées par la loi californienne ou fédérale, telles que la race, l’origine ethnique, les croyances religieuses ou philosophiques, l’adhésion à un syndicat, les données de santé, les informations biométriques, les données génétiques, le handicap, le statut d’ancien combattant, l’orientation sexuelle, le courrier personnel, les courriels et les messages textes (sauf si Honeywell en est le destinataire), les identifiants gouvernementaux (par exemple, le numéro de sécurité sociale), le permis de conduire, le passeport, les informations financières et bancaires.
Oui
F.
Les informations relatives à l’activité sur Internet ou sur d’autres réseaux électroniques, telles que l’historique de navigation, les interactions avec les sites Web Honeywell, les services de messagerie électronique et d’envoi de messages textes.
Oui
G.
Les données de géolocalisation, telles que la localisation d’appareil et la localisation IP.
Oui
H.
Les informations audio, électroniques, visuelles, thermiques ou similaires, telles que votre voix et votre image, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo ou si vous visitez nos bureaux.
Oui
I.
Les renseignements d’ordre professionnel ou liés à l’emploi, tels que votre profession, vos employeurs actuel ou précédents, votre titre de poste, vos antécédents scolaires, vos qualifications universitaires et professionnelles, votre curriculum vitae, vos antécédents professionnels, vos recommandations d’embauche, vos notes et évaluations d’entretien, vos langues, vos affiliations professionnelles, vos accréditations, vos évaluations de gestion du rendement, votre rémunération, vos préférences en matière de lieu de travail et de déplacements.
Oui
K.
Les déductions tirées de toute information personnelle énumérée ci-dessus pour créer un profil ou un résumé concernant, par exemple, les préférences et les caractéristiques d’une personne.
Oui
Load More
(ii)      Vos droits
Vous avez le droit de nous envoyer une demande pour les droits suivants couvrant la période de douze mois qui précède votre demande. Veuillez noter que ces droits ne sont pas absolus et que, dans certains cas, ils sont soumis aux limitations prévues par la loi applicable:
Le droit de savoir quels renseignements personnels nous avons recueillis à votre sujet, les catégories de sources à partir desquelles nous avons recueilli vos renseignements personnels; le motif professionnel ou commercial pour lequel nous avons recueilli vos renseignements personnels, et les catégories de tiers auxquels nous divulguons ces renseignements;
Le droit de supprimer vos renseignements personnels;
Le droit de corriger les renseignements personnels inexacts à votre sujet;
Le droit de refuser la vente ou la transmission de vos renseignements personnels;
Le droit de restreindre le traitement de vos renseignements personnels sensibles;
Le droit de ne pas subir de discrimination illégale parce que vous avez exercé vos droits en vertu des lois applicables.
Nous faciliterons l’exercice des droits qui s’appliquent à vous conformément à la loi en vigueur et, compte tenu du type de renseignements personnels faisant l’objet de la demande et de leur sensibilité, pour votre protection, il se peut que nous devions demander la vérification de votre identité et vous demander des renseignements supplémentaires.
Pour exercer tout droit relatif à vos renseignements personnels, veuillez nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande qui se trouve à l’adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou envoyer un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez nous contacter à l’adresse
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Pour nous joindre
Si vous avez des questions ou des plaintes sur la manière dont vos renseignements personnels sont traités ou si vous souhaitez exercer vos droits, veuillez contacter:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(seulement si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell) ou notre responsable de la protection des données à
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Vous pouvez également nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande de données qui se trouve à l’adresse suivante:
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Aktualisiert: 1. Januar 2023
Dieser Datenschutzhinweis für Bewerber ("Datenschutzhinweis") beschreibt, wie Honeywell International, Inc. und seine
verbundenen Unternehmen
(zusammen "
Honeywell
", "
wir
" oder "
uns
") Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, wenn Sie unserer Talent Community beitreten, eine Stelle suchen oder sich bewerben und uns über unser Portal, unsere Websites oder andere Rekrutierungsmedien personenbezogene Daten übermitteln, unabhängig davon, ob dies online oder offline geschieht (die "
Dienstleistungen
"). Wir sind die für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortlichen im Sinne der geltenden Datenschutzgesetze.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie, wenn Sie bereits bei Honeywell beschäftigt sind, auch die globalen Datenschutzrichtlinien von Honeywell und die Datenschutzhinweise für Mitarbeiter lesen können, sofern es in Ihrem Land solche gibt. Ziel dieser Datenschutzerklärung ist es, Ihnen genauere Informationen über die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung zu geben.
Von uns gesammelte persönliche Informationen
Um Ihre Bewerbung bearbeiten zu können, bitten wir Sie um die Angabe personenbezogener Daten, z. B. wenn Sie sich über unsere Website/unser Portal auf eine bestimmte Stelle bewerben oder, falls Sie bereits bei Honeywell beschäftigt sind, während Ihres Arbeitsverhältnisses. Alle Angaben erfolgen auf freiwilliger Basis, und Sie bestimmen den Umfang der Informationen, die Sie Honeywell zur Verfügung stellen.
Bitte bedenken Sie, dass wir einige Informationen benötigen, um Ihre Bewerbung zu prüfen, und dass wir Sie als Bewerber nur eingeschränkt berücksichtigen können, wenn Sie uns diese Informationen nicht zur Verfügung stellen.
(i)   Persönliche Informationen
Wir können die folgenden persönlichen Informationen über Sie sammeln:
Persönliche Angaben und Kontaktinformationen, einschließlich E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummer(n) und Foto;
Berufs- und Ausbildungsinformationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Tätigkeit, z. B. Ihre derzeitigen oder früheren Arbeitgeber, Ihre Berufsbezeichnung oder andere Informationen über die Organisation, der Sie angehören. Sie können auch Ihren Lebenslauf und Angaben zu Ihren Qualifikationen oder Ihrer Ausbildung machen, z. B. zu Ihren Abschlüssen, Studienfächern, den besuchten Einrichtungen, Sprachen, beruflichen Mitgliedschaften, Zertifizierungen, Einzelheiten zu Leistungsbewertungen und Vergütung;
Berufliche Präferenzen (z. B. kurz- und langfristige Ziele, Bereitschaft zum Umzug, verfügbares Datum für den Umzug und Standortpräferenzen);
Personenbezogene Daten, die sich aus Ihrer Teilnahme an unserem Einstellungsverfahren ergeben, wie z. B. die Daten, die wir bei Vorstellungsgesprächen erhalten, die E-Mails, die wir mit Ihnen bezüglich Ihrer Bewerbung austauschen, oder die Gespräche, die wir mit Ihnen über unseren Online-Chatbot führen.
Audio- und visuelle Informationen, wie Ihre Stimme und Ihr Bild auf Fotos, Video- oder Audioaufnahmen, wenn Sie an einem Telefon- oder Videointerview teilnehmen oder wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen;
Alle anderen persönlichen Informationen, die Sie uns freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen.
(ii)  Sensible persönliche Informationen
Wir können auch besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten über Sie erfassen (auch bekannt als "besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten"), wenn wir gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet sind oder die Informationen, die für Ihr künftiges Arbeitsumfeld bei Honeywell oder für die künftige Gewährung von Beschäftigungsleistungen relevant sind, oder mit Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung, z. B:
Eine von der Regierung ausgestellte Identifikationsnummer (z. B. eine Sozialversicherungsnummer);
Demografische Daten, die Informationen über geschützte Merkmale wie Alter, Geschlecht, Rasse, Behinderung, sexuelle Orientierung, Familienstand oder Veteranenstatus enthalten können;
Gesundheitsinformationen (z. B. zur Berücksichtigung von Behinderungen oder diätetischen Einschränkungen);
Informationen, die sich auf die politischen Meinungen oder religiösen Überzeugungen einer Person oder ihre Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft beziehen;
Informationen über Straftaten oder Verurteilungen einer Person sowie alle anderen Informationen, die nach den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen als sensibel gelten. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, muss Honeywell ggf. auch Hintergrund- und/oder strafrechtliche Überprüfungen durchführen, um Ihre Eignung für eine offene Stelle oder Gelegenheit bei Honeywell festzustellen.
Wir verlangen von Ihnen nicht, dass Sie uns sensible personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellen, es sei denn, dies ist für die Erfüllung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen erforderlich (z. B. für die Überwachung der Chancengleichheit) oder Sie haben Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung gegeben. Sofern nicht gesetzlich vorgeschrieben, ist die Bereitstellung dieser Informationen vollkommen freiwillig. Honeywell setzt sich für eine wirklich integrative und vielfältige Belegschaft ein. Indem Sie uns Ihre Daten zur Chancengleichheit zur Verfügung stellen, ermöglichen Sie uns ein besseres Verständnis unseres Mitarbeiterprofils in Bezug auf Daten zur Chancengleichheit und der Maßnahmen, die wir ergreifen müssen, um eine vielfältige Belegschaft zu gewinnen, zu fördern und zu halten, unabhängig von Alter, Behinderung, Geschlecht, Rasse, religiösen oder philosophischen Überzeugungen und sexueller Orientierung.
(iii) Persönliche Informationen, die wir automatisch von Ihnen sammeln
Wir können automatisch bestimmte Informationen über Ihren Besuch auf unseren Websites sammeln, indem wir "Cookies" und andere ähnliche Tracking-Technologien verwenden. Weitere Informationen zu den Cookies, die wir auf der Website verwenden, über die Sie Ihre Bewerbung einreichen, finden Sie in unserem
Cookie-Hinweis
.
Quellen für persönliche Informationen
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten direkt von Ihnen oder indirekt von Dritten erheben, die rechtmäßig zur Weitergabe Ihrer Daten an uns berechtigt sind, wie z. B:
Arbeitsvermittlungsagenturen, Anbieter von Hintergrund-/Beschäftigungsprüfungen oder Identitätsüberprüfungsdiensten;
Personalvermittlungsagenturen (z. B. wenn eine Personalvermittlungsagentur Sie als potenziellen Bewerber identifiziert);
Öffentlich zugängliche Informationen über Sie von Websites wie LinkedIn oder der Website Ihres derzeitigen Arbeitgebers. Sie können uns auch Zugang zu bestimmten personenbezogenen Daten gewähren, die von Dritten gespeichert werden (z. B. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google oder Facebook). Indem Sie Honeywell den Zugriff auf diese Informationen gestatten, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass wir diese Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen erfassen, speichern und nutzen dürfen;
Durch Empfehlung oder Mundpropaganda (z. B. durch eine Empfehlung eines derzeitigen oder ehemaligen Mitarbeiters). Bei Empfehlungen ist die Person, die Sie empfiehlt, für die Einholung Ihrer Zustimmung zur Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an uns verantwortlich.
Zwecke, für die persönliche Informationen verwendet werden
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für die folgenden Zwecke:
Um Ihre Bewerbung zu bewerten und Einstellungsentscheidungen zu treffen;
mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren und Sie über die Einstellung und/oder Ihre Bewerbung(en) oder andere erforderliche Mitteilungen zu informieren;
Zur Erfüllung geltender gesetzlicher und behördlicher Anforderungen sowie zur Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen;
Beschäftigung und Unternehmensführung (z. B. Erstellung eines grundlegenden Beschäftigungsnachweises, wenn Sie eingestellt werden);
Erstellung von aggregierten Berichten/Analysen zu den Aktivitätsdaten von Bewerbern (z. B. Traffic auf der Karriereseite, Kandidatentrichter, Einstellungsquelle, Erfolg von Rekrutierungskampagnen);
Nur für Honeywell-Mitarbeiter
:
Sie werden automatisch davon ausgeschlossen, dass Sie Personalvermittlern proaktiv für ein Stellenangebot vorgeschlagen werden, und kommen gemäß Ihrer aktuellen HPD 9-Block-Einstufung nicht für eine Berücksichtigung in Frage (die nie jemandem außerhalb von Honeywell mitgeteilt wird). Sie können sich jedoch jederzeit direkt auf eine verfügbare Stelle bewerben, und Ihre spezielle Situation wird von einem Personalverantwortlichen geprüft.
Nur wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in den Vereinigten Staaten haben
:
Um Ihnen Mitteilungen per SMS zu senden, insbesondere:
(i)     1-1 SMS-Nachrichten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung auf eine bestimmte offene Stelle; und/oder
(ii)    vorbehaltlich Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung, SMS-Kampagnenmitteilungen über Beschäftigungsmöglichkeiten, Stellenangelegenheiten und Aktualisierungen von Bewerbungen.
Sie haben die Möglichkeit, den Erhalt der oben genannten Mitteilungen abzulehnen und/oder Ihre Zustimmung zu widerrufen, indem Sie die in Ihrem Profil angegebenen Anweisungen befolgen.
Wenn Ihnen eine Beschäftigung bei Honeywell angeboten wird und Sie diese annehmen, werden die während des Bewerbungs- und Einstellungsverfahrens gesammelten Informationen Teil Ihrer Personalakte.
Automatisierte Verarbeitung und Profiling
Vorbehaltlich Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung (die Sie freiwillig erteilen, wenn Sie unserer Talent Community beitreten oder während des Bewerbungsprozesses das entsprechende Zustimmungsfeld ankreuzen), führen wir ein "Profiling" durch, um Ihre Eignung für bestimmte Stellenangebote zu bewerten. Dabei wird ein Matching-Algorithmus verwendet, der Ihr Beschäftigungsprofil auswertet und Ihre Eignung für ein bestimmtes Stellenangebot vorhersagen kann. Wir führen diese automatisierte Verarbeitung für die folgenden Zwecke durch:
Unterstützung von Personalvermittlern beim Abgleich von Bewerberprofilen mit Stellenangeboten, indem sie Kandidaten vorschlagen, die für ein bestimmtes Stellenangebot in Frage kommen; und
das Versenden von personalisierten Jobempfehlungen an Sie auf der Grundlage Ihres Profils und/oder Ihrer Präferenzen oder anderer Informationen, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten, wie z. B. Honeywell-Nachrichten, Webinare und Veranstaltungen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie auf der Grundlage dieses Profils für bestimmte Stellen nicht berücksichtigt werden können, es sei denn, Sie haben sich direkt darauf beworben.
Wir treffen keine Einstellungsentscheidungen, die ausschließlich auf automatisierten Entscheidungsprozessen und/oder Profiling beruhen. Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden menschlichen Entscheidungen unterworfen, da die endgültige Einstellungsentscheidung von den Personalverantwortlichen oder dem Personalleiter getroffen wird.
Die Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung Ihrer persönlichen Daten
In bestimmten Rechtsordnungen muss Honeywell eine Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben. Wenn wir nach geltendem Recht unsere Verarbeitungsaktivitäten rechtfertigen müssen, hängt unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben, von den betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten und dem spezifischen Kontext ab, in dem wir sie erfassen.
Einverständnis.
Im Allgemeinen erheben wir personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen, wenn wir Ihre Zustimmung dazu haben und wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zur Bearbeitung Ihrer Bewerbung benötigen. Indem Sie auf unsere Website/unser Portal zugreifen, unserer Talent Community beitreten oder sich auf eine unserer Stellen bewerben, geben Sie Honeywell Ihr Einverständnis, die oben beschriebenen personenbezogenen Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecken zu erfassen und weiterzuverarbeiten. Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen, indem Sie eine Anfrage über unser Portal für Datenschutzanfragen unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
einreichen oder uns eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
senden.
Berechtigte Interessen Die.
legitimen Interessen von Honeywell, nämlich die Anwerbung, Auswahl, Bewertung und Ernennung neuer Mitarbeiter sowie die Verwaltung und Administration des Einstellungs- und Personalprozesses, soweit unsere legitimen Interessen nicht durch Ihre Grundrechte und -freiheiten überlagert werden.
Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen
. Einhaltung der rechtlichen Verpflichtungen von Honeywell, wenn das Arbeitsrecht oder andere Gesetze die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten erfordern (z. B. in dem Maße, in dem das Gesetz die Überwachung von Chancengleichheit und Vielfalt vorschreibt).
Lebenswichtige Interessen.
Wir benötigen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten möglicherweise auch, um Ihre lebenswichtigen Interessen zu schützen (z. B. aus Gründen der Gesundheit und Sicherheit, wenn Sie an einem Vorstellungsgespräch bei uns teilnehmen)
Wenn Sie Fragen zu den Rechtsgrundlagen haben, auf denen wir Ihre persönlichen Daten sammeln und verwenden, oder weitere Informationen benötigen, senden Sie bitte eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Mit wem wir Ihre persönlichen Informationen teilen
Honeywell gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nur unter den folgenden Umständen an Dritte weiter:
Unternehmen der Honeywell-Gruppe
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an andere Konzernunternehmen in der ganzen Welt weitergeben, um Ihr Profil zu bewerten und Sie für Einstellungsmöglichkeiten auf Konzernebene zu berücksichtigen.
Dienstleister
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speziell an Drittanbieter weitergeben, die in unserem Auftrag bestimmte Dienstleistungen erbringen (z. B. Personalvermittlungs- und Outsourcing-Anbieter und Analytik-Anbieter). Solche Drittanbieter können je nach Land variieren und werden sich von Zeit zu Zeit ändern, können aber Phenom People, Inc. und Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. sowie deren jeweilige Drittanbieter umfassen.
Honeywell-Mitarbeiter.
Wenn Sie bereits ein Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sind, beachten Sie bitte, dass einige Abschnitte Ihres Profils öffentlich und somit für alle Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sichtbar sind (insbesondere Ihr Name, Ihr Titel, Ihr Foto, Ihre Fähigkeiten, Ihre Interessengebiete, Ihre Berufserfahrung und Ihre Ausbildung). Diese Bereiche können jedoch bearbeitet werden, und Sie können wählen, welche Informationen über Sie in Ihrem Profil angezeigt werden sollen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Angaben zu Karrierezielen, Umzügenund der Profilstatus "offen für neue Angebote" sind nicht öffentlich und daher nicht für alle Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sichtbar (nur für das Talentteam von Honeywell).
Andere Drittparteien.
Honeywell kann Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an die zuständigen Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Aufsichtsbehörden, Regierungsbehörden, Gerichte oder Dritte weitergeben, wenn wir der Meinung sind, dass die Weitergabe nach geltendem Recht erforderlich ist oder wenn wir in gutem Glauben davon ausgehen, dass eine solche Maßnahme notwendig ist, um unsere gesetzlichen Rechte auszuüben, zu begründen oder zu verteidigen oder um Ihre lebenswichtigen Interessen oder die einer anderen Person zu schützen. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch mit Ihrer Zustimmung oder auf Ihre Anweisung hin an andere weitergeben (z. B. an einen Schiedsrichter oder einen Berufsverband).
Internationale Übermittlung von persönlichen Daten
Honeywell ist ein globales Unternehmen, und Ihre personenbezogenen Daten können an verschiedene Standorte weltweit, z. B. in den USA und Indien, übermittelt, dort aufbewahrt, gespeichert oder verwendet werden. Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfassen, bedeutet dies, dass sie möglicherweise in Ländern verarbeitet werden, in denen andere Datenschutzgesetze gelten als in Ihrem Land. Honeywell wird jedoch stets angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu schützen und ein Schutzniveau für personenbezogene Daten zu gewährleisten, das mit dem Ihres Wohnsitzlandes vergleichbar ist. Dazu gehört auch die Anwendung der
Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Kommission
die Sie auf der Website der Kommission unter
https://ec.europa.eu
finden.
Vorratsspeicherung
Wir werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange aufbewahren, wie es im Zusammenhang mit den in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen beschriebenen Zwecken und in Übereinstimmung mit dem Honeywell Record Retention Schedule erforderlich ist oder wie es das geltende Recht vorschreibt.
Ihre Rechte
Je nach geltendem Recht haben Sie möglicherweise bestimmte Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre persönlichen Daten. Wenn Sie in Kalifornien ansässig sind, lesen Sie bitte unten den Abschnitt “
Zusätzliche Informationen für in Kalifornien ansässige Personen
”.
Sie haben das Recht,
auf
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
zuzugreifen, sie zu korrigieren, zu aktualisieren oder ihre Löschung zu
verlangen;
Sie können der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
widersprechen
und uns bitten,
diese einzuschränken
. die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten oder die
Übertragbarkeit
Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verlangen;
Sie haben das Recht, einer Entscheidung über Sie zu widersprechen, die ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung, einschließlich Profiling, beruht, wenn diese Entscheidung rechtliche Auswirkungen auf Sie hat oder Sie erheblich beeinträchtigt.
Honeywell trifft im Rahmen seines Einstellungsverfahrens keine ausschließlich automatisierten Entscheidungen über Bewerber.
Auch wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Einwilligung erhoben und verarbeitet haben, können Sie Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen. Der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung hat keinen Einfluss auf die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung, die wir vor Ihrem Widerruf durchgeführt haben, und auch nicht auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die auf der Grundlage anderer rechtmäßiger Verarbeitungsgründe als der Einwilligung erfolgt ist; und
Sie haben das Recht, sich bei einer Datenschutzbehörde über die Erhebung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns zu beschweren.
Wir unterstützen Sie bei der Ausübung der Rechte, die Ihnen nach geltendem Recht zustehen. Wenn Sie eines Ihrer Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte an uns über die HR-Hilfe oder das Antragsformular für Betroffene, das Sie unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-finden
oder senden Sie eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Zusätzliche Informationen für in Kalifornien ansässige Personen
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz im US-Bundesstaat Kalifornien haben, ergänzt dieser Abschnitt die Datenschutzhinweise für Bewerber von Honeywell.
(i)      Kategorien von gesammelten und weitergegebenen persönlichen Informationen
Honeywell hat in den vorangegangenen zwölf Monaten die folgenden Kategorien personenbezogener Daten für unsere Geschäftszwecke erfasst und weitergegeben:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorien
Wir sammeln
A.
Identifikatoren wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geschlecht, E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummern, Postanschrift, Online-Identifikatoren, Konten in sozialen Medien und andere Identifikatoren.
Ja
C.
Merkmale geschützter Klassifizierungen nach kalifornischem oder bundesstaatlichem Recht, wie z. B. Rasse, ethnische Zugehörigkeit, religiöse oder philosophische Überzeugungen, Gewerkschaftszugehörigkeit, Gesundheitsdaten, biometrische Informationen, genetische Daten, Behinderung, Veteranenstatus, sexuelle Orientierung, persönliche Post, E-Mails und Textnachrichten (sofern Honeywell nicht der vorgesehene Empfänger ist), staatliche Kennungen (z. B. Sozialversicherungsnummer), Führerschein, Reisepass, Finanz- und Bankdaten.
Ja
F.
Informationen über Internet- oder andere elektronische Netzwerkaktivitäten, wie z. B. Browserverlauf, Interaktionen mit Honeywell-Websites, E-Mail- und Textnachrichtendienste.
Ja
G.
Geolokalisierungsdaten, wie Gerätestandort und IP-Standort.
Ja
H.
Audio-, elektronische, visuelle, thermische oder ähnliche Informationen, wie z. B. Ihre Stimme und Ihr Bild, Video- oder Audioaufnahmen, wenn Sie an einem Telefon- oder Videointerview teilnehmen oder wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen.
Ja
I.
Berufliche oder beschäftigungsbezogene Informationen wie z. B. Ihr Beruf, derzeitige oder frühere Arbeitgeber, Berufsbezeichnung, Bildungsweg, akademische und berufliche Qualifikationen, Lebenslauf, beruflicher Werdegang, Einstellungsreferenzen, Gesprächsnotizen und -bewertungen, Sprachen, berufliche Mitgliedschaften, Zertifizierungen, Leistungsbewertungen, Vergütung, Standortpräferenzen und Reisepräferenzen.
Ja
K.
Rückschlüsse, die aus den oben aufgeführten personenbezogenen Daten gezogen werden, um ein Profil oder eine Zusammenfassung z. B. über die Vorlieben und Eigenschaften einer Person zu erstellen.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Ihre Recht
Sie haben das Recht, die folgenden Rechte für den Zeitraum von zwölf Monaten, der Ihrem Antrag vorausgeht, bei uns geltend zu machen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Rechte nicht absolut sind und in bestimmten Fällen Einschränkungen unterliegen, die im geltenden Recht festgelegt sind:
Sie haben das Recht zu erfahren, welche persönlichen Daten wir über Sie gesammelt haben, aus welchen Quellen wir Ihre persönlichen Daten gesammelt haben, für welchen geschäftlichen oder kommerziellen Zweck wir Ihre persönlichen Daten gesammelt haben und an welche Kategorien von Dritten wir Ihre persönlichen Daten weitergeben;
Das Recht, Ihre persönlichen Daten zu löschen;
Das Recht, unrichtige personenbezogene Daten über Sie zu korrigieren;
Das Recht, dem Verkauf oder der Weitergabe Ihrer persönlichen Daten zu widersprechen;
Das Recht, die Verarbeitung Ihrer sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten einzuschränken;
Das Recht, bei der Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach geltendem Recht nicht unrechtmäßig diskriminiert zu werden.
Wir werden Ihnen die Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach geltendem Recht erleichtern, und in Anbetracht der Art und Sensibilität der personenbezogenen Daten, die Gegenstand der Anfrage sind, kann es zu Ihrem Schutz erforderlich sein, Ihre Identität zu überprüfen und zusätzliche Informationen von Ihnen anzufordern.
Wenn Sie eines Ihrer Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre persönlichen Daten ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte über das Formular zur Datenanfrage unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
an uns oder senden Sie eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Wenn Sie bereits ein Mitarbeiter von Honeywell sind, können Sie sich unter
HRhelp@honeywell.com
an uns wenden.
Kontakt
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden darüber haben, wie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden, oder wenn Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte an
HRhelp@honeyw-ell.com
(nur, wenn Sie bereits ein Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sind) oder an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Sie können sich auch über das Formular für Anfragen von Betroffenen an uns wenden, das Sie unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement finden
.
Frissítve: január 1.
A jelen Pályázói adatvédelmi nyilatkozat ("Adatvédelmi nyilatkozat") leírja, hogy a Honeywell International, Inc. és
kapcsolt vállalkozásai
(együttesen "
Honeywell
", "
mi
" vagy "
mi
") hogyan dolgozzák fel az Ön személyes adatait, amikor Ön csatlakozik a tehetségközösségünkhöz, keres vagy jelentkezik állásra, és személyes adatokat küld nekünk a portálunkon, weboldalainkon vagy más toborzási eszközökön keresztül, akár online, akár offline (a "
Szolgáltatások
"). Az alkalmazandó adatvédelmi törvények értelmében mi vagyunk az Ön személyes adatainak kezelői.
Kérjük, vegye figyelembe, hogy ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, akkor a Honeywell globális adatvédelmi szabályzatát és a munkavállalói adatvédelmi nyilatkozatot is figyelembe veheti, amennyiben az Ön joghatósága alá tartozó területen létezik ilyen. A jelen Adatvédelmi tájékoztató célja, hogy részletesebb tájékoztatást adjon az Ön személyes adatainak az Ön jelentkezése kapcsán történő feldolgozásáról.
Az általunk gyűjtött személyes adatok
Az Ön jelentkezésének feldolgozása érdekében arra kérjük, hogy adja meg az Önre vonatkozó személyes adatokat, például amikor egy adott álláshirdetésre jelentkezik a weboldalunkon/portálunkon keresztül, vagy ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, akkor a munkaviszonya során. Minden információ megadása önkéntes alapon történik, és Ön határozza meg, hogy milyen mértékben adja meg a Honeywellnek az adatait.
Kérjük, ne feledje, hogy bizonyos információk szükségesek lehetnek az Ön jelentkezésének teljes körű értékeléséhez, és ha ezeket nem adja meg, korlátozott lehet a lehetőségünk arra, hogy Önt jelöltként figyelembe vegyük.
(i)   Személyes információk
A következő személyes adatokat gyűjthetjük Önről:
Személyes adatok és kapcsolattartási információk, beleértve az e-mail címet, telefonszám(ok)at és fényképet;
A foglalkozásával kapcsolatos szakmai és oktatási információk, például a jelenlegi vagy korábbi munkáltatói, a munkakörével kapcsolatos információk, vagy egyéb információk arról a szervezetről, amellyel kapcsolatban áll. Megadhatja önéletrajzát/önéletrajzát, valamint a képzettségére vagy az oktatására vonatkozó információkat is, például a diplomáját, a tanulmányi területeket, a tanult intézményeket, a nyelveket, a szakmai tagságokat, a tanúsítványokat, a teljesítményértékeléssel és a javadalmazással kapcsolatos részleteket;
Karrierpreferenciák (pl. rövid és hosszú távú célok, költözési hajlandóság, a költözésre rendelkezésre álló időpont és a hely preferenciái);
Az Ön toborzási folyamatunkban való részvételéből származó személyes adatok, például az interjúk során kapott adatok, az Önnel a jelentkezésével kapcsolatban váltott e-mailek vagy az online chatbotunkon keresztül folytatott beszélgetések.
Hang- és képi információk, például az Ön hangja és képmása, amelyet fényképek, videó- vagy hangfelvételek rögzítenek, ha Ön telefonos vagy videointerjún vesz részt, vagy ha felkeresi irodánkat;
Bármilyen más személyes adat, amelyet Ön önkéntesen megad nekünk.
(ii)  Érzékeny személyes adatok
A személyes adatok különleges kategóriáit is gyűjthetjük Önről (más néven "személyes adatok különleges kategóriái"), ha erre jogi kötelezettségünk van, vagy ha aaz Ön jövőbeli munkakörnyezete szempontjából fontos információk a Honeywellnél, vagy a jövőbeni foglalkoztatási juttatások biztosítása érdekében, vagy az Ön kifejezett beleegyezésével, mint például:
Kormányzati azonosító szám (például társadalombiztosítási szám);
Demográfiai adatok, amelyek tartalmazhatnak védett besorolásokra vonatkozó információkat, mint például az Ön kora, neme, faji hovatartozása, fogyatékossága, szexuális irányultsága, családi állapota vagy veterán státusza;
Egészségügyi információk (például az Ön esetleges fogyatékosságának vagy étrendi korlátozásainak figyelembevétele érdekében);
Valamely személy politikai véleményére, vallási meggyőződésére vagy szakszervezeti tagságára vonatkozó információk;
Az egyén bűncselekményeire vagy elítéléseire vonatkozó információk, valamint bármely más, az alkalmazandó adatvédelmi jogszabályok szerint érzékenynek minősülő információ. Amennyiben a törvény megengedi, és amennyiben alkalmazható, a Honeywellnek háttér- és/vagy büntetőjogi ellenőrzéseket is el kell végeznie annak megállapítása érdekében, hogy Ön alkalmas-e a Honeywellnél betöltendő pozícióra vagy lehetőségre.
Nem kérjük Öntől, hogy adjon meg érzékeny személyes adatokat, kivéve, ha ez szükséges a szabályozási kötelezettségeink teljesítéséhez (pl. az esélyegyenlőség ellenőrzéséhez), vagy ha Ön ehhez kifejezetten hozzájárult. A törvény által előírt mértéket kivéve, ezen információk megadása teljesen önkéntes. A Honeywell elkötelezett a valóban befogadó és sokszínű munkaerő mellett. Azzal, hogy megadja nekünk az esélyegyenlőségi adatait, lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy jobban megismerjük a munkavállalói profilunkat az esélyegyenlőségi adatok szempontjából, és hogy milyen intézkedéseket kell tennünk a sokszínű munkaerő vonzása, támogatása és megtartása érdekében, függetlenül a kortól, fogyatékosságtól, nemtől, nemtől, fajtól, vallási vagy filozófiai meggyőződéstől és szexuális irányultságtól.
(iii) Az Öntől automatikusan gyűjtött személyes adatok
A "cookie-k" és más hasonló nyomkövető technológiák segítségével automatikusan gyűjthetünk Öntől bizonyos információkat a weboldalainkon tett látogatásáról. A cookie-król szóló további információkért, amelyeket azon a weboldalon használunk, amelyen keresztül a pályázatát benyújtja, kérjük, olvassa el a
Cookie-nyilatkozatunkat
.
A személyes információk forrásai
Személyes adatait közvetlenül Öntől vagy közvetve olyan harmadik felektől gyűjthetjük, akik jogszerűen jogosultak arra, hogy az Ön adatait megosszák velünk, mint például:
Munkaügyi ügynökségek, háttér-/foglalkoztatás-ellenőrzési vagy személyazonosság-ellenőrzési szolgáltatók;
Munkaerő-közvetítő ügynökségek (például amikor egy munkaerő-közvetítő ügynökség potenciális jelöltként azonosítja Önt);
Nyilvánosan elérhető információk Önről olyan oldalakról, mint a LinkedIn vagy a jelenlegi munkáltatója honlapja. Ön dönthet úgy is, hogy hozzáférést biztosít számunkra bizonyos, harmadik felek (például a LinkedIn, a Twitter, a Google vagy a Facebook) által tárolt személyes adatokhoz. Azzal, hogy engedélyezi a Honeywell számára, hogy hozzáférjen ezekhez az információkhoz, Ön beleegyezik abba, hogy ezeket az információkat a jelen Adatvédelmi tájékoztatóval összhangban gyűjtsük, tároljuk és használjuk fel;
Referencia vagy szájhagyomány útján (például egy jelenlegi vagy korábbi alkalmazott ajánlásával). Ajánlás esetén az Önt ajánló személy felelős az Ön hozzájárulásának megszerzéséért, hogy személyes adatait átadja nekünk.
A személyes adatok felhasználásának céljai
Az Ön személyes adatait a következő célokra használjuk fel:
Az Ön jelentkezésének értékelése és a felvételi döntések meghozatala;
Kommunikálni Önnel, és tájékoztatni Önt a felvételi eljárásról és/vagy az Ön jelentkezési lapjáról (lapjairól), illetve bármely más szükséges kommunikációról;
Az alkalmazandó jogi és szabályozási követelményeknek való megfelelés, valamint jogi igények előterjesztése, érvényesítése vagy védelme érdekében;
Foglalkoztatás és vállalatirányítás (például alapvető foglalkoztatási nyilvántartás létrehozása, ha felveszik Önt);
Összevont jelentések / elemzések készítése a jelöltek aktivitási adataira vonatkozóan (pl. karrieroldal forgalma, jelölt-tölcsér, felvételi forrás, toborzási kampányok sikere);
Kizárólag a Honeywell alkalmazottai számára
:
Önt automatikusan kizárják abból, hogy proaktívan javasolják a toborzóknak egy álláslehetőségre, és nem jogosult a jelenlegi HPD 9 blokkos minősítése alapján (amely soha nem kerül nyilvánosságra senki számára a Honeywell-en kívül). Ugyanakkor mindig lehetősége lesz arra, hogy közvetlenül jelentkezzen bármely elérhető álláslehetőségre, és az Ön konkrét helyzetét egy toborzó figyelembe fogja venni.
Csak akkor, ha Ön az Egyesült Államokban lakik
:
SMS-ben történő kommunikáció küldése, különösen:
(i)     1-1 SMS kommunikáció egy adott álláshirdetésre való jelentkezésével kapcsolatban; és/vagy
(ii)
az
Ön kifejezett hozzájárulásától függően SMS-kampánykommunikáció a munkalehetőségekről, állásügyekről és pályázati frissítésekről.
Ön a profiljában megadott utasításokat követve lemondhat és/vagy visszavonhatja a fent említett közlemények fogadásához adott hozzájárulását.
Ha a Honeywell ajánlatot tesz Önnek, és elfogadja az állást, a jelentkezési és felvételi eljárás során gyűjtött információk az Ön foglalkoztatási nyilvántartásának részévé válnak.
Automatizált feldolgozás és profilalkotás
Az Ön kifejezett hozzájárulása esetén (amelyet Ön önkéntesen ad meg, amikor csatlakozik a tehetségközösségünkhöz, vagy amikor a jelentkezési folyamat során bejelölte a megfelelő hozzájárulási négyzetet), "profilalkotást" végzünk annak érdekében, hogy értékeljük az Ön alkalmasságát az egyes álláslehetőségekre. Ez egy olyan megfeleltetési algoritmus használatát jelenti, amely képes értékelni az Ön foglalkoztatási profilját, és megjósolni az Ön alkalmasságát egy adott álláslehetőségre. Ezt az automatizált feldolgozást a következő célokból végezzük:
a toborzók segítése a jelöltek profiljának és a munkalehetőségeknek a megfeleltetése azáltal, hogy jelölteket javasolnak egy adott munkalehetőségre; és
személyre szabott állásajánlatok küldése Önnek az Ön profilja és/vagy preferenciái alapján, illetve egyéb, az Ön számára érdekes információk, például Honeywell hírek, webináriumok és események küldése.
Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy e profilalkotás alapján előfordulhat, hogy bizonyos álláslehetőségekre nem veszik figyelembe, hacsak nem jelentkezett közvetlenül azokra.
Nem hozunk kizárólag automatizált döntéshozatali folyamatokon és/vagy profilalkotáson alapuló felvételi döntéseket. Az Ön személyes adatait emberi döntéseknek vetjük alá, mivel a végső felvételi döntést a toborzók vagy a felvételi menedzserek hozzák meg.
Az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozásának jogalapjai
Bizonyos joghatóságok megkövetelik, hogy a Honeywellnek legyen jogalapja az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozására. Amennyiben az alkalmazandó jog megköveteli, hogy igazoljuk feldolgozási tevékenységeinket, az Ön személyes adatainak a jelen Adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírtak szerinti gyűjtésére és felhasználására vonatkozó jogalapunk az érintett személyes adatoktól és attól a konkrét kontextustól függ, amelyben azokat gyűjtjük.
Hozzájárulás.
Általánosságban elmondható, hogy általában akkor gyűjtünk Öntől személyes adatokat, ha ehhez Ön hozzájárul, és ha az Ön személyes adataira az Ön jelentkezésének feldolgozásához van szükségünk. Azzal, hogy belép weboldalunkra/portálunkra, csatlakozik tehetségközösségünkhöz vagy jelentkezik valamelyik álláshelyünkre, Ön hozzájárulását adja a Honeywell számára a fent leírt személyes adatok gyűjtéséhez és további feldolgozásához a jelen adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírt célokból. Hozzájárulását bármikor visszavonhatja, ha az adatalanyok kérelmére szolgáló portálunkon keresztül a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
címen kérvényt nyújt be, vagy e-mailt küld nekünk a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
Jogos érdekek. A
Honeywell jogos érdekei, nevezetesen az új alkalmazottak felvétele, kiválasztása, értékelése és kinevezése, valamint a felvételi és a HR-folyamat irányítása és adminisztrációja, amennyiben jogos érdekeinket nem írják felül az Ön alapvető jogai és szabadságai.
Jogi kötelezettségek
. A Honeywell jogi kötelezettségeinek való megfelelés, amennyiben a munkajog vagy más törvények megkövetelik az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozását (például amennyiben a törvény előírja az esélyegyenlőség és a sokszínűség nyomon követését).
Létfontosságú érdekek.
Az Ön személyes adataira az Ön létfontosságú érdekeinek védelme érdekében is szükségünk lehet (például egészségügyi és biztonsági okokból, ha Ön egy interjún vesz részt nálunk).
Ha bármilyen kérdése van, vagy további információra van szüksége azzal kapcsolatban, hogy milyen jogalapon gyűjtjük és használjuk fel az Ön személyes adatait, kérjük, küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
Kivel osztjuk meg személyes adatait
A Honeywell csak a következő körülmények között osztja meg az Ön személyes adatait harmadik felekkel:
Honeywell-csoporthoz tartozó egységek
. Megoszthatjuk az Ön személyes adatait a csoport más, a világ különböző joghatóságai alatt működő szervezeti egységeivel az Ön profiljának értékelése és a csoport szintű felvételi lehetőségek mérlegelése céljából.
Szolgáltatók Az
Ön személyes adatait kifejezetten megoszthatjuk olyan harmadik fél szolgáltatókkal, akik a nevünkben speciális szolgáltatásokat végeznek (például toborzási és kiszervezési személyzeti szolgáltatók és elemzési szolgáltatók). Ezek a harmadik felek az Ön országától függően változhatnak, és időről időre változnak, de lehetnek a Phenom People, Inc. és a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. és a megfelelő harmadik fél szolgáltatók.
Honeywell alkalmazottak.
Ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, kérjük, vegye figyelembe, hogy az Ön profiljának egyes részei nyilvánosak, és ezért a Honeywell összes alkalmazottja számára láthatóak (különösen az Ön neve, beosztása, fényképe, képességei, érdeklődési területei, munkatapasztalata és végzettsége). Ezek a részek azonban szerkeszthetők, és Ön választhatja ki, hogy milyen információk jelenjenek meg Önről a profiljában. Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy a karriercélok, az áthelyezésekés a "nyitott az új lehetőségek előtt" részek nem nyilvánosak, és ezért nem láthatók a Honeywell összes alkalmazottja számára (csak a Honeywell tehetséggondozó csapata számára).
Egyéb harmadik felek. A
Honeywell az Ön személyes adatait bármely illetékes bűnüldöző szervvel, szabályozó hatósággal, kormányzati szervvel, bírósággal vagy harmadik féllel megoszthatja, amennyiben úgy véljük, hogy a közzétételre az alkalmazandó jogszabályok alapján szükség van, vagy abban a jóhiszemű meggyőződésben, hogy az ilyen intézkedés szükséges törvényes jogaink gyakorlásához, megalapozásához vagy védelméhez, illetve az Ön vagy más személy létfontosságú érdekeinek védelméhez. Személyes adatait az Ön hozzájárulásával vagy az Ön utasítására másokkal is megoszthatjuk (pl. egy bíró vagy szakmai szövetség).
Személyes adatok nemzetközi továbbítása
A Honeywell egy globális szervezet, és az Ön személyes adatait világszerte különböző helyszínekre, például az Egyesült Államokba és Indiába továbbíthatják, tárolhatják vagy felhasználhatják. Ez azt jelenti, hogy amikor személyes adatait gyűjtjük, azokat olyan országokban is feldolgozhatjuk, amelyek adatvédelmi törvényei eltérhetnek az Ön országának törvényeitől. A Honeywell azonban mindig megteszi az ésszerű lépéseket az Ön adatainak védelme és az Ön lakóhelye szerinti országéhoz hasonló szintű védelem biztosítása érdekében, amely magában foglalja az
Európai Bizottság általános szerződési feltételeinek
alkalmazását, amelyek megtalálhatók a Bizottság honlapján a
https://ec.europa.eu
címen.
Megtartás
Az Ön személyes adatait addig őrizzük meg, ameddig az a jelen Adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírt célokkal kapcsolatban szükséges, illetve a Honeywell iratmegőrzési ütemtervének megfelelően, vagy ahogy azt a vonatkozó jogszabályok előírják.
Az Ön jogai
Az alkalmazandó jogtól függően bizonyos jogokkal rendelkezhet személyes adatai tekintetében. Ha Ön kaliforniai lakos, kérjük, olvassa el az alábbi “
További információk kaliforniai lakosok számára
” című részt.
Önnek joga van
hozzáférni, helyesbíteni, frissíteni
vagy kérheti személyes adatainak
törlését
;
Tiltakozhat
személyes adatainak feldolgozása ellen, kérheti, hogy korlátozzuk személyes adatainak feldolgozását, vagy kérheti személyes adatainak
hordozhatóságát
;
Ön jogosult lehet arra, hogy ne hozzanak Önről olyan döntést, amely kizárólag automatizált feldolgozáson alapul, ideértve a profilalkotást is, ha a döntés joghatásokat eredményez Önre nézve, vagy jelentősen érinti Önt.
A Honeywell a munkaerő-felvételi folyamat részeként nem hoz kizárólag automatizált döntéseket a jelöltekről
.
Hasonlóképpen, ha személyes adatait az Ön hozzájárulásával gyűjtöttük és dolgozzuk fel, akkor Ön bármikor visszavonhatja hozzájárulását. A hozzájárulásának visszavonása nem érinti az Ön visszavonását megelőzően végzett feldolgozás jogszerűségét, és nem érinti az Ön személyes adatainak a hozzájáruláson kívüli jogszerű feldolgozási okokra támaszkodó feldolgozását sem; és
Önnek joga van panaszt tenni egy adatvédelmi hatóságnál személyes adatainak gyűjtése és felhasználása miatt.
Az alkalmazandó joggal összhangban megkönnyítjük az Önre vonatkozó jogok gyakorlását. A személyes adataival kapcsolatos bármely jogának gyakorlásához kérjük, lépjen kapcsolatba velünk a HR Help-en keresztül, vagy az érintettek kérelmére szolgáló űrlapon, amely a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-nyilatkozaton
található, vagy küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
További információk kaliforniai lakosok számára
Ha Ön Kalifornia államban lakik, ez a szakasz kiegészíti a Honeywell Pályázói adatvédelmi nyilatkozatát.
(i)      A gyűjtött és nyilvánosságra hozott személyes adatok kategóriái
A Honeywell a következő kategóriájú személyes adatokat gyűjtötte és tette közzé üzleti céljaink érdekében az elmúlt tizenkét hónapban:
Previous column
Next column
Kategóriák
Gyűjtünk
A.
Azonosítók, mint például név, születési dátum, nem, e-mail cím, telefonszámok, postai cím, online azonosítók, közösségi média fiók és egyéb azonosítók.
Igen
C.
A kaliforniai vagy szövetségi törvények szerint védett besorolás jellemzői, mint például faji, etnikai hovatartozás, vallási vagy filozófiai meggyőződés, szakszervezeti tagság, egészségügyi adatok, biometrikus információk, genetikai adatok, fogyatékosság, veterán státusz, szexuális irányultság, személyes levelek, e-mailek és szöveges üzenetek (kivéve, ha a Honeywell a címzett), kormányzati azonosítók (pl. társadalombiztosítási szám), jogosítvány, útlevél, pénzügyi és banki információk.
Igen
F.
Internetes vagy egyéb elektronikus hálózati tevékenységekre vonatkozó információk, például böngészési előzmények, a Honeywell webhelyeivel, e-mail és szöveges üzenetküldő szolgáltatásokkal való interakciók.
Igen
G.
Geolokációs adatok, például az eszköz helyzete és az IP-helyzet.
Igen
H.
Hang-, elektronikus, vizuális, termikus vagy hasonló információk, például az Ön hangja és képe, videó- vagy hangfelvételek, ha Ön telefonos vagy videointerjún vesz részt, vagy ha felkeresi irodáinkat.
Igen
I.
Szakmai vagy foglalkoztatással kapcsolatos információk, mint például az Ön foglalkozása, jelenlegi vagy korábbi munkáltatói, munkakörének megnevezése, iskolai végzettsége, tudományos és szakmai képzettsége, önéletrajza, munkahelyi előzményei, felvételi referenciák, interjúkról készült feljegyzések és értékelések, nyelvek, szakmai tagságok, tanúsítványok, teljesítményértékelések, javadalmazás, hely- és utazási preferenciák.
Igen
K.
A fent felsorolt személyes adatok bármelyikéből levont következtetések, amelyek célja egy profil vagy összefoglaló létrehozása, például az egyén preferenciáiról és jellemzőiről.
Igen
Load More
(ii)      Az Ön jogai
Ön jogosult arra, hogy az alábbi jogokra vonatkozó kérelmet küldjön nekünk a kérelmét megelőző tizenkét hónapos időszakra vonatkozóan. Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy ezek a jogok nem abszolút érvényűek, és bizonyos esetekben az alkalmazandó jogszabályokban meghatározott korlátozások alá esnek:
Jogunk van tudni, hogy milyen személyes adatokat gyűjtöttünk Önről, milyen kategóriájú forrásokból gyűjtöttük az Ön személyes adatait; milyen üzleti vagy kereskedelmi célból gyűjtöttük az Ön személyes adatait, és milyen kategóriájú harmadik felekkel közöljük az Ön személyes adatait;
A személyes adatok törléséhez való jog;
Az Önre vonatkozó pontatlan személyes adatok helyesbítéséhez való jog;
A személyes adatainak eladásából vagy megosztásából való kilépés joga;
Az Ön érzékeny személyes adatai feldolgozásának korlátozásához való jog;
Az alkalmazandó jogszabályok szerinti jogai gyakorlása miatt jogellenes megkülönböztetéstől való mentességhez való jog.
Az alkalmazandó joggal összhangban megkönnyítjük az Önre vonatkozó jogok gyakorlását, és a kérelem tárgyát képező személyes adatok típusát és érzékenységét figyelembe véve az Ön védelme érdekében szükség lehet arra, hogy kérvényezzük az Ön személyazonosságának ellenőrzését és további információkat kérjünk Öntől.
A személyes adataival kapcsolatos bármely jogának gyakorlásához kérjük, lépjen kapcsolatba velünk a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
oldalon található adatkérő űrlapon keresztül, vagy küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. címre. Ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, a
HRhelp@honeywell.com
címen léphet kapcsolatba velünk.
Kapcsolatfelvétel
Ha bármilyen kérdése vagy panasza van személyes adatai feldolgozásával kapcsolatban, vagy ha élni kíván a jogaival, kérjük, forduljon a következő címre:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
((csak akkor, ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja) vagy adatvédelmi tisztviselőnk a
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
címen. A
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
címen található adatkérő űrlapon keresztül is kapcsolatba léphet velünk.
Aggiornato: 1 gennaio 2023
La presente Informativa sulla privacy dei candidati ("Informativa sulla privacy") descrive le modalità con cui Honeywell International, Inc. e le sue
affiliate
(collettivamente "
Honeywell
", "
noi
" o "
ci"
) trattano i dati personali dell'utente quando si iscrive alla nostra Talent Community, cerca o si candida per un posto di lavoro e ci invia informazioni personali tramite il nostro portale, i siti web o altri mezzi di reclutamento, sia online che offline (i "
Servizi
"). Siamo i responsabili del trattamento delle informazioni personali dell'utente ai fini delle leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei dati.
Si prega di notare che se si è già un dipendente Honeywell si può fare riferimento anche alla Honeywell Global Data Privacy Policy e alla Employee Privacy Notice, se esiste per la propria giurisdizione. Lo scopo della presente Informativa sulla privacy è quello di fornire all'utente informazioni più dettagliate sul trattamento dei suoi dati personali in relazione alla sua candidatura.
Informazioni personali raccolte
Per elaborare la vostra candidatura, vi chiediamo di fornire le informazioni personali che vi riguardano, ad esempio quando vi candidate per un determinato posto di lavoro attraverso il nostro sito web/portale o, nel caso in cui siate già un dipendente Honeywell, durante il vostro rapporto di lavoro. Tutte le informazioni sono fornite su base volontaria e siete voi a determinare la quantità di informazioni che fornite a Honeywell.
Tenete presente che alcune informazioni potrebbero essere necessarie per completare la valutazione della vostra candidatura e che, in caso di mancata comunicazione, la nostra capacità di prendere in considerazione il candidato potrebbe essere limitata.
(i)   Informazioni personali
Possiamo raccogliere le seguenti informazioni personali sull'utente:
Dati personali e informazioni di contatto, tra cui indirizzo e-mail, numero/i di telefono e fotografia;
Informazioni professionali ed educative relative alla vostra occupazione, come i vostri datori di lavoro attuali o precedenti, il vostro titolo di lavoro o altre informazioni sull'organizzazione con cui siete affiliati. Potete anche fornire il vostro curriculum vitae e informazioni sulle vostre qualifiche o sulla vostra formazione, come ad esempio i vostri titoli di studio, i campi di studio, gli istituti che avete frequentato, le lingue, le appartenenze professionali, le certificazioni, i dettagli sulle valutazioni della gestione delle prestazioni e i compensi;
Preferenze di carriera (ad esempio, obiettivi a breve e a lungo termine, disponibilità a trasferirsi, data disponibile per il trasferimento e preferenze di luogo);
Informazioni personali derivanti dalla vostra partecipazione al nostro processo di reclutamento, come, ad esempio, quelle ottenute durante i colloqui, le e-mail che scambiamo con voi in merito alla vostra candidatura o le conversazioni che abbiamo con voi attraverso il nostro Chatbot online.
Informazioni audio e visive, come la vostra voce e la vostra immagine catturata in fotografie, registrazioni video o audio se partecipate a un'intervista telefonica o video, o se visitate i nostri uffici;
Qualsiasi altra informazione personale che l'utente sceglie volontariamente di fornirci.
(ii)  Informazioni personali sensibili
Possiamo anche raccogliere categorie speciali di informazioni personali su di voi (note anche come "categorie speciali di informazioni personali") laddove abbiamo l'obbligo legale di farlo, o il le informazioni sono rilevanti per il vostro futuro ambiente di lavoro presso Honeywell, o per la futura erogazione di benefici lavorativi, o con il vostro esplicito consenso, come ad esempio:
Numero di identificazione rilasciato dal governo (come il numero di previdenza sociale);
Informazioni demografiche, che possono includere informazioni su classificazioni protette, come età, sesso, razza, disabilità, orientamento sessuale, stato civile o stato di veterano;
Informazioni sulla salute (ad esempio, per soddisfare eventuali disabilità o restrizioni dietetiche);
Informazioni relative alle opinioni politiche, alle convinzioni religiose o all'appartenenza sindacale di una persona;
Informazioni su reati o condanne penali di un individuo, nonché qualsiasi altra informazione ritenuta sensibile ai sensi delle leggi vigenti in materia di protezione dei dati. Laddove consentito dalla legge e nella misura in cui ciò sia applicabile, Honeywell può anche avere la necessità di effettuare controlli sui precedenti personali e/o penali per determinare l'idoneità dell'utente a ricoprire una posizione o un'opportunità aperta presso Honeywell.
Non vi chiediamo di fornirci informazioni personali sensibili, a meno che non sia necessario per adempiere ai nostri obblighi normativi (ad esempio, per il monitoraggio delle pari opportunità), o a meno che non abbiate fornito il vostro esplicito consenso. Ad eccezione della misura richiesta dalla legge, la fornitura di queste informazioni sarà del tutto volontaria. Honeywell si impegna a creare una forza lavoro realmente inclusiva e diversificata. Fornendoci i vostri dati sulle pari opportunità, ci consentite di comprendere meglio il nostro profilo di dipendenti in termini di dati sulle pari opportunità e le azioni da intraprendere per attrarre, promuovere e mantenere una forza lavoro diversificata a prescindere da età, disabilità, sesso, razza, convinzioni religiose o filosofiche e orientamento sessuale.
(iii) Informazioni personali raccolte automaticamente dall'utente
Possiamo raccogliere automaticamente alcune informazioni sulla vostra visita ai nostri siti web utilizzando "cookie" e altre tecnologie di tracciamento simili. Per ulteriori informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo sul sito web attraverso il quale inviate la vostra candidatura, leggete la nostra
Informativa sui cookie
Fonti di informazioni personali
Possiamo raccogliere i vostri dati personali direttamente da voi o indirettamente da terze parti che sono legittimamente autorizzate a condividere i vostri dati con noi, come ad esempio:
Agenzie di collocamento, fornitori di servizi di controllo dei precedenti e di verifica dell'identità;
Agenzie di reclutamento (ad esempio, quando un'agenzia di reclutamento vi identifica come potenziali candidati);
Informazioni pubblicamente disponibili su di voi da siti come LinkedIn o dal sito web del vostro attuale datore di lavoro. L'utente può anche scegliere di fornirci l'accesso a determinate informazioni personali archiviate da terzi (ad esempio, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google o Facebook). Autorizzando Honeywell ad accedere a tali informazioni, l'utente accetta che Honeywell possa raccogliere, conservare e utilizzare tali informazioni in conformità con la presente Informativa sulla privacy;
Tramite referenze o passaparola (ad esempio, tramite una segnalazione da parte di un dipendente attuale o precedente). Nel caso di referenze, la persona che vi ha segnalato sarà responsabile di ottenere il vostro consenso a fornirci i vostri dati personali.
Finalità di utilizzo dei dati personali
Utilizziamo i vostri dati personali per i seguenti scopi:
Per valutare la vostra candidatura e prendere decisioni in merito all'assunzione;
Comunicare con voi e informarvi sul reclutamento e/o sulla vostra candidatura o su qualsiasi altra comunicazione richiesta;
Conformarsi ai requisiti legali e normativi applicabili e al fine di stabilire, esercitare o difendere un diritto legale;
Occupazione e gestione aziendale (ad esempio, stabilire un record di occupazione di base in caso di assunzione);
Realizzare report/analisi aggregati sui dati relativi all'attività dei candidati (ad esempio, traffico del sito di carriera, funnel dei candidati, fonte di assunzione, successo della campagna di reclutamento);
Solo per i dipendenti Honeywell:
Per escludervi automaticamente dall'essere proposti in modo proattivo ai reclutatori per un'opportunità di lavoro e non siete idonei a essere presi in considerazione in base alla vostra attuale valutazione HPD 9-block (che non sarà mai rivelata a nessuno al di fuori di Honeywell). Tuttavia, potrete sempre candidarvi direttamente a qualsiasi opportunità di lavoro disponibile e la vostra situazione specifica sarà presa in considerazione da un reclutatore.
Solo se siete residenti negli Stati Uniti:
Per inviarvi comunicazioni via SMS, in particolare:
(i)     1-1 comunicazioni via SMS in relazione alla vostra candidatura a un determinato posto di lavoro; e/o
(ii)    previo consenso esplicito dell'utente
,
comunicazioni via SMS su opportunità di lavoro, questioni lavorative e aggiornamenti sulle candidature.
L'utente potrà rinunciare e/o revocare il proprio consenso a ricevere le suddette comunicazioni seguendo le istruzioni fornite nel proprio profilo.
Se vi viene offerto e accettate di lavorare con Honeywell, le informazioni raccolte durante il processo di candidatura e di assunzione diventeranno parte del vostro curriculum lavorativo.
Elaborazione e profilazione automatizzate
Previo consenso esplicito dell'utente (che fornisce volontariamente quando si iscrive alla nostra Talent Community o seleziona l'apposita casella di consenso durante il processo di candidatura), effettuiamo una "profilazione" per valutare l'idoneità dell'utente a particolari opportunità di lavoro. Ciò comporta l'utilizzo di un algoritmo di corrispondenza in grado di valutare il vostro profilo lavorativo e di prevedere la vostra idoneità per una particolare opportunità di lavoro. Effettuiamo questo trattamento automatizzato allo scopo di:
aiutare i reclutatori ad abbinare i profili dei candidati alle opportunità di lavoro, suggerendo candidati da prendere in considerazione per una specifica opportunità di lavoro; e
invio di raccomandazioni lavorative personalizzate all'utente in base al suo profilo e/o alle sue preferenze o di altre informazioni che potrebbero essere di suo interesse, come notizie, webinar ed eventi di Honeywell.
Si prega di notare che, sulla base di questa profilazione, potreste non essere presi in considerazione per determinate opportunità di lavoro, a meno che non vi siate candidati direttamente.
Non prendiamo decisioni di assunzione basate esclusivamente su processi decisionali automatizzati e/o sulla profilazione. I vostri dati personali saranno sottoposti a decisioni umane, poiché la decisione finale di assunzione sarà presa dai selezionatori o dal responsabile delle assunzioni.
Le basi legali per il trattamento dei vostri dati personali
Alcune giurisdizioni richiedono a Honeywell una base giuridica per il trattamento dei dati personali dell'utente. Laddove la legge applicabile richieda di giustificare le nostre attività di trattamento, la nostra base giuridica per la raccolta e l'utilizzo delle informazioni personali dell'utente come descritto nella presente Informativa sulla privacy dipenderà dalle informazioni personali in questione e dal contesto specifico in cui le raccogliamo.
Consenso.
IIn generale, raccoglieremo normalmente i dati personali dell'utente quando avremo il suo consenso a farlo e quando avremo bisogno dei suoi dati personali per elaborare la sua candidatura. Accedendo al nostro sito web/portale, entrando a far parte della nostra Talent Community o candidandosi a una delle nostre posizioni lavorative, l'utente fornisce il proprio consenso a Honeywell per la raccolta e l'ulteriore elaborazione dei dati personali sopra descritti per gli scopi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla privacy. L'utente può
revocare il proprio consenso
in qualsiasi momento presentando una richiesta attraverso il nostro portale per la richiesta di dati personali all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o inviandoci un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Interessi legittimi.
Nei legittimi interessi di Honeywell, vale a dire il reclutamento, la selezione, la valutazione e la nomina di nuovi dipendenti e la gestione e l'amministrazione del processo di reclutamento e delle risorse umane, nella misura in cui i nostri legittimi interessi non prevalgono sui diritti e le libertà fondamentali dell'utente.
Obblighi legali
. Conformità agli obblighi legali di Honeywell, laddove la legge sul lavoro o altre leggi richiedano l'elaborazione delle informazioni personali dell'utente (ad esempio, nella misura in cui la legge richiede il monitoraggio delle pari opportunità e della diversità).
Interessi vitali.
Potremmo anche aver bisogno dei vostri dati personali per proteggere i vostri interessi vitali (ad esempio, per motivi di salute e sicurezza se partecipate a un colloquio presso la nostra sede).
Se avete domande o necessitate di ulteriori informazioni in merito alla base legale su cui raccogliamo e utilizziamo i vostri dati personali, vi preghiamo di inviare un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Con chi condividiamo i vostri dati personali
Honeywell condividerà le informazioni personali dell'utente con terzi solo nelle seguenti circostanze:
Entità del gruppo Honeywell
. Possiamo condividere i vostri dati personali con altre entità del gruppo situate in giurisdizioni di tutto il mondo per valutare il vostro profilo e prendere in considerazione eventuali opportunità di assunzione a livello di gruppo.
Fornitori di servizi
Possiamo condividere in modo specifico i vostri dati personali con fornitori di servizi terzi che svolgono servizi specifici per nostro conto (ad esempio, fornitori di personale di reclutamento e outsourcing e fornitori di analisi). Tali terze parti possono variare a seconda del paese dell'utente e cambiano di volta in volta, ma possono includere Phenom People, Inc. e Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. e i rispettivi fornitori terzi.
Dipendenti Honeywell.
Se siete già un dipendente Honeywell, tenete presente che alcune  sezioni del vostro profilo sono pubbliche e, quindi, visibili a tutti i dipendenti Honeywell (in particolare, nome, titolo, fotografia, competenze, aree di interesse, esperienza lavorativa e formazione). Tuttavia, tali sezioni sono modificabili e l'utente potrà scegliere quali informazioni su di sé mostrare nel proprio profilo. Si prega di notare che gli obiettivi di carriera, i trasferimenti e lo stato del profilo "aperto a nuove opportunità" non saranno pubblici e, pertanto, non saranno visibili a tutti i dipendenti Honeywell (solo al Talent Team di Honeywell).
Altre terze parti.
Honeywell può condividere le informazioni personali dell'utente con qualsiasi organo competente per l'applicazione della legge, autorità di regolamentazione, agenzia governativa, tribunale o terza parte, qualora ritenga che la divulgazione sia necessaria ai sensi della legge applicabile o nella convinzione in buona fede che tale azione sia necessaria per esercitare, stabilire o difendere i nostri diritti legali o per proteggere i vostri interessi vitali o quelli di un'altra persona. Potremmo anche condividere le vostre informazioni personali con altri soggetti con il vostro consenso o su vostra indicazione (ad esempio, un arbitro o un'associazione professionale).
Trasferimenti internazionali di informazioni personali
Honeywell è un'organizzazione globale e le informazioni personali dell'utente possono essere trasferite, conservate, archiviate o utilizzate in varie località del mondo, come gli Stati Uniti e l'India. Ciò significa che quando raccogliamo le informazioni personali dell'utente, queste possono essere elaborate in paesi che possono avere leggi sulla protezione dei dati diverse da quelle del paese dell'utente. Tuttavia, Honeywell adotterà sempre misure ragionevoli per proteggere la privacy dell'utente e fornire un livello di protezione delle informazioni personali paragonabile a quello del paese di residenza dell'utente, tra cui l'attuazione delle
Clausole contrattuali standard della Commissione
europea
, disponibili sul sito web della Commissione all'indirizzo
https://ec.europa.eu.
Mantenimento
Conserveremo le informazioni personali dell'utente per tutto il tempo necessario in relazione agli scopi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla privacy e in conformità con il programma di conservazione dei documenti di Honeywell o come richiesto dalla legge applicabile.
I vostri diritti
A seconda della legge applicabile, l'utente può godere di determinati diritti in relazione alle sue informazioni personali. Se siete residenti in California, fate riferimento alla sezione "
Informazioni aggiuntive per i residenti in California
.
L'utente può avere il diritto di
accedere, correggere, aggiornare
o richiedere
la cancellazione
dei propri dati personali;
Potete
opporvi
al trattamento dei vostri dati personali, chiederci di
limitare il
trattamento dei vostri dati trattamento dei vostri dati personali o richiedere
la portabilità
dei vostri dati personali;
L'utente può avere il diritto di non essere sottoposto a una decisione basata esclusivamente su un trattamento automatizzato, compresa la profilazione, se tale decisione produce effetti legali sull'utente o lo riguarda in modo significativo.
Honeywell, nell'ambito del processo di assunzione, non prende decisioni esclusivamente automatizzate sui candidati.
Allo stesso modo, se abbiamo raccolto ed elaborato i vostri dati personali con il vostro consenso, potete ritirare il vostro consenso in qualsiasi momento. La revoca del consenso non pregiudicherà la legittimità di qualsiasi trattamento da noi effettuato prima della revoca, né pregiudicherà il trattamento dei vostri dati personali effettuato sulla base di motivi di trattamento legittimi diversi dal consenso.
Avete il diritto di presentare un reclamo a un'autorità di protezione dei dati in merito alla raccolta e all'utilizzo dei vostri dati personali da parte nostra.
Agevoleremo il vostro esercizio dei diritti che vi spettano in conformità alla legge applicabile. esercitare uno qualsiasi dei diritti relativi ai vostri dati personali, contattateci attraverso HR Help, o il modulo di richiesta di dati personali che si trova all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
oppure inviate un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Ulteriori informazioni per i residenti in California
Se l'utente è residente nello Stato della California, questa sezione integra l'Informativa sulla privacy dei richiedenti di Honeywell.
(i)      Categorie di informazioni personali raccolte e divulgate
Honeywell ha raccolto e divulgato le seguenti categorie di informazioni personali per i propri scopi commerciali nei dodici mesi precedenti:
Previous column
Next column
Categorie
Raccogliamo
A.
Identificatori quali nome, data di nascita, sesso, indirizzo e-mail, numeri di telefono, indirizzo postale, identificatori online, account di social media e altri identificatori.
Sì
C.
Caratteristiche di classificazioni protette dalla legge californiana o federale, quali razza, etnia, convinzioni religiose o filosofiche, appartenenza a sindacati, dati sanitari, informazioni biometriche, dati genetici, disabilità, status di veterano, orientamento sessuale, posta personale, e-mail e messaggi di testo (a meno che Honeywell non sia il destinatario), identificatori governativi (ad esempio, numero di previdenza sociale), patente di guida, passaporto, informazioni finanziarie e bancarie.
Sì
F.
Informazioni sull'attività di Internet o di altre reti elettroniche, come la cronologia di navigazione, le interazioni con i siti web di Honeywell, le e-mail e i servizi di messaggistica di testo
Sì
G.
Dati di geolocalizzazione, come la posizione del dispositivo e la posizione IP.
Sì
H.
Informazioni audio, elettroniche, visive, termiche o simili, come la vostra voce e immagine, registrazioni video o audio se partecipate a un'intervista telefonica o video o se visitate i nostri uffici.
Sì
I.
Informazioni professionali o relative all'impiego, quali l'occupazione, i datori di lavoro attuali o precedenti, il titolo di lavoro, la storia educativa, le qualifiche accademiche e professionali, il curriculum, la storia lavorativa, le referenze di assunzione, le note e le valutazioni dei colloqui, le lingue, le appartenenze professionali, le certificazioni, le valutazioni della gestione delle prestazioni, la retribuzione, le preferenze di sede e di viaggio.
Sì
K.
Inferenze tratte da una qualsiasi delle informazioni personali sopra elencate per creare un profilo o un riassunto, ad esempio, delle preferenze e delle caratteristiche di un individuo.
Sì
Load More
(ii)      I vostri diritti
L'utente ha il diritto di inviarci una richiesta per ottenere i seguenti diritti relativi al periodo di dodici mesi precedente la sua richiesta. Si noti che questi diritti non sono assoluti e in alcuni casi sono soggetti a limitazioni come specificato nella legge applicabile
Il diritto di sapere quali informazioni personali abbiamo raccolto su di voi, le categorie di fonti da cui abbiamo raccolto le vostre informazioni personali, lo scopo aziendale o commerciale per cui abbiamo raccolto le vostre informazioni personali e le categorie di terzi con cui divulghiamo le vostre informazioni personali;
Il diritto di cancellare i propri dati personali;
Il diritto di correggere le informazioni personali inesatte che vi riguardano;
Il diritto di rinunciare alla vendita o alla condivisione dei vostri dati personali;
Il diritto di rinunciare alla vendita o alla condivisione dei vostri dati personali;
Il diritto di non subire discriminazioni illegali per l'esercizio dei propri diritti ai sensi delle leggi vigenti.
Faciliteremo il vostro esercizio dei diritti che vi spettano in conformità alla legge applicabile e, considerando il tipo e la sensibilità delle informazioni personali oggetto della richiesta, per la vostra protezione, potremmo dover richiedere di verificare la vostra identità e richiedere ulteriori informazioni da parte vostra.
Per esercitare i propri diritti relativi alle informazioni personali, si prega di contattare l'azienda tramite il modulo di richiesta di dati personali disponibile all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o di inviare un'e-mail all'indirizzo
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Se siete già un dipendente Honeywell, potete contattarci all'indirizzo
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contatto
In caso di domande o reclami sulle modalità di trattamento dei propri dati personali o per esercitare i propri diritti, si prega di contattare:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(solo se siete già dipendenti Honeywell) o il nostro responsabile della protezione dei dati all'indirizzo
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
L'utente può anche contattarci attraverso il modulo di richiesta dei dati che si trova all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
更新： 2023年1月1日
本応募者プライバシー通知（「プライバシー通知））では、あなたが当社のTalent Communityに参加し、求人について検索または応募し、当社のポータル、ウェブサイト、またはその他の求人媒体を通じて個人情報を当社に提出する際、Honeywell International, Inc.および
その関連会社
（総称して「
ハネウェル
」、「
当社
」、または「
弊社
」）が、オンラインまたはオフライン（「
サービス
」）であなたの個人情報をどのように処理するかについて説明しています。当社は、適用されるデータ保護法の目的で、あなたの個人情報の管理者です。
すでにハネウェル従業員である場合は、ハネウェル グローバルデータプライバシー方針と従業員プライバシー通知（あなたの管轄区域に存在する場合）を参照することもできます。本プライバシー通知の目的は、あなたの応募に関する個人情報の処理について、より詳細な情報を提供することです。
当社が収集する個人情報
当社は応募を処理するために、あなたが当社のウェブサイト/ポータルを通じて特定の求人に応募する場合、またはあなたがすでにハネウェル従業員である場合は、雇用関係にある間、あなたの個人情報の提供をお願いしています。すべての情報は任意で提供され、あなたはハネウェルに提供する情報の範囲を決定します。
一部の情報は応募内容の評価を完了するために必要となる場合があり、それが提供されない場合、候補者としての検討が制限される可能性があることをご承知おきください。
(i)   個人情報
当社は、あなたに関する以下の個人情報を収集することがあります。
電子メールアドレス、電話番号、写真などの個人情報および連絡先情報
現在または以前の雇用主、役職、または所属組織に関するその他の情報など、あなたの職業上の専門および教育に関する情報。また、履歴書や、学位、学歴、在籍機関、言語、専門職、資格、業績管理の評価や報酬の詳細など、資格や学歴に関する情報を提供することもできます。
キャリアに関する希望（短期および長期目標、転勤の意思、転勤可能な日付、勤務地に関する希望など）
例えば、面接中に入手したもの、応募に関してあなたとやり取りする電子メール、オンラインチャットボットを通じてあなたと交わした会話など、当社の採用プロセスへのあなたの参加に由来する個人情報。
電話やビデオのインタビューに参加する場合、または当社のオフィスを訪問する場合に、写真、ビデオ、または録音でキャプチャされた音声や肖像などの音声および視覚情報。
あなたが任意で当社に提供することを選択したその他の個人情報。
(ii)  機微な個人情報。
当社はまた、法的義務がある場合、または情報がハネウェルにおける将来の職場環境に関連する場合、または将来の雇用給付の提供のために、または以下のような明示的な同意を得た場合、あなたに関する特別な種類の個人情報（個人情報の特別なカテゴリーとも呼ばれます）を収集する場合があります。
政府発行の識別番号（社会保障番号など）
年齢、性別、人種、障害、性的指向、婚姻状況、退役軍人ステータスなど、保護対象の分類に関する情報を含む可能性のある人口統計学的情報
健康情報（例えば、障害や食事制限に対応するため）
個人の政治的意見、宗教的信条、労働組合への加入に関する情報
個人の刑事犯罪や有罪判決に関する情報、および適用されるデータ保護法の下で機密と見なされるその他の情報。法律で許可されている場合、また適用される範囲内で、ハネウェルは、当社で募集中の役職または機会に対するあなたの適合性を判断するために、場合によっては経歴および/または犯罪歴調査を実施する必要があります。
当社は、規制上の義務を遂行するために必要な場合（例：機会均等の監視のため）や、あなたから明示的な同意をいただいた場合を除き、あなたに機密性の高い個人情報の提供を要求しません。法律で義務付けられている場合を除き、この情報の提供は完全に任意です。ハネウェルは、真に包摂的で多様な労働力に尽力しています。平等な機会データを提供することで、平等な機会データ、および年齢、障害、性別、人種、宗教的または哲学的信念、性的指向に関係なく、多様な従業員を惹きつけ、促進し、維持するために必要な行動の観点から、従業員プロファイルをより深く理解することができます。
(iii) 当社が自動的に収集する個人情報
当社は、「クッキー」および類似の追跡技術を使用して、当社サイトへのあなたの訪問に関する特定の情報を収集します。当社があなたの応募書類を提出するウェブサイトで使用しているクッキーの詳細については、当社の
クッキーに関する通知
をお読みください。
個人情報の源
当社は、あなたの個人情報をあなたから直接、または以下を含む当社とあなたの情報を共有する法的権利を有する第三者から間接的に収集する場合があります。
人材派遣会社、身元調査/雇用調査または身元確認サービスプロバイダー
人材派遣会社（例えば、人材派遣会社が候補者としてあなたを特定する場合）
LinkedInや現在の雇用主のウェブサイトなどのサイトから公開されているあなたに関する情報。また、第三者（LinkedIn、Twitter、Google、Facebookなど）が保存している特定の個人情報へのアクセスを当社に提供することもできます。ハネウェルがこの情報にアクセスすることを許可することにより、あなたは、当社が本プライバシー通知に従ってこの情報を収集、保存、および使用する場合があることに同意するものとします。
参照または口コミによる（例えば、現従業員または元従業員からの紹介による）。推薦の場合、あなたを推薦する方が、あなたの個人情報を当社に提供するための同意をあなたから得る責任を負います。
個人情報の利用目的
当社は、以下の目的であなたの個人情報を使用します。
応募を評価し、採用を決定するため
採用および/または応募（複数可）、またはその他の必要な連絡について、あなたに連絡を取り、あなたに通知するため。
適用される法的および規制上の要件を遵守し、当社が法的請求を確立、行使、または防御するため
雇用および企業管理（例えば、雇用された場合は基本的な雇用記録を作成する）
候補者の活動データ（キャリアサイトのトラフィック、候補者ファネル、採用源、採用キャンペーンの成功など）に関する集計レポート/分析を実行するため。
ハネウェル従業員である場合：
採用担当者への採用検討のために積極的に提案されることを自動的に除外し、現在のHPD 9ブロック評価（ハネウェル社外の誰にも公開されません）では検討の対象となりません。ただし、いつでも求人に直接応募することができ、あなたの具体的な状況は採用担当者が検討します。
あなたが米国居住者である場合：
SMSで通信を送信するには、特に：
(i)     あなたの特定の求人への応募に関連する1-1のSMS通信、および/または
(ii)    あなたの明示的な同意を条件として、雇用機会、職務および応募の更新に関するSMSキャンペーンの連絡。
プロファイルに記載されている指示に従って、上記の通知を受け取ることに対する同意をオプトアウトおよび/または取り消すことができます。
ハネウェルでの雇用を申し出られ、受け入れた場合、応募および採用プロセス中に収集された情報は、雇用記録の一部となります。
自動処理とプロファイリング
あなたの明示的な同意（当社のTalent Communityへの参加時または応募プロセス中に適切な同意ボックスにチェックを入れる際にあなたが自発的に提供する同意）を条件として、当社は、特定の求人機会に対するあなたの適合性を評価するためにプロファイリングを実施します。これには、あなたの雇用プロファイルを評価し、特定の雇用機会に対するあなたの適格性を予測することができるマッチングアルゴリズムの使用が含まれます。当社は、以下の目的でこの自動処理を実施します。
採用担当者が候補者のプロファイルを求人に一致させるのを支援するため、候補者に特定の求人への検討を提案する、および
ハネウェルのニュース、ウェビナー、イベントなど、関心のあるプロファイルや好み、その他の情報に基づいて、パーソナライズされた求人提案を送信する。
このプロファイリングに基づいて、あなたが直接応募しない限り、特定の求人案件の対象とならない場合がありますのでご留意ください。
当社は、自動化された意思決定プロセスおよび/またはプロファイリングのみに基づいて採用決定を行うことはありません。最終的な採用決定は採用担当者または採用マネージャーによって行われるため、あなたの個人情報は人間による決定の対象となります。
あなたの個人情報を処理する法的根拠
一部の法域では、あなたの個人情報を処理する法的根拠をハネウェルに要求しています。適用法により、当社の処理活動を正当化することが義務付けられている場合、本プライバシー通知に記載されているあなたの個人情報の収集および使用に関する当社の法的根拠は、関連する個人情報および当社が収集する特定の状況によって異なります。
同意。
通常、当社は、あなたの同意を得ている場合、およびあなたの応募を処理するためにあなたの個人情報が必要な場合に、あなたから個人情報を収集します。当社のウェブサイト/ポータルにアクセスしたり、当社のTalent Communityに参加したり、当社の求人に応募したりすることにより、あなたはハネウェルに対し、本プライバシー通知に記載された目的のために上記の個人情報を収集し、さらに処理することに同意したものとみなされます。当社のデータ主体リクエストポータル（
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
）を通じてリクエストを提出するか、
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
宛てに電子メールを送信することにより、あなたはいつでも
同意を撤回
することができます。
正当な利益
ハネウェルの正当な利益、すなわち新入社員の採用、選定、評価および任命、ならびに当社の正当な利益があなたの基本的権利と自由によって優先されない範囲での採用と人事プロセスの管理および統制。
法的義務
雇用法またはその他の法律で個人情報の処理が義務付けられている場合のハネウェルの法的義務の遵守（例えば、機会と多様性の平等を監視することが法律で義務付けられている場合など）。
重要な関心事。
また、あなたの
重要な利益を保護するために、あなたの個人情報が必要になる場合があります（例えば、あなたが当サイトでのインタビューに出席する場合、健康と安全上の理由）。
当社があなたの個人情報を収集および使用する法的根拠についてご質問がある場合、または詳細情報が必要な場合は、
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
まで電子メールでお問い合わせください。
個人情報の共有先
ハネウェルは、以下の状況においてのみ、個人情報を第三者と共有します。
ハネウェルのグループ企業
。当社は、あなたのプロファイルを評価し、グループレベルでの採用機会を検討するために、世界中の法域に所在する他のグループ事業体とあなたの個人情報を共有する場合があります。
サービスプロバイダー
当社は、当社に代わって特定のサービスを実施する第三者サービスプロバイダー（採用およびアウトソーシングの人材派遣プロバイダーや分析プロバイダーなど）とあなたの個人情報を具体的に共有する場合があります。かかる第三者は、あなたの国によって異なり、随時変更されることがありますが、Phenom People, Inc.、Cornerstone OnDemand Inc.、およびそれぞれの第三者プロバイダーが含まれる場合があります。
ハネウェル従業員。
あなたがすでにハネウェル従業員である場合、プロファイルの一部のセクションは公開されているため、ハネウェルの全従業員が閲覧できます（特に、名前、役職、写真、スキル、関心分野、職歴、学歴）。ただし、これらのセクションは編集可能で、プロファイルに表示される情報を選択できます。キャリア目標、転勤、そして「新たな機会」に対するプロファイルステータスのセクションは公開されないため、ハネウェルの全従業員が閲覧できるわけではありません（ハネウェルのタレントチームのみ）。
その他の第三者。
ハネウェルは、適用法に基づき開示が必要であると当社が考える場合、または当社の法的権利を行使、確立、もしくは防御するため、またはあなたや他者の重大な利益を保護するためにかかる行為が必要であると誠実に信じる場合、管轄の法執行機関、規制当局、政府機関、裁判所、または第三者とあなたの個人情報を共有することがあります。また、当社は、あなたの同意を得たり、指示（例：審判員または専門団体）により、あなたの個人情報を他者と共有する場合があります。
個人情報の国際的な移行
ハネウェルはグローバルな組織であり、個人情報は、適用法に従って、米国やインドなど、世界中のさまざまな場所において転送、保持、保存、または使用される場合があります。これにより、当社があなたの個人情報を収集すると、お客様の国の法律とは異なるデータ保護法がある国で処理される場合があります。ただし、ハネウェルは、あなたのプライバシーを保護し、あなたの居住国と同等レベルの個人情報の保護を提供するために、常に合理的な措置を講じます。これには、
欧州委員会の標準契約条項
の実施が含まれます。この条項は、欧州委員会のウェブサイト、
https://ec.europa.eu
でご覧いただけます。
維持
当社は、本プライバシー通知に記載された目的に関連して、ハネウェルの記録保持スケジュールに従って、または適用法で要求される期間、あなたの個人情報を保持します。
あなたの権利
適用法によっては、個人情報に関する特定の権利があなたに付与される場合があります。カリフォルニア州にお住まいの方は、下記の「
カリフォルニア州居住者向け追加情報
」をご参照ください。
あなたは、ご自身の個人情報に対して
アクセス、コピーの要求、修正、更新
または
削除の要求
をする権利を有します。
あなたは、ご自身の個人情報の処理に
異議
を唱えること、個人情報の処理を
制限
するよう当社に依頼したり、個人情報の
ポータビリティ
を要求したりすることができます。
意思決定があなたに法的影響を与える場合、またはあなたに重大な影響を与える場合、
あなたについての説明を求める権利およびプロファイリングを含め、
自動処理のみに基づいた意思決定を受け入れない権利を有します。
ハネウェルは、採用プロセスの一環として、候補者に対して完全に自動化された意思決定を行うことはありません。
同様に、当社があなたの同意を得てお客様の個人情報を収集および処理した場合、あなたはいつでも同意を撤回することができます。同意の撤回は、撤回前に当社が行った処理の合法性に影響せず、同意以外の合法的な処理根拠に従って行われた個人情報の処理にも影響しません。
あなたは、当社があなたの個人情報を収集および使用したことについて、データ保護当局に苦情を申し立てる権利を有します。
当社は、適用される法律に従って、お客様に適用される権利が円滑に行使されるようにします。個人情報に関する権利を行使するには、HRヘルプまたは
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォーム、または
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
に電子メールにてお問い合わせください。
カリフォルニア州居住者向け追加情報
カリフォルニア州にお住まいの方は、ハネウェルの応募者プライバシー通知を補足するこのセクションをご覧ください。
(i)      収集・開示される個人情報のカテゴリー
ハネウェルは、過去12か月間に当社の事業目的で以下のカテゴリーの個人情報を収集し、開示しました。
Previous column
Next column
当社が収集した
カテゴリー
A.
氏名、生年月日、性別、Eメールアドレス、電話番号、郵送先住所、オンライン識別子、ソーシャルメディアアカウントなどの識別子。
あり
C.
人種、民族、宗教的または哲学的信条、労働組合への加入状況、健康データ、生体情報、遺伝データ、障害、退役軍人ステータス、性的指向、個人の郵便、Eメール、テキストメッセージ（ハネウェルが意図された受信者でないもの）、政府識別子（社会保障番号など）、運転免許証、パスポート、財務および銀行情報など、カリフォルニア州または連邦法の下で保護されている分類の特徴。
あり
F.
閲覧履歴、ハネウェルのウェブサイトとのやり取り、メールおよびテキストメッセージサービスなど、インターネットまたはその他の電子ネットワークの活動情報。
あり
G.
デバイスの場所やIPの場所などの位置情報データ。
あり
H.
電話やビデオのインタビューに参加する場合、または当社のオフィスを訪問する場合に、音声、写真、ビデオ、または録音でキャプチャされた音声、電子、視覚、熱、または類似の情報。
あり
I.
職業、現在または以前の雇用主、役職、学歴、学術および専門資格、履歴書、職務経歴、採用時の推薦者、面接のメモおよび評価、言語、専門職のメンバーシップ、認定資格、業績管理評価、報酬、勤務地の希望、出張の希望などの職業または雇用関連の情報。
あり
K.
個人の希望や特性などに関するプロフィールまたは概要を作成するために、上記の個人情報から引き出された推論。
あり
Load More
(ii)      お客様の権利
お客様は、ご自身に関する以下の権利について、請求日からさかのぼる12か月間を対象として、当社に請求を行う権利があります。ただし、これらの権利は絶対的なものではなく、適用法に基づく制限がある場合がありますのでご留意ください。以下の権利が含まれます。
当社がお客様に関して収集した個人情報の種類、当社がお客様の個人情報を収集した情報源のカテゴリー、当社がお客様の個人情報を収集した事業上または商業上の目的、および当社がお客様の個人情報を開示する第三者のカテゴリーを知る権利。
お客様の個人情報を削除する権利。
お客様に関する不正確な個人情報を訂正する権利。
お客様の個人情報の販売または共有をオプトアウトする権利。
お客様の機密個人情報の処理を制限する権利。
適用法に基づくお客様の権利を行使したことで違法な差別を受けない権利。
当社は、適用法に従い、お客様に適用される権利の行使を促進し、要請の対象となる個人情報の種類および機密性を考慮し、お客様の保護のために、お客様の身元確認および追加情報の請求が必要になる場合があります。
個人情報に関する権利を行使するには、
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォーム、または
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
に電子メールにてお問い合わせください。すでにハネウェル従業員である方は、
HRhelp@honeywell.com
までご連絡ください。
お問い合わせ
個人情報がどのように処理されるかについて質問や苦情がある場合、または権利を行使したい場合は、以下の宛先にご連絡ください。
HRhelp@honeywell.com
（すでにハネウェル従業員である場合のみ）または当社のデータ保護責任者
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
また、
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォームを通じて当社に連絡することもできます。
업데이트되었습니다: 업데이트: 2023년 1월 1일
본 지원자 개인정보 처리방침("개인정보 처리방침")은 귀하가 당사의 인재 커뮤니티에 가입하고, 당사의 포털, 웹사이트 또는 기타 온라인 또는 오프라인 채용 매체("
서비스
")를 통해 일자리를 검색 또는 지원하고, 당사에 개인정보를 제출할 때 하니웰 인터내셔널과 그
계열사
(총칭하여 "
하니웰
", "당사" 또는 "
우리
")가 귀하의 개인정보를 어떻게 처리하는지를 설명합니다. 당사는 관련 데이터 보호법의 목적에 따라 귀하의 개인정보를 처리합니다.
귀하가 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우, 해당 관할 지역에 적용되는 하니웰 글로벌 데이터 개인정보 취급방침 및 직원 개인정보 취급방침을 참조할 수도 있습니다. 본 개인정보 처리방침의 목적은 귀하의 지원과 관련하여 당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 처리하는 방법에 대한 자세한 정보를 제공하는 것입니다.
당사가 수집하는 개인 정보
당사는 귀하의 지원서를 처리하기 위해 귀하가 당사 웹사이트/포털을 통해 특정 채용 공고에 지원할 때 또는 귀하가 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우 고용 관계 중에 본인에 대한 개인 정보를 제공하도록 요청합니다. 모든 정보는 자발적으로 제공되며 귀하가 하니웰에 제공하는 정보의 범위는 귀하가 결정합니다.
지원서 평가를 완료하기 위해 일부 정보가 필요할 수 있으며, 해당 정보가 제공되지 않을 경우 지원자를 후보자로 고려하는 데 제한이 있을 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다.
(i)   개인 정보
당사는 귀하에 대해 다음과 같은 개인정보를 수집할 수 있습니다:
이메일 주소, 전화번호, 사진을 포함한 개인 정보 및 연락처 정보;
현재 또는 이전 고용주, 직책 또는 소속 조직에 대한 기타 정보 등 귀하의 직업과 관련된 전문 및 교육 정보. 또한 이력서/이력서와 학위, 전공 분야, 다닌 기관, 언어, 전문 회원 자격, 자격증, 성과 관리 등급 및 보상에 대한 세부 정보 등 자격 또는 교육에 관한 정보를 제공할 수 있습니다;
경력 선호사항(예: 단기 및 장기 목표, 이전 의향, 이전 가능한 날짜, 선호하는 위치);
예를 들어 면접 과정에서 얻은 정보, 지원과 관련하여 당사가 귀하와 주고받은 이메일 또는 온라인 챗봇을 통해 귀하와 나눈 대화 등 귀하가 당사의 채용 절차에 참여함으로써 파생되는 개인정보.
귀하가 전화 또는 화상 인터뷰에 참여하거나 당사 사무실을 방문한 경우 사진, 비디오 또는 오디오 녹음에 캡처된 귀하의 음성 및 모습과 같은 시청각 정보;
기타 귀하가 자발적으로 당사에 제공하기로 선택한 개인 정보.
(ii)
민감한 개인 정보
또한 당사는 법적 의무가 있는 경우 귀하에 대한 특수 범주의 개인정보("특수 범주 개인정보"라고도 함)를 수집할 수 있습니다. 귀하의 향후 Honeywell 근무 환경 또는 향후 고용 혜택 제공과 관련된 정보 또는 귀하의 명시적 동의가 있는 경우:
정부에서 발급한 식별 번호(예: 주민등록번호);
인구통계학적 정보에는 나이, 성별, 인종, 장애, 성적 지향, 결혼 여부 또는 군필 여부와 같은 보호 대상 분류에 대한 정보가 포함될 수 있습니다;
건강 정보(예: 장애가 있거나 식이 제한이 있는 경우);
개인의 정치적 의견이나 종교적 신념 또는 노동조합 가입과 관련된 정보;
개인의 형사 범죄 또는 유죄 판결에 관한 정보 및 관련 데이터 보호법에 따라 민감한 것으로 간주되는 기타 정보. 법이 허용하는 경우, 그리고 해당되는 범위 내에서, Honeywell은 귀하가 Honeywell의 개방형 직위 또는 기회에 적합한지 판단하기 위해 신원 및/또는 범죄 조회를 수행해야 할 수도 있습니다.
당사는 규제 의무를 이행하기 위한 목적(예: 기회 균등 모니터링)에 필요한 경우 또는 귀하가 명시적으로 동의하지 않는 한 민감한 개인정보를 당사에 제공할 것을 요구하지 않습니다. 법에서 요구하는 경우를 제외하고, 이 정보의 제공은 전적으로 자발적으로 이루어집니다. 하니웰은 진정으로 포용적이고 다양한 인력을 확보하기 위해 최선을 다하고 있습니다. 귀하는 당사에 기회 균등 데이터를 제공함으로써 연령, 장애, 성별, 인종, 종교적 또는 철학적 신념, 성적 지향에 관계없이 다양한 인력을 유치, 승진 및 유지하기 위해 취해야 할 조치와 기회 균등 데이터 측면에서 당사의 직원 프로필을 더 잘 이해할 수 있습니다.
(iii)  당사가 귀하로부터 자동으로 수집하는 개인 정보
당사는 "쿠키" 및 기타 유사한 추적 기술을 사용하여 귀하의 당사 웹사이트 방문에 관한 특정 정보를 자동으로 수집할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 지원서를 제출하는 웹사이트에서 당사가 사용하는 쿠키에 대한 자세한 내용은 당사의
쿠키 고지를
참조하시기 바랍니다.
개인 정보의 출처
당사는 귀하로부터 직접 또는 다음과 같이 합법적으로 당사와 귀하의 정보를 공유할 수 있는 제3자로부터 간접적으로 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집할 수 있습니다:
고용 대행사, 신원/고용 확인 또는 신원 확인 서비스 제공업체;
채용 에이전시(예: 채용 에이전시에서 귀하를 잠재적 후보자로 식별하는 경우);
LinkedIn 또는 현재 고용주의 웹사이트와 같은 사이트에서 공개적으로 사용 가능한 귀하에 관한 정보. 또한 귀하는 제3자(예: LinkedIn, Twitter, Google 또는 Facebook)가 저장한 특정 개인 정보에 대한 액세스를 당사에 제공하도록 선택할 수도 있습니다. 이러한 정보에 대한 액세스 권한을 Honeywell에 부여함으로써 귀하는 당사가 본 개인정보 취급방침에 따라 이러한 정보를 수집, 저장 및 사용할 수 있음에 동의하는 것입니다;
추천 또는 입소문(예: 현재 또는 전 직원의 추천을 통한 경우). 추천의 경우, 귀하를 추천하는 사람은 귀하의 개인 정보 제공에 대한 동의를 얻을 책임이 있습니다.
개인정보 사용 목적
당사는 다음과 같은 목적으로 귀하의 개인정보를 이용합니다:
지원서를 평가하고 채용 결정을 내리기 위해;
귀하와 소통하고 채용 및/또는 귀하의 지원서 또는 기타 필요한 커뮤니케이션에 대해 귀하에게 알리기 위해;
관련 법률 및 규제 요건을 준수하고 당사가 법적 청구를 설정, 행사 또는 방어하기 위한 목적;
고용 및 기업 관리(예: 고용된 경우 기본 고용 기록 수립);
후보자의 활동 데이터(예: 커리어 사이트 트래픽, 후보자 유입 경로, 채용 출처, 채용 캠페인 성공 여부)에 관한 집계 보고서/분석을 수행합니다;
하니웰 직원만 해당됩니다
:
채용 기회에 대한 채용 담당자의 사전 고려 대상에서 자동으로 제외되며, 현재 HPD 9블록 등급에 따라 고려 대상에서 제외됩니다(이 등급은 Honeywell 외부의 누구에게도 공개되지 않음). 그러나 귀하는 언제든지 가능한 모든 채용 기회에 직접 지원할 수 있으며 채용 담당자가 귀하의 특정 상황을 고려할 것입니다.
귀하가 미국 거주자인 경우에만 해당됩니다
:
T특히 SMS를 통해 커뮤니케이션을 보내기 위해:
(i)     1-1  특정 채용 공고에 대한 귀하의 지원과 관련된 SMS 통신 및/또는
(ii)    귀하의 명시적 동의가 있는 경우, 채용 기회, 직무 및 지원 업데이트에 대한 SMS 캠페인 커뮤니케이션을 제공합니다.
귀하는 프로필에 제공된 지침에 따라 위에 언급된 커뮤니케이션 수신에 대한 동의를 거부하거나 철회할 수 있습니다.
Honeywell에 채용 제안을 받고 수락하는 경우, 지원 및 채용 과정에서 수집된 정보는 고용 기록의 일부가 됩니다.
자동 처리 및 프로파일링
귀하의 명시적 동의(인재 커뮤니티 가입 시 또는 지원 과정에서 해당 동의 상자에 체크할 때 자발적으로 제공)에 따라, 당사는 특정 직무 기회에 대한 귀하의 적합성을 평가하기 위해 '프로파일링'을 실시합니다. 여기에는 귀하의 고용 프로필을 평가하고 특정 직무 기회에 대한 귀하의 적격성을 예측할 수 있는 매칭 알고리즘을 사용하는 것이 포함됩니다. 당사는 다음과 같은 목적으로 이 자동화된 처리를 수행합니다:
채용 담당자가 특정 직무 기회에 대해 고려할 후보자를 제안하여 후보자의 프로필을 직무 기회와 일치시킬 수 있도록 지원합니다.
귀하의 프로필 및/또는 선호도 또는 Honeywell 뉴스, 웨비나 및 이벤트와 같이 귀하가 관심을 가질 만한 기타 정보를 기반으로 귀하에게 맞춤화된 채용 추천을 보냅니다.
이 프로파일링에 따라 귀하가 직접 지원하지 않는 한 특정 채용 기회에 고려되지 않을 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다.
당사는 자동화된 의사결정 프로세스 및/또는 프로파일링만을 기반으로 채용 결정을 내리지 않습니다. 최종적인 채용 결정은 채용 담당자 또는 채용 관리자가 내리기 때문에 귀하의 개인정보는 사람이 내린 결정의 적용을 받습니다.
개인정보 처리의 법적 근거
특정 관할권에서는 하니웰이 귀하의 개인 정보를 처리할 수 있는 법적 근거를 요구합니다. 관련 법률에 따라 당사가 처리 활동을 정당화해야 하는 경우, 본 개인정보 취급방침에 설명된 대로 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집하고 사용하는 법적 근거는 해당 개인 정보와 당사가 개인 정보를 수집하는 특정 상황에 따라 달라집니다.
동의.
일반적으로 당사는 일반적으로 귀하의 동의가 있는 경우와 귀하의 지원서를 처리하기 위해 귀하의 개인 정보가 필요한 경우 귀하로부터 개인 정보를 수집합니다. 당사 웹사이트/포털에 액세스하거나, 인재 커뮤니티에 가입하거나, 당사의 채용 직책 중 하나에 지원함으로써 귀하는 본 개인정보 처리방침에 설명된 목적을 위해 위에 설명된 개인 정보를 수집하고 추가 처리하는 데 동의하는 것입니다. 귀하는 언제든지 데이터 주체 요청 포털(
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
)을 통해 요청을 제출하거나 이메일(
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
)을 보내
동의를 철회할
수 있습니다.
정당한 이익.
당사의 정당한 이익, 즉 신입 사원의 모집, 선발, 평가 및 임명, 채용 및 인사 프로세스의 관리 및 운영은 당사의 정당한 이익이 귀하의 기본적 권리와 자유에 의해 우선되지 않는 범위 내에서 이루어집니다.
법적 의무.
용법 또는 기타 법률에서 귀하의 개인 정보 처리를 요구하는 경우(예: 법률에서 기회 평등 및 다양성 모니터링에 대해 요구하는 범위까지) Honeywell의 법적 의무를 준수합니다.
중대한 이익.
당사는 또한 귀하의 중요한 이익을 보호하기 위해 귀하의 개인 정보가 필요할 수 있습니다(예: 귀하가 당사 사이트에서 면접에 참석하는 경우 건강 및 안전상의 이유).
당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집하고 사용하는 법적 근거에 대해 궁금한 점이 있거나 추가 정보가 필요한 경우
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주시기 바랍니다.
당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유하는 대상
하니웰은 다음과 같은 상황에서만 귀하의 개인 정보를 제3자와 공유합니다:
하니웰 그룹 법인.
당사는 귀하의 프로필을 평가하고 그룹 차원의 채용 기회를 고려하기 위해 전 세계 관할권에 위치한 다른 그룹 법인과 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유할 수 있습니다.
서비스 제공업체 당사는
당사를 대신하여 특정 서비스를 수행하는 제3자 서비스 제공업체(예: 채용 및 아웃소싱 인력 제공업체 및 분석 제공업체)와 귀하의 개인 정보를 구체적으로 공유할 수 있습니다. 이러한 제3자는 회원님의 국가에 따라 다를 수 있으며 수시로 변경될 수 있지만, Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. 및 해당 제3자 제공업체가 포함될 수 있습니다.
하니웰 직원.
이미 Honeywell 직원인 경우 프로필의 일부 섹션은 공개되어 있으므로 모든 Honeywell 직원이 볼 수 있습니다(특히 이름, 직책, 사진, 기술, 관심 분야, 업무 경력 및 교육). 그러나 이러한 섹션은 편집할 수 있으며 프로필에 표시할 자신에 대한 정보를 선택할 수 있습니다. 경력 목표, 근무지 이전 및 프로필 상태 "새로운 기회에 열려 있음" 섹션은 공개되지 않으므로 모든 Honeywell 직원에게 표시되지 않습니다(Honeywell의 인재 팀에만 표시됨).
기타 제3자.
하니웰은 관련 법률에 따라 또는 당사의 법적 권리를 행사, 확립 또는 방어하거나 귀하 또는 타인의 중대한 이익을 보호하기 위해 그러한 조치가 필요하다고 선의로 판단되는 경우 관할 법 집행 기관, 규제 기관, 정부 기관, 법원 또는 제3자와 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유할 수 있습니다. 또한 당사는 귀하의 동의 또는 귀하의 지시에 따라 귀하의 개인 정보를 다른 사람(예: 심판 또는 전문 협회)과 공유할 수 있습니다.
개인정보의 국제 전송
하니웰은 글로벌 조직이며 귀하의 개인 정보는 미국, 인도 등 전 세계 여러 지역에 이전, 보유, 저장 또는 사용될 수 있습니다. 이는 당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집할 때 귀하의 국가 법률과 다른 데이터 보호법이 적용되는 국가에서 처리될 수 있음을 의미합니다. 그러나 하니웰은 항상 귀하의 개인 정보를 보호하고 귀하의 거주 국가와 유사한 수준의 개인 정보 보호를 제공하기 위해 합리적인 조치를 취할 것이며, 여기에는
유럽연합
집행위원회 웹사이트(
https://ec.europa.eu
)에서 확인할 수 있는 유럽연합 집행위원회의
표준 계약 조항을
이행하는 것이 포함됩니다.
리텐션
당사는 본 개인정보 취급방침에 설명된 목적과 관련하여 필요한 기간 동안, 그리고 Honeywell의 기록 보존 일정에 따라 또는 관련 법률에서 요구하는 기간 동안 귀하의 개인 정보를 보유합니다.
귀하의 권리
관련 법률에 따라 귀하는 귀하의 개인정보와 관련하여 특정 권리를 가질 수 있습니다. 캘리포니아 거주자인 경우 아래의 '
캘리포니아 거주자를 위한 추가 정보
'를 참조하시기 바랍니다.
귀하는 귀하의 개인 정보에
액세스
,
수정
,
업데이트
또는
삭제를
요청할 권리가 있습니다;
귀하는 귀하의 개인 정보 처리에
이의를
제기하고, 당사에 다음과 같은
제한을
요청할 수 있습니다. 개인정보 처리 또는 개인정보
이동
요청;
귀하는 귀하에 대한 결정이 귀하에 대한 법적 효력을 발생시키거나 귀하에게 중대한 영향을 미치는 경우 프로파일링을 포함하여 자동화된 처리만을 기반으로 한 귀하에 대한 결정을 거부할 권리가 있을 수 있습니다.
하니웰은 채용 프로세스의 일부로서 지원자에 대한 결정을 전적으로 자동화된 방식으로만 내리지 않습니다.
마찬가지로, 당사가 귀하의 동의를 받아 귀하의 개인정보를 수집 및 처리한 경우 귀하는 언제든지 동의를 철회할 수 있습니다. 귀하의 동의를 철회하더라도 철회 이전에 당사가 수행한 처리의 적법성에는 영향을 미치지 않으며, 동의 이외의 적법한 처리 근거에 따라 수행한 귀하의 개인정보 처리에도 영향을 미치지 않습니다.
귀하는 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집 및 사용하는 것에 대해 데이터 보호 기관에 불만을 제기할 권리가 있습니다.
당사는 관련 법률에 따라 귀하에게 적용되는 권리 행사를 용이하게 할 것입니다. 귀하의 개인 정보와 관련된 권리를 행사하려면 인사 지원팀 또는
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-성명서에
있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해 당사에 문의하거나
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주십시오.
캘리포니아 거주자를 위한 추가 정보
귀하가 캘리포니아주 거주자인 경우, 본 섹션은 하니웰의 지원자 개인정보 취급방침을 보완합니다.
(i)      수집 및 공개하는 개인정보의 범주
하니웰은 지난 12개월 동안 당사의 사업 목적으로 다음 범주의 개인 정보를 수집하고 공개했습니다:
Previous column
Next column
카테고리
수집하는 정보
A.
이름, 생년월일, 성별, 이메일 주소, 전화번호, 우편 주소, 온라인 식별자, 소셜 미디어 계정 및 기타 식별자와 같은 식별자.
예
C.
인종, 민족, 종교적 또는 철학적 신념, 노동조합 가입 여부, 건강 데이터, 생체 정보, 유전 정보, 장애, 퇴역 여부, 성적 지향, 개인 우편, 이메일 및 문자 메시지(Honeywell이 의도한 수신자가 아닌 경우), 정부 식별자(예: 사회보장번호), 운전면허증, 여권, 금융 및 은행 정보 등 캘리포니아 또는 연방법에 따라 보호되는 분류의 특성.
예
F.
인터넷 또는 기타 전자 네트워크 활동 정보(예: 검색 기록, 하니웰 웹사이트와의 상호 작용, 이메일 및 문자 메시지 서비스).
예
G.
기기 위치 및 IP 위치와 같은 지리적 위치 데이터..
예
H.
전화 또는 화상 인터뷰에 참여하거나 당사 사무실을 방문한 경우 귀하의 음성 및 이미지, 비디오 또는 오디오 녹음과 같은 오디오, 전자, 시각, 열 또는 이와 유사한 정보.
예
I.
직업, 현재 또는 이전 고용주, 직위, 학력, 학력 및 전문 자격, 이력서, 경력, 채용 추천인, 면접 메모 및 평가, 언어, 전문 회원 자격, 자격증, 성과 관리 등급, 보수, 선호 지역 및 여행 선호도 등 직업 또는 고용 관련 정보.
예
K.
위에 나열된 개인 정보로부터 도출된 추론으로 개인의 선호도 및 특성 등에 대한 프로필 또는 요약을 생성합니다.
예
Load More
(ii)     귀하의 권리
귀하는 요청 전 12개월 기간에 대해 다음과 같은 권리를 당사에 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 이러한 권리는 절대적인 것이 아니며 특정 경우에는 관련 법률에 명시된 대로 제한될 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다:
당사가 귀하에 대해 수집한 개인정보, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집한 출처의 범주, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집한 비즈니스 또는 상업적 목적, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 공개하는 제3자의 범주에 대해 알 권리입니다;
개인 정보를 삭제할 권리;
귀하에 대한 부정확한 개인 정보를 수정할 권리;
개인 정보의 판매 또는 공유를 거부할 권리;
민감한 개인 정보의 처리를 제한할 권리;
관련 법률에 따라 권리를 행사하는 데 있어 불법적인 차별을 받지 않을 권리.
당사는 관련 법률에 따라 귀하에게 적용되는 권리 행사를 용이하게 할 것이며, 요청 대상인 개인정보의 유형과 민감성을 고려하여 귀하의 보호를 위해 귀하의 신원 확인을 요청하고 귀하에게 추가 정보를 요청할 필요가 있을 수 있습니다.
귀하의 개인 정보와 관련된 권리를 행사하려면
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
에 있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해 당사에 문의하거나
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주십시오. 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우
HRhelp@honeywell.com
으로 문의할 수 있습니다.
문의하기
개인정보 처리 방식에 대한 질문이나 불만 사항이 있거나 권리를 행사하려면 다음 연락처로 문의하시기 바랍니다:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(이미 하니웰 직원인 경우에만 해당) 또는 당사의 데이터 보호 책임자(
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
)에게 문의하십시오.
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
에있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해서도 당사에 문의할 수 있습니다.
Oppdatert: 1. januar 2023
Denne personvernerklæringen for søkere ("personvernerklæringen") beskriver hvordan Honeywell International, Inc. og dets
tilknyttede selskaper
(samlet kalt "
Honeywell
", "
oss"
eller "
vi
") behandler personopplysningene dine når du blir medlem av Talent Community, søker eller søker på en jobb og sender inn personopplysninger til oss via vår portal, våre nettsteder eller andre rekrutteringsmedier, enten online eller offline ("
tjenestene
"). Vi er behandlingsansvarlige for personopplysningene dine i henhold til gjeldende personvernlovgivning.
Vær oppmerksom på at hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, kan du også lese Honeywells globale retningslinjer for personvern og personvernerklæringen for ansatte der det finnes en slik for din jurisdiksjon. Formålet med denne personvernerklæringen er å gi deg mer detaljert informasjon om hvordan vi behandler personopplysningene dine i forbindelse med søknaden din.
Personopplysninger vi samler inn
For å kunne behandle søknaden din ber vi deg om å oppgi personopplysninger om deg selv, for eksempel når du søker på en bestemt ledig stilling via nettstedet/portalen vår eller, hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, i løpet av ditt ansettelsesforhold. All informasjon gis på frivillig basis, og du bestemmer selv hvor mye informasjon du gir til Honeywell.
Vær oppmerksom på at enkelte opplysninger kan være nødvendige for å kunne vurdere søknaden din, og hvis du ikke oppgir disse, kan det begrense vår mulighet til å vurdere deg som kandidat.
(i)   Personlig informasjon
Vi kan samle inn følgende personopplysninger om deg:
Personopplysninger og kontaktinformasjon, inkludert e-postadresse, telefonnummer og bilde;
Yrkes- og utdanningsinformasjon knyttet til yrket ditt, for eksempel nåværende eller tidligere arbeidsgivere, stillingstittel eller annen informasjon om organisasjonen du er tilknyttet. Du kan også oppgi CV og informasjon om kvalifikasjonene eller utdanningen din, for eksempel grader, studieretninger, hvilke institusjoner du har gått på, språk, faglige medlemskap, sertifiseringer, informasjon om prestasjonsvurderinger og kompensasjon;
Karrierepreferanser (f.eks. kortsiktige og langsiktige mål, vilje til å flytte, dato for flytting og stedspreferanser);
Personopplysninger som stammer fra din deltakelse i rekrutteringsprosessen vår, som for eksempel de som innhentes under intervjuer, e-postene vi utveksler med deg angående søknaden din eller samtalene vi har med deg gjennom vår online Chatbot.
Lyd- og bildeinformasjon, for eksempel din stemme og ditt bilde som er tatt opp på fotografier, video- eller lydopptak hvis du deltar i et telefon- eller videointervju, eller hvis du besøker våre kontorer;
Eventuelle andre personopplysninger som du frivillig velger å gi oss.
(ii)  Sensitive personopplysninger
Vi kan også samle inn spesielle kategorier av personopplysninger om deg (også kjent som "spesielle kategorier av personopplysninger") der vi har en juridisk forpliktelse til å gjøre det, eller der det er nødvendig av hensyn til informasjon som er relevant for ditt fremtidige arbeidsmiljø hos Honeywell, eller for fremtidig levering av ansettelsesfordeler, eller med ditt uttrykkelige samtykke, for eksempel:
Offentlig utstedt identifikasjonsnummer (f.eks. personnummer);
Demografisk informasjon, som kan omfatte informasjon om beskyttede klassifikasjoner, som alder, kjønn, rase, funksjonshemming, seksuell legning, sivilstatus eller veteranstatus;
Helseopplysninger (for eksempel for å imøtekomme eventuelle funksjonshemminger eller kostholdsrestriksjoner);
Opplysninger om en persons politiske meninger, religiøse overbevisning eller fagforeningsmedlemskap;
Informasjon om en persons straffbare handlinger eller domfellelser, samt annen informasjon som anses som sensitiv i henhold til gjeldende personvernlovgivning. Der loven tillater det og i den utstrekning det er relevant, kan Honeywell også ha behov for å utføre bakgrunns- og/eller kriminalsjekker for å avgjøre om du er egnet for en ledig stilling eller mulighet hos Honeywell.
Vi krever ikke at du oppgir sensitive personopplysninger med mindre det er nødvendig for å oppfylle våre lovpålagte forpliktelser (f.eks. for å overvåke likestilling), eller med mindre du har gitt ditt uttrykkelige samtykke. Med unntak av i den grad loven krever det, er det helt frivillig å oppgi disse opplysningene. Honeywell er opptatt av en inkluderende og mangfoldig arbeidsstyrke. Ved å gi oss opplysninger om likestilling gir du oss mulighet til å få en bedre forståelse av medarbeiderprofilen vår når det gjelder likestillingsdata og de tiltakene vi må iverksette for å tiltrekke oss, fremme og beholde en mangfoldig arbeidsstyrke uavhengig av alder, funksjonshemming, kjønn, rase, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning og seksuell legning.
(iii) Personopplysninger vi samler inn automatisk fra deg
Vi kan automatisk samle inn visse opplysninger fra deg om besøket ditt på nettsidene våre ved hjelp av informasjonskapsler og andre lignende sporingsteknologier. Hvis du vil ha mer informasjon om informasjonskapslene vi bruker på nettstedet der du sender inn søknaden din, kan du lese
informasjonskapselerklæringen
vår.
Kilder til personopplysninger
Vi kan samle inn personopplysningene dine direkte fra deg eller indirekte fra tredjeparter som har lovlig rett til å dele opplysningene dine med oss, for eksempel:
Bemanningsbyråer, leverandører av tjenester for bakgrunnssjekk/ansettelsessjekk eller identitetsverifisering;
Rekrutteringsbyråer (for eksempel når et rekrutteringsbyrå identifiserer deg som en potensiell kandidat);
Offentlig tilgjengelig informasjon om deg fra nettsteder som LinkedIn eller din nåværende arbeidsgivers nettsted. Du kan også velge å gi oss tilgang til visse personopplysninger som er lagret av tredjeparter (for eksempel LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Ved å gi Honeywell tilgang til denne informasjonen, samtykker du i at vi kan samle inn, lagre og bruke denne informasjonen i samsvar med denne personvernerklæringen;
Gjennom referanse eller muntlig (for eksempel gjennom en henvisning fra en nåværende eller tidligere ansatt). Ved henvisninger er personen som henviser deg, ansvarlig for å innhente ditt samtykke til å gi oss personopplysningene dine.
Formålene som personopplysningene brukes til
Vi bruker personopplysningene dine til følgende formål:
For å evaluere søknaden din og ta avgjørelser om ansettelse;
Kommunisere med deg og informere deg om rekrutteringen og/eller søknaden(e) din(e) eller annen nødvendig kommunikasjon;
Overholde gjeldende juridiske og regulatoriske krav og for at vi skal kunne etablere, utøve eller forsvare et juridisk krav;
Ansettelse og bedriftsledelse (for eksempel opprette en grunnleggende ansettelsesprotokoll hvis du blir ansatt);
Utføre aggregerte rapporter/analyser av data om kandidaters aktivitet (f.eks. trafikk på karrieresider, kandidattrakt, ansettelseskilder, vellykkede rekrutteringskampanjer);
Kun for Honeywell-ansatte
:
For automatisk å utelukke deg fra å bli foreslått proaktivt for rekrutterere for en jobbmulighet, og du er ikke kvalifisert for vurdering i henhold til din nåværende HPD 9-blokk rating (som aldri vil bli avslørt for noen utenfor Honeywell). Du vil imidlertid alltid kunne søke direkte på ledige stillinger, og din spesifikke situasjon vil bli vurdert av en rekrutterer.
Bare hvis du er bosatt i USA
:
Bare hvis du er bosatt i USA:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikasjon i forbindelse med din søknad til en bestemt ledig stilling; og/eller
(ii)    med forbehold om ditt uttrykkelige samtykke
,
SMS-kampanjekommunikasjon om ansettelsesmuligheter, jobbsaker og oppdateringer av søknader.
Du kan velge bort og/eller tilbakekalle ditt samtykke til å motta ovennevnte kommunikasjon ved å følge instruksjonene i profilen din.
Hvis du blir tilbudt og takker ja til ansettelse hos Honeywell, vil opplysningene som samles inn i løpet av søknads- og rekrutteringsprosessen, bli en del av ansettelsespapirene dine.
Automatisert behandling og profilering
Med forbehold om ditt uttrykkelige samtykke (som du frivillig gir når du melder deg inn i Talent Community eller krysser av i den aktuelle samtykkeboksen i løpet av søknadsprosessen), utfører vi "profilering" for å vurdere din egnethet for bestemte jobbmuligheter. Dette innebærer bruk av en matchingsalgoritme som er i stand til å evaluere ansettelsesprofilen din og forutsi om du er kvalifisert for en bestemt jobbmulighet. Vi utfører denne automatiserte behandlingen for følgende formål:
hjelpe rekrutteringsansvarlige med å matche kandidatprofiler med jobbmuligheter ved å foreslå kandidater som kan komme i betraktning for en bestemt jobbmulighet, og
sende personlige jobbanbefalinger til deg basert på profilen og/eller preferansene dine eller annen informasjon som kan være av interesse for deg, for eksempel Honeywell-nyheter, webinarer og arrangementer.
Vær oppmerksom på at basert på denne profileringen kan det hende at du ikke kommer i betraktning til visse stillinger med mindre du har søkt på dem direkte.
Vi tar ikke ansettelsesbeslutninger utelukkende basert på automatiserte beslutningsprosesser og/eller profilering. Personopplysningene dine vil bli gjenstand for menneskeskapte beslutninger, ettersom den endelige ansettelsesbeslutningen vil bli tatt av rekrutterere eller ansettelsesansvarlig.
Rettslig grunnlag for behandling av personopplysningene dine
Enkelte jurisdiksjoner krever at Honeywell har et rettslig grunnlag for å behandle personopplysningene dine. Der gjeldende lov krever at vi begrunner behandlingsaktivitetene våre, vil vårt rettslige grunnlag for å samle inn og bruke personopplysningene dine som beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen, avhenge av de aktuelle personopplysningene og den spesifikke konteksten vi samler dem inn i.
Samtykke.
Generelt vil vi normalt samle inn personopplysninger fra deg når vi har ditt samtykke til å gjøre det, og når vi trenger personopplysningene dine for å behandle søknaden din. Ved å gå inn på nettstedet/portalen vår, bli medlem av Talent Community eller søke på en av våre stillinger, gir du Honeywell ditt samtykke til å samle inn og behandle personopplysningene beskrevet ovenfor for de formålene som er beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen. Du kan når som helst
trekke tilbake ditt samtykke
ved å sende inn en forespørsel via vår portal for forespørsler fra registrerte på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende oss en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Berettigede interesser.
Honeywells legitime interesser, nemlig rekruttering, utvelgelse, evaluering og utnevnelse av nye ansatte og ledelse og administrasjon av rekrutterings- og HR-prosessen i den grad våre legitime interesser ikke overstyres av dine grunnleggende rettigheter og friheter.
Juridiske forpliktelser
. Overholdelse av Honeywells juridiske forpliktelser der arbeidsrett eller andre lover krever behandling av personopplysningene dine (for eksempel i den grad loven krever overvåking av like muligheter og mangfold).
Vitale interesser.
Vi kan også trenge personopplysningene dine for å beskytte dine vitale interesser (for eksempel av helse- og sikkerhetsgrunner hvis du deltar på et intervju hos oss).
Hvis du har spørsmål om eller trenger mer informasjon om det rettslige grunnlaget for innsamling og bruk av personopplysningene dine, kan du sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Hvem vi deler personopplysningene dine med
Honeywell vil bare dele personopplysningene dine med tredjeparter under følgende omstendigheter:
Enheter i Honeywell-konsernet
. Vi kan dele personopplysningene dine med andre enheter i Honeywell-konsernet i jurisdiksjoner rundt om i verden for å evaluere profilen din og vurdere eventuelle rekrutteringsmuligheter på konsernnivå.
Tjenesteleverandører
Vi kan spesifikt dele personopplysningene dine med tredjeparts tjenesteleverandører som utfører spesifikke tjenester på våre vegne (for eksempel leverandører av rekrutterings- og outsourcingstjenester og analyseleverandører). Slike tredjeparter kan variere avhengig av hvilket land du bor i, og vil endres fra tid til annen, men kan omfatte Phenom People, Inc. og Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. og deres respektive tredjepartsleverandører.
Ansatte i Honeywell.
Hvis du allerede er Honeywell-ansatt, må du være oppmerksom på at enkelte deler av profilen din er offentlige og dermed synlige for alle Honeywell-ansatte  (spesielt navn, tittel, bilde, ferdigheter, interesseområder, arbeidserfaring og utdanning). Disse delene kan imidlertid redigeres, og du kan velge hvilken informasjon om deg som skal vises i profilen din. Vær oppmerksom på at karrieremålene, flyttingene og profilstatus "åpen for nye muligheter" vil ikke være offentlige og derfor ikke synlige for alle Honeywell-ansatte (kun for Honeywells Talent Team).
Andre tredjeparter.
Honeywell kan dele personopplysningene dine med kompetente politimyndigheter, tilsynsmyndigheter, offentlige etater, domstoler eller tredjeparter der vi mener at utlevering er nødvendig i henhold til gjeldende lov eller i god tro om at en slik handling er nødvendig for å utøve, etablere eller forsvare våre juridiske rettigheter eller for å beskytte dine eller en annen persons vitale interesser. Vi kan også komme til å dele personopplysningene dine med andre med ditt samtykke eller etter din anvisning (f.eks. en dommer eller yrkesorganisasjon).
Internasjonal overføring av personopplysninger
Honeywell er en global organisasjon, og personopplysningene dine kan bli overført til, oppbevart, lagret eller brukt på ulike steder i verden, for eksempel i USA og India. Dette betyr at når vi samler inn personopplysningene dine, kan de bli behandlet i land som kan ha en annen personvernlovgivning enn den som gjelder i ditt land. Honeywell vil imidlertid alltid treffe rimelige tiltak for å beskytte personvernet ditt og sørge for et beskyttelsesnivå for personopplysninger som er sammenlignbart med det som gjelder i landet du bor i. Dette inkluderer implementering av
EU-kommisjonens standardkontraktsklausuler
, som du finner på kommisjonens nettsted på
https://ec.europa.eu.
Oppbevaring
Vi vil oppbevare personopplysningene dine så lenge det er nødvendig i forbindelse med formålene som er beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen og i samsvar med Honeywells arkivoppbevaringsplan eller i henhold til gjeldende lovgivning.
Dine rettigheter
Avhengig av gjeldende lovgivning kan du ha visse rettigheter med hensyn til personopplysningene dine. Hvis du er bosatt i California, se "
Tilleggsinformasjon for innbyggere i California
" nedenfor..
Du kan ha rett til å få
tilgang til, korrigere, oppdatere
eller be om
sletting
av personopplysningene dine;
Du kan
protestere
mot behandlingen av personopplysningene dine, be oss om å
begrense
behandling av personopplysningene dine eller be om
portabilitet
av personopplysningene dine;
Du kan ha rett til å motsette deg at det tas en avgjørelse om deg som utelukkende er basert på automatisert behandling, herunder profilering, hvis avgjørelsen har rettsvirkninger for deg eller påvirker deg i betydelig grad.
Honeywell tar ikke, som en del av rekrutteringsprosessen, utelukkende automatiserte avgjørelser om kandidater.
Hvis vi har samlet inn og behandlet personopplysningene dine med ditt samtykke, kan du når som helst trekke tilbake samtykket. Hvis du trekker tilbake samtykket ditt, vil det ikke påvirke lovligheten av behandlingen vi har utført før du trakk det tilbake, og det vil heller ikke påvirke behandlingen av personopplysningene dine som er utført på grunnlag av andre lovlige behandlingsgrunnlag enn samtykke.
Du har rett til å klage til en personvernmyndighet på vår innsamling og bruk av dine personopplysninger.
Vi vil legge til rette for at du kan utøve de rettighetene som gjelder for deg i samsvar med gjeldende lovgivning. Hvis du vil utøve noen av rettighetene dine i forbindelse med personopplysningene dine, kan du kontakte oss via HR Help eller skjemaet for forespørsler fra registrerte på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Ytterligere informasjon for innbyggere i California
Hvis du er bosatt i delstaten California, supplerer dette avsnittet Honeywells personvernerklæring for søkere.
(i)      Kategorier av personopplysninger som samles inn og utleveres
Honeywell har samlet inn og utlevert følgende kategorier av personopplysninger for våre forretningsformål i løpet av de siste tolv månedene:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi samler inn
A.
Identifikatorer som navn, fødselsdato, kjønn, e-postadresse, telefonnummer, postadresse, nettbaserte identifikatorer, kontoer på sosiale medier og andre identifikatorer.
Ja
C.
Kjennetegn ved beskyttede klassifikasjoner i henhold til californisk eller føderal lovgivning, for eksempel rase, etnisitet, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning, fagforeningsmedlemskap, helseopplysninger, biometriske opplysninger, genetiske opplysninger, funksjonshemming, veteranstatus, seksuell legning, personlig post, e-post og tekstmeldinger (med mindre Honeywell er den tiltenkte mottakeren), offentlige identifikatorer (f.eks. personnummer), førerkort, pass, finans- og bankopplysninger.
Ja
F.
Informasjon om Internett eller annen elektronisk nettverksaktivitet, for eksempel nettleserhistorikk, interaksjon med Honeywells nettsteder, e-post og tekstmeldingstjenester.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, for eksempel enhetens plassering og IP-posisjon.
Ja
H.
Lyd, elektronisk, visuell, termisk eller lignende informasjon, for eksempel stemme og bilde, video- eller lydopptak hvis du deltar i et telefon- eller videointervju eller hvis du besøker våre kontorer.
Ja
I.
Yrkes- eller ansettelsesrelaterte opplysninger som yrke, nåværende eller tidligere arbeidsgivere, stillingstittel, utdanningshistorikk, akademiske og faglige kvalifikasjoner, CV, jobbhistorikk, ansettelsesreferanser, intervjunotater og -vurderinger, språk, faglige medlemskap, sertifiseringer, prestasjonsvurderinger, kompensasjon, stedspreferanser og reisepreferanser.
Ja
K.
Slutninger som trekkes fra en hvilken som helst av personopplysningene som er oppført ovenfor, for å lage en profil eller et sammendrag om for eksempel en persons preferanser og egenskaper..
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dine rettigheter
Du har rett til å sende oss en forespørsel om følgende rettigheter for den tolvmånedersperioden som går forut for forespørselen din. Vær oppmerksom på at disse rettighetene ikke er absolutte, og at de i visse tilfeller er underlagt begrensninger i henhold til gjeldende lovgivning:
Retten til å få vite hvilke personopplysninger vi har samlet inn om deg, hvilke kategorier av kilder vi har samlet inn personopplysningene dine fra, hvilke forretningsmessige eller kommersielle formål vi har samlet inn personopplysningene dine for, og hvilke kategorier av tredjeparter vi utleverer personopplysningene dine til;
Retten til å slette personopplysningene dine;
Retten til å korrigere unøyaktige personopplysninger om deg;
Retten til å reservere deg mot salg eller deling av personopplysningene dine;
Retten til å begrense behandlingen av sensitive personopplysninger;
Retten til ikke å bli utsatt for ulovlig diskriminering når du utøver dine rettigheter i henhold til gjeldende lover.
Vi vil legge til rette for at du kan utøve de rettighetene som gjelder for deg i samsvar med gjeldende lov, og med tanke på typen og sensitiviteten til personopplysningene som er gjenstand for forespørselen, kan vi for å beskytte deg måtte be om å bekrefte identiteten din og be om ytterligere informasjon fra deg.
Hvis du vil utøve noen av rettighetene dine knyttet til personopplysningene dine, kan du kontakte oss via skjemaet for forespørsler om personopplysninger på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, kan du kontakte oss på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt oss
Hvis du har spørsmål eller klager på hvordan personopplysningene dine behandles, eller hvis du ønsker å utøve dine rettigheter, kan du kontakte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(bare hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell) eller vårt personvernombud på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan også kontakte oss via forespørselsskjemaet som du finner på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Aktualizacja: 1 stycznia 2023 r.
Niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności kandydatów ("Informacja o ochronie prywatności") opisuje, w jaki sposób Honeywell International, Inc. i jej
podmioty stowarzyszone
(łącznie "
Honeywell
", "
my
" lub "
nas
") przetwarzają dane osobowe użytkowników, którzy dołączają do naszej Społeczności talentów, wyszukują lub ubiegają się o pracę oraz przesyłają nam dane osobowe za pośrednictwem naszego portalu, stron internetowych lub innych mediów rekrutacyjnych, zarówno online, jak i offline ("
Usługi
"). Jesteśmy administratorami danych osobowych użytkownika dla celów obowiązujących przepisów o ochronie danych.
Pamiętaj, że jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell, możesz również zapoznać się z Globalną Polityką Prywatności Danych Honeywell i Informacją o Prywatności Pracowników, jeśli taka istnieje w Twojej jurysdykcji. Celem niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności jest przekazanie użytkownikowi bardziej szczegółowych informacji na temat przetwarzania przez nas jego danych osobowych w związku z jego aplikacją.
Gromadzone przez nas dane osobowe
W celu rozpatrzenia podania o pracę prosimy o podanie swoich danych osobowych, na przykład podczas ubiegania się o określone stanowisko pracy za pośrednictwem naszej strony internetowej/portalu lub, w przypadku gdy użytkownik jest już pracownikiem Honeywell, w trakcie trwania stosunku pracy. Wszystkie informacje są przekazywane dobrowolnie, a użytkownik określa zakres informacji, które przekazuje Honeywell.
Należy pamiętać, że niektóre informacje mogą być niezbędne do ukończenia oceny aplikacji, a jeśli nie zostaną dostarczone, nasza zdolność do rozważenia kandydata może być ograniczona.
(i)   Dane osobowe
Możemy gromadzić następujące dane osobowe użytkownika:
Dane osobowe i informacje kontaktowe, w tym adres e-mail, numer(y) telefonu i zdjęcie;
Informacje zawodowe i edukacyjne związane z wykonywanym zawodem, takie jak obecni lub poprzedni pracodawcy, stanowisko lub inne informacje o organizacji, z którą jesteś powiązany. Możesz również podać swoje CV/życiorys oraz informacje o swoich kwalifikacjach lub wykształceniu, takie jak stopnie naukowe, kierunki studiów, instytucje, do których uczęszczałeś, języki, członkostwo zawodowe, certyfikaty, szczegóły dotyczące ocen zarządzania wynikami i wynagrodzenia;
Preferencje dotyczące kariery zawodowej (np. cele krótko- i długoterminowe, gotowość do zmiany miejsca zamieszkania, dostępny termin zmiany miejsca zamieszkania i preferencje dotyczące lokalizacji);
Dane osobowe pochodzące z udziału użytkownika w naszym procesie rekrutacji, takie jak na przykład dane uzyskane podczas rozmów kwalifikacyjnych, wiadomości e-mail, które wymieniamy z użytkownikiem w związku z jego aplikacją lub rozmowy, które prowadzimy z użytkownikiem za pośrednictwem naszego internetowego Chatbota.
Informacje dźwiękowe i wizualne, takie jak głos i wizerunek użytkownika utrwalone na zdjęciach, nagraniach wideo lub audio w przypadku udziału w rozmowie telefonicznej lub wideo albo wizyty w naszych biurach;
Wszelkie inne dane osobowe, które użytkownik dobrowolnie zdecyduje się nam przekazać.
(ii)  Wrażliwe dane osobowe
Możemy również gromadzić specjalne kategorie danych osobowych użytkownika (znane również jako "specjalne kategorie danych osobowych"), gdy mamy do tego prawny obowiązek lub gdy informacje są istotne dla przyszłego środowiska pracy w Honeywell lub dla przyszłego zapewnienia świadczeń pracowniczych, lub za wyraźną zgodą użytkownika, np:
Numer identyfikacyjny wydany przez rząd (np. numer ubezpieczenia społecznego);
Informacje demograficzne, które mogą obejmować informacje o chronionych klasyfikacjach, takich jak wiek, płeć, rasa, niepełnosprawność, orientacja seksualna, stan cywilny lub status weterana;
Informacje o stanie zdrowia (na przykład w celu dostosowania do niepełnosprawności lub ograniczeń dietetycznych);
Informacje dotyczące poglądów politycznych, przekonań religijnych lub przynależności do związków zawodowych;
Informacje o przestępstwach lub wyrokach skazujących danej osoby, a także wszelkie inne informacje uznane za wrażliwe zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami o ochronie danych. Tam, gdzie jest to dozwolone przez prawo i w zakresie, w jakim ma to zastosowanie, Honeywell może również być zmuszony do przeprowadzenia prześwietlenia i/lub kontroli karnej w celu ustalenia, czy dana osoba nadaje się na wolne stanowisko lub do pracy w Honeywell.
Nie wymagamy od użytkownika podawania nam wrażliwych danych osobowych, chyba że jest to konieczne do celów wypełniania naszych obowiązków regulacyjnych (np. w celu monitorowania równości szans) lub jeśli użytkownik nie wyraził na to wyraźnej zgody. Z wyjątkiem zakresu wymaganego przez prawo, podanie tych informacji będzie całkowicie dobrowolne. Honeywell dąży do zapewnienia prawdziwie inkluzywnej i zróżnicowanej siły roboczej. Przekazując nam swoje dane dotyczące równych szans, umożliwiasz nam lepsze zrozumienie profilu naszych pracowników pod względem danych dotyczących równych szans oraz działań, które musimy podjąć w celu przyciągnięcia, promowania i utrzymania zróżnicowanej siły roboczej bez względu na wiek, niepełnosprawność, płeć, rasę, przekonania religijne lub filozoficzne oraz orientację seksualną.
(iii) Dane osobowe zbierane automatycznie od użytkownika
Możemy automatycznie zbierać od użytkownika pewne informacje na temat jego wizyty na naszych stronach internetowych za pomocą plików "cookie" i innych podobnych technologii śledzenia. Więcej informacji na temat plików cookie używanych na stronie internetowej, za pośrednictwem której użytkownik składa wniosek, można znaleźć w naszej
Informacji o plikach cookie
.
Źródła danych osobowych
Możemy gromadzić dane osobowe użytkownika bezpośrednio od niego lub pośrednio od stron trzecich, które zgodnie z prawem są uprawnione do udostępniania nam danych użytkownika, takich jak:
Agencje zatrudnienia, dostawcy usług sprawdzania przeszłości/ zatrudnienia lub weryfikacji tożsamości;
Agencje rekrutacyjne (na przykład, gdy agencja rekrutacyjna zidentyfikuje użytkownika jako potencjalnego kandydata);
Publicznie dostępne informacje o użytkowniku z witryn takich jak LinkedIn lub strona internetowa aktualnego pracodawcy. Użytkownik może również zdecydować się na zapewnienie nam dostępu do niektórych danych osobowych przechowywanych przez osoby trzecie (na przykład LinkedIn, Twitter, Google lub Facebook). Upoważniając Honeywell do dostępu do tych informacji, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na gromadzenie, przechowywanie i wykorzystywanie tych informacji zgodnie z niniejszą Informacją o ochronie prywatności;
Przez referencje lub ustnie (na przykład przez polecenie od obecnego lub byłego pracownika). W przypadku poleceń osoba polecająca będzie odpowiedzialna za uzyskanie zgody użytkownika na przekazanie nam jego danych osobowych.
Cele, dla których wykorzystywane są dane osobowe
Wykorzystujemy dane osobowe użytkownika do następujących celów:
Ocena aplikacji i podejmowanie decyzji o zatrudnieniu;
Komunikowanie się z użytkownikiem i informowanie go o rekrutacji i/lub zgłoszeniach lub innych wymaganych komunikatach;
Przestrzegania obowiązujących wymogów prawnych i regulacyjnych oraz w celu ustalenia, wykonania lub obrony roszczeń prawnych;
Zatrudnienie i zarządzanie firmą (na przykład ustanowienie podstawowego rejestru zatrudnienia w przypadku zatrudnienia);
Przeprowadzanie zagregowanych raportów / analiz dotyczących danych o aktywności kandydatów (np. ruch na stronie kariery, lejek kandydata, źródło zatrudnienia, sukces kampanii rekrutacyjnej);
Tylko dla pracowników Honeywell
:
Aby automatycznie wykluczyć Cię z proaktywnego sugerowania rekruterom możliwości zatrudnienia i nie kwalifikujesz się do rozważenia na podstawie Twojej aktualnej oceny HPD 9-block (która nigdy nie zostanie ujawniona nikomu spoza Honeywell). Zawsze jednak będziesz mógł bezpośrednio ubiegać się o każdą dostępną ofertę pracy, a Twoja konkretna sytuacja zostanie rozpatrzona przez rekrutera.
Tylko w przypadku, gdy użytkownik jest mieszkańcem Stanów Zjednoczonych
:
W celu wysyłania użytkownikowi wiadomości SMS, w szczególności:
(i)     1-1 wiadomości SMS w związku z aplikacją użytkownika na określone stanowisko pracy; i/lub
(ii)    pod warunkiem uzyskania wyraźnej zgody użytkownika
,
komunikaty w ramach kampanii SMS dotyczące możliwości zatrudnienia, spraw związanych z pracą i aktualizacji aplikacji.
Użytkownik będzie mógł zrezygnować i/lub odwołać swoją zgodę na otrzymywanie wyżej wymienionych wiadomości zgodnie z instrukcjami podanymi w jego profilu.
W przypadku zaoferowania i zaakceptowania zatrudnienia w Honeywell, informacje zebrane podczas procesu aplikacji i rekrutacji staną się częścią dokumentacji zatrudnienia.
Zautomatyzowane przetwarzanie i profilowanie
Z zastrzeżeniem wyraźnej zgody użytkownika (której udziela on dobrowolnie, dołączając do naszej Społeczności Talentów lub zaznaczając odpowiednie pole zgody podczas procesu aplikacyjnego), prowadzimy "profilowanie" w celu oceny przydatności użytkownika do konkretnych ofert pracy. Wiąże się to z wykorzystaniem algorytmu dopasowującego, który jest w stanie ocenić profil zatrudnienia użytkownika i przewidzieć, czy kwalifikuje się on do danej oferty pracy. Przeprowadzamy to zautomatyzowane przetwarzanie w celu:
pomaganie rekruterom w dopasowywaniu profili kandydatów do ofert pracy poprzez sugerowanie kandydatów do rozważenia na konkretne stanowisko; oraz
przesyłanie użytkownikowi spersonalizowanych rekomendacji dotyczących pracy w oparciu o jego profil i/lub preferencje lub innych informacji, które mogą być dla niego interesujące, takich jak wiadomości, webinaria i wydarzenia Honeywell.
Należy pamiętać, że w oparciu o to profilowanie, kandydat może nie być brany pod uwagę w przypadku niektórych ofert pracy, chyba że aplikował na nie bezpośrednio.
Nie podejmujemy decyzji o zatrudnieniu wyłącznie w oparciu o zautomatyzowane procesy decyzyjne i/lub profilowanie. Twoje dane osobowe będą przedmiotem decyzji podejmowanych przez człowieka, ponieważ ostateczna decyzja o zatrudnieniu zostanie podjęta przez rekruterów lub menedżerów ds. rekrutacji.
Podstawy prawne przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika
Niektóre jurysdykcje wymagają od Honeywell posiadania podstawy prawnej do przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika. Tam, gdzie obowiązujące prawo wymaga od nas uzasadnienia naszych działań związanych z przetwarzaniem, nasza podstawa prawna do gromadzenia i wykorzystywania danych osobowych użytkownika w sposób opisany w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności będzie zależeć od danych osobowych i konkretnego kontekstu, w którym je gromadzimy.
Zgoda.
Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, Honeywell będzie gromadzić dane osobowe użytkowników w przypadku, gdy uzyska na to ich zgodę i gdy będzie potrzebować ich danych osobowych w celu rozpatrzenia podania o pracę. Uzyskując dostęp do naszej strony internetowej/portalu, dołączając do naszej społeczności talentów lub ubiegając się o jedno z naszych stanowisk pracy, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na gromadzenie i dalsze przetwarzanie przez Honeywell danych osobowych opisanych powyżej w celach opisanych w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności. Użytkownik może
wycofać swoją zgodę w
dowolnym momencie, przesyłając wniosek za pośrednictwem naszego portalu wniosków dotyczących osób, których dane dotyczą, pod adresem
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysyłając nam wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Uzasadnione interesy.
W uzasadnionych interesach Honeywell, a mianowicie w rekrutacji, selekcji, ocenie i mianowaniu nowych pracowników oraz zarządzaniu i administrowaniu rekrutacją i procesem HR, w zakresie, w jakim nasze uzasadnione interesy nie są nadrzędne wobec podstawowych praw i wolności użytkownika.
Zobowiązania prawne
Zgodność ze zobowiązaniami prawnymi Honeywell, w przypadku gdy prawo pracy lub inne przepisy wymagają przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika (na przykład w zakresie, w jakim prawo wymaga monitorowania równości szans i różnorodności).
Istotne interesy
Możemy również potrzebować danych osobowych użytkownika w celu ochrony jego żywotnych interesów (na przykład ze względów zdrowotnych i bezpieczeństwa, jeśli użytkownik uczestniczy w rozmowie kwalifikacyjnej w naszym zakładzie).
W przypadku pytań lub potrzeby uzyskania dodatkowych informacji dotyczących podstawy prawnej gromadzenia i wykorzystywania przez nas danych osobowych użytkowników, prosimy o przesłanie wiadomości e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Komu udostępniamy dane osobowe użytkownika
Honeywell będzie udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika stronom trzecim wyłącznie w następujących okolicznościach:
Podmioty grupy Honeywell
. Możemy udostępniać Twoje dane osobowe innym podmiotom grupy zlokalizowanym w jurysdykcjach na całym świecie w celu oceny Twojego profilu i rozważenia możliwości rekrutacji na poziomie grupy.
Dostawcy usług
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika zewnętrznym dostawcom usług, którzy świadczą określone usługi w naszym imieniu (na przykład dostawcom usług rekrutacyjnych i outsourcingowych oraz dostawcom usług analitycznych).  Takie podmioty zewnętrzne mogą się różnić w zależności od kraju użytkownika i będą się zmieniać od czasu do czasu, ale mogą obejmować Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. i ich odpowiednich dostawców zewnętrznych.
HPracownicy Honeywell.
Jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell, pamiętaj, że niektóre sekcje Twojego profilu są publiczne, a zatem widoczne dla wszystkich pracowników Honeywell (w szczególności imię i nazwisko, tytuł, zdjęcie, umiejętności, obszary zainteresowań, doświadczenie zawodowe i wykształcenie). Takie sekcje można jednak edytować i użytkownik może wybrać, które informacje na jego temat będą wyświetlane w profilu. Należy pamiętać, że cele zawodowe, relokacje i status profilu "otwarty na nowe możliwości" nie będą publiczne, a zatem nie będą widoczne dla wszystkich pracowników Honeywell (tylko dla zespołu ds. talentów Honeywell).
Inne strony trzecie.
Honeywell może udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika dowolnemu właściwemu organowi ścigania, organowi regulacyjnemu, agencji rządowej, sądowi lub stronie trzeciej, jeżeli uważamy, że ujawnienie jest konieczne zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem lub w dobrej wierze, że takie działanie jest niezbędne do wykonania, ustanowienia lub obrony naszych praw lub do ochrony żywotnych interesów użytkownika lub innej osoby. Możemy również udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika innym podmiotom za jego zgodą lub na jego polecenie (np. sędziom lub stowarzyszeniom zawodowym).
Międzynarodowe transfery danych osobowych
Honeywell jest organizacją globalną, a dane osobowe użytkownika mogą być przekazywane, przechowywane, przechowywane lub wykorzystywane w różnych lokalizacjach na całym świecie, takich jak USA i Indie. Oznacza to, że gdy zbieramy dane osobowe użytkownika, mogą one być przetwarzane w krajach, w których przepisy o ochronie danych osobowych mogą różnić się od przepisów obowiązujących w kraju użytkownika. Honeywell będzie jednak zawsze podejmować uzasadnione kroki w celu ochrony prywatności użytkownika i zapewnienia poziomu ochrony danych osobowych porównywalnego z poziomem obowiązującym w kraju zamieszkania użytkownika, co obejmuje wdrożenie
standardowych klauzul umownych Komisji Europejskiej
, które można znaleźć na stronie internetowej Komisji pod adresem
https://ec.europa.eu.
Zatrzymanie
We will retain your personal information for as long as necessary in connection with the purposes described in this Privacy Notice and in accordance with Honeywell's Record Retention Schedule or as required by applicable law.
Prawa użytkownika
DW zależności od obowiązującego prawa użytkownikowi mogą przysługiwać określone prawa w odniesieniu do jego danych osobowych. Jeśli jesteś mieszkańcem Kalifornii, zapoznaj się z "
Dodatkowymi informacjami dla mieszkańców Kalifornii
" poniżej.
Użytkownik może mieć prawo
dostępu do
swoich danych osobowych
, ich poprawiania, aktualizowania
lub żądania ich
usunięcia;
Użytkownik może
sprzeciwić
się przetwarzaniu jego danych osobowych, poprosić nas  o
ograniczenie
przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika lub zażądać
przeniesienia
swoich danych osobowych;
Użytkownik może mieć prawo do tego, aby nie podejmowano wobec niego decyzji opartej wyłącznie na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu, w tym profilowaniu, jeżeli decyzja ta wywołuje wobec niego skutki prawne lub ma na niego istotny wpływ.
W ramach procesu rekrutacji Honeywell nie podejmuje wyłącznie zautomatyzowanych decyzji dotyczących kandydatów.
Podobnie, jeśli zebraliśmy i przetwarzamy dane osobowe użytkownika za jego zgodą, może on wycofać swoją zgodę w dowolnym momencie. Wycofanie zgody nie wpłynie na zgodność z prawem przetwarzania, którego dokonaliśmy przed jej wycofaniem, ani na przetwarzanie danych osobowych użytkownika w oparciu o zgodne z prawem podstawy przetwarzania inne niż zgoda; oraz
Użytkownik ma prawo do złożenia skargi do organu ochrony danych w związku z gromadzeniem i wykorzystywaniem przez nas jego danych osobowych.
Ułatwimy użytkownikowi korzystanie z przysługujących mu praw zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem. Aby skorzystać z któregokolwiek ze swoich praw związanych z danymi osobowymi, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem Pomocy HR lub formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się pod adresem
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysłać wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Dodatkowe informacje dla mieszkańców Kalifornii
Jeśli użytkownik jest mieszkańcem stanu Kalifornia, niniejsza sekcja stanowi uzupełnienie Informacji o ochronie prywatności wnioskodawców firmy Honeywell.
(i)      Kategorie gromadzonych i ujawnianych danych osobowych
Honeywell zebrał i ujawnił następujące kategorie danych osobowych do celów biznesowych w ciągu ostatnich dwunastu miesięcy:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorie
Zbieramy
A.
Identyfikatory, takie jak imię i nazwisko, data urodzenia, płeć, adres e-mail, numery telefonów, adres pocztowy, identyfikatory internetowe, konta w mediach społecznościowych i inne identyfikatory.
Tak
C.
Cechy klasyfikacji chronionych na mocy prawa kalifornijskiego lub federalnego, takie jak rasa, pochodzenie etniczne, przekonania religijne lub filozoficzne, przynależność do związków zawodowych, dane zdrowotne, informacje biometryczne, dane genetyczne, niepełnosprawność, status weterana, orientacja seksualna, poczta osobista, wiadomości e-mail i wiadomości tekstowe (chyba że Honeywell jest zamierzonym odbiorcą), identyfikatory rządowe (np. numer ubezpieczenia społecznego), prawo jazdy, paszport, informacje finansowe i bankowe.
Tak
F.
Informacje o aktywności w Internecie lub innych sieciach elektronicznych, takie jak historia przeglądania, interakcje ze stronami internetowymi Honeywell, poczta elektroniczna i usługi przesyłania wiadomości tekstowych.
Tak
G.
Dane geolokalizacyjne, takie jak lokalizacja urządzenia i lokalizacja IP.
Tak
H.
Informacje dźwiękowe, elektroniczne, wizualne, termiczne lub podobne, takie jak głos i wizerunek użytkownika, nagrania wideo lub audio w przypadku udziału w rozmowie telefonicznej lub wideo albo wizyty w naszych biurach.
Tak
I.
Informacje zawodowe lub związane z zatrudnieniem, takie jak zawód, obecny lub poprzedni pracodawca, stanowisko, historia edukacji, kwalifikacje akademickie i zawodowe, życiorys, historia zatrudnienia, referencje dotyczące zatrudnienia, notatki z rozmów kwalifikacyjnych i oceny, języki, członkostwo zawodowe, certyfikaty, oceny zarządzania wydajnością, wynagrodzenie, preferencje dotyczące lokalizacji i preferencje dotyczące podróży.
Tak
K.
Wyciąganie wniosków na podstawie jakichkolwiek danych osobowych wymienionych powyżej w celu stworzenia profilu lub podsumowania na temat, na przykład, preferencji i cech danej osoby.
Tak
Load More
(ii)      Twoje prawa
Użytkownik ma prawo przesłać nam wniosek o przyznanie następujących praw obejmujących okres dwunastu miesięcy poprzedzających złożenie wniosku. Należy pamiętać, że prawa te nie są bezwzględne i w niektórych przypadkach podlegają ograniczeniom określonym w obowiązującym prawie:
Prawo do informacji o tym, jakie dane osobowe zebraliśmy na temat użytkownika, kategorie źródeł, z których zebraliśmy dane osobowe użytkownika, cel biznesowy lub handlowy, dla którego zebraliśmy dane osobowe użytkownika, oraz kategorie stron trzecich, którym ujawniamy dane osobowe użytkownika;
Prawo do usunięcia danych osobowych;
Prawo do poprawienia niedokładnych danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do rezygnacji ze sprzedaży lub udostępniania danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do ograniczenia przetwarzania wrażliwych danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do wolności od bezprawnej dyskryminacji za korzystanie z praw przysługujących na mocy obowiązujących przepisów.
Ułatwimy użytkownikowi korzystanie z przysługujących mu praw zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem, a biorąc pod uwagę rodzaj i wrażliwość danych osobowych będących przedmiotem wniosku, w celu ochrony użytkownika może być konieczne zweryfikowanie jego tożsamości i zażądanie od niego dodatkowych informacji.
Aby skorzystać z któregokolwiek ze swoich praw związanych z danymi osobowymi, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się na stronie
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysłać wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Jeśli użytkownik jest już pracownikiem Honeywell, może skontaktować się z nami pod adresem
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt
W przypadku jakichkolwiek pytań lub skarg dotyczących sposobu przetwarzania danych osobowych lub chęci skorzystania z przysługujących praw, prosimy o kontakt:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(tylko jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell) lub z naszym inspektorem ochrony danych pod adresem
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Można również skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się na stronie
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Atualizado: 1 de janeiro de 2023
O presente Aviso de Privacidade do Candidato ("Aviso de Privacidade") descreve a forma como a Honeywell International, Inc. e as suas
filiais
(coletivamente "
Honeywell
", "
nós
" ou "
nosso
") processam as suas informações pessoais quando se junta à nossa Comunidade de Talentos, procura ou se candidata a um emprego e nos envia informações pessoais através do nosso portal, websites ou outros meios de recrutamento, quer online quer offline (os "Serviços"). Somos os responsáveis pelo tratamento das suas informações pessoais para efeitos das leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis.
Tenha em atenção que, se já for funcionário da Honeywell, também pode consultar a Política Global de Privacidade de Dados da Honeywell e o Aviso de Privacidade do Funcionário, caso exista um para a sua jurisdição. O objetivo do presente Aviso de Privacidade é fornecer-lhe informações mais detalhadas sobre o processamento das suas informações pessoais relativamente à sua candidatura.
Informações pessoais que recolhemos
Para processar a sua candidatura, pedimos-lhe que forneça informações pessoais sobre si, por exemplo, quando se candidata a uma determinada vaga de emprego através do nosso website/portal ou, no caso de já ser funcionário da Honeywell, durante a sua relação laboral. Todas as informações são fornecidas numa base voluntária e o utilizador determina a extensão das informações que fornece à Honeywell.
Tenha em conta que algumas informações podem ser necessárias para completar a avaliação da sua candidatura e que, se não forem fornecidas, a nossa capacidade de o considerar como candidato pode ser limitada.
(i)   Informações pessoais
Podemos recolher as seguintes informações pessoais sobre o utilizador:
Dados pessoais e informações de contacto, incluindo endereço de correio eletrónico, número(s) de telefone e fotografia;
Informações profissionais e educativas relacionadas com a sua ocupação, tais como os seus empregadores actuais ou anteriores, o seu cargo ou outras informações sobre a organização a que está associado. Pode também fornecer o seu CV/currículo e informações sobre as suas qualificações ou formação, tais como os seus diplomas, áreas de estudo, instituições que frequentou, línguas, associações profissionais, certificações, pormenores sobre classificações de gestão do desempenho e remuneração;
Preferências de carreira (por exemplo, objectivos a curto e a longo prazo, vontade de mudar de residência, data disponível para mudar de residência e preferências de localização);
Informações pessoais derivadas da sua participação no nosso processo de recrutamento, como, por exemplo, as obtidas durante as entrevistas, os e-mails que trocamos consigo relativamente à sua candidatura ou as conversas que temos consigo através do nosso Chatbot online.
Informações áudio e visuais, tais como a sua voz e imagem captadas em fotografias, gravações de vídeo ou áudio, se participar numa entrevista por telefone ou vídeo, ou se visitar os nossos escritórios;
Quaisquer outras informações pessoais que o utilizador opte voluntariamente por nos fornecer.
(ii)  Informações pessoais sensíveis
Podemos também recolher categorias especiais de informações pessoais sobre o utilizador (também conhecidas como "categorias especiais de informações pessoais") quando tivermos a obrigação legal de o fazer, ou quando as informações são relevantes para o seu futuro ambiente de trabalho na Honeywell, ou para a futura prestação de benefícios laborais, ou com o seu consentimento explícito, tais como:
Government-issued identification number (such as a social security number);
Demographic information, which may include information about protected classifications, such as your age, gender, race, disabilities, sexual orientation, marital status, or veteran status;
Número de identificação emitido pelo governo (como um número de segurança social);
Informações demográficas, que podem incluir informações sobre classificações protegidas, tais como a sua idade, sexo, raça, incapacidades, orientação sexual, estado civil ou estatuto de veterano;
Informações de saúde (por exemplo, para acomodar qualquer deficiência que o utilizador possa ter ou restrições alimentares);
Informações relativas às opiniões políticas ou crenças religiosas ou à filiação sindical de uma pessoa;
Informações sobre as infracções ou condenações criminais de um indivíduo, bem como quaisquer outras informações consideradas sensíveis ao abrigo das leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. Sempre que permitido por lei e na medida do aplicável, a Honeywell poderá também ter de efetuar verificações de antecedentes e/ou criminais para determinar a sua adequação a um cargo ou oportunidade em aberto na Honeywell.
Não exigimos que o utilizador nos forneça informações pessoais sensíveis, a menos que tal seja necessário para efeitos de cumprimento das nossas obrigações regulamentares (por exemplo, para controlo da igualdade de oportunidades) ou que o utilizador tenha dado o seu consentimento explícito. Exceto na medida em que tal seja exigido por lei, o fornecimento destas informações será totalmente voluntário. A Honeywell está empenhada numa força de trabalho verdadeiramente inclusiva e diversificada. Ao fornecer-nos os seus dados sobre igualdade de oportunidades, permite-nos compreender melhor o perfil dos nossos funcionários em termos de dados sobre igualdade de oportunidades e as medidas que temos de tomar para atrair, promover e manter uma força de trabalho diversificada, independentemente da idade, deficiência, sexo, raça, crenças religiosas ou filosóficas e orientação sexual.
(iii) Informações pessoais que recolhemos automaticamente do utilizador
Podemos recolher automaticamente determinadas informações sobre a sua visita aos nossos sítios Web utilizando "cookies" e outras tecnologias de rastreio semelhantes. Para mais informações sobre os cookies que utilizamos no sítio Web através do qual apresenta a sua candidatura, leia o nosso
Aviso sobre cookies
.
Fontes de informações pessoais
Podemos recolher as suas informações pessoais diretamente junto do utilizador ou indiretamente junto de terceiros que estejam legalmente autorizados a partilhar as suas informações connosco, tais como:
Agências de emprego, prestadores de serviços de verificação de antecedentes/emprego ou de verificação de identidade;
Agências de recrutamento (por exemplo, quando uma agência de recrutamento o identifica como potencial candidato);
Informações publicamente disponíveis sobre si em sítios como o LinkedIn ou o sítio Web do seu atual empregador. O utilizador poderá também optar por nos fornecer acesso a determinadas informações pessoais armazenadas por terceiros (por exemplo, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). Ao autorizar a Honeywell a ter acesso a estas informações, o utilizador concorda que podemos recolher, armazenar e utilizar estas informações de acordo com o presente Aviso de privacidade;
Por referência ou boca a boca (por exemplo, através de uma referência de um funcionário atual ou antigo). No caso de referências, a pessoa que o está a referir será responsável por obter o seu consentimento para nos fornecer as suas informações pessoais.
Finalidades para as quais as informações pessoais são utilizadas
Utilizamos as suas informações pessoais para os seguintes fins:
Para avaliar a sua candidatura e tomar decisões de contratação;
Comunicar com o candidato e informá-lo sobre o recrutamento e/ou a(s) sua(s) candidatura(s) ou quaisquer outras comunicações necessárias;
Cumprir os requisitos legais e regulamentares aplicáveis e para que possamos estabelecer, exercer ou defender uma ação judicial;
Emprego e gestão de empresas (por exemplo, estabelecer um registo de emprego básico se for contratado);
Elaborar relatórios/análises agregados sobre os dados de atividade dos candidatos (por exemplo, tráfego do sítio de carreiras, funil de candidatos, fonte de contratação, sucesso da campanha de recrutamento);
Apenas para funcionários da Honeywell
:
Para o excluir automaticamente de ser sugerido proactivamente para consideração aos recrutadores para uma oportunidade de emprego e não é elegível para consideração de acordo com a sua atual classificação HPD de 9 blocos (que nunca será revelada a ninguém fora da Honeywell). No entanto, poderá sempre candidatar-se diretamente a qualquer oportunidade de emprego disponível e a sua situação específica será considerada por um recrutador.
Apenas se o utilizador for residente nos Estados Unidos
:
Para lhe enviar comunicações por SMS, especificamente:
(i)     1-1 comunicações SMS relacionadas com a sua candidatura a uma determinada vaga de emprego; e/ou
(ii)    mediante o seu consentimento expresso, comunicações de campanhas por SMS sobre oportunidades de emprego, assuntos relacionados com o emprego e actualizações de candidaturas.
Poderá optar por não receber e/ou revogar o seu consentimento para receber as comunicações acima referidas seguindo as instruções dadas no seu perfil.
Se lhe for proposto e aceitar um emprego na Honeywell, as informações recolhidas durante o processo de candidatura e recrutamento passarão a fazer parte do seu registo de emprego.
Processamento automatizado e definição de perfis
Sujeito ao seu consentimento expresso (que fornece voluntariamente quando se junta à nossa Comunidade de Talentos ou quando assinala a caixa de consentimento apropriada durante o processo de candidatura), efectuamos a "definição de perfis" para avaliar a sua adequação a determinadas oportunidades de emprego. Isto implica a utilização de um algoritmo de correspondência capaz de avaliar o seu perfil profissional e prever a sua elegibilidade para uma determinada oportunidade de emprego. Efectuamos este processamento automatizado para os seguintes fins
ajudar os recrutadores a fazer corresponder os perfis dos candidatos às oportunidades de emprego, sugerindo candidatos a considerar para uma oportunidade de emprego específica; e
enviar-lhe recomendações de emprego personalizadas com base no seu perfil e/ou preferências ou outras informações que possam ser do seu interesse, tais como notícias, webinars e eventos da Honeywell.
Tenha em atenção que, com base nesta definição de perfis, poderá não ser considerado para determinadas oportunidades de emprego, a menos que se tenha candidatado diretamente a elas.
Não tomamos decisões de contratação baseadas exclusivamente em processos de decisão automatizados e/ou na definição de perfis. As suas informações pessoais serão objeto de decisões humanas, uma vez que a decisão final de contratação será tomada pelos recrutadores ou pelo gestor de contratação.
As bases legais para o processamento das suas informações pessoais
Determinadas jurisdições exigem que a Honeywell tenha uma base legal para processar as informações pessoais do utilizador. Nos casos em que a lei aplicável exige que justifiquemos as nossas actividades de processamento, a nossa base legal para recolher e utilizar as suas informações pessoais, conforme descrito neste Aviso de Privacidade, dependerá das informações pessoais em questão e do contexto específico em que as recolhemos.
Consentimento.
Em geral, recolheremos normalmente informações pessoais do utilizador quando tivermos o seu consentimento para o fazer e quando necessitarmos das suas informações pessoais para processar a sua candidatura. Ao aceder ao nosso website/portal, aderir à nossa Comunidade de Talentos ou candidatar-se a um dos nossos postos de trabalho, dá o seu consentimento à Honeywell para recolher e processar as informações pessoais acima descritas para os fins descritos no presente Aviso de Privacidade. Pode retirar o seu consentimento em qualquer altura, enviando um pedido através do nosso portal de pedidos do titular dos dados em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou enviando-nos uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Interesses legítimos.
Nos interesses legítimos da Honeywell, nomeadamente o recrutamento, seleção, avaliação e nomeação de novos funcionários e a gestão e administração do recrutamento e do processo de RH, na medida em que os nossos interesses legítimos não sejam sobrepostos pelos seus direitos e liberdades fundamentais.
Obrigações legais.
Conformidade com as obrigações legais da Honeywell quando a legislação laboral ou outras leis exigem o processamento das suas informações pessoais (por exemplo, na medida em que a lei exige a monitorização da igualdade de oportunidades e diversidade).
Interesses vitais.
Também podemos precisar das suas informações pessoais para proteger os seus interesses vitais (por exemplo, razões de saúde e segurança se participar numa entrevista nas nossas instalações)
Se tiver alguma dúvida ou precisar de mais informações sobre a base jurídica em que recolhemos e utilizamos as suas informações pessoais, envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Com quem partilhamos as suas informações pessoais
A Honeywell apenas partilhará as suas informações pessoais com terceiros nas seguintes circunstâncias:
Entidades do grupo Honeywell.
Podemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com outras entidades do grupo localizadas em jurisdições de todo o mundo para avaliar o seu perfil e considerar quaisquer oportunidades de recrutamento a nível do grupo.
Prestadores de serviços
Podemos partilhar especificamente as suas informações pessoais com prestadores de serviços terceiros que executam serviços específicos em nosso nome (por exemplo, prestadores de serviços de recrutamento e subcontratação de pessoal e prestadores de serviços de análise). Esses terceiros podem variar consoante o seu país e mudarão de tempos a tempos, mas podem incluir a Phenom People, Inc., a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. e os respectivos fornecedores terceiros.
Empregados da Honeywell.
Se já é funcionário da Honeywell, tenha em atenção que algumas secções do seu perfil são públicas e, por conseguinte, visíveis para todos os funcionários da Honeywell (especificamente, o seu nome, título, fotografia, competências, áreas de interesse, experiência profissional e habilitações literárias). No entanto, essas secções são editáveis e o utilizador poderá escolher quais as informações sobre si que são apresentadas no seu perfil. Tenha em atenção que os objectivos de carreira, as deslocalizações e o estado do perfil "aberto a novas oportunidades" não serão públicos e, por conseguinte, não serão visíveis para todos os funcionários da Honeywell (apenas para a equipa de talentos da Honeywell).
Outros terceiros.
A Honeywell pode partilhar as suas informações pessoais com qualquer organismo competente de aplicação da lei, regulador, agência governamental, tribunal ou terceiro, sempre que considerar que a divulgação é necessária ao abrigo da lei aplicável ou na convicção de boa-fé de que tal ação é necessária para exercer, estabelecer ou defender os nossos direitos legais ou para proteger os seus interesses vitais ou os de outra pessoa. Também podemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com outros com o seu consentimento ou a seu pedido (por exemplo, um árbitro ou uma associação profissional).
Transferências internacionais de informações pessoais
A Honeywell é uma organização global e as suas informações pessoais podem ser transferidas para, mantidas, armazenadas ou utilizadas em vários locais em todo o mundo, como os EUA e a Índia. Isto significa que, quando recolhemos as suas informações pessoais, estas poderão ser processadas em países que poderão ter leis de proteção de dados diferentes das leis do seu país. No entanto, a Honeywell tomará sempre medidas razoáveis para proteger a sua privacidade e fornecer um nível de proteção das informações pessoais comparável ao do seu país de residência, o que inclui a implementação
das cláusulas contratuais-tipo da Comissão
Europeia
, que podem ser consultadas no website da Comissão em
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retenção
Conservaremos as suas informações pessoais durante o tempo necessário para os fins descritos no presente Aviso de privacidade e de acordo com o Calendário de conservação de registos da Honeywell ou conforme exigido pela legislação aplicável.
Os seus direitos
Dependendo da legislação aplicável, o utilizador pode ter determinados direitos relativamente às suas informações pessoais. Se for residente na Califórnia, consulte a secção "
Informações adicionais para residentes na Califórnia
" abaixo.
O utilizador pode ter o direito de
aceder
,
corrigir
,
atualizar
ou solicitar a
eliminação
das suas informações pessoais;
Pode
opor-se
ao processamento das suas informações pessoais, pedir-nos para
restringir
processar as suas informações pessoais ou solicitar a
portabilidade
das suas informações pessoais;
O utilizador pode ter o direito de não ser objeto de uma decisão baseada exclusivamente no processamento automatizado, incluindo a definição de perfis, se essa decisão produzir efeitos legais sobre o utilizador ou o afetar significativamente.
A Honeywell não toma, no âmbito do seu processo de recrutamento, decisões exclusivamente automatizadas sobre os candidatos.
Do mesmo modo, se tivermos recolhido e processado as suas informações pessoais com o seu consentimento, pode retirar o seu consentimento em qualquer altura. Retirar o seu consentimento não afectará a legalidade de qualquer processamento que tenhamos efectuado antes da sua retirada, nem afectará o processamento das suas informações pessoais efectuado com base em fundamentos de processamento legais que não o consentimento; e
O utilizador tem o direito de apresentar queixa a uma autoridade de proteção de dados sobre a nossa recolha e utilização das suas informações pessoais.
Facilitaremos o exercício dos direitos que se aplicam ao utilizador de acordo com a legislação aplicável. Para exercer qualquer um dos seus direitos relacionados com as suas informações pessoais, contacte-nos através da Ajuda RH, ou do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados que se encontra na declaração
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informações adicionais para residentes na Califórnia
Se o utilizador residir no Estado da Califórnia, esta secção complementa o Aviso de privacidade do requerente da Honeywell.
(i)     Categorias de informações pessoais recolhidas e divulgadas
A Honeywell recolheu e divulgou as seguintes categorias de informações pessoais para fins comerciais nos últimos doze meses:
Previous column
Next column
Categorias
Recolhemos
A.
Identificadores como o nome, a data de nascimento, o sexo, o endereço de correio eletrónico, os números de telefone, o endereço postal, os identificadores em linha, a conta nas redes sociais e outros identificadores.
Sim
C.
Características de classificações protegidas ao abrigo da legislação da Califórnia ou federal, tais como raça, etnia, crenças religiosas ou filosóficas, filiação sindical, dados de saúde, informações biométricas, dados genéticos, deficiência, estatuto de veterano, orientação sexual, correio pessoal, correio eletrónico e mensagens de texto (exceto se a Honeywell for o destinatário pretendido), identificadores governamentais (por exemplo, número da segurança social), carta de condução, passaporte, informações financeiras e bancárias.
Sim
F.
Informações sobre actividades na Internet ou noutras redes electrónicas, tais como histórico de navegação, interacções com websites da Honeywell, serviços de correio eletrónico e de mensagens de texto.
Sim
G.
Dados de geolocalização, como a localização do dispositivo e a localização do IP.
Sim
H.
Informações áudio, electrónicas, visuais, térmicas ou similares, como a sua voz e imagem, gravações de vídeo ou áudio, se participar numa entrevista por telefone ou vídeo ou se visitar os nossos escritórios.
Sim
I.
Informações profissionais ou relacionadas com o emprego, tais como a sua ocupação, empregadores actuais ou anteriores, cargo, historial escolar, qualificações académicas e profissionais, currículo, historial de emprego, referências de contratação, notas e avaliações de entrevistas, línguas, associações profissionais, certificações, classificações de gestão de desempenho, remuneração, preferências de localização e preferências de viagem.
Sim
K.
Inferências tiradas de qualquer uma das informações pessoais listadas acima para criar um perfil ou resumo sobre, por exemplo, as preferências e características de um indivíduo.
Sim
Load More
(ii)      Os seus direitos
O utilizador tem o direito de nos enviar um pedido dos seguintes direitos, abrangendo o período de doze meses anterior ao seu pedido. Note-se que estes direitos não são absolutos e, em certos casos, estão sujeitos a limitações, conforme especificado na legislação aplicável:
O direito de saber quais as informações pessoais que recolhemos sobre si, as categorias de fontes a partir das quais recolhemos as suas informações pessoais; a finalidade empresarial ou comercial para a qual recolhemos as suas informações pessoais e as categorias de terceiros com os quais divulgamos as suas informações pessoais;
O direito de apagar as suas informações pessoais;
O direito de corrigir informações pessoais inexactas sobre si;
O direito de recusar a venda ou a partilha das suas informações pessoais;
O direito de limitar o tratamento das suas informações pessoais sensíveis;
O direito de não ser objeto de discriminação ilegal por exercer os seus direitos ao abrigo da legislação aplicável.
Facilitaremos o exercício dos direitos que lhe são aplicáveis em conformidade com a legislação aplicável e, tendo em conta o tipo e a sensibilidade das informações pessoais objeto do pedido, para sua proteção, poderemos ter de solicitar a verificação da sua identidade e pedir-lhe informações adicionais.
Para exercer qualquer um dos seus direitos relacionados com as suas informações pessoais, contacte-nos através do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados disponível em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Se já for funcionário da Honeywell, pode contactar-nos através do endereço
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contactar-nos
Se tiver alguma questão ou reclamação sobre a forma como as suas informações pessoais são processadas ou se pretender exercer os seus direitos, contacte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(apenas se já for funcionário da Honeywell) ou o nosso responsável pela proteção de dados em
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Também pode contactar-nos através do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados disponível em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Actualizat: 1 ianuarie 2023
Această Notificare privind confidențialitatea solicitanților ("Notificare privind confidențialitatea") descrie modul în care Honeywell International, Inc. și
afiliații
săi (colectiv "
Honeywell
", "
noi
" sau "
noi
") prelucrează informațiile dumneavoastră personale atunci când vă alăturați comunității noastre de talente, căutați sau aplicați pentru un loc de muncă și ne trimiteți informații personale prin intermediul portalului nostru, al site-urilor web sau al altor mijloace de recrutare, fie online sau offline (denumite "
Servicii
"). Noi suntem controlorii informațiilor dvs. personale în sensul legilor aplicabile privind protecția datelor.
Vă rugăm să rețineți că, dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell, puteți consulta, de asemenea, Politica globală de confidențialitate a datelor Honeywell și Notificarea privind confidențialitatea angajaților, dacă există una pentru jurisdicția dumneavoastră. Scopul acestei Notificări privind confidențialitatea este de a vă oferi informații mai detaliate despre prelucrarea de către noi a informațiilor dvs. personale în legătură cu candidatura dvs.
Informații personale pe care le colectăm
Pentru a vă procesa cererea, vă solicităm să furnizați informații personale despre dumneavoastră, de exemplu atunci când aplicați pentru un anumit post vacant prin intermediul site-ului/portalului nostru web sau, în cazul în care sunteți deja angajat Honeywell, în timpul relației de muncă. Toate informațiile sunt furnizate în mod voluntar și dumneavoastră stabiliți măsura în care informațiile pe care le furnizați către Honeywell.
Vă rugăm să aveți în vedere că anumite informații pot fi necesare pentru a finaliza evaluarea cererii dumneavoastră și, dacă nu le furnizați, capacitatea noastră de a vă lua în considerare ca și candidat poate fi limitată.
(i)   Informații personale
Este posibil să colectăm următoarele informații personale despre dumneavoastră:
Detalii personale și informații de contact, inclusiv adresa de e-mail, numărul (numerele) de telefon și o fotografie;
Informații profesionale și educaționale legate de ocupația dvs., cum ar fi angajatorii actuali sau anteriori, titlul postului dvs. sau alte informații despre organizația la care sunteți afiliat. De asemenea, puteți furniza CV-ul/curriculum vitae și informații despre calificările sau educația dumneavoastră, cum ar fi diplomele, domeniile de studiu, instituțiile pe care le-ați frecventat, limbile străine, afilieri profesionale, certificări, detalii despre evaluările de management al performanței și remunerare;
Preferințele în materie de carieră (de exemplu, obiectivele pe termen scurt și lung, disponibilitatea de a se reloca, data la care este disponibil să se relocheze și preferințele privind locația);
Informații personale derivate din participarea dvs. la procesul nostru de recrutare, cum ar fi, de exemplu, cele obținute în timpul interviurilor, e-mailurile pe care le schimbăm cu dvs. cu privire la candidatura dvs. sau conversațiile pe care le avem cu dvs. prin intermediul Chatbot-ului nostru online.
Informații audio și vizuale, cum ar fi vocea și înfățișarea dvs., așa cum sunt ele surprinse în fotografii, înregistrări video sau audio, dacă participați la un interviu telefonic sau video sau dacă vizitați birourile noastre;
Orice alte informații personale pe care alegeți în mod voluntar să ni le furnizați.
(ii)  Informații personale sensibile
De asemenea, este posibil să colectăm categorii speciale de informații cu caracter personal despre dvs. (cunoscute și sub denumirea de "categorii speciale de informații cu caracter personal") în cazul în care avem o obligație legală de a face acest lucru, sau în cazul în care informațiile sunt relevante pentru viitorul dvs. mediu de lucru la Honeywell sau pentru furnizarea viitoare a beneficiilor de angajare, sau cu consimțământul dvs. explicit, cum ar fi:
Numărul de identificare emis de guvern (cum ar fi un număr de securitate socială);
Informații demografice, care pot include informații despre clasificări protejate, cum ar fi vârsta, sexul, rasa, dizabilitățile, orientarea sexuală, starea civilă sau statutul de veteran;
Informații despre sănătate (de exemplu, pentru a vă adapta la orice handicap pe care îl aveți sau la restricții alimentare);
Informații referitoare la opiniile politice, convingerile religioase sau apartenența sindicală a unei persoane;
Informații despre infracțiunile sau condamnările penale ale unei persoane, precum și orice alte informații considerate sensibile în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă privind protecția datelor. În cazul în care legea permite acest lucru și în măsura în care este aplicabil, este posibil ca Honeywell să fie nevoită, de asemenea, să efectueze verificări ale antecedentelor și/sau ale cazierului judiciar pentru a stabili dacă sunteți potrivit pentru un post sau o oportunitate deschisă la Honeywell.
Nu vă solicităm să ne furnizați informații personale sensibile decât dacă acest lucru este necesar în scopul îndeplinirii obligațiilor noastre de reglementare (de exemplu, pentru monitorizarea egalității de șanse) sau dacă nu v-ați dat consimțământul explicit. Cu excepția cazului în care legea o cere, furnizarea acestor informații va fi în întregime voluntară. Honeywell se angajează să aibă o forță de muncă cu adevărat incluzivă și diversă. Furnizându-ne datele dvs. privind egalitatea de șanse, ne permiteți să înțelegem mai bine profilul nostru de angajați în ceea ce privește datele privind egalitatea de șanse și măsurile pe care trebuie să le luăm pentru a atrage, promova și păstra o forță de muncă diversă, indiferent de vârstă, handicap, sex, rasă, convingeri religioase sau filozofice și orientare sexuală.
(iii) Informații personale pe care le colectăm automat de la dumneavoastră
Este posibil să colectăm în mod automat anumite informații despre vizita dvs. pe site-urile noastre web folosind "cookie-uri" și alte tehnologii de urmărire similare. Pentru mai multe informații despre modulele cookie pe care le folosim pe site-ul web prin intermediul căruia vă depuneți candidatura, vă rugăm să citiți
Notificarea
noastră privind modulele
cookie
.
Surse de informații personale
Este posibil să colectăm informațiile dvs. personale direct de la dvs. sau indirect de la terțe părți care au dreptul legal de a ne comunica informațiile dvs., cum ar fi:
Agențiile de ocupare a forței de muncă, furnizorii de servicii de verificare a antecedentelor/verificare a angajării sau de verificare a identității;
Agențiile de recrutare (de exemplu, atunci când o agenție de recrutare vă identifică ca potențial candidat);
Informații publice disponibile despre dvs. de pe site-uri precum LinkedIn sau de pe site-ul angajatorului dvs. actual. De asemenea, puteți alege să ne oferiți acces la anumite informații personale stocate de terțe părți (de exemplu, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google sau Facebook). Autorizând Honeywell să aibă acces la aceste informații, sunteți de acord ca noi să colectăm, să stocăm și să utilizăm aceste informații în conformitate cu această Notificare de confidențialitate;
Prin referințe sau din gură în gură (de exemplu, printr-o recomandare din partea unui angajat actual sau fost). În cazul recomandărilor, persoana care vă recomandă va fi responsabilă pentru obținerea consimțământului dumneavoastră de a ne furniza informațiile dumneavoastră personale.
Scopurile pentru care sunt utilizate informațiile personale
Utilizăm informațiile dvs. personale în următoarele scopuri:
Pentru a vă evalua cererea și a lua decizii de angajare;
să comunice cu dumneavoastră și să vă informeze cu privire la recrutare și/sau la candidatura (candidaturile) dumneavoastră sau orice alte comunicări necesare;
Respectarea cerințelor legale și de reglementare aplicabile și pentru a ne permite să stabilim, să exercităm sau să ne apărăm un drept legal;
Angajarea și gestionarea corporației (de exemplu, întocmirea unui dosar de angajare de bază în cazul în care sunteți angajat);
Pentru a realiza rapoarte / analize agregate privind datele de activitate ale candidaților (de exemplu, traficul pe site-ul de carieră, pâlnia de candidați, sursa de angajare, succesul campaniei de recrutare);
Vypracovanie súhrnných správ/analýz týkajúcich sa údajov o činnosti kandidátov (napr. návštevnosť kariérnej stránky, lievik kandidátov, zdroj náboru, úspešnosť náborových kampaní);
Numai pentru angajații Honeywell:
Pentru a vă exclude în mod automat de la a fi sugerat în mod proactiv pentru a fi luat în considerare de recrutori pentru o oportunitate de angajare și nu sunteți eligibil pentru a fi luat în considerare conform ratingului dvs. actual de 9 blocuri HPD (care nu va fi dezvăluit niciodată nimănui din afara Honeywell). Cu toate acestea, veți putea întotdeauna să aplicați direct pentru orice oportunitate de angajare disponibilă, iar situația dvs. specifică va fi luată în considerare de un recrutor.
Numai dacă sunteți rezident al Statelor Unite
:
Pentru a vă trimite comunicări prin SMS, în special:
(i)     1-1 comunicări prin SMS în legătură cu candidatura dvs. la un anumit loc de muncă vacant; și/sau
(ii)    sub rezerva consimțământului dvs. expres, comunicări prin SMS privind oportunitățile de angajare, afacerile legate de locuri de muncă și actualizări ale aplicațiilor.
Veți putea să renunțați și/sau să vă retrageți consimțământul pentru primirea comunicărilor menționate mai sus, urmând instrucțiunile din profilul dumneavoastră.
În cazul în care vi se oferă și acceptați un loc de muncă la Honeywell, informațiile colectate în timpul procesului de cerere și de recrutare vor face parte din dosarul dumneavoastră de angajare.
Prelucrarea și profilarea automată
Sub rezerva consimțământului dvs. expres (pe care îl oferiți în mod voluntar atunci când vă alăturați comunității noastre de talente sau atunci când bifați căsuța de consimțământ corespunzătoare în timpul procesului de depunere a candidaturii), realizăm "crearea de profiluri" pentru a vă evalua aptitudinea pentru anumite oportunități de angajare. Acest lucru implică utilizarea unui algoritm de potrivire care este capabil să evalueze profilul dvs. de angajare și să prezică eligibilitatea dvs. pentru o anumită oportunitate de angajare. Efectuăm această prelucrare automată în scopul:
ajutând recrutorii să coreleze profilurile candidaților cu oportunitățile de angajare, sugerând candidați care să fie luați în considerare pentru o anumită oportunitate de angajare; și
trimiterea de recomandări de locuri de muncă personalizate pe baza profilului și/sau preferințelor dumneavoastră sau a altor informații care vă pot interesa, cum ar fi știri, seminarii web și evenimente Honeywell.
Vă rugăm să rețineți că, pe baza acestei profilări, este posibil să nu fiți luat în considerare pentru anumite oportunități de angajare decât dacă ați aplicat direct pentru acestea.
Nu luăm decizii de angajare bazate exclusiv pe procese decizionale automatizate și/sau pe crearea de profiluri. Informațiile dvs. personale vor fi supuse unor decizii luate de oameni, deoarece decizia finală de angajare va fi luată de recrutori sau de managerul de angajare.
Bazele legale pentru prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale
Anumite jurisdicții cer ca Honeywell să aibă un temei legal pentru prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale. În cazul în care legislația aplicabilă ne cere să ne justificăm activitățile de prelucrare, temeiul nostru juridic pentru colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor dvs. personale, așa cum este descris în această Notificare de confidențialitate, va depinde de informațiile personale în cauză și de contextul specific în care le colectăm.
Consimțământ.
În general, în mod normal, vom colecta informații personale de la dvs. atunci când avem consimțământul dvs. în acest sens și când avem nevoie de informațiile dvs. personale pentru a vă procesa cererea. Prin accesarea site-ului/portalului nostru web, prin aderarea la Comunitatea noastră de talente sau prin depunerea unei candidaturi pentru unul dintre posturile noastre de muncă, vă dați consimțământul ca Honeywell să colecteze și să prelucreze în continuare informațiile personale descrise mai sus în scopurile descrise în această Notificare de confidențialitate. Vă puteți retrage consimțământul în orice moment prin depunerea unei cereri prin intermediul portalului nostru de solicitare a persoanelor vizate, la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau trimițându-ne un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Interesele legitime.
În interesul legitim al Honeywell, și anume recrutarea, selecția, evaluarea și numirea de noi angajați, precum și gestionarea și administrarea procesului de recrutare și de resurse umane, în măsura în care interesele noastre legitime nu sunt anulate de drepturile și libertățile dumneavoastră fundamentale.
Obligațiile legale.
Respectarea obligațiilor legale ale Honeywell în cazul în care legislația privind ocuparea forței de muncă sau alte legi impun prelucrarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale (de exemplu, în măsura în care legea impune monitorizarea egalității de șanse și a diversității).
Interese vitale. De
asemenea, este posibil să avem nevoie de informațiile dvs. personale pentru a vă proteja interesele vitale (de exemplu, din motive de sănătate și siguranță dacă participați la un interviu la sediul nostru).
Dacă aveți întrebări sau aveți nevoie de informații suplimentare cu privire la temeiul juridic pe baza căruia colectăm și utilizăm informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne trimiteți un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Cu cine împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale
Honeywell va partaja informațiile dvs. personale cu terțe părți numai în următoarele circumstanțe:
Entitățile grupului Honeywell.
Este posibil să împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale cu alte entități ale grupului situate în jurisdicții din întreaga lume pentru a vă evalua profilul și pentru a vă lua în considerare pentru orice oportunități de recrutare la nivel de grup.
Furnizori de servicii Este
posibil să împărtășim în mod specific informațiile dvs. personale cu furnizori de servicii terți care prestează servicii specifice în numele nostru (de exemplu, furnizori de personal de recrutare și externalizare și furnizori de servicii de analiză). Aceste terțe părți pot varia în funcție de țara dvs. și se vor schimba din când în când, dar pot include Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. și furnizorii lor terți respectivi.
Angajații Honeywell.
Dacă sunteți deja un angajat Honeywell, vă rugăm să rețineți că  unele secțiuni din profilul dumneavoastră sunt publice și, prin urmare, vizibile pentru toți angajații Honeywell (în special, numele, titlul, fotografia, competențele, domeniile de interes, experiența profesională și educația). Cu toate acestea, aceste secțiuni sunt editabile și veți putea alege ce informații despre dvs. sunt afișate în profilul dvs. Vă rugăm să rețineți că obiectivele profesionale, relocările și statutul profilului "deschis pentru noi oportunități" nu vor fi publice și, prin urmare, nu vor fi vizibile pentru toți angajații Honeywell (doar pentru echipa de talente a Honeywell).
Alte părți terțe.
Honeywell poate împărtăși informațiile dvs. personale cu orice organism competent de aplicare a legii, autoritate de reglementare, agenție guvernamentală, instanță sau terță parte, în cazul în care considerăm că dezvăluirea este necesară în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă sau în cazul în care credem cu bună credință că o astfel de acțiune este necesară pentru a ne exercita, stabili sau apăra drepturile legale sau pentru a vă proteja interesele vitale sau pe cele ale unei alte persoane. De asemenea, este posibil să împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale cu alte persoane cu consimțământul dvs. sau la indicațiile dvs. (de exemplu, un arbitru sau o asociație profesională).
Transferurile internaționale de informații personale
Honeywell este o organizație globală, iar informațiile dvs. personale pot fi transferate, păstrate, stocate sau utilizate în diverse locații din întreaga lume, cum ar fi SUA și India. Acest lucru înseamnă că, atunci când colectăm informațiile dvs. personale, acestea pot fi procesate în țări care pot avea legi privind protecția datelor diferite de legile din țara dvs. Cu toate acestea, Honeywell va lua întotdeauna măsuri rezonabile pentru a vă proteja confidențialitatea și pentru a oferi un nivel de protecție a informațiilor personale comparabil cu cel din țara dumneavoastră de reședință, printre care se numără punerea în aplicare a
clauzelor contractuale standard
ale Comisiei
Europene
, care pot fi găsite pe site-ul web al Comisiei la adresa
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retenție
Vom păstra informațiile dvs. personale atât timp cât este necesar în legătură cu scopurile descrise în această Notificare de confidențialitate și în conformitate cu Programul de păstrare a înregistrărilor Honeywell sau în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă.
Drepturile dumneavoastră
În funcție de legislația aplicabilă, este posibil să aveți anumite drepturi în ceea ce privește informațiile dumneavoastră personale. Dacă sunteți rezident californian, vă rugăm să consultați "
Informații suplimentare pentru rezidenții din California
" de mai jos.
Puteți avea dreptul de a
accesa
,
corecta
,
actualiza
sau solicita
ștergerea
informațiilor dumneavoastră personale;
Puteți să vă opuneți prelucrării informațiilor dvs. personale, să ne cereți să
restricționăm
prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale sau să solicitați
portabilitatea
informațiilor dvs. personale;
Este posibil să aveți dreptul de a refuza să se ia o decizie în ceea ce vă privește care se bazează exclusiv pe prelucrarea automatizată, inclusiv crearea de profiluri, în cazul în care decizia respectivă produce efecte juridice în ceea ce vă privește sau vă afectează în mod semnificativ.
Honeywell nu ia, în cadrul procesului de recrutare, decizii exclusiv automatizate cu privire la candidați.
În mod similar, în cazul în care am colectat și prelucrat informațiile dvs. personale cu consimțământul dvs., atunci vă puteți retrage consimțământul în orice moment. Retragerea consimțământului dvs. nu va afecta legalitatea prelucrării pe care am efectuat-o înainte de retragerea dvs. și nici nu va afecta prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. cu caracter personal efectuată în baza unor motive de prelucrare legale, altele decât consimțământul; și
Aveți dreptul de a depune o plângere la o autoritate de protecție a datelor cu privire la colectarea și utilizarea de către noi a informațiilor dumneavoastră personale.
Vă vom facilita exercitarea drepturilor care vi se aplică în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă. Pentru a vă exercita oricare dintre drepturile referitoare la informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne contactați prin intermediul Serviciului de asistență pentru resurse umane sau prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a persoanei vizate, care se găsește la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau să trimiteți un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informații suplimentare pentru rezidenții din California
Dacă sunteți rezident al statului California, această secțiune completează Notificarea privind confidențialitatea solicitantului Honeywell.
(i)     Categorii de informații personale colectate și divulgate
Honeywell a colectat și dezvăluit următoarele categorii de informații personale în scop comercial în ultimele douăsprezece luni:
Previous column
Next column
Categorii
Noi colectăm
A.
Identificatori, cum ar fi numele, data nașterii, sexul, adresa de e-mail, numerele de telefon, adresa poștală, identificatorii online, contul de social media și alți identificatori.
Da
C.
Caracteristici ale clasificărilor protejate în conformitate cu legislația californiană sau federală, cum ar fi rasa, etnia, convingerile religioase sau filozofice, apartenența la un sindicat, datele de sănătate, informațiile biometrice, datele genetice, handicapul, statutul de veteran, orientarea sexuală, corespondența personală, e-mailurile și mesajele text (cu excepția cazului în care Honeywell este destinatarul), identificatorii guvernamentali (de exemplu, numărul de securitate socială), permisul de conducere, pașaportul, informațiile financiare și bancare.
Da
F.
Informații privind activitatea pe internet sau în alte rețele electronice, cum ar fi istoricul de navigare, interacțiunile cu site-urile Honeywell, serviciile de e-mail și de mesagerie text.
Da
G.
date de geolocalizare, cum ar fi locația dispozitivului și locația IP.
Da
H.
Informații audio, electronice, vizuale, termice sau similare, cum ar fi vocea și imaginea dvs., înregistrări video sau audio, dacă participați la un interviu telefonic sau video sau dacă vizitați birourile noastre.
Da
I.
Informații profesionale sau legate de locul de muncă, cum ar fi ocupația dumneavoastră, angajatorii actuali sau anteriori, titlul postului, istoricul educațional, calificările academice și profesionale, CV-ul, istoricul postului, referințele de angajare, notele și evaluările de la interviuri, limbile străine, apartenența profesională, certificările, evaluările de management al performanței, remunerarea, preferințele privind locația și preferințele de călătorie.
Da
K.
Deduceri trase din oricare dintre informațiile personale enumerate mai sus pentru a crea un profil sau un rezumat despre, de exemplu, preferințele și caracteristicile unei persoane.
Da
Load More
(ii)      Drepturile dumneavoastră
Aveți dreptul de a ne trimite o cerere pentru următoarele drepturi, care acoperă perioada de douăsprezece luni care precede cererea dumneavoastră. Vă rugăm să rețineți că aceste drepturi nu sunt absolute și, în anumite cazuri, sunt supuse unor limitări, așa cum se specifică în legislația aplicabilă:
Dreptul de a ști ce informații personale am colectat despre dumneavoastră, categoriile de surse din care am colectat informațiile personale; scopul comercial sau de afaceri pentru care am colectat informațiile personale și categoriile de terți cărora le dezvăluim informațiile personale;
Dreptul de a șterge informațiile dumneavoastră personale;
Dreptul de a corecta informațiile personale inexacte care vă privesc;
Dreptul de a renunța la vânzarea sau partajarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale;
Dreptul de a limita prelucrarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale sensibile;
Dreptul de a nu fi discriminat în mod ilegal pentru exercitarea drepturilor dumneavoastră în temeiul legilor aplicabile.
Vă vom facilita exercitarea drepturilor care vi se aplică în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă și, având în vedere tipul și caracterul sensibil al informațiilor personale care fac obiectul cererii, pentru protecția dumneavoastră, este posibil să fie necesar să vă solicităm verificarea identității dumneavoastră și să vă cerem informații suplimentare.
Pentru a vă exercita oricare dintre drepturile dvs. referitoare la informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne contactați prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a datelor care se găsește la
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau să trimiteți un e-mail la HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com. Dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell, ne puteți contacta la adresa HRhelp@honeywell.com.
Contactați-ne
Dacă aveți întrebări sau plângeri cu privire la modul în care sunt prelucrate informațiile dvs. personale sau dacă doriți să vă exercitați drepturile, vă rugăm să contactați:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(numai dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell) sau responsabilul nostru cu protecția datelor la
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. De asemenea, ne puteți contacta prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a persoanei vizate care se găsește la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Обновлено: 1 января 2023 г.
Настоящее Уведомление о конфиденциальности информации о соискателях (далее - "Уведомление о конфиденциальности") описывает, как компания Honeywell International, Inc. и ее
аффилированные лица
(далее - "
Honeywell
", "
мы
" или "
мы
") обрабатывают Вашу личную информацию, когда Вы присоединяетесь к нашему сообществу талантов, ищете или подаете заявку на работу и предоставляете нам личную информацию через наш портал, веб-сайты или другие средства найма, как онлайн, так и офлайн ("
Услуги
"). Мы являемся контролерами вашей личной информации в соответствии с действующим законодательством о защите данных.
Обратите внимание, что если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, вы также можете обратиться к Глобальной политике конфиденциальности данных Honeywell и Уведомлению о конфиденциальности сотрудников, если таковое существует в вашей юрисдикции. Цель данного Уведомления о конфиденциальности - предоставить вам более подробную информацию о том, как мы обрабатываем вашу личную информацию в связи с вашим заявлением.
Собираемая нами персональная информация
Чтобы обработать Вашу заявку, мы просим Вас предоставить личную информацию о себе, например, когда Вы подаете заявку на конкретную вакансию через наш сайт/портал или, если Вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, в ходе трудовых отношений. Вся информация предоставляется на добровольной основе, и вы сами определяете объем информации, которую вы предоставляете компании Honeywell.
Пожалуйста, имейте в виду, что некоторая информация может потребоваться для завершения оценки вашей заявки, и если она не будет предоставлена, наша возможность рассматривать вас в качестве кандидата может быть ограничена.
(i)   Персональная информация
Мы можем собирать о вас следующую личную информацию:
Личные данные и контактная информация, включая адрес электронной почты, номер (номера) телефона и фотографию;
Профессиональная и образовательная информация, связанная с Вашей профессиональной деятельностью, например, Ваши нынешние или предыдущие работодатели, Ваша должность или другая информация об организации, с которой Вы связаны. Вы также можете предоставить свое резюме/резюме и информацию о своей квалификации или образовании, например, об ученых степенях, специальностях, учебных заведениях, языках, профессиональных членствах, сертификатах, сведения об оценках по результатам работы и вознаграждении;
Карьерные предпочтения (например, краткосрочные и долгосрочные цели, готовность к переезду, дата, когда можно переехать, и предпочтения по месту работы);
Личные данные, полученные в результате вашего участия в нашем процессе найма, например, полученные в ходе собеседований, электронных писем, которыми мы обмениваемся с вами по поводу вашей заявки, или разговоров, которые мы ведем с вами через наш онлайн-чатбот.
Аудио- и визуальная информация, например, ваш голос и ваше изображение, запечатленное на фотографиях, видео- или аудиозаписях, если вы участвуете в телефонном или видеоинтервью или посещаете наши офисы;
Любая другая личная информация, которую вы добровольно решили предоставить нам.
(ii)  Чувствительная личная информация
Мы также можем собирать о вас персональные данные особых категорий (также известные как "специальные категории персональной информации"), если у нас есть юридическое обязательство делать это, или к будущему предоставлению льгот при трудоустройстве, или с вашего явного согласия, например:
Идентификационный номер, выданный государством (например, номер социального страхования);
Демографическая информация, которая может включать сведения о защищаемых классификациях, таких как ваш возраст, пол, раса, инвалидность, сексуальная ориентация, семейное положение или статус ветерана;
Информация о здоровье (например, для учета имеющихся у вас ограничений по здоровью или диетических ограничений);
Информация, касающаяся политических взглядов, религиозных убеждений или членства в профсоюзе;
Информация об уголовных преступлениях или судимостях, а также любая другая информация, считающаяся конфиденциальной в соответствии с действующим законодательством о защите данных. Если это разрешено законом и в соответствующих пределах, Honeywell может также потребоваться проведение проверки биографических данных и/или уголовных преступлений для определения вашего соответствия открытой должности или возможности работы в Honeywell.
Мы не требуем от вас предоставления конфиденциальной личной информации, за исключением случаев, когда это необходимо для выполнения наших нормативных обязательств (например, для контроля равных возможностей), или если вы не предоставили своего явного согласия. За исключением случаев, когда это требуется по закону, предоставление такой информации будет полностью добровольным. Компания Honeywell стремится к тому, чтобы персонал был действительно инклюзивным и разнообразным. Предоставляя нам свои данные о равных возможностях, вы позволяете нам лучше понять профиль наших сотрудников с точки зрения данных о равных возможностях и действия, которые нам необходимо предпринять для привлечения, продвижения и удержания разнообразного персонала, независимо от возраста, инвалидности, пола, расы, религиозных или философских убеждений и сексуальной.
(iii) Личная информация, которую мы получаем от вас автоматически
Мы можем автоматически собирать определенную информацию о посещении вами наших сайтов с помощью "cookies" и других подобных технологий отслеживания. Для получения дополнительной информации о файлах cookie, используемых нами на сайте, через который вы подаете заявку, ознакомьтесь с нашим
Уведомлением о файлах cookie
.
Источники персональной информации
Мы можем получать вашу личную информацию непосредственно от вас или косвенно от третьих лиц, которые имеют законное право передавать нам вашу информацию, например:
Агентства по трудоустройству, поставщики услуг по проверке биографических данных/рабочих мест или проверке личности;
Агентства по подбору персонала (например, когда агентство по подбору персонала идентифицирует Вас как потенциального кандидата);
Общедоступная информация о вас с таких сайтов, как LinkedIn или сайт вашего нынешнего работодателя. Вы также можете предоставить нам доступ к определенной личной информации, хранящейся у третьих лиц (например, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google или Facebook). Разрешая компании Honeywell доступ к этой информации, вы соглашаетесь с тем, что мы можем собирать, хранить и использовать эту информацию в соответствии с настоящим Уведомлением о конфиденциальности;
по рекомендации или из уст в уста (например, по рекомендации нынешнего или бывшего сотрудника). В случае рекомендации лицо, которое вас направляет, будет нести ответственность за получение вашего согласия на предоставление нам вашей личной информации.
Цели использования персональной информации
Мы используем вашу личную информацию для следующих целей:
Для оценки вашего заявления и принятия решения о приеме на работу;
Общаться с Вами и информировать Вас о наборе и/или Вашей заявке (заявках), а также о любых других необходимых сообщениях;
Выполнять применимые законодательные и нормативные требования, а также для того, чтобы мы могли установить, реализовать или защитить правовые претензии;
Трудоустройство и корпоративное управление (например, завести основную трудовую книжку при приеме на работу);
Для составления агрегированных отчетов/анализа данных о деятельности кандидатов (например, посещаемость сайта, воронка кандидатов, источник найма, успешность рекрутинговой кампании);
Только для сотрудников Honeywell
:
Чтобы автоматически исключить возможность того, что вы будете предложены рекрутерам для рассмотрения в качестве кандидата на вакансию и не будете допущены к рассмотрению в соответствии с вашим текущим рейтингом HPD 9-block (который никогда не будет раскрыт никому за пределами Honeywell). Тем не менее, вы всегда сможете напрямую подать заявку на любую имеющуюся вакансию, и ваша конкретная ситуация будет рассмотрена рекрутером.
Только в том случае, если вы являетесь резидентом США
:
Для отправки Вам сообщений через SMS, в частности:
(i)     1-1 SMS-сообщения в связи с Вашей заявкой на конкретную вакансию; и/или
(ii)    при наличии Вашего прямого согласия
-
SMS-рассылки о возможностях трудоустройства, вакансиях и обновлениях анкет.
Вы сможете отказаться и/или отозвать свое согласие на получение вышеуказанных сообщений, следуя инструкциям, указанным в Вашем профиле.
Если вам будет предложено и вы согласитесь на работу в компании Honeywell, информация, полученная в процессе подачи заявления и найма, станет частью вашей трудовой книжки.
Автоматизированная обработка и профилирование
С вашего явного согласия (которое вы добровольно предоставляете, присоединяясь к нашему сообществу талантов или отмечая соответствующее поле согласия в процессе подачи заявки) мы проводим "профилирование" для оценки вашей пригодности для конкретных вакансий. Для этого используется алгоритм, способный оценить ваш профиль занятости и предсказать ваше соответствие конкретной вакансии. Мы осуществляем такую автоматизированную обработку в следующих целях:
помощь рекрутерам в сопоставлении профилей кандидатов с вакансиями, предлагая кандидатов для рассмотрения на конкретную вакансию; и
отправка Вам персонализированных рекомендаций по работе на основе Вашего профиля и/или предпочтений, а также другой информации, которая может представлять для Вас интерес, например, новостей, вебинаров и мероприятий Honeywell.
Обратите внимание, что на основании такого профилирования вы можете быть не рассмотрены на определенные вакансии, если вы не подали на них прямое заявление.
Мы не принимаем решений о приеме на работу, основываясь исключительно на автоматизированных процессах принятия решений и/или профилировании. Ваши персональные данные будут подвергаться обработке человеком, поскольку окончательное решение о приеме на работу будет приниматься рекрутером или менеджером по подбору персонала.
Правовые основания для обработки вашей персональной информации
В некоторых юрисдикциях компания Honeywell должна иметь юридическое основание для обработки вашей личной информации. Если действующее законодательство требует от нас обоснования действий по обработке, то наше правовое основание для сбора и использования Вашей личной информации, как описано в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности, будет зависеть от конкретной личной информации и контекста, в котором мы ее собираем.
Согласие.
Как правило, мы собираем личную информацию о Вас, если имеем на это Ваше согласие и если Ваша личная информация необходима нам для обработки Вашего заявления. Посещая наш сайт/портал, присоединяясь к нашему сообществу талантов или подавая заявку на одну из наших вакансий, вы даете свое согласие компании Honeywell на сбор и дальнейшую обработку вышеуказанной личной информации в целях, описанных в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности. Вы можете в любое время
отозвать свое согласие,
направив запрос через наш портал запросов субъектов данных по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
или отправив нам электронное письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Законные интересы.
В законных интересах компании Honeywell, а именно в связи с наймом, отбором, оценкой и назначением новых сотрудников, а также в связи с управлением и администрированием процесса найма и работы с персоналом в той мере, в какой наши законные интересы не противоречат вашим основным правам и свободам.
Юридические обязательства.
Выполнение юридических обязательств компании Honeywell, когда трудовое законодательство или другие законы требуют обработки вашей личной информации (например, в той мере, в какой закон требует отслеживания равенства возможностей и разнообразия).
VЖизненно важные интересы.
Ваша личная информация может понадобиться нам для защиты ваших жизненно важных интересов (например, по соображениям охраны здоровья и безопасности, если вы проходите собеседование на нашем объекте)
Если у вас возникли вопросы или вам необходима дополнительная информация о правовых основаниях, на которых мы собираем и используем вашу личную информацию, пожалуйста, отправьте письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
С кем мы передаем вашу личную информацию
Компания Honeywell будет передавать вашу личную информацию третьим лицам только в следующих случаях:
Предприятия группы Honeywell.
Мы можем передавать вашу личную информацию другим предприятиям группы, расположенным в юрисдикциях по всему миру, для оценки вашей анкеты и рассмотрения возможности найма на работу на уровне группы.
Поставщики услуг
Мы можем специально передавать вашу личную информацию  сторонним поставщикам услуг, которые выполняют определенные услуги от нашего имени (например, поставщикам услуг по подбору и аутсорсингу персонала и поставщикам аналитических услуг). Такие третьи стороны могут варьироваться в зависимости от страны, в которой вы проживаете, и время от времени меняться, но могут включать компании Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. и их соответствующих сторонних поставщиков.
Сотрудники компании Honeywell.
Если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, обратите внимание, что некоторые разделы вашего профиля являются открытыми и, следовательно, видны всем сотрудникам Honeywell (в частности, ваше имя, должность, фотография, навыки, сферы интересов, опыт работы и образование). Однако эти разделы можно редактировать, и вы сами сможете выбирать, какая информация о вас будет отображаться в вашем профиле. Обратите внимание, что карьерные цели, переезды
Другие третьи стороны.
Honeywell может передавать Вашу личную информацию любому компетентному правоохранительному органу, регулятору, государственному учреждению, суду или третьей стороне, если мы считаем, что раскрытие информации необходимо в соответствии с действующим законодательством или по добросовестному убеждению, что такие действия необходимы для осуществления, установления или защиты наших законных прав или для защиты Ваших жизненных интересов или интересов другого лица. Мы также можем передавать вашу личную информацию другим лицам с вашего согласия или по вашему указанию (например, судье или профессиональной ассоциации).
Международные переводы персональной информации
HКомпания Honeywell является глобальной организацией, и ваша личная информация может передаваться, храниться и использоваться в различных странах мира, таких как США и Индия. Это означает, что когда мы собираем вашу личную информацию, она может обрабатываться в странах, законы о защите данных которых могут отличаться от законов вашей страны. Однако Honeywell всегда будет предпринимать разумные меры для защиты вашей конфиденциальности и обеспечения уровня защиты личной информации, сопоставимого с уровнем защиты в стране вашего проживания, включая применение
Стандартных договорных положений
Европейской
комиссии
, с которыми можно ознакомиться на сайте Комиссии https://ec.europa.eu.
Удержание
Мы будем хранить Вашу личную информацию столько, сколько необходимо для достижения целей, описанных в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности, в соответствии с графиком хранения записей Honeywell или в соответствии с требованиями действующего законодательства.
Ваши права
В зависимости от действующего законодательства вы можете иметь определенные права в отношении вашей личной информации. Если вы являетесь жителем Калифорнии, обратитесь к разделу “
Дополнительная информация для жителей Калифорнии
” ниже.
Вы имеете право на
доступ, исправление, обновление
или запрос на
удаление
вашей личной информации;
Вы можете
возразить
против обработки вашей личной информации, попросить нас
ограничить
pобработку вашей личной информации или запросить
перенос
вашей личной информации;
Вы можете иметь право не принимать в отношении вас решение, основанное исключительно на автоматизированной обработке, включая профилирование, если такое решение порождает в отношении вас юридические последствия или существенно влияет на вас.
Компания Honeywell не принимает в рамках процесса подбора персонала исключительно автоматизированных решений в отношении кандидатов.
Аналогичным образом, если мы собирали и обрабатывали ваши персональные данные с вашего согласия, вы можете отозвать свое согласие в любое время. Отзыв вашего согласия не повлияет на законность любой обработки, проведенной нами до вашего отзыва, а также не повлияет на обработку вашей личной информации, проведенную на законных основаниях, отличных от согласия; и
Вы имеете право подать жалобу в орган по защите данных на сбор и использование нами вашей личной информации.
Мы будем способствовать осуществлению вами прав, относящихся к вам, в соответствии с действующим законодательством. Чтобы воспользоваться любым из ваших прав, касающихся вашей личной информации, свяжитесь с нами через HR Help или форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную на сайте
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, или отправьте письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Дополнительная информация для жителей Калифорнии
Если вы являетесь резидентом штата Калифорния, данный раздел дополняет Уведомление о конфиденциальности для заявителей компании Honeywell.
(i)      Категории собираемой и раскрываемой персональной информации
В течение последних двенадцати месяцев компания Honeywell собирала и раскрывала следующие категории личной информации для наших коммерческих целей:
Previous column
Next column
Категории
Мы собираем
A.
Идентификаторы, такие как имя, дата рождения, пол, адрес электронной почты, номера телефонов, почтовый адрес, онлайн-идентификаторы, учетные записи в социальных сетях и другие идентификаторы.
Да
C.
Характеристики, относящиеся к защищаемой классификации в соответствии с калифорнийским или федеральным законодательством, такие как раса, этническая принадлежность, религиозные или философские убеждения, членство в профсоюзе, медицинские данные, биометрическая информация, генетические данные, инвалидность, статус ветерана, сексуальная ориентация, личная почта, электронная почта и текстовые сообщения (если только компания Honeywell не является предполагаемым получателем), государственные идентификаторы (например, номер социального страхования), водительские права, паспорт, финансовая и банковская информация.
Да
F.
Информация об активности в Интернете или других электронных сетях, например, история просмотра веб-страниц, взаимодействие с веб-сайтами Honeywell, электронной почтой и службами обмена текстовыми сообщениями..
Да
G.
Геолокационные данные, такие как местоположение устройства и местоположение IP-адреса.
Да
H.
Аудио-, электронная, визуальная, тепловая или аналогичная информация, например, ваш голос и изображение, видео- или аудиозаписи, если вы участвуете в телефонном или видеоинтервью или посещаете наши офисы.
Да
I.
Профессиональная или связанная с работой информация, такая как род занятий, текущий или предыдущий работодатель, должность, история образования, академическая и профессиональная квалификация, резюме, история работы, рекомендации при приеме на работу, записи и оценки собеседований, языки, профессиональные членства, сертификаты, оценки эффективности работы, компенсация, предпочтения в отношении места работы и поездок.
Да
K.
Выводы, сделанные на основе любой из перечисленных выше персональных данных, для создания профиля или резюме, например, о предпочтениях и характеристиках человека.
Да
Load More
(ii)      Ваши права
Вы имеете право направить нам запрос о предоставлении следующих прав, охватывающих двенадцатимесячный период, предшествующий Вашему запросу. Обратите внимание, что эти права не являются абсолютными и в некоторых случаях подлежат ограничениям, предусмотренным действующим законодательством:
Право знать, какую личную информацию о вас мы собрали, из каких источников мы  собрали вашу личную информацию, с какой деловой или коммерческой целью мы собрали вашу личную информацию, а также с какими третьими лицами мы раскрываем вашу личную информацию;
Право на удаление своей личной информации;
Право на исправление неточной личной информации о вас;
Право отказаться от продажи или передачи вашей личной информации;
Право на ограничение обработки вашей чувствительной личной информации;
Право не подвергаться незаконной дискриминации за осуществление своих прав в соответствии с действующим законодательством.
Мы будем способствовать осуществлению применимых к вам прав в соответствии с действующим законодательством и, учитывая тип и чувствительность персональной информации, являющейся предметом запроса, для вашей защиты нам может потребоваться запросить проверку вашей личности и запросить у вас дополнительную информацию.
Чтобы воспользоваться любыми своими правами, связанными с персональной информацией, свяжитесь с нами через форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, или отправьте электронное письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, вы можете связаться с нами по адресу
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Свяжитесь с нами
Если у вас возникли вопросы или жалобы по поводу обработки вашей личной информации или вы хотите воспользоваться своими правами, обращайтесь по адресу:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(только если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell) или к нашему специалисту по защите данных по адресу
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Вы также можете связаться с нами через форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Aktualizované: 1. januára 2023
Toto oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov uchádzačov (ďalej len "oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov") opisuje, ako spoločnosť Honeywell International, Inc. a jej
pridružené spoločnosti
(ďalej spoločne len "
Honeywell
", "
my
" alebo "
nás
") spracúvajú vaše osobné údaje, keď sa pripojíte k našej komunite talentov, hľadáte alebo sa uchádzate o zamestnanie a poskytujete nám osobné údaje prostredníctvom nášho portálu, webových stránok alebo iných náborových médií, či už online alebo offline (ďalej len "
služby
"). Na účely platných zákonov o ochrane údajov sme správcami vašich osobných údajov.
Upozorňujeme, že ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, môžete si prečítať aj Globálne zásady ochrany osobných údajov spoločnosti Honeywell a Oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov zamestnancov, ak existuje pre vašu jurisdikciu. Cieľom tohto oznámenia o ochrane osobných údajov je poskytnúť vám podrobnejšie informácie o spracovaní vašich osobných údajov v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou.
Osobné údaje, ktoré zhromažďujeme
Aby sme mohli spracovať vašu žiadosť, požiadame vás o poskytnutie osobných údajov o vás, napríklad keď sa uchádzate o konkrétne voľné pracovné miesto prostredníctvom našej webovej stránky/portálu alebo v prípade, že ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, počas vášho pracovného pomeru. Všetky informácie sa poskytujú dobrovoľne a vy určujete rozsah informácií, ktoré spoločnosti Honeywell poskytnete.
Majte na pamäti, že niektoré informácie môžu byť potrebné na dokončenie hodnotenia vašej žiadosti a v prípade ich neposkytnutia môže byť naša schopnosť posúdiť vás ako kandidáta obmedzená.
(i)   Osobné informácie
Môžeme o vás zhromažďovať tieto osobné údaje:
Osobné údaje a kontaktné informácie vrátane e-mailovej adresy, telefónneho čísla (čísel) a fotografie;
Profesijné a vzdelanostné informácie súvisiace s vaším povolaním, ako sú vaši súčasní alebo predchádzajúci zamestnávatelia, vaša pracovná pozícia alebo iné informácie o organizácii, s ktorou ste spätí. Môžete tiež poskytnúť svoj životopis/životopis a informácie o svojej kvalifikácii alebo vzdelaní, ako sú tituly, študijné odbory, inštitúcie, ktoré ste navštevovali, jazyky, profesijné členstvo, certifikáty, podrobnosti o hodnotení riadenia výkonnosti a odmeňovaní;
Kariérne preferencie (napr. krátkodobé a dlhodobé ciele, ochota presťahovať sa, termín presťahovania a preferencie miesta);
Osobné údaje získané z vašej účasti v našom náborovom procese, ako sú napríklad údaje získané počas pohovorov, e-maily, ktoré si s vami vymieňame v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou, alebo konverzácie, ktoré s vami vedieme prostredníctvom nášho online chatbota.
Zvukové a vizuálne informácie, napríklad váš hlas a podobizeň zachytené na fotografiách, videozáznamoch alebo zvukových nahrávkach, ak sa zúčastníte telefonického alebo videorozhovoru alebo ak navštívite naše kancelárie;
Akékoľvek iné osobné údaje, ktoré sa nám dobrovoľne rozhodnete poskytnúť.
(ii)  Citlivé osobné údaje
Môžeme o vás zhromažďovať aj osobitné kategórie osobných údajov (známe aj ako "osobitné kategórie osobných údajov"), ak máme zákonnú povinnosť tak urobiť alebo ak informácie sú dôležité pre vaše budúce pracovné prostredie v spoločnosti Honeywell alebo pre budúce poskytovanie zamestnaneckých výhod, alebo s vaším výslovným súhlasom, ako napríklad:G
Identifikačné číslo vydané vládou (napríklad číslo sociálneho poistenia);
Demografické údaje, ktoré môžu zahŕňať informácie o chránených klasifikáciách, ako je váš vek, pohlavie, rasa, zdravotné postihnutie, sexuálna orientácia, rodinný stav alebo status veterána;
informácie o zdravotnom stave (napríklad na prispôsobenie sa vášmu zdravotnému postihnutiu alebo stravovacím obmedzeniam);
Informácie týkajúce sa politických názorov, náboženského presvedčenia alebo členstva v odboroch;
Informácie o trestných činoch alebo odsúdeniach jednotlivca, ako aj akékoľvek iné informácie považované za citlivé podľa platných zákonov o ochrane údajov. Ak to povoľuje zákon a v príslušnom rozsahu, spoločnosť Honeywell môže tiež potrebovať vykonať previerky minulosti a/alebo trestnej zodpovednosti, aby určila vašu vhodnosť pre otvorenú pozíciu alebo príležitosť v spoločnosti Honeywell.
Nevyžadujeme od vás, aby ste nám poskytli citlivé osobné údaje, pokiaľ to nie je potrebné na účely plnenia našich regulačných povinností (napr. na monitorovanie rovnosti príležitostí) alebo pokiaľ ste nám na to neposkytli svoj výslovný súhlas. S výnimkou rozsahu vyžadovaného zákonom bude poskytnutie týchto informácií úplne dobrovoľné. Spoločnosť Honeywell sa zaviazala k skutočnej inkluzívnej a rôznorodej pracovnej sile. Poskytnutím vašich údajov o rovnosti príležitostí nám umožníte lepšie pochopiť profil našich zamestnancov z hľadiska údajov o rovnosti príležitostí a opatrení, ktoré musíme prijať na prilákanie, podporu a udržanie rôznorodej pracovnej sily bez ohľadu na vek, zdravotné postihnutie, pohlavie, rasu, náboženské alebo filozofické presvedčenie a sexuálnu orientáciu.
(iii) Osobné údaje, ktoré od vás zhromažďujeme automaticky
Môžeme od vás automaticky zhromažďovať určité informácie o vašej návšteve našich webových stránok pomocou súborov cookie a iných podobných technológií sledovania. Ďalšie informácie o súboroch cookie, ktoré používame na webovej lokalite, prostredníctvom ktorej podávate žiadosť, nájdete v našom
oznámení o súboroch cookie
.
Zdroje osobných informácií
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme získavať priamo od vás alebo nepriamo od tretích strán, ktoré sú oprávnené zdieľať vaše údaje s nami, ako napríklad:
Pracovné agentúry, poskytovatelia služieb overovania minulosti/zamestnania alebo overovania totožnosti;
personálne agentúry (napríklad keď vás personálna agentúra identifikuje ako potenciálneho kandidáta);
Verejne dostupné informácie o vás z webových stránok, ako je LinkedIn alebo webová stránka vášho súčasného zamestnávateľa. Môžete sa tiež rozhodnúť, že nám poskytnete prístup k určitým osobným informáciám uloženým tretími stranami (napríklad LinkedIn, Twitter, Google alebo Facebook). Povolením prístupu k týmto informáciám spoločnosti Honeywell súhlasíte s tým, že môžeme tieto informácie zhromažďovať, uchovávať a používať v súlade s týmto oznámením o ochrane osobných údajov;
na základe referencie alebo ústneho podania (napríklad na základe odporúčania od súčasného alebo bývalého zamestnanca). V prípade odporúčaní je osoba, ktorá vás odporúča, zodpovedná za získanie vášho súhlasu s poskytnutím vašich osobných údajov.
Účely, na ktoré sa osobné údaje používajú
Vaše osobné údaje používame na tieto účely:
vyhodnotiť vašu žiadosť a prijať rozhodnutie o prijatí do zamestnania;
komunikovať s vami a informovať vás o nábere a/alebo vašej prihláške (prihláškach) alebo o akejkoľvek inej požadovanej komunikácii;
dodržiavanie platných zákonných a regulačných požiadaviek a na to, aby sme mohli preukázať, uplatniť alebo obhájiť právny nárok;
Zamestnanie a riadenie spoločnosti (napríklad vytvorenie základného záznamu o zamestnaní, ak vás zamestnajú);
Vypracovanie súhrnných správ/analýz týkajúcich sa údajov o činnosti kandidátov (napr. návštevnosť kariérnej stránky, lievik kandidátov, zdroj náboru, úspešnosť náborových kampaní);
Len pre zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell
:
Aby ste boli automaticky vylúčení z proaktívneho navrhovania náborovým pracovníkom pre pracovné príležitosti a neboli oprávnení na posúdenie podľa vášho aktuálneho hodnotenia HPD 9-block (ktoré nebude nikdy odhalené nikomu mimo spoločnosti Honeywell). Vždy sa však budete môcť priamo uchádzať o akúkoľvek dostupnú pracovnú príležitosť a vaša konkrétna situácia bude náborovým pracovníkom zvážená.
Iba v prípade, že máte trvalý pobyt v Spojených štátoch
:
Na zasielanie správ prostredníctvom SMS, konkrétne:
(i)     1-1 SMS komunikácia v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou o konkrétne voľné pracovné miesto a/alebo
(ii)    na základe vášho výslovného súhlasu, komunikácia prostredníctvom SMS kampaní o pracovných príležitostiach, pracovných záležitostiach a aktualizáciách žiadostí.
Svoj súhlas so zasielaním vyššie uvedených správ budete môcť odmietnuť a/alebo odvolať podľa pokynov uvedených vo vašom profile.
Ak dostanete ponuku a prijmete zamestnanie v spoločnosti Honeywell, informácie zhromaždené počas procesu podávania žiadosti a náboru sa stanú súčasťou vášho pracovného záznamu.
Automatizované spracovanie a profilovanie
Na základe vášho výslovného súhlasu (ktorý dobrovoľne poskytnete pri vstupe do našej komunity talentov alebo pri zaškrtnutí príslušného políčka súhlasu počas procesu podávania žiadosti) vykonávame "profilovanie" s cieľom vyhodnotiť vašu vhodnosť pre konkrétne pracovné príležitosti. Ide o použitie algoritmu na porovnávanie, ktorý dokáže vyhodnotiť váš pracovný profil a predpovedať vašu vhodnosť pre konkrétnu pracovnú príležitosť. Toto automatizované spracovanie vykonávame na účely:
pomoc náborovým pracovníkom pri zosúlaďovaní profilov uchádzačov s pracovnými príležitosťami prostredníctvom navrhovania kandidátov, ktorí by mali byť zaradení na konkrétnu pracovnú príležitosť, a
zasielanie personalizovaných odporúčaní pracovných miest na základe vášho profilu a/alebo preferencií alebo iných informácií, ktoré vás môžu zaujímať, ako sú novinky, webové semináre a podujatia spoločnosti Honeywell.
Upozorňujeme, že na základe tohto profilovania nemusíte byť zaradení do výberu určitých pracovných príležitostí, pokiaľ ste sa o ne priamo neuchádzali.
Nerobíme rozhodnutia o prijímaní zamestnancov výlučne na základe automatizovaných rozhodovacích procesov a/alebo profilovania. Vaše osobné údaje budú podliehať ľudským rozhodnutiam, keďže konečné rozhodnutie o prijatí do zamestnania urobia náboroví pracovníci alebo vedúci náboru.
Právne základy spracovania vašich osobných údajov
Niektoré jurisdikcie vyžadujú, aby spoločnosť Honeywell mala právny základ na spracovanie vašich osobných údajov. Ak platné právne predpisy vyžadujú, aby sme zdôvodnili naše činnosti spracovania, náš právny základ na zhromažďovanie a používanie vašich osobných údajov, ako je opísané v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov, bude závisieť od príslušných osobných údajov a konkrétneho kontextu, v ktorom ich zhromažďujeme.
Súhlas.
Vo všeobecnosti platí, že osobné údaje od vás zhromažďujeme, ak na to máme váš súhlas a ak vaše osobné údaje potrebujeme na spracovanie vašej žiadosti. Prístupom na našu webovú stránku/portál, vstupom do našej komunity talentov alebo podaním žiadosti o jednu z našich pracovných pozícií udeľujete spoločnosti Honeywell súhlas so zhromažďovaním a ďalším spracovaním vyššie uvedených osobných údajov na účely opísané v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov. Svoj súhlas môžete kedykoľvek odvolať podaním žiadosti prostredníctvom nášho portálu pre žiadosti subjektov údajov na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
alebo zaslaním e-mailu na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oprávnené záujmy.
Oprávnené záujmy spoločnosti Honeywell, konkrétne nábor, výber, hodnotenie a menovanie nových zamestnancov a riadenie a správa náborového a personálneho procesu v rozsahu, v akom nad našimi oprávnenými záujmami neprevažujú vaše základné práva a slobody.
Právne povinnosti.
Dodržiavanie zákonných povinností spoločnosti Honeywell v prípadoch, keď pracovné právo alebo iné zákony vyžadujú spracovanie vašich osobných údajov (napríklad v rozsahu, v akom zákon vyžaduje monitorovanie rovnosti príležitostí a rozmanitosti).
Životne dôležité záujmy.
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme potrebovať aj na ochranu vašich životne dôležitých záujmov (napríklad z dôvodov ochrany zdravia a bezpečnosti, ak sa zúčastníte na pohovore na našom pracovisku).
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo potrebujete ďalšie informácie týkajúce sa právneho základu, na základe ktorého zhromažďujeme a používame vaše osobné údaje, pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
S kým zdieľame vaše osobné údaje
Spoločnosť Honeywell bude zdieľať vaše osobné údaje s tretími stranami len za nasledujúcich okolností:
Subjekty skupiny Honeywell.
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme zdieľať s inými subjektmi skupiny, ktoré sa nachádzajú v jurisdikciách po celom svete, aby sme mohli posúdiť váš profil a zvážiť prípadné možnosti náboru na úrovni skupiny.
Poskytovatelia služieb
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme osobitne zdieľať s externými poskytovateľmi služieb, ktorí v našom mene vykonávajú špecifické služby (napríklad poskytovatelia náboru a outsourcingu zamestnancov a poskytovatelia analytických služieb). Takéto tretie strany sa môžu líšiť v závislosti od vašej krajiny a z času na čas sa budú meniť, ale môžu zahŕňať spoločnosti Phenom People, Inc. a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. a ich príslušných poskytovateľov tretích strán.
Zamestnanci spoločnosti Honeywell.
Ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, upozorňujeme, že niektoré časti vášho profilu sú verejné, a teda viditeľné pre všetkých zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell (konkrétne vaše meno, titul, fotografia, zručnosti, oblasti záujmov, pracovné skúsenosti a vzdelanie). Takéto časti sú však editovateľné a budete si môcť vybrať, ktoré informácie o vás sa vo vašom profile zobrazia. Upozorňujeme, že kariérne ciele, premiestnenie a sekcie stavu profilu "otvorené pre nové príležitosti" nebudú verejné, a preto nebudú viditeľné pre všetkých zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell (iba pre tím talentov spoločnosti Honeywell).
Ostatné tretie strany.
Spoločnosť Honeywell môže poskytnúť vaše osobné údaje akémukoľvek príslušnému orgánu činnému v trestnom konaní, regulačnému orgánu, vládnej agentúre, súdu alebo tretej strane, ak sa domnievame, že takéto poskytnutie je nevyhnutné podľa platných právnych predpisov alebo v dobrej viere, že takéto konanie je nevyhnutné na uplatnenie, stanovenie alebo obhajobu našich zákonných práv alebo na ochranu vašich životných záujmov alebo záujmov inej osoby. Vaše osobné údaje môžeme tiež poskytnúť iným osobám s vaším súhlasom alebo na váš pokyn (napr. rozhodcovi alebo profesijnému združeniu).
Medzinárodné prenosy osobných údajov
Spoločnosť Honeywell je globálna organizácia a vaše osobné údaje sa môžu prenášať, uchovávať, uchovávať alebo používať na rôznych miestach na svete, napríklad v USA a Indii. To znamená, že keď zhromažďujeme vaše osobné údaje, môžu byť spracované v krajinách, ktoré môžu mať zákony o ochrane údajov odlišné od zákonov vašej krajiny. Spoločnosť Honeywell však vždy podnikne primerané kroky na ochranu vášho súkromia a na zabezpečenie úrovne ochrany osobných údajov, ktorá je porovnateľná s úrovňou ochrany vo vašej krajine bydliska, čo zahŕňa implementáciu
štandardných zmluvných doložiek
Európskej
komisie
, ktoré možno nájsť na webovej stránke Komisie na adrese https://ec.europa.eu.
Zadržanie
Vaše osobné údaje budeme uchovávať tak dlho, ako to bude potrebné v súvislosti s účelmi opísanými v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov a v súlade s harmonogramom uchovávania záznamov spoločnosti Honeywell alebo v súlade s platnými zákonmi.
Vaše práva
V závislosti od platných zákonov môžete mať určité práva týkajúce sa vašich osobných údajov. Ak ste obyvateľom Kalifornie, pozrite si nižšie uvedené "
Ďalšie informácie pre obyvateľov Kalifornie
".
Môžete mať právo na
prístup k
svojim osobným údajom, ich
opravu
,
aktualizáciu
alebo
vymazanie
;
Môžete
namietať proti
spracovaniu vašich osobných údajov, požiadať nás o
obmedzenie
spracovanie vašich osobných údajov alebo požiadať o
prenosnosť
vašich osobných údajov;
Môžete mať právo na to, aby o vás nebolo prijaté rozhodnutie, ktoré je založené výlučne na automatizovanom spracovaní vrátane profilovania, ak toto rozhodnutie má pre vás právne účinky alebo vás významne ovplyvňuje.
Spoločnosť Honeywell v rámci svojho náborového procesu nevykonáva výlučne automatizované rozhodovanie o uchádzačoch.
Podobne, ak sme vaše osobné údaje zhromažďovali a spracúvali s vaším súhlasom, môžete ho kedykoľvek odvolať. Odvolanie vášho súhlasu neovplyvní zákonnosť akéhokoľvek spracovania, ktoré sme vykonali pred vaším odvolaním, ani neovplyvní spracovanie vašich osobných údajov vykonané na základe iných zákonných dôvodov spracovania, ako je súhlas, a
Máte právo podať sťažnosť orgánu na ochranu údajov v súvislosti s naším zhromažďovaním a používaním vašich osobných údajov.
Uľahčíme vám uplatnenie práv, ktoré sa na vás vzťahujú, v súlade s platnými zákonmi. Ak chcete uplatniť ktorékoľvek zo svojich práv týkajúcich sa vašich osobných údajov, kontaktujte nás prostredníctvom služby HR Help alebo formulára žiadosti subjektu údajov, ktorý nájdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, alebo pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Ďalšie informácie pre obyvateľov Kalifornie
Ak ste obyvateľom štátu Kalifornia, táto časť dopĺňa oznámenie spoločnosti Honeywell o ochrane osobných údajov žiadateľov.
(i)      Kategórie zhromažďovaných a zverejňovaných osobných údajov
Spoločnosť Honeywell v predchádzajúcich dvanástich mesiacoch zhromaždila a zverejnila nasledujúce kategórie osobných údajov na naše obchodné účely:
Previous column
Next column
Kategórie
Zbierame
A.
Identifikátory, ako je meno, dátum narodenia, pohlavie, e-mailová adresa, telefónne čísla, poštová adresa, online identifikátory, účet na sociálnej sieti a iné identifikátory.
Áno
C.
Charakteristiky chránených klasifikácií podľa kalifornských alebo federálnych zákonov, ako sú rasa, etnický pôvod, náboženské alebo filozofické presvedčenie, členstvo v odboroch, zdravotné údaje, biometrické informácie, genetické údaje, zdravotné postihnutie, status veterána, sexuálna orientácia, osobná pošta, e-mailové a textové správy (pokiaľ spoločnosť Honeywell nie je ich príjemcom), vládne identifikátory (napr. číslo sociálneho poistenia), vodičský preukaz, pas, finančné a bankové informácie.
Áno
F.
informácie o aktivitách na internete alebo iných elektronických sieťach, ako je história prehliadania, interakcie s webovými stránkami spoločnosti Honeywell, e-mailové služby a služby textových správ.
Áno
G.
Geolokačné údaje, ako je poloha zariadenia a poloha IP.
Áno
H.
Zvukové, elektronické, vizuálne, tepelné alebo podobné informácie, ako je váš hlas a obraz, videozáznam alebo zvukový záznam, ak sa zúčastníte na telefonickom alebo videorozhovore alebo ak navštívite naše kancelárie.
Áno
I.
Profesijné informácie alebo informácie týkajúce sa zamestnania, ako je vaše povolanie, súčasný alebo predchádzajúci zamestnávateľ, názov pracovnej pozície, história vzdelania, akademická a odborná kvalifikácia, životopis, história zamestnania, referencie o prijatí do zamestnania, poznámky a hodnotenia z pohovoru, jazyky, členstvo v profesijných organizáciách, certifikáty, hodnotenie riadenia výkonnosti, odmeňovanie, preferencie týkajúce sa miesta a preferencie týkajúce sa cestovania.
Áno
K.
Závery vyvodené z akýchkoľvek vyššie uvedených osobných údajov s cieľom vytvoriť profil alebo zhrnutie, napríklad o preferenciách a vlastnostiach jednotlivca.
Áno
Load More
(ii)      Vaše práva
Máte právo poslať nám žiadosť o nasledujúce práva, ktoré sa vzťahujú na dvanásťmesačné obdobie, ktoré predchádza vašej žiadosti. Upozorňujeme, že tieto práva nie sú absolútne a v niektorých prípadoch podliehajú obmedzeniam uvedeným v platných právnych predpisoch:
Právo vedieť, aké osobné údaje sme o vás zhromaždili, kategórie zdrojov, z ktorých sme vaše osobné údaje zhromaždili, obchodné alebo komerčné účely, na ktoré sme vaše osobné údaje zhromaždili, a kategórie tretích strán, ktorým vaše osobné údaje poskytujeme;
Právo na vymazanie vašich osobných údajov;
Právo na opravu nepresných osobných údajov o vás;
Právo odmietnuť predaj alebo zdieľanie vašich osobných údajov;
Právo obmedziť spracovanie vašich citlivých osobných údajov;
Právo nebyť nezákonne diskriminovaný pri uplatňovaní svojich práv podľa platných zákonov.
Uľahčíme vám uplatnenie práv, ktoré sa na vás vzťahujú, v súlade s platnými právnymi predpismi a vzhľadom na typ a citlivosť osobných údajov, ktoré sú predmetom žiadosti, môžeme v záujme vašej ochrany požiadať o overenie vašej totožnosti a vyžiadať si od vás ďalšie informácie.
Ak chcete uplatniť akékoľvek svoje právo týkajúce sa vašich osobných údajov, kontaktujte nás prostredníctvom formulára žiadosti o poskytnutie údajov, ktorý nájdete na
adrese https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, alebo nám pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, môžete nás kontaktovať na adrese
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontaktujte nás
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo sťažnosti týkajúce sa spôsobu spracovania vašich osobných údajov alebo chcete uplatniť svoje práva, obráťte sa na:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(len ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell) alebo nášho úradníka pre ochranu údajov na adrese
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Môžete nás kontaktovať aj prostredníctvom formulára žiadosti o poskytnutie údajov, ktorý nájdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Actualizado: 1 de enero de 2023
Este Aviso de privacidad del solicitante ("Aviso de privacidad") describe cómo Honeywell International, Inc. y sus
filiales
(colectivamente "
Honeywell
", "
nosotros
") procesan su información personal cuando usted se une a nuestra Comunidad de talentos, busca o solicita un empleo y nos envía información personal a través de nuestro portal, sitios Web u otros medios de contratación, ya sea en línea o fuera de línea (los "
Servicios
"). Somos los responsables del tratamiento de su información personal a efectos de la legislación aplicable en materia de protección de datos.
Tenga en cuenta que si ya es empleado de Honeywell, también puede consultar la Política Global de Privacidad de Datos de Honeywell y el Aviso de Privacidad para Empleados, en caso de que exista uno para su jurisdicción. El objetivo de este Aviso de privacidad es proporcionarle información más detallada sobre nuestro procesamiento de su información personal en relación con su solicitud.
Información personal que recopilamos
Para procesar su solicitud, le pedimos que proporcione información personal sobre usted, por ejemplo, cuando se postula para una vacante en particular a través de nuestro sitio Web/portal o, en caso de que ya sea empleado de Honeywell, durante su relación laboral. Toda la información se proporciona de forma voluntaria y usted determina el alcance de la información que proporciona a Honeywell.
Tenga en cuenta que algunos datos pueden ser necesarios para completar la evaluación de su solicitud y que, si no los facilita, nuestra capacidad para considerarle candidato puede verse limitada.
(i)   Información personal
Podemos recopilar la siguiente información personal sobre usted:
Datos personales e información de contacto, como dirección de correo electrónico, número(s) de teléfono y fotografía;
Información profesional y educativa relacionada con su ocupación, como sus empleadores actuales o anteriores, su cargo u otra información sobre la organización a la que está afiliado. También puede facilitar su currículum vítae e información sobre sus cualificaciones o su formación, como títulos, campos de estudio, instituciones a las que ha asistido, idiomas, afiliaciones profesionales, certificaciones, detalles sobre las calificaciones de la gestión del rendimiento y la remuneración;
Preferencias profesionales (por ejemplo, objetivos a corto y largo plazo, disposición a trasladarse, fecha disponible para trasladarse y preferencias de ubicación);
Datos personales derivados de su participación en nuestro proceso de contratación, como, por ejemplo, los obtenidos durante las entrevistas, los correos electrónicos que intercambiamos con usted en relación con su solicitud o las conversaciones que mantenemos con usted a través de nuestro Chatbot en línea.
Información sonora y visual, como su voz e imagen captadas en fotografías, grabaciones de vídeo o audio si participa en una entrevista telefónica o de vídeo, o si visita nuestras oficinas;
Cualquier otra información personal que decida proporcionarnos voluntariamente.
(ii)  Información personal sensible
También podemos recopilar categorías especiales de información personal sobre usted (también conocidas como "categorías especiales de información personal")  cuando tengamos la obligación legal de hacerlo, o lala información es relevante para su futuro entorno de trabajo en Honeywell, o para la futura provisión de beneficios laborales, o con su consentimiento explícito, como por ejemplo:
Número de identificación emitido por el gobierno (como el número de la seguridad social);
Información demográfica, que puede incluir información sobre clasificaciones protegidas, como su edad, sexo, raza, discapacidad, orientación sexual, estado civil o condición de veterano;
Información sanitaria (por ejemplo, para adaptarse a cualquier discapacidad que pueda tener o a restricciones dietéticas);
Información relativa a las opiniones políticas, creencias religiosas o afiliación sindical de una persona;
Información sobre delitos o condenas penales de un individuo, así como cualquier otra información considerada sensible según las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Cuando la ley lo permita y en la medida en que corresponda, Honeywell también puede necesitar realizar verificaciones de antecedentes y/o penales para determinar su idoneidad para un puesto vacante u oportunidad en Honeywell.
No le pedimos que nos proporcione información personal sensible a menos que sea necesario para cumplir nuestras obligaciones reglamentarias (por ejemplo, para el control de la igualdad de oportunidades), o a menos que nos haya dado su consentimiento explícito. Excepto en la medida en que lo exija la ley, el suministro de esta información será totalmente voluntario. Honeywell está comprometida con una verdadera fuerza laboral inclusiva y diversa. Al proporcionarnos sus datos de igualdad de oportunidades, nos permite comprender mejor el perfil de nuestros empleados en términos de datos de igualdad de oportunidades y las medidas que debemos tomar para atraer, promover y retener una fuerza laboral diversa independientemente de la edad, discapacidad, sexo, raza, creencias religiosas o filosóficas y orientación sexual.
(iii) Información personal que recopilamos automáticamente de usted
Podemos recopilar automáticamente cierta información sobre su visita a nuestros sitios web utilizando "cookies" y otras tecnologías de seguimiento similares. Para más información sobre las cookies que utilizamos en el sitio web a través del cual presenta su solicitud, lea nuestro
Aviso sobre cookies
.
Fuentes de información personal
Podemos recabar sus datos personales directamente de usted o indirectamente de terceros que estén legalmente autorizados a compartir su información con nosotros, como por ejemplo
Agencias de empleo, proveedores de servicios de verificación de antecedentes/empleo o de identidad;
Agencias de contratación (por ejemplo, cuando una agencia de contratación le identifica como posible candidato);
Información pública sobre usted procedente de sitios como LinkedIn o el sitio web de su empleador actual. También puede optar por proporcionarnos acceso a cierta información personal almacenada por terceros (por ejemplo, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google o Facebook). Al autorizar a Honeywell a tener acceso a esta información, usted acepta que podamos recopilar, almacenar y utilizar esta información de acuerdo con este Aviso de privacidad;
Por referencia o de boca en boca (por ejemplo, a través de una recomendación de un empleado actual o anterior). En el caso de las referencias, la persona que le recomiende , será responsable de obtener su consentimiento para facilitarnos sus datos personales.
Fines para los que se utilizan los datos personales
Utilizamos su información personal para los siguientes fines:
Para evaluar su solicitud y tomar decisiones de contratación;
Comunicarnos con usted e informarle sobre la contratación y/o su(s) candidatura(s) o cualquier otra comunicación necesaria;
Cumplir con los requisitos legales y reglamentarios aplicables y para que podamos establecer, ejercer o defender una reclamación legal;
Empleo y gestión empresarial (por ejemplo, establecer un historial laboral básico si se le contrata);
Realizar informes/análisis agregados relativos a los datos de actividad de los candidatos (por ejemplo, tráfico del sitio de empleo, embudo de candidatos, fuente de contratación, éxito de la campaña de contratación);
Sólo para empleados de Honeywell
:
Para excluirlo automáticamente de ser sugerido proactivamente para consideración de los reclutadores para una oportunidad de trabajo y no es elegible para consideración por su calificación actual de HPD de 9 bloques (que nunca será revelada a nadie fuera de Honeywell). Sin embargo, siempre podrá solicitar directamente cualquier oportunidad de trabajo disponible y su situación específica será considerada por un reclutador.
Únicamente si reside en Estados Unidos
:
Para enviarle comunicaciones por SMS, en concreto:
(i)     1-1 comunicaciones por SMS en relación con su candidatura a una determinada oferta de empleo; y/o
(ii)    previo consentimiento expreso por su parte
,
comunicaciones de campañas por SMS sobre oportunidades de empleo, asuntos laborales y actualizaciones de solicitudes.
Podrá darse de baja y/o revocar su consentimiento para recibir las comunicaciones mencionadas siguiendo las instrucciones que figuran en su perfil.
Si se le ofrece y acepta un empleo en Honeywell, la información recopilada durante el proceso de solicitud y contratación formará parte de su registro de empleo.
Tratamiento automatizado y elaboración de perfiles
Sujeto a su consentimiento expreso (que usted proporciona voluntariamente al unirse a nuestra Comunidad de Talentos o al marcar la casilla de consentimiento correspondiente durante el proceso de solicitud), realizamos "perfiles" para evaluar su idoneidad para determinadas oportunidades de empleo. Esto implica el uso de un algoritmo de comparación capaz de evaluar su perfil laboral y predecir su idoneidad para una determinada oportunidad de empleo. Llevamos a cabo este tratamiento automatizado con los siguientes fines:
ayudar a los responsables de la selección de personal a adecuar los perfiles de los candidatos a las oportunidades de empleo, sugiriendo candidatos a tener en cuenta para una oportunidad de empleo concreta; y
enviarle recomendaciones de trabajo personalizadas basadas en su perfil y/o  preferencias u otra información que pueda ser de su interés, como noticias, seminarios web y eventos de Honeywell.
Tenga en cuenta que, sobre la base de este perfil, es posible que no se le tenga en cuenta para determinadas oportunidades de empleo a menos que las haya solicitado directamente.
No tomamos decisiones de contratación basadas únicamente en procesos automatizados de toma de decisiones y/o elaboración de perfiles. Sus datos personales se someterán a decisiones humanas, ya que la decisión final de contratación la tomarán los responsables de contratación.
Bases jurídicas del tratamiento de sus datos personales
Ciertas jurisdicciones exigen que Honeywell tenga una base legal para procesar su información personal. Cuando la legislación aplicable nos exija justificar nuestras actividades de procesamiento, nuestra base legal para recopilar y utilizar su información personal según se describe en este Aviso de privacidad dependerá de la información personal en cuestión y del contexto específico en el que la recopilamos.
Consentimiento.
En general, normalmente recopilaremos su información personal cuando tengamos su consentimiento para hacerlo y cuando necesitemos su información personal para procesar su solicitud. Al acceder a nuestro sitio Web/portal, unirse a nuestra Comunidad de Talentos o solicitar uno de nuestros puestos de trabajo, usted otorga su consentimiento a Honeywell para recopilar y procesar la información personal descrita anteriormente para los fines descritos en este Aviso de Privacidad. Puede
retirar su consentimiento en
cualquier momento enviando una solicitud a través de nuestro portal de solicitud de datos en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o enviándonos un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intereses legítimos.
En los intereses legítimos de Honeywell, a saber, la contratación, selección, evaluación y nombramiento de nuevos empleados y la gestión y administración de la contratación y el proceso de RR.HH. en la medida en que nuestros intereses legítimos no se vean anulados por sus derechos y libertades fundamentales.
Obligaciones legales.
Cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales de Honeywell cuando la legislación laboral u otras leyes exijan el procesamiento de su información personal (por ejemplo, en la medida en que la ley exija el control de la igualdad de oportunidades y la diversidad).
Intereses vitales.
También podemos necesitar sus datos personales para proteger sus intereses vitales (por ejemplo, por motivos de salud y seguridad si acude a una entrevista en nuestras instalaciones).
Si tiene alguna pregunta o necesita más información sobre la base jurídica en la que recogemos y utilizamos sus datos personales, envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Con quién compartimos sus datos personales
Honeywell sólo compartirá su información personal con terceros en las siguientes circunstancias:
Entidades del grupo Honeywell
. Podemos compartir su información personal con otras entidades del grupo ubicadas en jurisdicciones de todo el mundo para evaluar su perfil y considerarlo para cualquier oportunidad de contratación a nivel de grupo.
Proveedores de servicios
Podemos compartir específicamente su información personal con terceros proveedores de servicios que prestan servicios específicos en nuestro nombre (por ejemplo, proveedores de contratación y externalización de personal y proveedores de análisis). Dichos terceros pueden variar en función de su país y cambiarán de vez en cuando, pero pueden incluir a Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. y sus respectivos proveedores externos.
Empleados de Honeywell.
ISi ya es empleado de Honeywell, tenga en cuenta que algunas secciones de su perfil son públicas y, por lo tanto, visibles para todos los empleados de Honeywell (específicamente, su nombre, cargo, fotografía, habilidades, áreas de interés, experiencia laboral y educación). Sin embargo, dichas secciones son editables y usted podrá elegir qué información sobre usted se muestra en su perfil. Tenga en cuenta que los objetivos profesionales, traslados y las secciones de estado del perfil "abierto a nuevas oportunidades" no serán públicas y, por lo tanto, no serán visibles para todos los empleados de Honeywell (sólo para el Equipo de Talento de Honeywell).
Otros terceros.
Honeywell puede compartir su información personal con cualquier organismo competente de aplicación de la ley, regulador, agencia gubernamental, tribunal o tercero cuando creamos que la divulgación es necesaria según la ley aplicable o en la creencia de buena fe de que dicha acción es necesaria para ejercer, establecer o defender nuestros derechos legales o para proteger sus intereses vitales o los de otra persona. También podemos compartir su información personal con terceros con su consentimiento o por indicación suya (por ejemplo, un árbitro o una asociación profesional).
Transferencias internacionales de datos personales
HHoneywell es una organización global y su información personal puede transferirse, guardarse, almacenarse o utilizarse en varios lugares del mundo, como EE.UU. e India. Esto significa que cuando recopilamos su información personal, ésta puede ser procesada en países que pueden tener leyes de protección de datos diferentes a las leyes de su país. Sin embargo, Honeywell siempre tomará medidas razonables para proteger su privacidad y proporcionar un nivel de protección de la información personal que sea comparable al de su país de residencia, lo que incluye la implementación de las
Cláusulas Contractuales Tipo de la Comisión
Europea
que se pueden encontrar en el sitio Web de la Comisión en
https://ec.europa.eu.
Retención
Conservaremos su información personal durante el tiempo que sea necesario en relación con los fines descritos en este Aviso de privacidad y de acuerdo con el Programa de conservación de registros de Honeywell o según lo exija la legislación aplicable.
Sus derechos
Dependiendo de la legislación aplicable, usted puede tener ciertos derechos con respecto a su información personal. Si reside en California, consulte la sección "
Información adicional para residentes en California
" que figura a continuación.
Usted puede tener derecho a
acceder, corregir, actualizar
o solicitar la
supresión
de su información personal;
Puede oponerse al tratamiento de sus datos personales, pedirnos que
restrinjamos
el tratamiento de sus datos personales o solicitar
la portabilidad
de los mismos;
Puede tener derecho a que no se tome una decisión sobre usted basada únicamente en un tratamiento automatizado, incluida la elaboración de perfiles, si dicha decisión produce efectos jurídicos sobre usted o le afecta de forma significativa.
Honeywell no toma, como parte de su proceso de selección de personal, decisiones sobre los candidatos basadas únicamente en tratamientos automatizados.
Del mismo modo, si hemos recopilado y procesado su información personal con su consentimiento, puede retirarlo en cualquier momento. La retirada de su consentimiento no afectará a la legalidad de cualquier tratamiento que hayamos realizado antes de su retirada, ni afectará al tratamiento de su información personal realizado sobre la base de motivos legales de tratamiento distintos del consentimiento; y
Tiene derecho a presentar una reclamación ante una autoridad de protección de datos sobre la recogida y el uso que hacemos de su información personal.
Le facilitaremos el ejercicio de los derechos que le correspondan de conformidad con la legislación aplicable. Para ejercer cualquiera de sus derechos relativos a su información personal, póngase en contacto con nosotros a través de HR Help, o del formulario de solicitud del interesado que encontrará en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Información adicional para residentes en California
Si usted reside en el Estado de California, esta sección complementa el Aviso de privacidad para solicitantes de Honeywell.
(i)      Categorías de información personal recopilada y divulgada
Honeywell ha recopilado y divulgado las siguientes categorías de información personal para nuestros fines comerciales en los doce meses anteriores:
Previous column
Next column
Categorías
Recogemos
A.
Identificadores como nombre, fecha de nacimiento, sexo, dirección de correo electrónico, números de teléfono, dirección postal, identificadores en línea, cuenta de redes sociales y otros identificadores.
Sí
C.
Características de clasificaciones protegidas según las leyes federales o de California, como raza, origen étnico, creencias religiosas o filosóficas, afiliación sindical, datos de salud, información biométrica, datos genéticos, discapacidad, condición de veterano, orientación sexual, correo personal, correo electrónico y mensajes de texto (a menos que Honeywell sea el destinatario), identificadores gubernamentales (por ejemplo, número de seguro social), licencia de conducir, pasaporte, información financiera y bancaria.
Sí
F.
Información de actividad en Internet u otras redes electrónicas, como historial de navegación, interacciones con sitios Web de Honeywell, correo electrónico y servicios de mensajería de texto.
Sí
G.
Datos de geolocalización, como la ubicación del dispositivo y la ubicación IP.
Sí
H.
Información sonora, electrónica, visual, térmica o similar, como su voz e imagen, grabaciones de vídeo o audio si participa en una entrevista telefónica o por vídeo o si visita nuestras oficinas.
Sí
I.
Información profesional o relacionada con el empleo, como su ocupación, empleadores actuales o anteriores, cargo, historial educativo, cualificaciones académicas y profesionales, currículum vitae, historial laboral, referencias de contratación, notas y evaluaciones de entrevistas, idiomas, afiliaciones profesionales, certificaciones, calificaciones de gestión del rendimiento, remuneración, preferencias de ubicación y preferencias de viaje.
Sí
K.
Inferencias extraídas de cualquiera de los datos personales enumerados anteriormente para crear un perfil o resumen sobre, por ejemplo, las preferencias y características de un individuo.
Sí
Load More
(ii)      Sus derechos
Tiene derecho a solicitarnos los siguientes derechos para el periodo de doce meses anterior a su solicitud. Tenga en cuenta que estos derechos no son absolutos y que, en determinados casos, están sujetos a las limitaciones especificadas en la legislación aplicable:
El derecho a saber qué información personal hemos recopilado sobre usted, las categorías de fuentes de las que hemos recopilado su información personal; la finalidad empresarial o comercial para la que hemos recopilado su información personal, y las categorías de terceros con los que revelamos su información personal;
Derecho a suprimir sus datos personales;
Derecho a corregir la información personal inexacta sobre usted;
Derecho a optar por no vender o compartir su información personal;
Derecho a limitar el tratamiento de sus datos personales sensibles;
Derecho a no ser discriminado ilegalmente por ejercer los derechos que le otorga la legislación vigente.
Le facilitaremos el ejercicio de los derechos que le correspondan de conformidad con la legislación aplicable y, teniendo en cuenta el tipo y la sensibilidad de la información personal objeto de la solicitud, para su protección, es posible que tengamos que solicitar que se verifique su identidad y pedirle información adicional.
Para ejercer cualquiera de sus derechos relacionados con su Información personal, póngase en contacto con nosotros a través del formulario de solicitud del interesado que se encuentra en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si ya es empleado de Honeywell, puede ponerse en contacto con nosotros en
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Póngase en contacto con nosotros
Si tiene alguna pregunta o queja sobre cómo se procesa su información personal o desea ejercer sus derechos, póngase en contacto con:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(sólo si ya es empleado de Honeywell) o con nuestro Responsable de Protección de Datos en
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
También puede ponerse en contacto con nosotros a través del formulario de solicitud del interesado que encontrará en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Uppdaterad: 1 januari 2023
Detta integritetsmeddelande för sökande ("integritetsmeddelande") beskriver hur Honeywell International, Inc. och dess
dotterbolag
(tillsammans "
Honeywell
",
"
oss
" eller "
vi
") behandlar dina personuppgifter när du går med i vår Talent Community, söker eller ansöker om ett jobb och skickar personuppgifter till oss via vår portal, webbplatser eller andra rekryteringsmedier, oavsett om de är online eller offline ("
tjänsterna
"). Vi är personuppgiftsansvariga för dina personuppgifter i enlighet med tillämpliga dataskyddslagar.
Observera att om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell kan du även läsa Honeywells globala integritetspolicy och integritetsmeddelandet för anställda om det finns ett sådant för din jurisdiktion. Syftet med detta integritetsmeddelande är att ge dig mer detaljerad information om vår behandling av dina personuppgifter i samband med din ansökan.
Personuppgifter som vi samlar in
För att behandla din ansökan ber vi dig att lämna personuppgifter om dig själv, till exempel när du söker en viss ledig tjänst via vår webbplats/portal eller, om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell, under ditt anställningsförhållande. All information lämnas på frivillig basis och du bestämmer själv i vilken utsträckning du lämnar information till Honeywell.
Tänk på att vissa uppgifter kan vara nödvändiga för att vi ska kunna utvärdera din ansökan, och om de inte lämnas kan vår möjlighet att överväga dig som kandidat vara begränsad.
(i)   Personlig information
Vi kan samla in följande personuppgifter om dig:
Personuppgifter och kontaktinformation, inklusive e-postadress, telefonnummer och foto;
Yrkes- och utbildningsinformation relaterad till ditt yrke, såsom din nuvarande eller tidigare arbetsgivare, din jobbtitel eller annan information om den organisation som du är ansluten till. Du kan också lämna ditt CV och information om dina kvalifikationer eller din utbildning, t.ex. dina examina, studieinriktningar, vilka institutioner du har gått på, språk, yrkesmässiga medlemskap, certifieringar, uppgifter om resultatbedömningar och ersättning;
Karriärpreferenser (t.ex. kortsiktiga och långsiktiga mål, villighet att omplacera, datum för omplacering och ortspreferenser);
Personuppgifter som härrör från ditt deltagande i vår rekryteringsprocess, t.ex. de som erhålls under intervjuer, de e-postmeddelanden vi utbyter med dig angående din ansökan eller de samtal vi har med dig via vår Chatbot online.
Ljud- och bildinformation, t.ex. din röst och bild som fångats på fotografier, video- eller ljudinspelningar om du deltar i en telefon- eller videointervju eller om du besöker våra kontor;
Alla andra personuppgifter som du frivilligt väljer att lämna till oss.
(ii)  Känslig personlig information
Vi kan också samla in särskilda kategorier av personuppgifter om dig (även kallade "särskilda kategorier av personuppgifter") om vi har en rättslig skyldighet att göra det, eller om informationen är relevant för din framtida arbetsmiljö på Honeywell, eller för framtida tillhandahållande av anställningsförmåner, eller med ditt uttryckliga samtycke, t.ex:
Statligt utfärdat identifikationsnummer (t.ex. ett socialförsäkringsnummer);
Demografisk information, som kan innehålla information om skyddade klassificeringar, såsom din ålder, kön, ras, funktionshinder, sexuella läggning, civilstånd eller veteranstatus;
Hälsouppgifter (t.ex. för att ta hänsyn till eventuella funktionshinder eller dietrestriktioner);
Information om en persons politiska åsikter, religiösa övertygelse eller medlemskap i fackförening;
Information om en individs brott eller fällande domar, samt all annan information som anses vara känslig enligt gällande dataskyddslagar. Där det är tillåtet enligt lag och i tillämplig utsträckning kan Honeywell också behöva utföra bakgrunds- och/eller brottskontroller för att avgöra din lämplighet för en öppen position eller möjlighet hos Honeywell.
Vi kräver inte att du förser oss med känsliga personuppgifter om det inte är nödvändigt för att uppfylla våra lagstadgade skyldigheter (t.ex. för övervakning av lika möjligheter) eller om du inte har gett ditt uttryckliga samtycke. Förutom i den utsträckning som krävs enligt lag kommer tillhandahållandet av denna information att vara helt frivilligt. Honeywell har åtagit sig att ha en verkligt inkluderande och mångfaldig arbetsstyrka. Genom att förse oss med dina uppgifter om lika möjligheter gör du det möjligt för oss att bättre förstå vår medarbetarprofil när det gäller uppgifter om lika möjligheter och de åtgärder vi behöver vidta för att attrahera, främja och behålla en mångsidig arbetsstyrka oavsett ålder, funktionshinder, kön, ras, religiös eller filosofisk övertygelse och sexuell läggning.
(iii) Personuppgifter som vi samlar in automatiskt från dig
Vi kan automatiskt samla in viss information från dig om ditt besök på våra webbplatser med hjälp av "cookies" och andra liknande spårningstekniker. För mer information om de cookies vi använder på den webbplats där du skickar in din ansökan, läs vårt
meddelande om cookies
.
Källor till personlig information
Vi kan samla in dina personuppgifter direkt från dig eller indirekt från tredje parter som har laglig rätt att dela dina uppgifter med oss, t.ex:
Arbetsförmedlingar, leverantörer av tjänster för bakgrunds-/anställningskontroller eller identitetsverifiering;
Rekryteringsbyråer (t.ex. när en rekryteringsbyrå identifierar dig som en potentiell kandidat);
Allmänt tillgänglig information om dig från webbplatser som LinkedIn eller din nuvarande arbetsgivares webbplats. Du kan också välja att ge oss tillgång till viss personlig information som lagras av tredje part (t.ex. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Genom att tillåta Honeywell att få tillgång till denna information samtycker du till att vi får samla in, lagra och använda denna information i enlighet med detta integritetsmeddelande;
Genom referens eller muntligt (till exempel genom en hänvisning från en nuvarande eller tidigare anställd). För hänvisningar kommer den person som hänvisar dig att vara ansvarig för att få ditt samtycke till att förse oss med dina personuppgifter.
Ändamål för vilka personuppgifter används
Vi använder dina personuppgifter för följande ändamål:
För att utvärdera din ansökan och fatta anställningsbeslut;
Kommunicera med dig och informera dig om rekryteringen och/eller din/dina ansökan/ansökningar eller annan nödvändig kommunikation;
Följa tillämpliga rättsliga och regulatoriska krav och för att vi ska kunna fastställa, utöva eller försvara ett rättsligt anspråk;
Anställning och företagsledning (t.ex. upprätta ett grundläggande anställningsregister om du anställs);
För att utföra aggregerade rapporter/analyser avseende kandidaternas aktivitetsdata (t.ex. trafik till karriärsajten, kandidattrappa, anställningskälla, rekryteringskampanjens framgång);
Endast för anställda på Honeywell
:
För att automatiskt utesluta dig från att proaktivt föreslås för övervägande till rekryterare för en jobbmöjlighet och är inte berättigad till övervägande enligt din nuvarande HPD 9-block rating (som aldrig kommer att avslöjas för någon utanför Honeywell). Du kommer dock alltid att kunna ansöka direkt till alla lediga jobb och din specifika situation kommer att övervägas av en rekryterare.
Endast om du är bosatt i USA
: För att skicka meddelanden till dig via SMS, specifikt:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikation i samband med din ansökan till en viss ledig tjänst och/eller
(ii)    med förbehåll för ditt uttryckliga samtycke, SMS-kampanjkommunikation om anställningsmöjligheter, jobbfrågor och uppdateringar av ansökningar.
Du kommer att kunna välja bort och/eller återkalla ditt samtycke till att ta emot ovannämnda meddelanden genom att följa instruktionerna i din profil.
Om du erbjuds och accepterar anställning hos Honeywell kommer den information som samlats in under ansöknings- och rekryteringsprocessen att bli en del av din anställningshistorik.
Automatiserad behandling och profilering
Med förbehåll för ditt uttryckliga samtycke (som du frivilligt ger när du går med i vår Talent Community eller när du markerar lämplig samtyckesruta under ansökningsprocessen) utför vi "profilering" för att utvärdera din lämplighet för särskilda jobbmöjligheter. Detta innebär att vi använder en matchningsalgoritm som kan utvärdera din anställningsprofil och förutsäga din lämplighet för en viss jobbmöjlighet. Vi utför denna automatiserade behandling i syfte att:
hjälpa rekryterare att matcha kandidaternas profiler med lediga jobb genom att föreslå kandidater som kan komma ifråga för ett specifikt jobb, och
skicka personliga jobbrekommendationer till dig baserat på din profil och/eller dina preferenser eller annan information som kan vara av intresse för dig, till exempel Honeywell-nyheter, webbseminarier och evenemang.
Observera att du på grund av denna profilering kanske inte kommer att beaktas för vissa jobbmöjligheter om du inte har sökt dem direkt.
Vi fattar inga anställningsbeslut som enbart baseras på automatiserade beslutsprocesser och/eller profilering. Dina personuppgifter kommer att bli föremål för mänskliga beslut eftersom det slutliga anställningsbeslutet kommer att fattas av rekryterarna eller den anställande chefen.
De rättsliga grunderna för behandling av dina personuppgifter
Vissa jurisdiktioner kräver att Honeywell har en rättslig grund för att behandla din personliga information. Om tillämplig lag kräver att vi motiverar våra behandlingsaktiviteter, beror vår rättsliga grund för insamling och användning av dina personuppgifter enligt beskrivningen i detta integritetsmeddelande på vilka personuppgifter det gäller och det specifika sammanhang i vilket vi samlar in dem.
Samtycke.
I allmänhet kommer vi normalt att samla in personuppgifter från dig där vi har ditt samtycke till att göra det och där vi behöver dina personuppgifter för att behandla din ansökan. Genom att besöka vår webbplats/portal, gå med i vår Talent Community eller ansöka om en av våra tjänster ger du ditt samtycke till Honeywell att samla in och vidare behandla de personuppgifter som beskrivs ovan för de ändamål som beskrivs i detta sekretessmeddelande. Du kan när som helst
återkalla ditt samtycke
genom att skicka in en begäran via vår portal för begäran från registrerade på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Berättigade intressen.
I Honeywells legitima intressen, nämligen rekrytering, urval, utvärdering och anställning av nya medarbetare samt hantering och administration av rekryteringen och HR-processen i den utsträckning våra legitima intressen inte åsidosätts av dina grundläggande rättigheter och friheter.
Rättsliga skyldigheter.
Överensstämmelse med Honeywells rättsliga skyldigheter där arbetsrätt eller andra lagar kräver behandling av dina personuppgifter (till exempel i den utsträckning lagen kräver övervakning av lika möjligheter och mångfald).
Vitala intressen.
Vi kan också behöva dina personuppgifter för att skydda dina vitala intressen (t.ex. hälso- och säkerhetsskäl om du deltar i en intervju på vår webbplats)
Om du har några frågor om eller behöver ytterligare information om den rättsliga grund på vilken vi samlar in och använder dina personuppgifter, vänligen skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Vem vi delar din personliga information med
Honeywell kommer endast att dela din personliga information med tredje part under följande omständigheter:
Enheter inom Honeywell-koncernen.
Vi kan komma att dela dina personuppgifter med andra koncernenheter i jurisdiktioner runt om i världen för att utvärdera din profil och överväga eventuella rekryteringsmöjligheter på koncernnivå.
Tjänsteleverantörer
Vi kan specifikt dela din personliga information med tredjepartsleverantörer som utför specifika tjänster för vår räkning (till exempel rekrytering och outsourcing av bemanningsleverantörer och analysleverantörer). Sådana tredje parter kan variera beroende på ditt land och kommer att ändras från tid till annan men kan inkludera Phenom People, Inc, Cornerstone OnDemand Inc, och deras respektive tredjepartsleverantörer.
Anställda på Honeywell.
Om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell, observera att vissa avsnitt i din profil är offentliga och därför synliga för alla Honeywell-anställda (särskilt ditt namn, titel, foto, färdigheter, intresseområden, arbetslivserfarenhet och utbildning). Sådana avsnitt är dock redigerbara och du kommer att kunna välja vilken information om dig som ska visas i din profil. Observera att karriärmål, omplaceringar  och profilstatus "öppen för nya möjligheter" kommer inte att vara offentliga och därför inte synliga för alla Honeywell-anställda (endast för Honeywells Talent Team).
Andra tredje parter.
Honeywell kan dela dina personuppgifter med behöriga brottsbekämpande organ, tillsynsmyndigheter, myndigheter, domstolar eller tredje part om vi anser att utlämnandet är nödvändigt enligt tillämplig lag eller i god tro att en sådan åtgärd är nödvändig för att utöva, fastställa eller försvara våra juridiska rättigheter eller för att skydda dina vitala intressen eller någon annan persons intressen. Vi kan också dela dina personuppgifter med andra med ditt samtycke eller på din anvisning (t.ex. en domare eller yrkesförening).
Internationell överföring av personuppgifter
Honeywell är en global organisation och dina personuppgifter kan överföras till, förvaras, lagras eller användas på olika platser i världen, t.ex. i USA och Indien. Detta innebär att när vi samlar in dina personuppgifter kan de behandlas i länder som kan ha dataskyddslagar som skiljer sig från lagarna i ditt land. Honeywell kommer dock alltid att vidta rimliga åtgärder för att skydda din integritet och tillhandahålla en skyddsnivå för personuppgifter som är jämförbar med den i ditt hemland, vilket inkluderar implementering av
Europeiska
kommissionens standardavtalsklausuler
som kan hittas på kommissionens webbplats på
https://ec.europa.eu.
Bevarande
Vi behåller dina personuppgifter så länge det är nödvändigt i samband med de syften som beskrivs i detta integritetsmeddelande och i enlighet med Honeywells schema för bevarande av uppgifter eller enligt vad som krävs i tillämplig lag.
Dina rättigheter
Beroende på tillämplig lag kan du ha vissa rättigheter med avseende på dina personuppgifter. Om du är bosatt i Kalifornien, se "
Ytterligare information för personer bosatta i Kalifornien
" nedan.
Du kan ha rätt att få
tillgång till
,
korrigera
,
uppdatera
eller begära
radering
av dina personuppgifter;
Du kan
invända
mot behandlingen av dina personuppgifter, be oss att
begränsa
behandling av dina personuppgifter eller begära
portabilitet
av dina personuppgifter;
Du kan ha rätt att inte få ett beslut fattat om dig som enbart baseras på automatiserad behandling, inklusive profilering, om det beslutet ger rättsliga effekter om dig eller påverkar dig avsevärt.
Honeywell fattar inte, som en del av sin rekryteringsprocess, enbart automatiserade beslut om kandidater.
På samma sätt, om vi har samlat in och behandlat dina personuppgifter med ditt samtycke, kan du när som helst återkalla ditt samtycke. Att dra tillbaka ditt samtycke påverkar inte lagligheten av någon behandling som vi utförde före ditt tillbakadragande, och det påverkar inte heller behandlingen av dina personuppgifter som utförs i förlitan på andra lagliga behandlingsgrunder än samtycke; och
Du har rätt att klaga till en dataskyddsmyndighet om vår insamling och användning av dina personuppgifter.
Vi kommer att underlätta ditt utövande av de rättigheter som gäller för dig i enlighet med tillämplig lag. Om du vill utöva någon av dina rättigheter avseende dina personuppgifter kan du kontakta oss via HR Help eller via formuläret för begäran från den registrerade som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Ytterligare information för invånare i Kalifornien
Om du är bosatt i delstaten Kalifornien kompletterar detta avsnitt Honeywells sekretessmeddelande för sökande.
(i)    Kategorier av personuppgifter som samlas in och lämnas ut
Honeywell har samlat in och lämnat ut följande kategorier av personuppgifter för våra affärssyften under de senaste tolv månaderna:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi samlar in
A.
Identifierare såsom namn, födelsedatum, kön, e-postadress, telefonnummer, postadress, online-identifierare, konto på sociala medier och andra identifierare.
Ja
C.
Egenskaper hos skyddade klassificeringar enligt kalifornisk eller federal lag, såsom ras, etnicitet, religiös eller filosofisk övertygelse, medlemskap i fackförening, hälsouppgifter, biometrisk information, genetiska uppgifter, funktionshinder, veteranstatus, sexuell läggning, personlig post, e-post och textmeddelanden (om inte Honeywell är den avsedda mottagaren), statliga identifierare (t.ex. socialförsäkringsnummer), körkort, pass, ekonomisk information och bankinformation.
Ja
F.
Information om aktiviteter på Internet eller andra elektroniska nätverk, t.ex. webbläsarhistorik, interaktioner med Honeywells webbplatser, e-post och textmeddelandetjänster.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, t.ex. enhetens position och IP-position.
Ja
H.
Ljud, elektronisk, visuell, termisk eller liknande information, t.ex. din röst och bild, video- eller ljudinspelningar om du deltar i en telefon- eller videointervju eller om du besöker våra kontor.
Ja
I.
Yrkes- eller anställningsrelaterade uppgifter såsom yrke, nuvarande eller tidigare arbetsgivare, befattning, utbildning, akademiska och yrkesmässiga kvalifikationer, CV, arbetshistorik, anställningsreferenser, intervjuanteckningar och bedömningar, språk, yrkesmässiga medlemskap, certifieringar, prestationsbedömningar, ersättning, plats- och resepreferenser.
Ja
K.
Slutsatser som dras från någon av de personuppgifter som anges ovan för att skapa en profil eller sammanfattning om t.ex. en individs preferenser och egenskaper.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dina rättigheter
Du har rätt att skicka en begäran till oss om följande rättigheter under den tolvmånadersperiod som föregår din begäran. Observera att dessa rättigheter inte är absoluta och att de i vissa fall är föremål för begränsningar i enlighet med tillämplig lag:
Rätt att få veta vilka personuppgifter vi har samlat in om dig, från vilka kategorier av källor vi har samlat in dina personuppgifter, för vilka affärs- eller kommersiella ändamål vi har samlat in dina personuppgifter och vilka kategorier av tredje parter som vi lämnar ut dina personuppgifter till;
Rätt att radera dina personuppgifter;
Rätt att korrigera felaktiga personuppgifter om dig;
Rätten att välja bort försäljning eller delning av dina personuppgifter;
Rätten att begränsa behandlingen av dina känsliga personuppgifter;
Rätten att inte utsättas för olaglig diskriminering när du utövar dina rättigheter enligt gällande lagar.
Vi kommer att underlätta ditt utövande av de rättigheter som gäller för dig i enlighet med tillämplig lag och, med tanke på typen och känsligheten hos de personuppgifter som omfattas av begäran, för ditt skydd, kan vi behöva begära att verifiera din identitet och begära ytterligare information från dig.
Om du vill utöva någon av dina rättigheter i samband med dina personuppgifter kan du kontakta oss via formuläret för begäran om uppgifter som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Om du redan är anställd av Honeywell kan du kontakta oss på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakta oss
Om du har några frågor eller klagomål om hur dina personuppgifter behandlas eller vill utöva dina rättigheter, vänligen kontakta:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(endast om du redan är anställd av Honeywell) eller vårt dataskyddsombud på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan också kontakta oss via formuläret för begäran från den registrerade som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Güncellenmiştir: 1 Ocak 2023
Bu Başvuru Sahibi Gizlilik Bildirimi ("Gizlilik Bildirimi"), Honeywell International, Inc. ve
bağlı kuruluş
larının (topluca "
Honeywell
", "
biz
" veya "
biz
") Yetenek Topluluğumuza katıldığınızda, bir iş aradığınızda veya başvurduğunuzda ve portalımız, web sitelerimiz veya diğer işe alım ortamları aracılığıyla çevrimiçi veya çevrimdışı olarak kişisel bilgilerinizi bize gönderdiğinizde ("
Hizmetler
") kişisel bilgilerinizi nasıl işlediğini açıklamaktadır. Geçerli veri koruma yasalarının amaçları doğrultusunda kişisel bilgilerinizin kontrolörleri biziz.
Halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız, Honeywell Global Veri Gizliliği Politikasına ve yargı alanınız için varsa Çalışan Gizliliği Bildirimine de başvurabileceğinizi lütfen unutmayın. Bu Gizlilik Bildiriminin amacı, başvurunuzla ilgili olarak kişisel bilgilerinizi işlememiz hakkında size daha ayrıntılı bilgi vermektir.
Topladığımız Kişisel Bilgiler
Başvurunuzu işleme koymak için, örneğin web sitemiz/portalımız aracılığıyla belirli bir iş ilanına başvurduğunuzda veya halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanı olmanız durumunda, istihdam ilişkiniz sırasında kendinizle ilgili kişisel bilgileri sağlamanızı isteriz. Tüm bilgiler gönüllülük esasına göre sağlanır ve Honeywell'e verdiğiniz bilgilerin kapsamını siz belirlersiniz.
Başvurunuzun değerlendirilmesini tamamlamak için bazı bilgilerin gerekli olabileceğini ve bu bilgilerin sağlanmaması halinde sizi aday olarak değerlendirme imkanımızın sınırlı olabileceğini lütfen unutmayın.
(i)  Kişisel bilgiler
Sizin hakkınızda aşağıdaki kişisel bilgileri toplayabiliriz:
E-posta adresi, telefon numarası/numaraları ve fotoğraf dahil olmak üzere kişisel bilgiler ve iletişim bilgileri;
Mevcut veya önceki işverenleriniz, iş unvanınız veya bağlı olduğunuz kuruluşla ilgili diğer bilgiler gibi mesleğinizle ilgili mesleki ve eğitim bilgileri. Ayrıca CV/özgeçmişinizi ve dereceleriniz, çalışma alanlarınız, katıldığınız kurumlar, diller, mesleki üyelikler, sertifikalar, performans yönetimi derecelendirmeleri ve ücretlendirme ile ilgili ayrıntılar gibi nitelikleriniz veya eğitiminiz hakkında bilgi sağlayabilirsiniz;
Kariyer tercihleri (örneğin, kısa ve uzun vadeli hedefler, yer değiştirme isteği, yer değiştirme için uygun tarih ve yer tercihleri);
Örneğin mülakatlar sırasında elde edilenler, başvurunuzla ilgili olarak sizinle paylaştığımız e-postalar veya çevrimiçi Sohbet Robotumuz aracılığıyla sizinle yaptığımız konuşmalar gibi işe alım sürecimize katılımınızdan elde edilen kişisel bilgiler.
Bir telefon veya video görüşmesine katılmanız veya ofislerimizi ziyaret etmeniz halinde fotoğraf, video veya ses kayıtlarında yakalanan sesiniz ve benzerliğiniz gibi işitsel ve görsel bilgiler;
Bize gönüllü olarak vermeyi seçtiğiniz diğer kişisel bilgiler.
(ii)  Hassas kişisel bilgiler
Ayrıca, yasal bir zorunluluğumuz olduğunda veya aşağıdaki durumlarda hakkınızda özel kişisel bilgi kategorileri ("özel kişisel bilgi kategorileri" olarak da bilinir) toplayabiliriz bilgiler Honeywell'deki gelecekteki çalışma ortamınızla veya gelecekte istihdam avantajlarının sağlanmasıyla ilgilidir veya açık izninizle, örneğin:
Devlet tarafından verilen kimlik numarası (sosyal güvenlik numarası gibi);
Yaşınız, cinsiyetiniz, ırkınız, engellilik durumunuz, cinsel yöneliminiz, medeni durumunuz veya gazilik durumunuz gibi korunan sınıflandırmalarla ilgili bilgileri içerebilecek demografik bilgiler;
Sağlık bilgileri (örneğin, sahip olabileceğiniz herhangi bir engele veya diyet kısıtlamalarına uyum sağlamak için);
Bir kişinin siyasi görüşleri veya dini inançları ya da sendika üyeliği ile ilgili bilgiler;
Bir bireyin cezai suçları veya mahkumiyetleri hakkındaki bilgilerin yanı sıra geçerli veri koruma yasaları kapsamında hassas kabul edilen diğer bilgiler. Yasaların izin verdiği durumlarda ve uygulanabilir olduğu ölçüde, Honeywell'in Honeywell'deki açık bir pozisyon veya fırsat için uygunluğunuzu belirlemek amacıyla geçmiş ve/veya cezai kontroller yapması da gerekebilir.
Düzenleyici yükümlülüklerimizi yerine getirmek için gerekli olmadıkça (örneğin, fırsat eşitliği denetimi için) veya açık rızanızı vermediğiniz sürece bize hassas kişisel bilgilerinizi vermenizi istemeyiz. Yasaların gerektirdiği durumlar dışında, bu bilgilerin sağlanması tamamen gönüllülük esasına dayanacaktır. Honeywell gerçek anlamda kapsayıcı ve çeşitlilik içeren bir iş gücüne kendini adamıştır. Bize fırsat eşitliği verilerinizi sağlayarak, fırsat eşitliği verileri açısından çalışan profilimizi ve yaş, engellilik, cinsiyet, ırk, dini veya felsefi inançlar ve cinsel yönelimden bağımsız olarak çeşitli bir işgücünü çekmek, teşvik etmek ve elde tutmak için atmamız gereken adımları daha iyi anlamamızı sağlarsınız.
(iii) Sizden otomatik olarak topladığımız kişisel bilgiler
"Çerezler" ve diğer benzer izleme teknolojilerini kullanarak web sitelerimizi ziyaretiniz hakkında sizden belirli bilgileri otomatik olarak toplayabiliriz. Başvurunuzu gönderdiğiniz web sitesinde kullandığımız çerezler hakkında daha fazla bilgi için lütfen
Çerez Bildirimimizi
okuyun.
Kişisel Bilgi Kaynakları
Kişisel bilgilerinizi doğrudan sizden veya dolaylı olarak bilgilerinizi bizimle paylaşmaya yasal olarak yetkili olan üçüncü taraflardan toplayabiliriz, örneğin
İş bulma kurumları, geçmiş/istihdam kontrolü veya kimlik doğrulama hizmeti sağlayıcıları;
İşe alım ajansları (örneğin, bir işe alım ajansı sizi potansiyel bir aday olarak tanımladığında);
LinkedIn veya mevcut işvereninizin web sitesi gibi sitelerden sizin hakkınızda kamuya açık bilgiler. Ayrıca bize üçüncü taraflarca (örneğin LinkedIn, Twitter, Google veya Facebook) saklanan belirli kişisel bilgilere erişim sağlamayı da seçebilirsiniz. Honeywell'e bu bilgilere erişim yetkisi vererek, bu bilgileri bu Gizlilik Bildirimine uygun olarak toplayabileceğimizi, saklayabileceğimizi ve kullanabileceğimizi kabul etmiş olursunuz;
Referans veya kulaktan kulağa (örneğin, mevcut veya eski bir çalışanın yönlendirmesi yoluyla). Yönlendirmelerde, kişisel bilgilerinizi bize sağlamak için onayınızı almaktan sizi yönlendiren kişi sorumlu olacaktır.
Kişisel Bilgilerin Kullanıldığı Amaçlar
Kişisel bilgilerinizi aşağıdaki amaçlar için kullanırız:
Başvurunuzu değerlendirmek ve işe alım kararı vermek için;
Sizinle iletişim kurmak ve işe alım ve/veya başvuru(larınız) veya diğer gerekli iletişimler hakkında sizi bilgilendirmek;
Yürürlükteki yasal ve düzenleyici gerekliliklere uymak ve yasal bir hak talebinde bulunmamız, bu talebi yerine getirmemiz veya savunmamız için;
İstihdam ve kurumsal yönetim (örneğin, işe alınmanız halinde temel bir istihdam kaydı oluşturun);
Adayların faaliyet verilerine ilişkin toplu raporlar / analizler yapmak (örneğin, kariyer sitesi trafiği, aday hunisi, işe alım kaynağı, işe alım kampanyası başarısı);
Yalnızca Honeywell çalışanları içindir
:
Sizi bir iş fırsatı için işe alım uzmanlarına proaktif olarak önerilmekten otomatik olarak hariç tutmak ve mevcut HPD 9 blok derecelendirmenize göre değerlendirmeye uygun olmamanız (Honeywell dışında kimseye asla açıklanmayacaktır). Bununla birlikte, mevcut herhangi bir iş fırsatına her zaman doğrudan başvurabileceksiniz ve özel durumunuz bir işe alım görevlisi tarafından değerlendirilecektir.
Yalnızca Amerika Birleşik Devletleri'nde ikamet ediyorsanız
:
Size özellikle SMS yoluyla iletişim göndermek için:
(i)     1-1 Belirli bir iş ilanına başvurunuzla bağlantılı olarak SMS iletişimleri; ve/veya
(ii)    açık rızanıza tabi olarak
,
istihdam fırsatları, iş ilişkileri ve başvuru güncellemeleri hakkında SMS kampanya iletişimleri.
Profilinizde verilen talimatları izleyerek yukarıda belirtilen iletişimleri alma izninizi devre dışı bırakabilir ve/veya iptal edebilirsiniz.
Honeywell'den iş teklifi alır ve kabul ederseniz, başvuru ve işe alım sürecinde toplanan bilgiler istihdam kaydınızın bir parçası haline gelecektir.
Otomatik İşleme ve Profil Oluşturma
Açık rızanıza tabi olarak (Yetenek Topluluğumuza katılırken veya başvuru sürecinde uygun onay kutusunu işaretlerken gönüllü olarak verdiğiniz), belirli iş fırsatlarına uygunluğunuzu değerlendirmek için 'profilleme' yapıyoruz. Bu, istihdam profilinizi değerlendirebilen ve belirli bir iş fırsatı için uygunluğunuzu tahmin edebilen bir eşleştirme algoritması kullanmayı içerir. Bu otomatik işlemeyi şu amaçlarla gerçekleştiriyoruz:
belirli bir iş fırsatı için değerlendirilmek üzere adaylar önererek işe alım uzmanlarının adayların profillerini iş fırsatlarıyla eşleştirmesine yardımcı olmak; ve
profilinize ve/veya tercihlerinize veya Honeywell haberleri, web seminerleri ve etkinlikleri gibi ilginizi çekebilecek diğer bilgilere dayalı olarak size kişiselleştirilmiş iş önerileri göndermek.
Bu profillemeye dayanarak, doğrudan başvurmadığınız sürece belirli iş fırsatları için değerlendirilmeyebileceğinizi lütfen unutmayın. İşe alma kararlarını yalnızca otomatik karar verme süreçlerine ve/veya profil oluşturmaya dayalı olarak vermiyoruz. Nihai işe alım kararı işe alım görevlileri veya işe alım müdürü tarafından verileceğinden, kişisel bilgileriniz insan yapımı kararlara tabi olacaktır.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizin İşlenmesinin Yasal Dayanakları
Bazı yargı bölgeleri, Honeywell'in kişisel bilgilerinizi işlemek için yasal bir dayanağa sahip olmasını gerektirir. Yürürlükteki yasaların işleme faaliyetlerimizi gerekçelendirmemizi gerektirdiği durumlarda, kişisel bilgilerinizi bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklandığı şekilde toplamak ve kullanmak için yasal dayanağımız, ilgili kişisel bilgilere ve bunları topladığımız özel bağlama bağlı olacaktır.
Onay.
Genel olarak, normalde sizin onayınızı aldığımız ve başvurunuzu işleme koymak için kişisel bilgilerinize ihtiyaç duyduğumuz durumlarda sizden kişisel bilgilerinizi toplayacağız. Web sitemize/portalımıza erişerek, Yetenek Topluluğumuza katılarak veya iş pozisyonlarımızdan birine başvurarak, Honeywell'in bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklanan amaçlar doğrultusunda yukarıda açıklanan kişisel bilgileri toplamasına ve daha fazla işlemesine izin vermiş olursunuz.
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresindeki veri sahibi talep portalımız üzerinden bir talepte bulunarak veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta göndererek onayınızı istediğiniz zaman
geri çekebilirsiniz
.
Meşru menfaatler.
Honeywell'in meşru menfaatleri, yani yeni çalışanların işe alınması, seçilmesi, değerlendirilmesi ve atanması ve meşru menfaatlerimizin temel hak ve özgürlükleriniz tarafından geçersiz kılınmadığı ölçüde işe alım ve İK sürecinin yönetimi ve idaresi.
Yasal yükümlülükler.
İş kanunu veya diğer kanunların kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesini gerektirdiği durumlarda Honeywell'in yasal yükümlülüklerine uygunluk (örneğin, kanun fırsat eşitliği ve çeşitliliğin izlenmesini gerektirdiği ölçüde).
Hayati çıkarlar.
Kişisel bilgilerinize hayati çıkarlarınızı korumak için de ihtiyaç duyabiliriz (örneğin, tesisimizde bir görüşmeye katılmanız durumunda sağlık ve güvenlik nedenleri)
Kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımız ve kullandığımız yasal dayanak hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz varsa veya daha fazla bilgiye ihtiyacınız varsa, lütfen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizi Kiminle Paylaşıyoruz
Honeywell kişisel bilgilerinizi yalnızca aşağıdaki durumlarda üçüncü taraflarla paylaşacaktır:
Honeywell grup kuruluşları
. Kişisel bilgilerinizi, profilinizi değerlendirmek ve grup düzeyinde herhangi bir işe alım fırsatını değerlendirmek için dünyanın dört bir yanındaki yargı bölgelerinde bulunan diğer grup kuruluşlarıyla paylaşabiliriz.
Hizmet sağlayıcılar
Kişisel bilgilerinizi, bizim adımıza belirli hizmetleri gerçekleştiren üçüncü taraf hizmet sağlayıcılarla (örneğin, işe alım ve dış kaynak personel sağlayıcıları ve analiz sağlayıcıları) özel olarak paylaşabiliriz. Bu tür üçüncü taraflar ülkenize bağlı olarak değişebilir ve zaman zaman değişebilir, ancak Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. ve ilgili üçüncü taraf sağlayıcılarını içerebilir.
Honeywell çalışanları.
Zaten bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız, profilinizdeki bazı bölümlerin herkese açık olduğunu ve bu nedenle tüm Honeywell çalışanları tarafından görülebileceğini lütfen unutmayın (özellikle adınız, unvanınız, fotoğrafınız, becerileriniz, ilgi alanlarınız, iş deneyiminiz ve eğitiminiz). Ancak, bu bölümler düzenlenebilir ve profilinizde sizinle ilgili hangi bilgilerin gösterileceğini seçebileceksiniz. Lütfen kariyer hedeflerinin, yer değiştirmelerin ve profil durumu "yeni fırsatlara açık" bölümleri herkese açık olmayacak ve bu nedenle tüm Honeywell çalışanları tarafından görülemeyecektir (yalnızca Honeywell'in Yetenek Ekibi tarafından).
Diğer üçüncü taraflar.
Honeywell, ifşanın yürürlükteki yasalar uyarınca gerekli olduğuna inandığımız veya yasal haklarımızı kullanmak, tesis etmek veya savunmak ya da sizin veya başka bir kişinin hayati çıkarlarını korumak için bu tür bir eylemin gerekli olduğuna iyi niyetle inandığımız durumlarda kişisel bilgilerinizi herhangi bir yetkili kolluk kuvveti, düzenleyici, devlet kurumu, mahkeme veya üçüncü tarafla paylaşabilir. Kişisel bilgilerinizi sizin izninizle veya sizin talimatınızla başkalarıyla da paylaşabiliriz (örneğin bir hakem veya meslek birliği).
Kişisel Bilgilerin Uluslararası Aktarımı
Honeywell küresel bir kuruluştur ve kişisel bilgileriniz ABD ve Hindistan gibi dünya çapında çeşitli konumlara aktarılabilir, tutulabilir, saklanabilir veya kullanılabilir. Bu, kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımızda, ülkenizin yasalarından farklı veri koruma yasalarına sahip olabilecek ülkelerde işlenebileceği anlamına gelir. Ancak Honeywell, gizliliğinizi korumak ve ikamet ettiğiniz ülkedekiyle karşılaştırılabilir bir kişisel bilgi koruma düzeyi sağlamak için her zaman makul adımlar atacaktır; bu adımlar arasında Komisyonun
https://ec.europa.eu
adresindeki web sitesinde bulunabilecek
Avrupa
Komisyonu Standart Sözleşme Maddelerinin
uygulanması da yer almaktadır.
Elde tutma
Kişisel bilgilerinizi, bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklanan amaçlarla bağlantılı olarak gerekli olduğu sürece ve Honeywell'in Kayıt Saklama Programına uygun olarak veya geçerli yasaların gerektirdiği şekilde saklayacağız.
Sizin Haklarınız
Yürürlükteki yasalara bağlı olarak, kişisel bilgilerinizle ilgili belirli haklara sahip olabilirsiniz. Kaliforniya'da ikamet ediyorsanız lütfen aşağıdaki "
Kaliforniya'da İkamet Edenler için Ek Bilgiler
" bölümüne bakın.
Kişisel bilgilerinize
erişme, düzeltme, güncelleme
veya
silinmesini
talep etme hakkına sahip olabilirsiniz;
Kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesine
itiraz
edebilir,
kısıtlamamızı
isteyebilir kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesi veya kişisel bilgilerinizin
taşınabilirliğini
talep etme;
Hakkınızda, profil oluşturma da dahil olmak üzere, yalnızca otomatik işlemeye dayalı bir karar verilmesini, bu kararın hakkınızda yasal etkiler doğurması veya sizi önemli ölçüde etkilemesi durumunda istememe hakkına sahip olabilirsiniz.
Honeywell, işe alım sürecinin bir parçası olarak adaylar hakkında yalnızca otomatik kararlar almaz.
Benzer şekilde, kişisel bilgilerinizi sizin izninizle toplamış ve işlemişsek, izninizi istediğiniz zaman geri çekebilirsiniz. Onayınızı geri çekmeniz, geri çekmenizden önce gerçekleştirdiğimiz herhangi bir işlemin yasallığını etkilemeyeceği gibi, kişisel bilgilerinizin onay dışındaki yasal işleme gerekçelerine dayanılarak işlenmesini de etkilemeyecektir; ve
Kişisel bilgilerinizi toplamamız ve kullanmamız hakkında bir veri koruma yetkilisine şikayette bulunma hakkına sahipsiniz.
Geçerli yasalara uygun olarak sizin için geçerli olan hakları kullanmanızı kolaylaştıracağız. Kişisel bilgilerinizle ilgili haklarınızdan herhangi birini kullanmak için lütfen İK Yardımı veya
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri sahibi talep formu aracılığıyla bizimle iletişime geçin veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin.
Kaliforniya'da İkamet Edenler İçin Ek Bilgiler
Kaliforniya Eyaleti'nde ikamet ediyorsanız, bu bölüm Honeywell'in Başvuru Sahibi Gizlilik Bildirimi'ni tamamlar.
(i)     Toplanan ve İfşa Edilen Kişisel Bilgi Kategorileri
Honeywell, önceki on iki ay içinde iş amaçlarımız için aşağıdaki kişisel bilgi kategorilerini toplamış ve ifşa etmiştir:
Previous column
Next column
Kategoriler
Biz topluyoruz
A.
İsim, doğum tarihi, cinsiyet, e-posta adresi, telefon numaraları, posta adresi, çevrimiçi tanımlayıcılar, sosyal medya hesabı ve diğer tanımlayıcılar gibi tanımlayıcılar.
Evet
C.
Irk, etnik köken, dini veya felsefi inançlar, sendika üyeliği, sağlık verileri, biyometrik bilgiler, genetik veriler, engellilik, gazilik durumu, cinsel yönelim, kişisel posta, e-posta ve kısa mesajlar (amaçlanan alıcı Honeywell olmadığı sürece), devlet tanımlayıcıları (ör. sosyal güvenlik numarası), ehliyet, pasaport, finans ve bankacılık bilgileri gibi Kaliforniya veya federal yasalar kapsamında korunan sınıflandırmaların özellikleri.
Evet
F.
Tarama geçmişi, Honeywell web siteleri, e-posta ve metin mesajlaşma hizmetleri ile etkileşimler gibi İnternet veya diğer elektronik ağ etkinlik bilgileri.
Evet
G.
Cihaz konumu ve IP konumu gibi coğrafi konum verileri.
Evet
H.
Bir telefon veya video görüşmesine katılmanız veya ofislerimizi ziyaret etmeniz halinde sesiniz ve görüntünüz, video veya ses kayıtları gibi sesli, elektronik, görsel, termal veya benzeri bilgiler.
Evet
I.
Mesleğiniz, mevcut veya önceki işverenleriniz, iş unvanınız, eğitim geçmişiniz, akademik ve mesleki nitelikleriniz, özgeçmişiniz, iş geçmişiniz, işe alma referanslarınız, mülakat notlarınız ve değerlendirmeleriniz, dilleriniz, mesleki üyelikleriniz, sertifikalarınız, performans yönetimi derecelendirmeleriniz, tazminatınız, konum tercihleriniz ve seyahat tercihleriniz gibi mesleki veya istihdamla ilgili bilgiler.
Evet
K.
Örneğin bir bireyin tercihleri ve özellikleri hakkında bir profil veya özet oluşturmak için yukarıda listelenen kişisel bilgilerden herhangi birinden yapılan çıkarımlar.
Evet
Load More
(ii)    Sizin haklarınız
Talebinizden önceki on iki aylık dönemi kapsayan aşağıdaki haklar için bize bir talep gönderme hakkına sahipsiniz. Bu hakların mutlak olmadığını ve bazı durumlarda yürürlükteki yasalarda belirtilen sınırlamalara tabi olduğunu lütfen unutmayın:
Hakkınızda hangi kişisel bilgileri topladığımızı, kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımız kaynak kategorilerini; kişisel bilgilerinizi hangi iş veya ticari amaç için topladığımızı ve kişisel bilgilerinizi ifşa ettiğimiz üçüncü taraf kategorilerini bilme hakkı;
Kişisel bilgilerinizi silme hakkı;
Hakkınızdaki yanlış kişisel bilgileri düzeltme hakkı;
Kişisel bilgilerinizin satışından veya paylaşımından vazgeçme hakkı;
Hassas kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesini sınırlandırma hakkı;
Yürürlükteki yasalar kapsamındaki haklarınızı kullandığınız için yasadışı ayrımcılığa maruz kalmama hakkı.
Yürürlükteki yasalara uygun olarak sizin için geçerli olan hakları kullanmanızı kolaylaştıracağız ve talebe konu olan kişisel bilgilerin türü ve hassasiyetini göz önünde bulundurarak, korunmanız için kimliğinizin doğrulanmasını talep etmemiz ve sizden ek bilgi talep etmemiz gerekebilir.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizle ilgili haklarınızdan herhangi birini kullanmak için lütfen
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri konusu talep formu aracılığıyla bizimle iletişime geçin veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin. Halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız
HRhelp@honeywell.com
adresinden bizimle iletişime geçebilirsiniz.
Bize Ulaşın
Kişisel bilgilerinizin nasıl işlendiği hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz veya şikayetiniz varsa veya haklarınızı kullanmak istiyorsanız, lütfen iletişime geçin:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(yalnızca zaten bir Honeywell çalışanı iseniz) veya
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
adresinden Veri Koruma Görevlimiz. Ayrıca
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri sahibi talep formu aracılığıyla da bizimle iletişime geçebilirsiniz.
English
Updated:  1 January 2023
This Applicant Privacy Notice (“Privacy Notice”) describes how Honeywell International, Inc. and its
affiliates
(collectively “
Honeywell
”, "
us
" or “
we
”) process your personal information when you join our Talent Community, search or apply for a job and submit personal information to us via our portal, websites or other recruitment mediums, whether online or offline (the "
Services
"). We are the controllers of your personal information for the purposes of applicable data protection laws.
Please note that if you are already a Honeywell employee you can also refer to the Honeywell Global Data Privacy Policy and the Employee Privacy Notice where one exists for your jurisdiction. The aim of this Privacy Notice is to give you more detailed information about our processing of your personal information in relation to your application.
Personal Information We Collect
To process your application, we ask you to provide the personal information about yourself, for example when you apply for a particular job vacancy through our website/portal or, in case that you already are a Honeywell employee, during your employment relationship. All information is provided on a voluntary basis and you determine the extent of information you provide to Honeywell.
Please bear in mind that some information may be necessary to complete an evaluation of your application and if it is not provided, our ability to consider you as a candidate may be limited.
(i)   Personal information
We may collect the following personal information about you:
Personal details and contact information including email address, telephone number(s), and photograph;
Professional and educational information related to your occupation, such as your current or previous employers, your job title, or other information about the organization with which you are affiliated. You may also provide your CV/resume and information about your qualifications or your education, such as your degrees, fields of study, the institutions you’ve attended, languages, professional memberships, certifications, details on performance management ratings and compensation;
Career preferences (e.g., short-term and long-term goals, willingness to relocate, date available to relocate and location preferences);
Personal information derived from your participation in our recruitment process, such as, for example, those obtained during interviews, the emails we exchange with you regarding your application or the conversations we have with you through our online Chatbot.
Audio and visual information, such as your voice and likeness as captured in photographs, video or audio recordings if you participate in a phone or video interview, or if you visit our offices;
Any other personal information that you voluntarily choose to provide to us.
(ii)  Sensitive personal information
We may also collect special categories of personal information about you (also known as “special categories of personal information”) where we have a legal obligation to do so, or the information is relevant to your future working environment at Honeywell, or for the future provision of employment benefits, or with your explicit consent such as:
Government-issued identification number (such as a social security number);
Demographic information, which may include information about protected classifications, such as your age, gender, race, disabilities, sexual orientation, marital status, or veteran status;
Health information (for example, to accommodate any disability you may have or dietary restrictions);
Information relating to a person's political opinions or religious beliefs or trade union membership;
Information about an individual's criminal offences or convictions, as well as any other information deemed sensitive under applicable data protection laws. Where permitted by law and to the extent applicable, Honeywell may also need to carry out background and/or criminal checks to determine your suitability for an open position or opportunity at Honeywell.
We do not require you to provide us with sensitive personal information unless it is necessary for the purposes of carrying out our regulatory obligations (e..g., for equal opportunity monitoring), or unless you have provided your explicit consent. Except to the extent required by law, the provision of this information will be entirely voluntary. Honeywell is committed to a true inclusive and diverse workforce. By providing us with your equal opportunity data, you allow us to better understand our employee profile in terms of equal opportunities data and the action we need to take to attract, promote and retain a diverse workforce regardless of age, disability, gender, race, religious or philosophical beliefs and sexual orientation.
(iii) Personal information we collect automatically from you
We may automatically collect certain information from you about your visit to our websites using "cookies" and other similar tracking technologies. For further information about the cookies we use on the website through which you submit your application, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
Sources of Personal Information
We may collect your personal information directly from you or indirectly from third parties who are lawfully entitled to share your information with us such as:
Employment agencies, background/employment check or identity verification service providers;
Recruitment agencies (for example, when a recruitment agency identifies you as a potential candidate);
Publicly available information about you from sites such as LinkedIn or your current employer's website. You may also choose to provide us with access to certain personal information stored by third parties (for example, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google or Facebook). By authorizing Honeywell to have access to this information, you agree that we may collect, store and use this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice;
By reference or word of mouth (for example, through a referral from a current or former employee). For referrals, the person who is referring you will be responsible for obtaining your consent to provide us with your personal information.
Purposes for which Personal Information is used
We use your personal information for the following purposes:
To evaluate your application and make hiring decisions;
Communicate with you and to inform you about the recruitment and/or your application(s) or any other required communications;
Comply with applicable legal and regulatory requirements and in order for us to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim;
Employment and corporate management (for example, establish a basic employment record if you are hired);
To carry out aggregated reports / analysis regarding candidates’ activity data (e.g. career site traffic, candidate funnel, source of hire, recruiting campaign success);
For Honeywell employees only:
To automatically exclude you from being proactively suggested for consideration to recruiters for a job opportunity and are not eligible for consideration per your current HPD 9-block rating (which will never be revealed to anyone outside Honeywell). However, you will always be able to directly apply for any job opportunity available and your specific situation will be considered by a recruiter.
Only where you are a resident of the United States:
To send you communications via SMS, specifically:
(i)     1-1 SMS communications in connection with your application to a particular job vacancy; and/or
(ii)    subject to your express consent, SMS campaign communications about employment opportunities, job affairs and application updates.
You will be able to opt out and/or revoke your consent for receiving the abovementioned communications following the instructions given in your profile.
If you are offered and accept employment with Honeywell, the information collected during the application and recruitment process will become part of your employment record.
Automated Processing and Profiling
Subject to your express consent (which you voluntarily provide when joining our Talent Community or when checking the appropriate consent box during the application process), we conduct 'profiling' to evaluate your suitability for particular job opportunities. This involves using a matching algorithm that is able to evaluate your employment profile and predict your eligibility for a particular job opportunity. We carry out this automated processing for the purposes of:
helping recruiters match candidates’ profiles to job opportunities by suggesting candidates for consideration for a specific job opportunity; and
sending personalized job recommendations to you based on your profile and/or preferences or other information that may be of interest for you such as Honeywell news, webinars and events.
Please note that based on this profiling, you may not be considered for certain job opportunities unless you have applied for them directly.
We do not make hiring decisions based solely on automated decision-making processes and/or profiling. Your personal information will be subjected to human-made decisions as the ultimate hiring decision will be made by the recruiters or hiring manager.
The Legal Bases for Processing Your Personal Information
Certain jurisdictions require Honeywell to have a legal basis for processing your personal information. Where applicable law requires us to justify our processing activities, our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
Consent.
In general, we will normally collect personal information from you where we have your consent to do so and where we need your personal information to process your application. By accessing our website/portal, joining our Talent Community or applying for one of our job positions, you provide your consent to Honeywell to collect and further process the personal information described above for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice. You may
withdraw your consent
at any time by making submitting a request through our data subject request portal at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or sending us an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitimate interests.
In Honeywell’s legitimate interests, namely the recruitment, selection, evaluation and appointment of new employees and the management and administration of the recruitment and the HR process to the extent our legitimate interests are not overridden by your fundamental rights and freedoms.
Legal obligations
. Compliance with Honeywell’s legal obligations where employment law or other laws require the processing of your personal information (for example to the extent the law requires the monitoring equality of opportunity and diversity).
Vital interests.
We may also need your personal information to protect your
vital interests (for example, health and safety reasons if you attend an interview at our site)
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Who We Share Your Personal Information With
Honeywell will only share your personal information with third parties under the following circumstances:
Honeywell group entities
. We may share your personal information with other group entities located in jurisdictions around the world for evaluating your profile and consideration for any recruitment opportunities at a group level.
Service providers
We may specifically share your personal information with third party service providers that perform specific services on our behalf (for example, recruitment and outsourcing staffing providers and analytics providers). Such third parties may vary depending on your country and will change from time to time but may include Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc., and their respective third-party providers.
Honeywell employees.
If you are already a Honeywell employee, please note that some sections on your profile are public and, therefore, visible to all Honeywell employees (specifically, your name, title, photograph, skills, interest areas, work experience and education). However, such sections are editable and you will be able to choose which information about you is shown in your profile. Please note that the career goals, relocations and profile status "open to new opportunities" sections will not be public and, therefore, not visible to all Honeywell employees (only to Honeywell's Talent Team).
Other third parties.
Honeywell may share your personal information with any competent law enforcement body, regulator, government agency, court or third party where we believe the disclosure is necessary under applicable law or in the good-faith belief that such action is necessary to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights or to protect your vital interests or those of another person. We may also share your personal information with others with your consent or at your direction (e.g. a referee or professional association).
International Transfers of Personal Information
Honeywell is a global organization and your personal information may be transferred to, held, stored or used across various locations worldwide such as the US and India. This means that when we collect your personal information it may be processed in countries that may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country. However, Honeywell will always take reasonable steps to protect your privacy and to provide a level of protection of personal information that is comparable to that of your country of residence which include implementing the
European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses
which may be found at the Commission's website at
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retention
We will retain your personal information for as long as necessary in connection with the purposes described in this Privacy Notice and in accordance with Honeywell's Record Retention Schedule or as required by applicable law.
Your Rights
Depending on applicable law, you may have certain rights with respect to your personal information. If you are a Californian resident please refer to “
Additional Information for California Residents
” below.
You may have the right to
access, correct, update
or request
deletion
of your personal information;
You can
object
to the processing of your personal information, ask us to
restrict
processing of your personal information or request
portability
of your personal information;
You may have the right not to have a decision made about you that is based solely on automated processing, including
profiling if that decision produces legal effects about you or significantly affects you.
Honeywell does not, as part of its recruitment process, make solely automated decisions about candidates.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal information with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent; and
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information.
We will facilitate your exercise of the rights that apply to you in accordance with applicable law. To exercise any of your rights relating to your personal information, please contact us through HR Help, or the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Additional Information for California Residents
If you are a resident of the State of California, this section supplements Honeywell’s Applicant Privacy Notice.
(i)      Categories of Personal Information Collected and Disclosed
Honeywell has collected and disclosed the following categories of personal information for our business purposes in the preceding twelve-months:
Previous column
Next column
Categories
We collect
A.
Identifiers such as name, date of birth, gender, email address, telephone numbers, postal address, online identifiers, social media account and other identifiers.
Yes
C.
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law such as race, ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, health data, biometric information, genetic data, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, personal mail, email and text messages (unless Honeywell is the intended recipient), government identifiers (e.g., social security number), driver’s license, passport, financial and banking information.
Yes
F.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as browsing history, interactions with Honeywell websites, email and text messaging services.
Yes
G.
Geolocation data, such as device location and IP location.
Yes
H.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal or similar information, such as your voice and image, video or audio recordings if you participate in a phone or video interview or if you visit our offices.
Yes
I.
Professional or employment-related information such as your occupation, current or previous employers, job title, educational history, academic and professional qualifications, resume, job history, hiring references, interview notes and assessments, languages, professional memberships, certifications, performance management ratings, compensation, location preferences and  travel preferences.
Yes
K.
Inferences drawn from any of the personal information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics.
Yes
Load More
(ii)      Your rights
You have the right to send us a request for the following rights covering the twelve-month period that precedes your request. Please note that these rights are not absolute and in certain cases are subject to limitations as specified in applicable law:
The right to know what personal information we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected your personal information; the business or commercial purpose for which we collected your personal information for, and the categories of third parties with which we disclose your personal information;
The right to delete your personal information;
The right to correct inaccurate personal information about you;
The right to opt out of the sale or sharing of your personal information;
The right to limit the processing of your sensitive personal information;
The right to be free from unlawful discrimination for exercising your rights under applicable laws.
We will facilitate your exercise of the rights that apply to you in accordance with applicable law and, considering the type and sensitivity of the personal information subject to the request, for your protection, we may need to request verify your identity and request additional information from you.
To exercise any of your rights relating to your personal Information, please contact us through the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
or send an email to
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. If you are already a Honeywell employee you may contact us at
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contact Us
If you have any question or complaints about how your personal information is processed or wish to exercise your rights, please contact:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(only if you already are a Honeywell employee) or our Data Protection Officer at
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
You may also contact us through the data subject request form found at
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Chinese
已更新：2023 年 1 月 1 日
本《求职者隐私声明》（以下简称 "隐私声明"）介绍了霍尼韦尔国际公司及其
关联公司
（以下统称 "
霍尼韦尔
"、"
我们
"或 "
我们
"）在您加入我们的人才社区、搜索或申请职位以及通过我们的门户网站、网站或其他招聘媒介（无论是在线还是离线）向我们提交个人信息时（以下简称 "
服务
"）如何处理您的个人信息。根据适用的数据保护法，我们是您个人信息的控制者。
请注意，如果您已经是霍尼韦尔的员工，您也可以参考霍尼韦尔全球数据隐私政策和员工隐私声明（如果您所在的司法管辖区有）。本隐私声明旨在向您提供更详细的信息，说明我们如何处理与您的申请相关的个人信息。
我们收集的个人信息
为了处理您的申请，我们会要求您提供有关您的个人信息，例如，当您通过我们的网站/门户申请某个职位空缺时，或者，如果您已经是霍尼韦尔的员工，在您的雇佣关系存续期间，我们会要求您提供有关您的个人信息。所有信息都是在自愿的基础上提供的，您可以决定向霍尼韦尔提供信息的范围。
请注意，有些信息可能是完成申请评估所必需的，如果不提供这些信息，我们考虑您作为候选人的能力可能会受到限制。
(i)   个人信息
我们可能会收集您的以下个人信息：
个人信息和联系方式，包括电子邮件地址、电话号码和照片；
与您的职业相关的专业和教育信息，例如您目前或以前的雇主、您的职称或有关您所属组织的其他信息。您还可以提供您的简历和有关您的资历或教育背景的信息，例如您的学位、学习领域、就读院校、语言、专业会员资格、认证、绩效管理评级和报酬的详细信息；
职业偏好（如短期和长期目标、搬迁意愿、可搬迁日期和地点偏好）；
您在参与我们的招聘过程中获得的个人信息，例如，在面试过程中获得的信息、我们与您就您的申请交换的电子邮件或我们通过在线聊天机器人与您进行的对话。
音频和视频信息，例如，如果您参加电话或视频访谈，或如果您访问我们的办公室，照片、视频或音频记录中捕捉到的您的声音和肖像；
您自愿提供给我们的任何其他个人信息。
(ii)  敏感个人信息
在以下情况下，我们也可能收集您的特殊类别个人信息（又称 "特殊类别个人信息"）：我们有法律义务这样做，或 与您未来在霍尼韦尔的工作环境相关的信息，或与未来提供就业福利相关的信息，或经您明确同意的信息，如
政府颁发的身份证号码（如社会保险号）；
人口统计信息，其中可能包括受保护类别的信息，如您的年龄、性别、种族、残疾、性取向、婚姻状况或退伍军人身份；
健康信息（例如，为了照顾您的残疾或饮食限制）；
有关个人政治观点、宗教信仰或工会会员身份的信息；
有关个人刑事犯罪或定罪的信息，以及适用的数据保护法认为敏感的任何其他信息。在法律允许和适用的范围内，霍尼韦尔可能还需要进行背景和/或刑事调查，以确定您是否适合霍尼韦尔的空缺职位或机会。
我们不会要求您提供敏感的个人信息，除非是为了履行我们的监管义务（例如，用于平等机会监控），或者您已明确表示同意。除非法律要求，否则提供此类信息完全出于自愿。霍尼韦尔致力于打造一支真正具有包容性和多样性的员工队伍。通过向我们提供您的平等机会数据，我们可以更好地了解我们的员工在平等机会数据方面的情况，以及我们为吸引、晋升和留住不同年龄、残疾、性别、种族、宗教或哲学信仰以及性取向的员工而需要采取的行动。
(iii) 我们自动向您收集的个人信息
我们可能会使用 "cookies "和其他类似跟踪技术自动收集您访问我们网站的某些信息。如需进一步了解我们在您提交申请的网站上使用的 Cookie，请阅读我们的
Cookie 通知
。
个人信息来源
我们可能直接从您那里收集您的个人信息，也可能间接从有权合法与我们共享您的信息的第三方那里收集您的个人信息，例如： 我们可能直接从您那里收集您的个人信息，也可能间接从有权合法与我们共享您的信息的第三方那里收集您的个人信息：
职业介绍所、背景/就业调查或身份验证服务提供商；
招聘机构（例如，当招聘机构将您确定为潜在候选人时）；
从 LinkedIn 或您当前雇主的网站上公开获得的关于您的信息。您也可以选择让我们访问第三方（例如 LinkedIn、Twitter、Google 或 Facebook）存储的某些个人信息。授权霍尼韦尔访问这些信息，即表示您同意我们根据本隐私声明收集、存储和使用这些信息；
推荐或口口相传（例如，通过现任或前任员工的介绍）。对于推荐人，推荐人将负责征得您的同意，向我们提供您的个人信息。
个人信息的使用目的
我们将您的个人信息用于以下目的：
评估您的申请并做出聘用决定；
与您联系，向您通报招聘信息和/或您的申请信息或任何其他必要的信息；
遵守适用的法律和监管要求，以便我们确立、行使或维护法律索赔；
就业和企业管理（例如，如果您被录用，建立基本的就业记录）；
对候选人的活动数据（如职业网站流量、候选人漏斗、聘用来源、招聘活动成功率）进行汇总报告/分析；
仅适用于霍尼韦尔员工
：
自动排除您被主动推荐给招聘人员考虑的工作机会，并且根据您当前的 HPD 9 块评级，您没有资格被考虑（不会向霍尼韦尔以外的任何人透露）。但是，您始终可以直接申请任何工作机会，招聘人员会考虑您的具体情况。
仅限于您是美国居民的情况
：
通过短信向您发送信息，特别是
(i)     与您申请特定职位空缺有关的 1-1 条短信通信；和/或
(ii)    在您明确同意的情况下，发送有关就业机会、工作事务和申请更新的短信。
您可以按照个人资料中的说明选择退出和/或撤销同意接收上述通信。
如果您获得并接受霍尼韦尔的聘用，在申请和招聘过程中收集的信息将成为您工作记录的一部分。
自动处理和特征分析
在您明确同意的前提下（您在加入我们的人才社区或在申请过程中勾选相应的同意框时自愿提供），我们会进行 "特征分析"，以评估您是否适合特定的工作机会。这包括使用匹配算法来评估您的就业情况，并预测您是否有资格获得特定的工作机会。我们进行这种自动处理的目的如下
通过推荐候选人考虑特定的工作机会，帮助招聘人员将候选人的资料与工作机会相匹配；以及
根据您的个人资料和/或偏好或您可能感兴趣的其他信息（如霍尼韦尔新闻、网络研讨会和活动），向您发送个性化的工作推荐。
请注意，除非您直接提出申请，否则某些工作机会可能不会考虑您。
我们不会仅根据自动决策程序和/或特征分析做出招聘决定。您的个人信息将受到人工决策的影响，因为最终的招聘决定将由招聘人员或招聘经理做出。
处理您个人信息的法律依据
某些司法管辖区要求霍尼韦尔在处理您的个人信息时有法律依据。在适用法律要求我们证明我们的处理活动合理的情况下，我们收集和使用本隐私声明中所述您的个人信息的法律依据将取决于相关个人信息以及我们收集信息的具体情况。
同意。
一般情况下，我们在征得您的同意并需要您的个人信息来处理您的申请时，通常会收集您的个人信息。访问我们的网站/门户、加入我们的人才社区或申请我们的职位，即表示您同意霍尼韦尔出于本隐私声明所述目的收集并进一步处理上述个人信息。您可以随时通过我们的数据主体请求门户网站
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
提交请求，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
，撤回您的同意。
合法权益。
符合霍尼韦尔的合法利益，即招聘、选拔、评估和任命新员工，以及招聘和人力资源流程的管理和行政，但我们的合法利益不得超越您的基本权利和自由。
法律义务。
在就业法或其他法律要求处理您的个人信息的情况下（例如，在法律要求监督机会平等和多样性的情况下），遵守霍尼韦尔的法律义务。
重要利益。
我们还可能需要您的个人信息来保护您的重要利益（例如，如果您在我们公司参加面试，出于健康和安全考虑）
如果您对我们收集和使用您个人信息的法律依据有任何疑问或需要更多信息，请发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。
我们与谁共享您的个人信息
霍尼韦尔只会在以下情况下与第三方共享您的个人信息：
霍尼韦尔集团实体。
我们可能会与位于世界各地的其他集团实体共享您的个人信息，以便对您的个人资料进行评估，并考虑在集团层面提供任何招聘机会。
服务提供商
我们可能会专门与代表我们提供特定服务的第三方服务提供商（例如，招聘和外包人员提供商和分析提供商）共享您的个人信息。此类第三方可能会根据您所在国家的不同而有所不同，并且会不时变更，但可能包括 Phenom People, Inc.、Cornerstone OnDemand Inc.
霍尼韦尔员工。
如果您已经是霍尼韦尔员工，请注意您个人资料中的某些部分是公开的，因此所有霍尼韦尔员工都可以看到（特别是您的姓名、职位、照片、技能、兴趣领域、工作经验和教育背景）。但是，这些部分是可以编辑的，您可以选择在个人资料中显示哪些有关您的信息。请注意，职业目标、工作地点和个人资料状态 "接受新机会 "部分不会公开，因此，霍尼韦尔的所有员工都无法看到（只有霍尼韦尔的人才团队可以看到）。
其他第三方。
霍尼韦尔可能会与任何主管执法机构、监管机构、政府机构、法院或第三方共享您的个人信息，前提是我们认为根据适用法律有必要披露您的个人信息，或真诚地认为有必要采取此类行动来行使、确立或捍卫我们的合法权利，或保护您或他人的重要利益。我们也可能在征得您的同意或在您的指示下与他人共享您的个人信息（例如裁判或专业协会）。
个人信息的国际传输
霍尼韦尔是一家全球性企业，您的个人信息可能会被传输、保存、存储或在美国和印度等世界各地使用。这意味着，当我们收集您的个人信息时，可能会在数据保护法律与您所在国家法律不同的国家进行处理。但是，霍尼韦尔将始终采取合理措施保护您的隐私，并提供与您所在国家相当的个人信息保护水平，其中包括执行
欧盟委员会的标准合同条款
，该条款可在欧盟委员会网站
https://ec.europa.eu
上找到。
保留
我们将根据本《隐私声明》所述目的、霍尼韦尔记录保留时间表或适用法律的要求，在必要的时间内保留您的个人信息。
您的权利
根据适用法律，您可能对您的个人信息享有某些权利。如果您是加州居民，请参阅下面的 "
加州居民附加信息
"。
您有权
访问、更正、更新
或要求
删除
您的个人信息；
您可以反对处理您的个人信息，要求我们
限制
处理您的个人信息。处理您的个人信息，或要求
移植
您的个人信息；
您有权不接受完全基于自动化处理（包括个人资料分析）做出的关于您的决定，如果该决定对您产生法律效力或重大影响。
作为招聘流程的一部分，霍尼韦尔不会仅对应聘者做出自动化决定。
同样，如果我们在征得您同意的情况下收集并处理您的个人信息，您可以随时撤销同意。撤销同意不会影响我们在您撤销同意之前进行的任何处理的合法性，也不会影响我们根据除同意之外的其他合法处理理由对您的个人信息进行的处理；以及
您有权就我们收集和使用您个人信息的行为向数据保护机构投诉。
我们将根据适用法律为您行使适用于您的权利提供便利。如需行使与个人信息相关的任何权利，请通过人力资源帮助或
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy- 声明
中的数据主体申请表联系我们，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。
加州居民的其他信息
如果您是加利福尼亚州居民，本部分将补充霍尼韦尔的《申请人隐私声明》。
(i)      收集和披露的个人信息类别
霍尼韦尔在过去 12 个月中出于业务目的收集并披露了以下各类个人信息：
Previous column
Next column
类别
我们收集
A.
身份识别信息，如姓名、出生日期、性别、电子邮件地址、电话号码、邮政地址、在线身份识别信息、社交媒体账户及其他身份识别信息。
是
C.
受加州或联邦法律保护的分类特征，如种族、民族、宗教或哲学信仰、工会会员身份、健康数据、生物识别信息、基因数据、残疾、退伍军人身份、性取向、个人邮件、电子邮件和短信（除非霍尼韦尔是预定收件人）、政府标识符（如社会保险号）、驾驶执照、护照、财务和银行信息。
是
F.
互联网或其他电子网络活动信息，如浏览历史记录、与霍尼韦尔网站、电子邮件和短信服务的互动。
是
G.
地理位置数据，如设备位置和 IP 位置。
是
H.
音频、电子、视觉、热敏或类似信息，例如您的声音和图像，如果您参加电话或视频访谈，或如果您访问我们的办事处，则会有视频或音频记录。
是
I.
专业或就业相关信息，如您的职业、现任或前任雇主、职称、教育经历、学历和专业资 格、简历、工作经历、招聘推荐信、面试记录和评估、语言、专业会员资格、认证、绩 效管理评级、薪酬、地点偏好和旅行偏好。
是
K.
根据上述任何个人信息进行推断，以创建有关个人喜好和特征等的概况或摘要。
是
Load More
(ii)      您的权利
您有权向我们提出申请，要求在您提出申请之前的 12 个月内享有以下权利。请注意，这些权利不是绝对的，在某些情况下会受到适用法律规定的限制：
有权知道我们收集了您的哪些个人信息、我们收集您的个人信息的来源类别、我们收集您的个人信息的业务或商业目的，以及我们向哪些类别的第三方披露您的个人信息；
删除个人信息的权利；
更正有关您的不准确个人信息的权利；
有权拒绝出售或共享您的个人信息；
限制处理敏感个人信息的权利；
在行使适用法律规定的权利时不受非法歧视的权利。
我们将根据适用法律为您行使适用于您的权利提供便利，考虑到请求所涉个人信息的类型和敏感性，为保护您的利益，我们可能需要请求核实您的身份并要求您提供更多信息。
如需行使与个人信息相关的任何权利，请通过
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
上的数据主体申请表联系我们，或发送电子邮件至
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
。如果您已是霍尼韦尔员工，则可通过
HRhelp@honeywell.com
与我们联系。
联系我们
如果您对个人信息的处理方式有任何疑问或投诉，或希望行使您的权利，请联系
HRhelp@honeywell.com
（仅限于您已是霍尼韦尔员工的情况）或我们的数据保护官（
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
）。您也可以通过
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
上的数据主体申请表联系我们。
Czech
Aktualizováno: 1. ledna 2023
Toto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů uchazečů (dále jen "oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů") popisuje, jak společnost Honeywell International, Inc. a její
přidružené společnosti
(souhrnně "
Honeywell
", "
my
" nebo "
nás
") zpracovávají vaše osobní údaje, když se připojíte k naší komunitě talentů, hledáte nebo se ucházíte o zaměstnání a poskytujete nám osobní údaje prostřednictvím našeho portálu, webových stránek nebo jiných náborových médií, ať už online nebo offline (dále jen "
služby
"). Pro účely platných zákonů o ochraně osobních údajů jsme správci vašich osobních údajů.
Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, můžete se také seznámit s globálními zásadami ochrany osobních údajů společnosti Honeywell a s oznámením o ochraně osobních údajů zaměstnanců, pokud pro vaši jurisdikci existuje. Cílem tohoto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů je poskytnout vám podrobnější informace o zpracování vašich osobních údajů v souvislosti s vaší žádostí.
Osobní údaje, které shromažďujeme
Abychom mohli zpracovat vaši žádost, požádáme vás o poskytnutí osobních údajů, například když se ucházíte o konkrétní volné pracovní místo prostřednictvím našich webových stránek/portálu nebo v případě, že jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, v průběhu vašeho pracovního poměru. Všechny informace jsou poskytovány dobrovolně a vy určujete rozsah informací, které společnosti Honeywell poskytnete.
Mějte prosím na paměti, že některé informace mohou být nezbytné k dokončení hodnocení vaší žádosti a v případě jejich neposkytnutí může být naše schopnost posoudit vás jako kandidáta omezena.
(i)   Osobní údaje
Můžeme o vás shromažďovat následující osobní údaje:
Osobní údaje a kontaktní informace včetně e-mailové adresy, telefonního čísla (čísel) a fotografie;
profesní a vzdělanostní informace související s vaším povoláním, jako jsou vaši současní nebo předchozí zaměstnavatelé, vaše pracovní pozice nebo jiné informace o organizaci, se kterou jste spojeni. Můžete také poskytnout svůj životopis/životopis a informace o své kvalifikaci nebo vzdělání, jako jsou tituly, studijní obory, instituce, které jste navštěvovali, jazyky, profesní členství, certifikace, podrobnosti o hodnocení řízení výkonu a odměňování;
Kariérní preference (např. krátkodobé a dlouhodobé cíle, ochota přestěhovat se, datum, kdy je možné se přestěhovat, a preference místa);
Osobní údaje získané z vaší účasti v našem náborovém procesu, jako jsou například údaje získané během pohovorů, e-maily, které si s vámi vyměníme ohledně vaší žádosti, nebo konverzace, kterou s vámi vedeme prostřednictvím našeho online chatbota.
Zvukové a vizuální informace, jako je váš hlas a podoba zachycená na fotografiích, videozáznamech nebo zvukových nahrávkách, pokud se účastníte telefonického nebo video rozhovoru nebo pokud navštívíte naše kanceláře;
Jakékoli další osobní údaje, které se nám dobrovolně rozhodnete poskytnout.
(ii)  Citlivé osobní údaje
Můžeme o vás také shromažďovat zvláštní kategorie osobních údajů (známé také jako "zvláštní kategorie osobních údajů"), pokud k tomu máme zákonnou povinnost nebo pokud to vyžaduje informace jsou relevantní pro vaše budoucí pracovní prostředí ve společnosti Honeywell nebo pro budoucí poskytování zaměstnaneckých výhod, nebo s vaším výslovným souhlasem, jako například:
identifikační číslo vydané vládou (např. číslo sociálního pojištění);
Demografické údaje, které mohou zahrnovat informace o chráněných klasifikacích, jako je váš věk, pohlaví, rasa, zdravotní postižení, sexuální orientace, rodinný stav nebo status veterána;
informace o zdravotním stavu (například pro přizpůsobení se vašemu zdravotnímu postižení nebo dietním omezením);
Informace týkající se politických názorů, náboženského přesvědčení nebo členství v odborech;
Informace o trestných činech nebo odsouzeních jednotlivce, jakož i jakékoli další informace považované za citlivé podle platných zákonů o ochraně údajů. V případech povolených zákonem a v příslušném rozsahu může společnost Honeywell rovněž potřebovat provést prověrku vaší minulosti a/nebo trestněprávní prověrku, aby zjistila vaši vhodnost pro otevřenou pozici nebo příležitost ve společnosti Honeywell.
Nepožadujeme, abyste nám poskytli citlivé osobní údaje, pokud to není nezbytné pro účely plnění našich zákonných povinností (např. pro sledování rovných příležitostí) nebo pokud jste nám k tomu neposkytli svůj výslovný souhlas. S výjimkou případů, kdy to vyžaduje zákon, je poskytnutí těchto informací zcela dobrovolné. Společnost Honeywell se zavázala ke skutečné inkluzivitě a rozmanitosti zaměstnanců. Tím, že nám poskytnete své údaje o rovných příležitostech, nám umožníte lépe porozumět profilu našich zaměstnanců z hlediska údajů o rovných příležitostech a opatřením, která musíme přijmout, abychom přilákali, podpořili a udrželi různorodou pracovní sílu bez ohledu na věk, zdravotní postižení, pohlaví, rasu, náboženské nebo filozofické přesvědčení a sexuální orientaci.
(iii) Osobní údaje, které od vás automaticky shromažďujeme
Můžeme od vás automaticky shromažďovat určité informace o vaší návštěvě našich webových stránek pomocí souborů cookie a jiných podobných technologií sledování. Další informace o souborech cookie, které používáme na webových stránkách, prostřednictvím kterých podáváte žádost, naleznete v našem
oznámení o souborech cookie
.
Zdroje osobních informací
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme shromažďovat přímo od vás nebo nepřímo od třetích stran, které jsou oprávněny sdílet vaše údaje s námi, jako jsou:
Pracovní agentury, poskytovatelé služeb prověřování minulosti/zaměstnání nebo ověřování totožnosti;
personální agentury (například když vás personální agentura identifikuje jako potenciálního kandidáta);
Veřejně dostupné informace o vás ze stránek, jako je LinkedIn nebo webové stránky vašeho současného zaměstnavatele. Můžete se také rozhodnout, že nám poskytnete přístup k určitým osobním údajům uloženým třetími stranami (například LinkedIn, Twitter, Google nebo Facebook). Tím, že společnosti Honeywell povolíte přístup k těmto informacím, souhlasíte s tím, že tyto informace můžeme shromažďovat, uchovávat a používat v souladu s tímto oznámením o ochraně osobních údajů;
Na základě reference nebo ústního sdělení (například doporučení od současného nebo bývalého zaměstnance). V případě doporučení je osoba, která vás doporučuje, odpovědná za získání vašeho souhlasu s poskytnutím vašich osobních údajů.
Účely použití osobních údajů
Vaše osobní údaje používáme k následujícím účelům:
Vyhodnocení vaší žádosti a rozhodnutí o přijetí do zaměstnání;
komunikovat s vámi a informovat vás o náboru a/nebo vaší přihlášce (přihláškách) nebo o jiných požadovaných sděleních;
splnění platných právních a regulačních požadavků a za účelem zjištění, uplatnění nebo obhajoby právních nároků;
Zaměstnání a řízení společnosti (například vytvoření základního záznamu o zaměstnání, pokud jste přijati);
Provádět souhrnné zprávy / analýzy týkající se údajů o činnosti uchazečů (např. návštěvnost kariérních stránek, trychtýř uchazečů, zdroj náboru, úspěšnost náborových kampaní);
Pouze pro zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell
: Abyste byli automaticky vyloučeni z proaktivního navrhování náborářům pro pracovní příležitosti a nebyli způsobilí pro zvážení podle vašeho aktuálního hodnocení HPD 9-block (které nebude nikdy odhaleno nikomu mimo Honeywell). Vždy se však budete moci přímo ucházet o jakoukoli dostupnou pracovní příležitost a vaše konkrétní situace bude náborovým pracovníkem posouzena.
Pouze v případě, že jste rezidentem Spojených států
: Pro zasílání sdělení prostřednictvím SMS, konkrétně:
(i)     1-1 SMS komunikace v souvislosti s vaší žádostí o konkrétní volné pracovní místo; a/nebo
(ii)    s vaším výslovným souhlasem, sdělení SMS kampaní o pracovních příležitostech, pracovních záležitostech a aktualizacích žádostí.
Svůj souhlas se zasíláním výše uvedených sdělení budete moci odmítnout a/nebo odvolat podle pokynů uvedených ve vašem profilu.
Pokud vám bude nabídnuto zaměstnání u společnosti Honeywell a vy ho přijmete, stanou se informace shromážděné během procesu podávání žádosti a náboru součástí vaší pracovní dokumentace.
Automatizované zpracování a profilování
S vaším výslovným souhlasem (který nám dobrovolně poskytnete při vstupu do naší komunity talentů nebo při zaškrtnutí příslušného políčka souhlasu během procesu podávání žádosti) provádíme "profilování", abychom vyhodnotili vaši vhodnost pro konkrétní pracovní příležitosti. Jedná se o použití párovacího algoritmu, který je schopen vyhodnotit váš pracovní profil a předpovědět vaši vhodnost pro konkrétní pracovní příležitost. Toto automatizované zpracování provádíme za účelem:
pomáhat náborovým pracovníkům přiřadit profily uchazečů k pracovním příležitostem tím, že navrhují kandidáty, kteří by se mohli ucházet o konkrétní pracovní příležitost, a
zasílání personalizovaných pracovních doporučení na základě vašeho profilu a/nebo preferencí nebo jiných informací, které by vás mohly zajímat, jako jsou novinky, webináře a události společnosti Honeywell.
Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že na základě tohoto profilování nemusíte být pro některé pracovní příležitosti vybráni, pokud jste se o ně přímo nepřihlásili.
O náboru zaměstnanců nerozhodujeme pouze na základě automatizovaných rozhodovacích procesů a/nebo profilování. O vašich osobních údajích bude rozhodovat člověk, protože konečné rozhodnutí o přijetí do zaměstnání učiní náboroví pracovníci nebo vedoucí náboru.
Právní základy pro zpracování vašich osobních údajů
Některé jurisdikce vyžadují, aby společnost Honeywell měla právní základ pro zpracování vašich osobních údajů. Pokud platné právní předpisy vyžadují, abychom zdůvodnili naše činnosti zpracování, bude náš právní základ pro shromažďování a používání vašich osobních údajů, jak je popsáno v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů, záviset na příslušných osobních údajích a konkrétním kontextu, v němž je shromažďujeme.
Souhlas.
Obecně platí, že od vás budeme obvykle shromažďovat osobní údaje, pokud k tomu máme váš souhlas a pokud vaše osobní údaje potřebujeme ke zpracování vaší žádosti. Přístupem na naše webové stránky/portál, připojením se k naší komunitě talentů nebo podáním žádosti o některou z našich pracovních pozic udělujete společnosti Honeywell souhlas se shromažďováním a dalším zpracováním výše popsaných osobních údajů pro účely popsané v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů.
Svůj souhlas
můžete kdykoli
odvolat
podáním žádosti prostřednictvím našeho portálu pro žádosti subjektů údajů na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
nebo zasláním e-mailu na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oprávněné zájmy.
Oprávněné zájmy společnosti Honeywell, konkrétně nábor, výběr, hodnocení a jmenování nových zaměstnanců a řízení a správa náboru a personálního procesu v rozsahu, v jakém nad našimi oprávněnými zájmy nepřevažují vaše základní práva a svobody.
Právní povinnosti.
Dodržování zákonných povinností společnosti Honeywell v případech, kdy pracovní právo nebo jiné zákony vyžadují zpracování vašich osobních údajů (například v rozsahu, v jakém zákon vyžaduje sledování rovnosti příležitostí a rozmanitosti).
Životní zájmy.
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme také potřebovat k ochraně vašich životně důležitých zájmů (například z důvodů ochrany zdraví a bezpečnosti, pokud se účastníte pohovoru na našem pracovišti).
Pokud máte jakékoli dotazy nebo potřebujete další informace o právním základu, na jehož základě shromažďujeme a používáme vaše osobní údaje, zašlete nám prosím e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com,
S kým sdílíme vaše osobní údaje
Společnost Honeywell bude sdílet vaše osobní údaje s třetími stranami pouze za následujících okolností:
Subjekty skupiny Honeywell
. Vaše osobní údaje můžeme sdílet s dalšími subjekty skupiny nacházejícími se v jurisdikcích po celém světě za účelem vyhodnocení vašeho profilu a zvážení případných náborových příležitostí na úrovni skupiny.
Poskytovatelé služeb
Vaše osobní údaje můžeme konkrétně sdílet s poskytovateli služeb třetích stran, kteří pro nás vykonávají konkrétní služby (například poskytovatelé náboru a outsourcingu zaměstnanců a poskytovatelé analytických služeb). Tyto třetí strany se mohou lišit v závislosti na vaší zemi a čas od času se budou měnit, ale mohou zahrnovat společnosti Phenom People, Inc. a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. a jejich příslušné poskytovatele třetích stran.
Zaměstnanci společnosti Honeywell.
Pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, mějte na paměti, že některé části vašeho profilu jsou veřejné, a tudíž viditelné pro všechny zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell (konkrétně vaše jméno, titul, fotografie, dovednosti, oblasti zájmů, pracovní zkušenosti a vzdělání). Tyto sekce však lze upravovat a vy si budete moci zvolit, které informace o vás se ve vašem profilu zobrazí. Vezměte prosím na vědomí, že kariérní cíle, přemístění a sekce stavu profilu "otevřeno novým příležitostem" nebudou veřejné, a tudíž nebudou viditelné pro všechny zaměstnance společnosti Honeywell (pouze pro tým talentů společnosti Honeywell).
Ostatní třetí strany.
Společnost Honeywell může sdílet vaše osobní údaje s jakýmkoli příslušným orgánem činným v trestním řízení, regulačním orgánem, vládní agenturou, soudem nebo třetí stranou, pokud se domníváme, že je to nezbytné podle platných právních předpisů nebo v dobré víře, že je to nezbytné k výkonu, určení nebo obraně našich zákonných práv nebo k ochraně vašich životních zájmů nebo zájmů jiné osoby. Vaše osobní údaje můžeme také s vaším souhlasem nebo na váš pokyn sdílet s dalšími osobami (např. s rozhodčím nebo profesním sdružením).
Mezinárodní přenosy osobních údajů
Společnost Honeywell je globální organizace a vaše osobní údaje mohou být přenášeny, uchovávány, ukládány nebo používány na různých místech po celém světě, například v USA a Indii. To znamená, že když shromažďujeme vaše osobní údaje, mohou být zpracovávány v zemích, které mohou mít zákony na ochranu osobních údajů odlišné od zákonů vaší země. Společnost Honeywell však vždy podnikne přiměřené kroky k ochraně vašeho soukromí a k zajištění takové úrovně ochrany osobních údajů, která je srovnatelná s úrovní ochrany ve vaší zemi bydliště, což zahrnuje implementaci
standardních smluvních doložek Evropské komise,
které lze nalézt na webových stránkách Komise na adrese
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retence
Vaše osobní údaje budeme uchovávat tak dlouho, jak bude nutné v souvislosti s účely popsanými v tomto oznámení o ochraně osobních údajů a v souladu s harmonogramem uchovávání záznamů společnosti Honeywell nebo v souladu s požadavky platných právních předpisů.
Vaše práva
V závislosti na platných zákonech můžete mít určitá práva týkající se vašich osobních údajů. Pokud jste obyvatelem Kalifornie, přečtěte si níže uvedené “
Další informace pro obyvatele Kalifornie
”
Máte právo na
přístup ke
svým osobním údajům, jejich
opravu
,
aktualizaci
nebo
vymazání;
Můžete
vznést námitku proti
zpracování svých osobních údajů, požádat nás o
omezení jejich
zpracování. zpracování vašich osobních údajů nebo požádat o přenositelnost vašich osobních údajů;
Můžete mít právo na to, aby o vás nebylo učiněno rozhodnutí, které je založeno výhradně na automatizovaném zpracování, včetně profilování, pokud toto rozhodnutí má pro vás právní účinky nebo se vás významně dotýká.
Společnost Honeywell v rámci náborového procesu neprovádí výhradně automatizované rozhodování o uchazečích.
Pokud jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili a zpracováváme s vaším souhlasem, můžete ho kdykoli odvolat. Odvolání vašeho souhlasu nebude mít vliv na zákonnost zpracování, které jsme provedli před jeho odvoláním, ani na zpracování vašich osobních údajů prováděné na základě jiných zákonných důvodů zpracování, než je souhlas; a
Máte právo podat stížnost na naše shromažďování a používání vašich osobních údajů u úřadu pro ochranu osobních údajů.
Usnadníme vám uplatnění práv, která se na vás vztahují, v souladu s platnými právními předpisy. Chcete-li uplatnit kterékoli ze svých práv týkajících se vašich osobních údajů, kontaktujte nás prostřednictvím nápovědy pro lidské zdroje nebo formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy- statement,
nebo zašlete e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Další informace pro obyvatele Kalifornie
Pokud jste obyvatelem státu Kalifornie, tato část doplňuje oznámení společnosti Honeywell o ochraně osobních údajů žadatelů.
(i)      Kategorie shromažďovaných a zveřejňovaných osobních údajů
Společnost Honeywell v uplynulých dvanácti měsících shromáždila a zveřejnila následující kategorie osobních údajů pro naše obchodní účely:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorie
Shromažďujeme
A.
Identifikátory, jako je jméno, datum narození, pohlaví, e-mailová adresa, telefonní čísla, poštovní adresa, online identifikátory, účet na sociálních sítích a další identifikátory.
Ano
C.
Charakteristiky chráněných klasifikací podle kalifornských nebo federálních zákonů, jako je rasa, etnický původ, náboženské nebo filozofické přesvědčení, členství v odborech, zdravotní údaje, biometrické údaje, genetické údaje, zdravotní postižení, status veterána, sexuální orientace, osobní pošta, e-mailové a textové zprávy (pokud společnost Honeywell není jejich příjemcem), vládní identifikátory (např. číslo sociálního pojištění), řidičský průkaz, pas, finanční a bankovní informace.
Ano
F.
Informace o aktivitách na internetu nebo jiných elektronických sítích, jako je historie prohlížení, interakce s webovými stránkami společnosti Honeywell, e-mail a textové zprávy.
Ano
G.
Geolokační údaje, jako je poloha zařízení a IP poloha.
Ano
H.
Zvukové, elektronické, vizuální, tepelné nebo podobné informace, jako je váš hlas a obraz, videozáznam nebo zvukový záznam, pokud se účastníte telefonického nebo videorozhovoru nebo pokud navštívíte naše kanceláře.
Ano
I.
Informace týkající se profese nebo zaměstnání, jako je vaše povolání, současný nebo předchozí zaměstnavatel, pracovní pozice, historie vzdělání, akademická a odborná kvalifikace, životopis, historie zaměstnání, reference o přijetí do zaměstnání, poznámky a hodnocení z pohovorů, jazyky, profesní členství, certifikace, hodnocení řízení výkonu, odměna, preference místa a cestovní preference.
Ano
K.
Závěry vyvozené z jakýchkoli výše uvedených osobních údajů za účelem vytvoření profilu nebo shrnutí například preferencí a charakteristik jednotlivce.
Ano
Load More
(ii)      Vaše práva
Máte právo zaslat nám žádost o následující práva, která se týkají dvanáctiměsíčního období, které předchází vaší žádosti. Upozorňujeme, že tato práva nejsou absolutní a v některých případech podléhají omezením stanoveným platnými právními předpisy:
Právo vědět, jaké osobní údaje jsme o vás shromáždili, kategorie zdrojů, z nichž jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili, obchodní nebo komerční účel, pro který jsme vaše osobní údaje shromáždili, a kategorie třetích stran, kterým vaše osobní údaje poskytujeme;
Právo na vymazání vašich osobních údajů;
Právo na opravu nepřesných osobních údajů o vás;
Právo odmítnout prodej nebo sdílení vašich osobních údajů;
Právo na omezení zpracování vašich citlivých osobních údajů;
Právo nebýt nezákonně diskriminován při uplatňování svých práv podle platných zákonů.
Usnadníme vám uplatnění práv, která se na vás vztahují, v souladu s platnými právními předpisy a vzhledem k typu a citlivosti osobních údajů, které jsou předmětem žádosti, můžeme v zájmu vaší ochrany požádat o ověření vaší totožnosti a vyžádat si od vás další informace.
Chcete-li uplatnit některá ze svých práv týkajících se vašich osobních údajů, kontaktujte nás prostřednictvím formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na
adrese https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, nebo nám zašlete e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell, můžete nás kontaktovat na adrese
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontaktujte nás
Máte-li jakékoli dotazy nebo stížnosti týkající se zpracování vašich osobních údajů nebo chcete-li uplatnit svá práva, obraťte se na:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(pouze pokud jste již zaměstnancem společnosti Honeywell) nebo našeho pověřence pro ochranu osobních údajů na adrese
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Můžete nás také kontaktovat prostřednictvím formuláře žádosti subjektu údajů, který najdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Danish
Opdateret: 1. januar 2023
Denne meddelelse om databeskyttelse for ansøgere ("meddelelse om databeskyttelse") beskriver, hvordan Honeywell International, Inc. og dets
tilknyttede selskaber
(samlet "
Honeywell
", "
os
" eller "
vi
") behandler dine personlige oplysninger, når du tilmelder dig vores Talent Community, søger eller ansøger om et job og indsender personlige oplysninger til os via vores portal, websteder eller andre rekrutteringsmedier, uanset om de er online eller offline ("
tjenesterne
"). Vi er de dataansvarlige for dine personlige oplysninger i henhold til gældende databeskyttelseslove.
Bemærk, at hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, kan du også henvise til Honeywells globale databeskyttelsespolitik og medarbejdernes databeskyttelseserklæring, hvor en sådan findes for din jurisdiktion. Formålet med denne fortrolighedserklæring er at give dig mere detaljerede oplysninger om vores behandling af dine personlige oplysninger i forbindelse med din ansøgning.
Personlige oplysninger, vi indsamler
For at behandle din ansøgning beder vi dig om at give personlige oplysninger om dig selv, f.eks. når du ansøger om en bestemt ledig stilling via vores websted/portal, eller hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, under dit ansættelsesforhold. Alle oplysninger gives på frivillig basis, og du bestemmer selv omfanget af de oplysninger, du giver til Honeywell.
Vær opmærksom på, at nogle oplysninger kan være nødvendige for at gennemføre en evaluering af din ansøgning, og hvis de ikke gives, kan vores mulighed for at overveje dig som kandidat være begrænset.
(i)   Personlige oplysninger
Vi kan indsamle følgende personlige oplysninger om dig:
Personlige oplysninger og kontaktoplysninger, herunder e-mailadresse, telefonnummer(-er) og foto;
Professionelle og uddannelsesmæssige oplysninger relateret til din beskæftigelse, såsom dine nuværende eller tidligere arbejdsgivere, din jobtitel eller andre oplysninger om den organisation, du er tilknyttet. Du kan også angive dit CV og oplysninger om dine kvalifikationer eller din uddannelse, f.eks. dine grader, studieretninger, de institutioner, du har gået på, sprog, faglige medlemskaber, certificeringer, oplysninger om performance management ratings og kompensation;
Karrierepræferencer (f.eks. kortsigtede og langsigtede mål, villighed til at flytte, tilgængelig dato for flytning og præferencer for placering);
Personlige oplysninger, der stammer fra din deltagelse i vores rekrutteringsproces, som f.eks. dem, der opnås under interviews, de e-mails, vi udveksler med dig vedrørende din ansøgning, eller de samtaler, vi har med dig via vores online Chatbot.
Lyd- og billedoplysninger, f.eks. din stemme og dit billede, som er optaget på fotografier, video- eller lydoptagelser, hvis du deltager i et telefon- eller videointerview, eller hvis du besøger vores kontorer;
Alle andre personlige oplysninger, som du frivilligt vælger at give os.
(ii)  Følsomme personlige oplysninger
Vi kan også indsamle særlige kategorier af personlige oplysninger om dig (også kendt som "særlige kategorier af personlige oplysninger"), hvor vi har en juridisk forpligtelse til at gøre det, eller hvoroplysninger er relevante for dit fremtidige arbejdsmiljø hos Honeywell eller for fremtidig levering af ansættelsesfordele, eller med dit udtrykkelige samtykke, f.eks:
Statsligt udstedt identifikationsnummer (f.eks. et CPR-nummer);
Demografiske oplysninger, som kan omfatte oplysninger om beskyttede klassifikationer, såsom din alder, køn, race, handicap, seksuelle orientering, ægteskabelige status eller veteranstatus;
Helbredsoplysninger (for eksempel for at imødekomme et handicap, du måtte have, eller kostrestriktioner);
Oplysninger om en persons politiske holdninger, religiøse overbevisning eller medlemskab af en fagforening;
Oplysninger om en persons strafbare handlinger eller domme samt alle andre oplysninger, der anses for følsomme i henhold til gældende databeskyttelseslove. Hvor loven tillader det, og i det omfang det er relevant, kan Honeywell også være nødt til at udføre baggrunds- og/eller straffetjek for at afgøre din egnethed til en åben stilling eller mulighed hos Honeywell.
Vi kræver ikke, at du giver os følsomme personlige oplysninger, medmindre det er nødvendigt for at opfylde vores lovmæssige forpligtelser (f.eks. til overvågning af lige muligheder), eller medmindre du har givet dit udtrykkelige samtykke. Bortset fra i det omfang, det er påkrævet ved lov, vil afgivelsen af disse oplysninger være helt frivillig. Honeywell er forpligtet til at have en inkluderende og mangfoldig arbejdsstyrke. Ved at give os dine data om lige muligheder giver du os mulighed for bedre at forstå vores medarbejderprofil med hensyn til data om lige muligheder og de foranstaltninger, vi skal træffe for at tiltrække, fremme og fastholde en mangfoldig arbejdsstyrke uanset alder, handicap, køn, race, religiøse eller filosofiske overbevisninger og seksuel orientering.
(iii) Personlige oplysninger, som vi indsamler automatisk fra dig
Vi kan automatisk indsamle visse oplysninger fra dig om dit besøg på vores hjemmesider ved hjælp af "cookies" og andre lignende sporingsteknologier. For yderligere oplysninger om de cookies, vi bruger på den hjemmeside, hvor du indsender din ansøgning, bedes du læse vores
Cookie Notice
.
Kilder til personlige oplysninger
Vi kan indsamle dine personlige oplysninger direkte fra dig eller indirekte fra tredjeparter, der er lovligt berettiget til at dele dine oplysninger med os, f.eks:
Arbejdsformidlinger, udbydere af baggrunds-/ansættelsestjek eller identitetsbekræftelse;
Rekrutteringsbureauer (f.eks. når et rekrutteringsbureau identificerer dig som en potentiel kandidat);
Offentligt tilgængelige oplysninger om dig fra sider som LinkedIn eller din nuværende arbejdsgivers hjemmeside. Du kan også vælge at give os adgang til visse personlige oplysninger, der er gemt af tredjeparter (f.eks. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Ved at give Honeywell tilladelse til at få adgang til disse oplysninger accepterer du, at vi kan indsamle, opbevare og bruge disse oplysninger i overensstemmelse med denne fortrolighedserklæring;
Ved henvisning eller mund til mund (f.eks. gennem en henvisning fra en nuværende eller tidligere medarbejder). Ved henvisninger vil den person, der henviser dig, være ansvarlig for at indhente dit samtykke til at give os dine personlige oplysninger.
Formål, som personlige oplysninger bruges til
Vi bruger dine personlige oplysninger til følgende formål:
At evaluere din ansøgning og træffe beslutninger om ansættelse;
Kommunikere med dig og informere dig om rekrutteringen og/eller din(e) ansøgning(er) eller andre nødvendige meddelelser;
Overholde gældende juridiske og lovgivningsmæssige krav, og for at vi kan etablere, udøve eller forsvare et juridisk krav;
Ansættelse og virksomhedsledelse (f.eks. oprettelse af en grundlæggende ansættelsesjournal, hvis du bliver ansat);
At udføre aggregerede rapporter/analyser vedrørende kandidaternes aktivitetsdata (f.eks. trafik på karrieresiden, kandidattragt, ansættelseskilde, rekrutteringskampagnesucces);
Kun for Honeywell-medarbejdere:
For automatisk at udelukke dig fra at blive proaktivt foreslået til overvejelse til rekrutteringsfolk for en jobmulighed og er ikke berettiget til overvejelse i henhold til din nuværende HPD 9-block rating (som aldrig vil blive afsløret for nogen uden for Honeywell). Du vil dog altid kunne ansøge direkte om en ledig stilling, og din specifikke situation vil blive overvejet af en rekrutteringsmedarbejder.
Kun hvis du er bosiddende i USA:
For at sende dig kommunikation via SMS, specifikt:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikation i forbindelse med din ansøgning til en bestemt ledig stilling; og/eller
(ii)    med forbehold for dit udtrykkelige samtykke, SMS-kampagnekommunikation om beskæftigelsesmuligheder, jobanliggender og opdateringer af ansøgninger.
Du vil kunne fravælge og/eller tilbagekalde dit samtykke til at modtage ovennævnte kommunikation ved at følge instruktionerne i din profil.
Hvis du bliver tilbudt og accepterer ansættelse hos Honeywell, vil de oplysninger, der indsamles under ansøgnings- og rekrutteringsprocessen, blive en del af din ansættelsesjournal.
Automatiseret behandling og profilering
Med forbehold for dit udtrykkelige samtykke (som du frivilligt giver, når du tilmelder dig vores Talent Community, eller når du markerer det relevante samtykkefelt under ansøgningsprocessen), foretager vi "profilering" for at vurdere din egnethed til bestemte jobmuligheder. Dette indebærer brug af en matchende algoritme, der er i stand til at evaluere din beskæftigelsesprofil og forudsige din berettigelse til en bestemt jobmulighed. Vi udfører denne automatiserede behandling med henblik på:
hjælpe rekrutteringsmedarbejdere med at matche kandidatprofiler med jobmuligheder ved at foreslå kandidater, der kan komme i betragtning til en specifik jobmulighed; og
sende personlige jobanbefalinger til dig baseret på din profil og/eller dine præferencer eller andre oplysninger, der kan være af interesse for dig, såsom Honeywell-nyheder, webinarer og begivenheder.
Bemærk venligst, at du på baggrund af denne profilering muligvis ikke kommer i betragtning til visse jobmuligheder, medmindre du har søgt dem direkte.
Vi træffer ikke ansættelsesbeslutninger udelukkende baseret på automatiserede beslutningsprocesser og/eller profilering. Dine personlige oplysninger vil blive udsat for menneskeskabte beslutninger, da den endelige ansættelsesbeslutning vil blive truffet af de rekrutteringsansvarlige eller den ansættende leder.
Det juridiske grundlag for behandling af dine personlige oplysninger
Visse jurisdiktioner kræver, at Honeywell har et juridisk grundlag for at behandle dine personlige oplysninger. Hvor gældende lov kræver, at vi retfærdiggør vores behandlingsaktiviteter, vil vores juridiske grundlag for at indsamle og bruge dine personlige oplysninger som beskrevet i denne fortrolighedserklæring afhænge af de pågældende personlige oplysninger og den specifikke kontekst, hvor vi indsamler dem.
Samtykke.
Generelt vil vi normalt indsamle personlige oplysninger fra dig, hvor vi har dit samtykke til at gøre det, og hvor vi har brug for dine personlige oplysninger til at behandle din ansøgning. Ved at tilgå vores hjemmeside/portal, tilmelde dig vores Talent Community eller ansøge om en af vores stillinger, giver du dit samtykke til, at Honeywell kan indsamle og yderligere behandle de personlige oplysninger, der er beskrevet ovenfor, til de formål, der er beskrevet i denne fortrolighedserklæring. Du kan til enhver tid
trække dit samtykke tilbage
ved at indsende en anmodning via vores portal for anmodninger fra registrerede på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende os en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitime interesser.
I Honeywells legitime interesser, nemlig rekruttering, udvælgelse, evaluering og udnævnelse af nye medarbejdere og ledelse og administration af rekrutterings- og HR-processen i det omfang, vores legitime interesser ikke tilsidesættes af dine grundlæggende rettigheder og friheder.
Juridiske forpligtelser
. Overholdelse af Honeywells juridiske forpligtelser, hvor ansættelsesret eller andre love kræver behandling af dine personlige oplysninger (f.eks. i det omfang loven kræver overvågning af lige muligheder og mangfoldighed).
Vitale interesser.
Vi kan også have brug for dine personlige oplysninger for at beskytte dine vitale interesser (f.eks. af sundheds- og sikkerhedsmæssige årsager, hvis du deltager i et interview hos os).
Hvis du har spørgsmål om eller brug for yderligere oplysninger om det juridiske grundlag, hvorpå vi indsamler og bruger dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Hvem deler vi dine personlige oplysninger med?
Honeywell vil kun dele dine personlige oplysninger med tredjeparter under følgende omstændigheder:
Enheder i Honeywell-koncernen
. Vi kan dele dine personlige oplysninger med andre koncernenheder i jurisdiktioner rundt om i verden for at evaluere din profil og overveje eventuelle rekrutteringsmuligheder på koncernniveau.
Tjenesteudbydere
Vi kan specifikt dele dine personlige oplysninger med tredjeparts tjenesteudbydere, der udfører specifikke tjenester på vores vegne (for eksempel rekruttering og outsourcing af personaleudbydere og analyseudbydere). Sådanne tredjeparter kan variere afhængigt af dit land og vil ændre sig fra tid til anden, men kan omfatte Phenom People, Inc, Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. og deres respektive tredjepartsudbydere.
Medarbejdere hos Honeywell.
Hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, skal du være opmærksom på, at nogle dele af din profil er offentlige og derfor synlige for alle Honeywell-medarbejdere (især dit navn, titel, foto, færdigheder, interesseområder, erhvervserfaring og uddannelse). Sådanne sektioner kan dog redigeres, og du vil kunne vælge, hvilke oplysninger om dig der skal vises i din profil. Bemærk venligst, at karrieremål, flytningerog profilstatus "åben for nye muligheder" vil ikke være offentlige og derfor ikke synlige for alle Honeywell-medarbejdere (kun for Honeywells Talent Team).
Andre tredjeparter.
Honeywell kan dele dine personlige oplysninger med ethvert kompetent retshåndhævende organ, tilsynsmyndighed, regeringsorgan, domstol eller tredjepart, hvor vi mener, at videregivelsen er nødvendig i henhold til gældende lov eller i god tro om, at en sådan handling er nødvendig for at udøve, etablere eller forsvare vores juridiske rettigheder eller for at beskytte dine vitale interesser eller en anden persons. Vi kan også dele dine personlige oplysninger med andre med dit samtykke eller efter din anvisning (f.eks. en dommer eller en faglig sammenslutning).
Internationale overførsler af personlige oplysninger
Honeywell er en global organisation, og dine personlige oplysninger kan blive overført til, opbevaret, lagret eller brugt på forskellige steder i verden, f.eks. i USA og Indien. Det betyder, at når vi indsamler dine personlige oplysninger, kan de blive behandlet i lande, der kan have databeskyttelseslove, der er forskellige fra lovene i dit land. Honeywell vil dog altid tage rimelige skridt til at beskytte dit privatliv og give et niveau af beskyttelse af personlige oplysninger, der er sammenligneligt med det i dit bopælsland, hvilket omfatter implementering af
Europa-Kommissionens standardkontraktbestemmelser,
som kan findes på Kommissionens websted på
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Fastholdelse
Vi opbevarer dine personlige oplysninger, så længe det er nødvendigt i forbindelse med de formål, der er beskrevet i denne meddelelse om beskyttelse af personlige oplysninger, og i overensstemmelse med Honeywells tidsplan for opbevaring af optegnelser eller som krævet af gældende lovgivning.
Dine rettigheder
Afhængigt af gældende lovgivning kan du have visse rettigheder med hensyn til dine personlige oplysninger. Hvis du er bosiddende i Californien, bedes du læse “
Yderligere oplysninger for bosiddende i Californien
” nedenfor.
Du kan have ret til at få
adgang til, rette, opdatere
eller anmode om
sletning
af dine personlige oplysninger;
Du kan gøre
indsigelse
mod behandlingen af dine personlige oplysninger, bede os om at
begrænse
behandling af dine personlige oplysninger eller anmode om portabilitet af dine personlige oplysninger;
Du kan have ret til ikke at få truffet en beslutning om dig, der udelukkende er baseret på automatiseret behandling, herunder profilering, hvis denne beslutning har retsvirkninger for dig eller påvirker dig væsentligt.
Honeywell træffer ikke, som en del af sin rekrutteringsproces, udelukkende automatiserede beslutninger om kandidater.
Tilsvarende, hvis vi har indsamlet og behandlet dine personlige oplysninger med dit samtykke, kan du til enhver tid trække dit samtykke tilbage. Tilbagetrækning af dit samtykke vil ikke påvirke lovligheden af nogen behandling, vi har foretaget før din tilbagetrækning, og det vil heller ikke påvirke behandlingen af dine personlige oplysninger, der udføres i tillid til andre lovlige behandlingsgrunde end samtykke; og
Du har ret til at klage til en databeskyttelsesmyndighed over vores indsamling og brug af dine personlige oplysninger.
Vi vil lette din udøvelse af de rettigheder, der gælder for dig i overensstemmelse med gældende lovgivning. Hvis du vil udøve nogen af dine rettigheder i forbindelse med dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte os via HR Help eller formularen til anmodning om oplysninger, som du finder på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy,
eller sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Yderligere information til indbyggere i Californien
Hvis du er bosiddende i staten Californien, supplerer dette afsnit Honeywells meddelelse om beskyttelse af personoplysninger for ansøgere.
(i)      Kategorier af personlige oplysninger, der indsamles og videregives
Honeywell har indsamlet og videregivet følgende kategorier af personlige oplysninger til vores forretningsformål i de foregående tolv måneder:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi indsamler
A.
Identifikatorer såsom navn, fødselsdato, køn, e-mailadresse, telefonnumre, postadresse, online-identifikatorer, konto på sociale medier og andre identifikatorer.
Ja
C.
Karakteristika for beskyttede klassifikationer i henhold til californisk eller føderal lovgivning, såsom race, etnicitet, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning, fagforeningsmedlemskab, sundhedsdata, biometriske oplysninger, genetiske data, handicap, veteranstatus, seksuel orientering, personlig post, e-mail og sms-beskeder (medmindre Honeywell er den tilsigtede modtager), offentlige identifikatorer (f.eks. personnummer), kørekort, pas, finansielle oplysninger og bankoplysninger.
Ja
F.
Oplysninger om internet- eller andre elektroniske netværksaktiviteter, f.eks. browserhistorik, interaktioner med Honeywell-websteder, e-mail- og tekstbeskedtjenester.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, såsom enhedens placering og IP-placering.
Ja
H.
Lyd-, elektroniske, visuelle, termiske eller lignende oplysninger, såsom din stemme og dit billede, video- eller lydoptagelser, hvis du deltager i et telefon- eller videointerview, eller hvis du besøger vores kontorer.
Ja
I.
Professionelle eller ansættelsesrelaterede oplysninger såsom din beskæftigelse, nuværende eller tidligere arbejdsgivere, jobtitel, uddannelseshistorik, akademiske og professionelle kvalifikationer, CV, jobhistorik, ansættelsesreferencer, interviewnoter og -vurderinger, sprog, professionelle medlemskaber, certificeringer, performance management ratings, kompensation, lokationspræferencer og rejsepræferencer.
Ja
K.
Slutninger, der drages fra enhver af de personlige oplysninger, der er anført ovenfor, for at skabe en profil eller et resumé om f.eks. en persons præferencer og karakteristika.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dine rettigheder
Du har ret til at sende os en anmodning om følgende rettigheder, der dækker den tolvmåneders periode, der går forud for din anmodning. Bemærk venligst, at disse rettigheder ikke er absolutte og i visse tilfælde er underlagt begrænsninger som angivet i gældende lovgivning:
Retten til at vide, hvilke personlige oplysninger vi har indsamlet om dig, de kategorier af kilder, hvorfra vi har indsamlet dine personlige oplysninger, det forretningsmæssige eller kommercielle formål, som vi har indsamlet dine personlige oplysninger til, og de kategorier af tredjeparter, som vi videregiver dine personlige oplysninger til;
Retten til at slette dine personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at rette unøjagtige personlige oplysninger om dig;
Retten til at fravælge salg eller deling af dine personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at begrænse behandlingen af dine følsomme personlige oplysninger;
Retten til at være fri for ulovlig diskrimination, når du udøver dine rettigheder i henhold til gældende love.
Vi vil lette din udøvelse af de rettigheder, der gælder for dig i overensstemmelse med gældende lovgivning, og i betragtning af typen og følsomheden af de personlige oplysninger, der er genstand for anmodningen, kan vi af hensyn til din beskyttelse være nødt til at anmode om verificering af din identitet og anmode om yderligere oplysninger fra dig.
Hvis du vil udøve nogen af dine rettigheder i forbindelse med dine personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte os via formularen til anmodning om dataemne, der findes på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-mail til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell, kan du kontakte os på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt os
Hvis du har spørgsmål eller klager over, hvordan dine personlige oplysninger behandles, eller ønsker at udøve dine rettigheder, bedes du kontakte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(kun hvis du allerede er ansat hos Honeywell) eller vores databeskyttelsesansvarlige på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan også kontakte os via formularen til anmodning fra den registrerede, som du finder på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Dutch
Bijgewerkt: 1 januari 2023
In deze Privacykennisgeving voor sollicitanten ("Privacykennisgeving") wordt beschreven hoe Honeywell International, Inc. en haar
dochterondernemingen
(gezamenlijk "
Honeywell
", "
wij
" of "
wij
") uw persoonsgegevens verwerken wanneer u lid wordt van onze Talent Community, een functie zoekt of solliciteert en persoonsgegevens aan ons verstrekt via onze portal, websites of andere wervingsmedia, zowel online als offline (de "
Services
"). Wij zijn de beheerders van uw persoonsgegevens voor de doeleinden van de toepasselijke wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming.
Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, kunt u ook het privacybeleid voor wereldwijde gegevens van Honeywell en het privacybeleid voor medewerkers raadplegen, indien dit voor uw rechtsgebied bestaat. Het doel van deze Privacykennisgeving is om u meer gedetailleerde informatie te geven over onze verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens in verband met uw sollicitatie.
Persoonlijke gegevens die we verzamelen
Om uw sollicitatie te verwerken, vragen wij u om persoonsgegevens over uzelf te verstrekken, bijvoorbeeld wanneer u solliciteert op een bepaalde vacature via onze website/portaal of, als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, tijdens uw arbeidsrelatie. Alle gegevens worden op vrijwillige basis verstrekt en u bepaalt zelf hoeveel gegevens u aan Honeywell verstrekt.
Houd er rekening mee dat sommige informatie nodig kan zijn om een evaluatie van uw sollicitatie te voltooien en als deze informatie niet wordt verstrekt, kunnen onze mogelijkheden om u als kandidaat in aanmerking te nemen worden beperkt.
(i)   Persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen de volgende persoonlijke gegevens over u verzamelen:
Persoonlijke gegevens en contactgegevens zoals e-mailadres, telefoonnummer(s) en foto;
Professionele en educatieve informatie met betrekking tot uw beroep, zoals uw huidige of vorige werkgevers, uw functietitel of andere informatie over de organisatie waaraan u verbonden bent. U kunt ook uw cv en informatie over uw kwalificaties of opleiding verstrekken, zoals uw diploma's, studierichtingen, de instellingen die u hebt bezocht, talen, professionele lidmaatschappen, certificeringen, details over prestatiebeheer en compensatie;
Carrièrevoorkeuren (bv. doelen op korte en lange termijn, bereidheid om te verhuizen, datum beschikbaar om te verhuizen en locatievoorkeuren);
Persoonsgegevens die zijn afgeleid van uw deelname aan ons wervingsproces, zoals bijvoorbeeld de gegevens die zijn verkregen tijdens sollicitatiegesprekken, de e-mails die we met u uitwisselen over uw sollicitatie of de gesprekken die we met u voeren via onze online Chatbot.
Audio- en visuele informatie, zoals uw stem en beeltenis zoals vastgelegd op foto's, video- of audio-opnamen als u deelneemt aan een telefoon- of video-interview of als u onze kantoren bezoekt;
Alle andere persoonlijke informatie die u vrijwillig aan ons verstrekt.
(ii)  Gevoelige persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen ook speciale categorieën van persoonlijke gegevens over u verzamelen (ook wel "speciale categorieën van persoonlijke gegevens" genoemd) wanneer we hiertoe wettelijk verplicht zijn, of de gegevens relevant zijn voor uw toekomstige werkomgeving bij Honeywell of voor de toekomstige verstrekking van arbeidsvoorwaarden, of met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming, zoals:
Door de overheid uitgegeven identificatienummer (zoals een burgerservicenummer);
Demografische informatie, die informatie kan bevatten over beschermde classificaties, zoals uw leeftijd, geslacht, ras, handicap, seksuele geaardheid, burgerlijke staat of veteranenstatus;
Gezondheidsinformatie (bijvoorbeeld om rekening te houden met een eventuele handicap of dieetbeperkingen);
Informatie met betrekking tot iemands politieke opvattingen of religieuze overtuigingen of lidmaatschap van een vakbond;
Informatie over strafbare feiten of veroordelingen van een persoon, evenals andere informatie die als gevoelig wordt beschouwd onder de toepasselijke wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming. Indien wettelijk toegestaan en voor zover van toepassing, moet Honeywell mogelijk ook achtergrond- en/of strafrechtelijke controles uitvoeren om uw geschiktheid voor een open functie of mogelijkheid bij Honeywell te bepalen.
We vragen je niet om ons gevoelige persoonlijke informatie te verstrekken, tenzij dit noodzakelijk is voor het uitvoeren van onze wettelijke verplichtingen (bijv. voor het monitoren van gelijke kansen), of tenzij je hiervoor expliciet toestemming hebt gegeven. Tenzij dit wettelijk verplicht is, is het verstrekken van deze gegevens geheel vrijwillig. Honeywell streeft naar een echt inclusief en divers personeelsbestand. Door ons uw gegevens over gelijke kansen te verstrekken, stelt u ons in staat een beter inzicht te krijgen in ons werknemersprofiel op het gebied van gelijke kansen en de maatregelen die wij moeten nemen om een divers personeelsbestand aan te trekken, te bevorderen en te behouden, ongeacht leeftijd, handicap, geslacht, ras, religieuze of filosofische overtuigingen en seksuele geaardheid.
(iii) Persoonlijke gegevens die we automatisch van u verzamelen
Wij kunnen automatisch bepaalde informatie over uw bezoek aan onze websites verzamelen met behulp van "cookies" en andere soortgelijke traceertechnologieën. Voor meer informatie over de cookies die wij gebruiken op de website via welke u uw sollicitatie indient, kunt u onze
Cookie Notice
lezen.
Bronnen van persoonlijke informatie
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens direct van u verzamelen of indirect van derden die wettelijk gerechtigd zijn om uw gegevens met ons te delen, zoals:
Uitzendbureaus, dienstverleners op het gebied van antecedentenonderzoek of identiteitscontrole;
Wervingsbureaus (bijvoorbeeld wanneer een wervingsbureau u als potentiële kandidaat identificeert);
Openbaar beschikbare informatie over jou van sites zoals LinkedIn of de website van je huidige werkgever. U kunt er ook voor kiezen om ons toegang te geven tot bepaalde persoonsgegevens die zijn opgeslagen door derden (bijvoorbeeld LinkedIn, Twitter, Google of Facebook). Door Honeywell toestemming te geven voor toegang tot deze gegevens, gaat u ermee akkoord dat wij deze gegevens kunnen verzamelen, opslaan en gebruiken in overeenstemming met dit Privacybericht;
Door referentie of mond-tot-mondreclame (bijvoorbeeld door een verwijzing van een huidige of voormalige werknemer). Bij doorverwijzingen is de persoon die u doorverwijst verantwoordelijk voor het verkrijgen van uw toestemming om uw persoonlijke gegevens aan ons te verstrekken.
Doeleinden waarvoor persoonlijke informatie wordt gebruikt
Wij gebruiken uw persoonlijke gegevens voor de volgende doeleinden:
Om je sollicitatie te evalueren en beslissingen over aanwerving te nemen;
Met u communiceren en u informeren over de werving en/of uw sollicitatie(s) of andere vereiste communicatie;
Voldoen aan toepasselijke wettelijke en regelgevende vereisten en om ons in staat te stellen een rechtsvordering in te stellen, uit te oefenen of te verdedigen;
Tewerkstelling en bedrijfsmanagement (bijvoorbeeld een basis arbeidsverleden opstellen als je wordt aangenomen);
Samengevoegde rapporten / analyses uitvoeren met betrekking tot de activiteitsgegevens van kandidaten (bijv. verkeer op carrièresites, kandidaatfunnel, bron van aanwerving, succes van wervingscampagnes);
Alleen voor werknemers van Honeywell
:
Om u automatisch uit te sluiten van proactief voorstellen aan recruiters voor een vacature en niet in aanmerking te laten komen voor een overweging op basis van uw huidige HPD 9-blokkenscore (die nooit zal worden onthuld aan iemand buiten Honeywell). U kunt echter altijd rechtstreeks solliciteren naar elke beschikbare vacature en uw specifieke situatie zal worden bekeken door een recruiter.
Alleen als u een inwoner van de Verenigde Staten bent
:
Om u berichten te sturen via SMS, met name:
(i)     1-1 SMS-communicatie in verband met uw sollicitatie naar een bepaalde vacature; en/of
(ii)    met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming, SMS-campagneberichten over vacatures, vacatures en sollicitatie-updates.
Je kunt je afmelden en/of je toestemming voor het ontvangen van de bovengenoemde communicatie intrekken door de instructies in je profiel te volgen.
Als u een baan bij Honeywell krijgt aangeboden en accepteert, worden de gegevens die tijdens de sollicitatie- en wervingsprocedure zijn verzameld, onderdeel van uw personeelsdossier.
Geautomatiseerde verwerking en profilering
Met uw uitdrukkelijke toestemming (die u vrijwillig geeft wanneer u lid wordt van onze Talent Community of wanneer u het betreffende toestemmingsvakje aanvinkt tijdens de sollicitatieprocedure), voeren we 'profilering' uit om uw geschiktheid voor bepaalde vacatures te beoordelen. Hierbij wordt gebruik gemaakt van een matching-algoritme dat in staat is om uw werkgelegenheidsprofiel te evalueren en te voorspellen of u in aanmerking komt voor een bepaalde vacature. Wij voeren deze geautomatiseerde verwerking uit met het oog op:
recruiters helpen het profiel van kandidaten af te stemmen op vacatures door kandidaten voor te stellen voor een specifieke vacature; en
het verzenden van gepersonaliseerde functieaanbevelingen aan u op basis van uw profiel en/of voorkeuren of andere informatie die voor u interessant kan zijn, zoals Honeywell-nieuws, webinars en evenementen.
Houd er rekening mee dat je op basis van deze profilering mogelijk niet in aanmerking komt voor bepaalde vacatures, tenzij je er direct naar hebt gesolliciteerd.
We nemen geen wervingsbeslissingen uitsluitend op basis van geautomatiseerde besluitvormingsprocessen en/of profilering. Uw persoonlijke gegevens worden onderworpen aan menselijke beslissingen, aangezien de uiteindelijke aanwervingsbeslissing wordt genomen door de recruiters of de aanwervende manager.
De rechtsgrondslagen voor het verwerken van uw persoonlijke gegevens
Bepaalde rechtsgebieden vereisen dat Honeywell een rechtsgrondslag heeft voor de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens. Wanneer de toepasselijke wetgeving vereist dat wij onze verwerkingsactiviteiten rechtvaardigen, is onze rechtsgrondslag voor het verzamelen en gebruiken van uw persoonsgegevens zoals beschreven in dit Privacy notice afhankelijk van de betreffende persoonsgegevens en de specifieke context waarin wij deze verzamelen.
Toestemming.
Over het algemeen verzamelen wij persoonsgegevens van u wanneer wij hiervoor uw toestemming hebben en wanneer wij uw persoonsgegevens nodig hebben om uw sollicitatie te verwerken. Door onze website/portaal te bezoeken, lid te worden van onze Talent Community of te solliciteren op een van onze vacatures, geeft u Honeywell toestemming om de hierboven beschreven persoonsgegevens te verzamelen en verder te verwerken voor de in dit Privacy notice beschreven doeleinden. U kunt uw toestemming op elk gewenst moment intrekken door een verzoek in te dienen via onze portal voor het aanvragen van gegevens door betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en- us/privacy-statement
of door een e-mail te sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Legitieme belangen.
In het legitieme belang van Honeywell, namelijk de werving, selectie, evaluatie en aanstelling van nieuwe werknemers en het beheer en de administratie van de werving en het HR-proces, voor zover onze legitieme belangen niet zwaarder wegen dan uw fundamentele rechten en vrijheden.
Wettelijke verplichtingen
. Voldoen aan de wettelijke verplichtingen van Honeywell wanneer de arbeidswetgeving of andere wetten de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens vereisen (bijvoorbeeld voor zover de wet het toezicht op gelijke kansen en diversiteit vereist).
Vitale belangen.
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens ook nodig hebben om uw vitale belangen te beschermen (bijvoorbeeld gezondheids- en veiligheidsredenen als u een interview bijwoont op onze locatie)
Als u vragen hebt over of meer informatie wilt over de rechtsgrondslag waarop we uw persoonlijke gegevens verzamelen en gebruiken, stuur dan een e-mail naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Met wie we uw persoonlijke gegevens delen
Honeywell deelt uw persoonsgegevens alleen onder de volgende omstandigheden met derden:
Honeywell groepsentiteiten
. Wij kunnen uw persoonsgegevens delen met andere groepsentiteiten in rechtsgebieden over de hele wereld om uw profiel te evalueren en in aanmerking te komen voor wervingsmogelijkheden op groepsniveau.
Serviceproviders
We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens specifiek delen met externe serviceproviders die specifieke diensten namens ons uitvoeren (bijvoorbeeld leveranciers van wervings- en outsourcingpersoneel en analyseproviders). Dergelijke derden kunnen variëren afhankelijk van uw land en zullen van tijd tot tijd veranderen, maar kunnen Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. en hun respectieve externe leveranciers omvatten.
Honeywell-werknemers.
Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, moet u er rekening mee houden dat sommige gedeelten van uw profiel openbaar zijn en dus zichtbaar voor alle medewerkers van Honeywell (met name uw naam, titel, foto, vaardigheden, interessegebieden, werkervaring en opleiding). Deze secties kunnen echter worden bewerkt en u kunt kiezen welke informatie over u wordt weergegeven op uw profiel. Houd er rekening mee dat de carrièredoelen, verhuizingenen profielstatus "open voor nieuwe mogelijkheden" zijn niet openbaar en daarom niet zichtbaar voor alle medewerkers van Honeywell (alleen voor het Talent Team van Honeywell).
Andere derden.
Honeywell kan uw persoonsgegevens delen met een bevoegde wetshandhavingsinstantie, toezichthouder, overheidsinstantie, rechtbank of derde partij wanneer wij van mening zijn dat de openbaarmaking noodzakelijk is volgens de toepasselijke wetgeving of wanneer wij te goeder trouw geloven dat een dergelijke actie noodzakelijk is om onze wettelijke rechten uit te oefenen, vast te stellen of te verdedigen of om uw vitale belangen of die van een andere persoon te beschermen. We kunnen uw persoonlijke gegevens ook delen met anderen met uw toestemming of op uw aanwijzing (bijvoorbeeld een scheidsrechter of beroepsvereniging).
Internationale overdracht van persoonlijke gegevens
Honeywell is een wereldwijde organisatie en uw persoonsgegevens kunnen worden overgedragen naar, bewaard, opgeslagen of gebruikt op verschillende locaties wereldwijd, zoals de VS en India. Dit betekent dat wanneer wij uw persoonsgegevens verzamelen, deze kunnen worden verwerkt in landen waar de wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming mogelijk afwijkt van de wetgeving in uw land. Honeywell zal echter altijd redelijke maatregelen nemen om uw privacy te beschermen en een niveau van bescherming van persoonsgegevens te bieden dat vergelijkbaar is met dat van het land waarin u woont, zoals het implementeren van
de standaardcontractbepalingen van de Europese Commissie
die te vinden zijn op de website van de Commissie op
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Behoud
Wij bewaren uw persoonsgegevens zo lang als nodig is in verband met de in dit Privacybericht beschreven doeleinden en in overeenstemming met het schema voor het bewaren van gegevens van Honeywell of zoals vereist door de toepasselijke wetgeving.
Uw rechten
Afhankelijk van de toepasselijke wetgeving kunt u bepaalde rechten hebben met betrekking tot uw persoonlijke gegevens. Als u in Californië woont, raadpleeg dan “
Aanvullende informatie voor inwoners van Californië
” hieronder.
U kunt het recht hebben om uw persoonlijke gegevens
in te zien, te corrigeren, bij te werken
of te laten
verwijderen
;
U kunt
bezwaar maken
tegen de verwerking van uw persoonlijke gegevens, ons vragen om verwerking van uw persoonlijke gegevens of verzoeken om
overdraagbaarheid
van uw persoonlijke gegevens;
U hebt mogelijk het recht om een besluit over u dat uitsluitend is gebaseerd op geautomatiseerde verwerking, waaronder profilering, te weigeren als dat besluit rechtsgevolgen voor u heeft of aanzienlijke gevolgen voor u heeft.
Honeywell neemt, als onderdeel van het wervingsproces, geen uitsluitend geautomatiseerde beslissingen over kandidaten
.
Ook als we uw persoonsgegevens met uw toestemming hebben verzameld en verwerkt, kunt u uw toestemming te allen tijde intrekken. Het intrekken van uw toestemming heeft geen invloed op de rechtmatigheid van de verwerking die we hebben uitgevoerd voordat u uw toestemming introk, noch op de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens op andere rechtmatige verwerkingsgronden dan toestemming; en
U hebt het recht om een klacht in te dienen bij een gegevensbeschermingsautoriteit over het verzamelen en gebruiken van uw persoonlijke gegevens door ons.
We zullen u helpen bij het uitoefenen van de rechten die op u van toepassing zijn in overeenstemming met de toepasselijke wetgeving. Als u gebruik wilt maken van uw rechten met betrekking tot uw persoonlijke gegevens, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via HR Help of het formulier voor het aanvragen van gegevens op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy
of een e-mail sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Aanvullende informatie voor inwoners van Californië
Als u inwoner bent van de staat Californië, is dit gedeelte een aanvulling op de Privacykennisgeving voor aanvragers van Honeywell.
(i)      Categorieën van verzamelde en openbaar gemaakte persoonlijke gegevens
Honeywell heeft in de afgelopen twaalf maanden de volgende categorieën persoonsgegevens verzameld en verstrekt voor onze bedrijfsdoeleinden:
Previous column
Next column
Categorieën
We verzamelen
A.
Identificatiegegevens zoals naam, geboortedatum, geslacht, e-mailadres, telefoonnummers, postadres, online identificatiegegevens, social media-account en andere identificatiegegevens.
Ja
C.
Kenmerken van beschermde classificaties onder Californische of federale wetgeving, zoals ras, etniciteit, religieuze of filosofische overtuigingen, lidmaatschap van een vakbond, gezondheidsgegevens, biometrische informatie, genetische gegevens, handicap, veteranenstatus, seksuele geaardheid, persoonlijke post, e-mail en sms-berichten (tenzij Honeywell de beoogde ontvanger is), identificatiegegevens van de overheid (bijv. sofi-nummer), rijbewijs, paspoort, financiële en bankgegevens.
Ja
F.
Gegevens over internet- of andere elektronische netwerkactiviteiten, zoals browsergeschiedenis, interacties met websites van Honeywell, e-mail en sms-services.
Ja
G.
Geolocatiegegevens, zoals apparaatlocatie en IP-locatie.
Ja
H.
Audio-, elektronische, visuele, thermische of soortgelijke informatie, zoals uw stem en beeld, video- of audio-opnames als u deelneemt aan een telefoon- of video-interview of als u onze kantoren bezoekt.
Ja
I.
Professionele of werkgerelateerde informatie zoals uw beroep, huidige of vorige werkgevers, functietitel, onderwijsgeschiedenis, academische en professionele kwalificaties, cv, functiegeschiedenis, aanwervingsreferenties, gespreksnotities en beoordelingen, talen, professionele lidmaatschappen, certificeringen, prestatiemanagementbeoordelingen, compensatie, locatievoorkeuren en reisvoorkeuren.
Ja
K.
Conclusies die worden getrokken uit de bovenstaande persoonlijke informatie om een profiel of samenvatting te maken over bijvoorbeeld de voorkeuren en kenmerken van een persoon.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Uw rechten
U hebt het recht om ons een verzoek te sturen voor de volgende rechten met betrekking tot de periode van twaalf maanden die voorafgaat aan uw verzoek. Houd er rekening mee dat deze rechten niet absoluut zijn en in bepaalde gevallen onderworpen zijn aan beperkingen zoals gespecificeerd in de toepasselijke wetgeving:
Het recht om te weten welke persoonlijke gegevens we over u hebben verzameld, de categorieën bronnen waarvan we uw persoonlijke gegevens hebben verzameld, het zakelijke of commerciële doel waarvoor we uw persoonlijke gegevens hebben verzameld en de categorieën derden waarmee we uw persoonlijke gegevens openbaar maken;
Het recht om uw persoonlijke gegevens te verwijderen;
Het recht om onjuiste persoonlijke informatie over u te corrigeren;
Het recht om af te zien van de verkoop of het delen van uw persoonlijke gegevens;
Het recht om de verwerking van uw gevoelige persoonlijke gegevens te beperken;
Het recht om gevrijwaard te blijven van onwettige discriminatie bij het uitoefenen van uw rechten onder de toepasselijke wetgeving.
We zullen u helpen bij het uitoefenen van de rechten die op u van toepassing zijn in overeenstemming met de toepasselijke wetgeving en, gezien het type en de gevoeligheid van de persoonlijke informatie waarop het verzoek betrekking heeft, kan het voor uw bescherming nodig zijn dat we uw identiteit verifiëren en u om aanvullende informatie vragen.
Als u uw rechten met betrekking tot uw persoonsgegevens wilt uitoefenen, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via het aanvraagformulier voor betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
of een e-mail sturen naar
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent, kunt u contact met ons opnemen via
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Neem contact met ons op
Als u vragen of klachten hebt over de verwerking van uw persoonsgegevens of als u uw rechten wilt uitoefenen, kunt u contact opnemen met:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(alleen als u al een medewerker van Honeywell bent) of onze functionaris voor gegevensbescherming op
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
U kunt ook contact met ons opnemen via het aanvraagformulier voor betrokkenen op
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Finnish
Päivitetty: 1 tammikuuta 2023
Tässä hakijoiden tietosuojailmoituksessa ("tietosuojailmoitus") kuvataan, miten Honeywell International, Inc. ja sen
tytäryhtiöt
(yhdessä "
Honeywell
", "
me
" tai "
me
") käsittelevät henkilötietojasi, kun liityt osaajayhteisöömme, haet tai haet työpaikkaa ja toimitat meille henkilötietojasi portaalimme, verkkosivujemme tai muiden rekrytointivälineiden kautta, joko verkossa tai muualla ("
palvelut
"). Me olemme henkilötietojesi rekisterinpitäjiä sovellettavien tietosuojalakien mukaisesti.
Huomaa, että jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, voit tutustua myös Honeywellin maailmanlaajuiseen tietosuojakäytäntöön ja työntekijän tietosuojailmoitukseen, jos sellainen on olemassa omalla alueellasi. Tämän tietosuojailmoituksen tarkoituksena on antaa sinulle yksityiskohtaisempaa tietoa siitä, miten käsittelemme henkilötietojasi hakemuksesi yhteydessä.
Keräämämme henkilötiedot
Hakemuksesi käsittelyä varten pyydämme sinua antamaan henkilökohtaisia tietoja itsestäsi esimerkiksi silloin, kun haet tiettyä avointa työpaikkaa verkkosivustomme/portaalimme kautta tai, jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, työsuhteen aikana. Kaikkien tietojen antaminen on vapaaehtoista, ja sinä päätät, kuinka paljon tietoja annat Honeywellille.
Muistathan, että jotkin tiedot saattavat olla tarpeen hakemuksesi arvioimiseksi, ja jos niitä ei toimiteta, voimme rajoittaa mahdollisuuksiamme ottaa sinut huomioon hakijana.
(i)   Henkilökohtaiset tiedot
Saatamme kerätä sinusta seuraavia henkilötietoja:
Henkilö- ja yhteystiedot, mukaan lukien sähköpostiosoite, puhelinnumero(t) ja valokuva;
Ammattiisi liittyvät ammatti- ja koulutustiedot, kuten nykyiset tai aiemmat työnantajasi, ammattinimikkeesi tai muut tiedot organisaatiosta, johon olet yhteydessä. Voit myös antaa ansioluettelosi/ansioluettelosi ja tietoja pätevyydestäsi tai koulutuksestasi, kuten tutkintosi, opintoalasi, oppilaitokset, joissa olet opiskellut, kielet, ammattijäsenyydet, todistukset, tiedot suorituksenhallinnan arvioinneista ja korvauksista;
uratoiveet (esim. lyhyen ja pitkän aikavälin tavoitteet, halukkuus siirtyä muualle, mahdollinen siirtymisajankohta ja sijaintivalinnat);
Henkilötiedot, jotka ovat peräisin osallistumisestasi rekrytointiprosessiimme, kuten esimerkiksi haastattelujen aikana saadut tiedot, sähköpostiviestit, joita vaihdamme kanssasi hakemukseesi liittyen, tai keskustelut, joita käymme kanssasi verkkokeskustelurobotin kautta.
Ääni- ja kuvatiedot, kuten äänesi ja kuvasi valokuvissa, video- tai äänitallenteissa, jos osallistut puhelin- tai videohaastatteluun tai jos vierailet toimistossamme;
muut henkilötiedot, jotka annat meille vapaaehtoisesti.
(ii)  Arkaluonteiset henkilötiedot
Voimme myös kerätä sinusta erityisiä henkilötietoryhmiä (tunnetaan myös nimellä "erityiset henkilötietoryhmät"), jos meillä on lakisääteinen velvollisuus tehdä niin tai jos tiedot ovat merkityksellisiä tulevan työympäristösi kannalta Honeywellissä tai työsuhde-etuuksien tarjoamiseksi tulevaisuudessa tai nimenomaisella suostumuksellasi, kuten:
Valtion myöntämä tunnistenumero (kuten sosiaaliturvatunnus);
Demografiset tiedot, jotka voivat sisältää tietoja suojatuista luokituksista, kuten iästäsi, sukupuolestasi, rodustasi, vammaisuudestasi, seksuaalisesta suuntautumisestasi, siviilisäädystäsi tai veteraanistasi;
Terveystiedot (esimerkiksi mahdollisen vamman tai ruokavaliorajoitusten huomioon ottamiseksi);
Henkilön poliittisia mielipiteitä tai uskonnollista vakaumusta tai ammattiyhdistyksen jäsenyyttä koskevat tiedot;
tiedot henkilön rikoksista tai tuomioista sekä muut tiedot, joita pidetään arkaluonteisina sovellettavien tietosuojalakien nojalla. Lain sallimissa rajoissa ja soveltuvin osin Honeywell saattaa myös joutua tekemään taustatutkimuksia ja/tai rikostutkimuksia määrittääkseen, soveltuuko henkilö Honeywellin avoinna olevaan tehtävään tai tilaisuuteen.
Emme vaadi sinua antamaan meille arkaluonteisia henkilötietoja, paitsi jos se on tarpeen lakisääteisten velvoitteidemme täyttämiseksi (esim. yhtäläisten mahdollisuuksien valvomiseksi) tai jos et ole antanut siihen nimenomaista suostumustasi. Näiden tietojen antaminen on täysin vapaaehtoista, ellei laki sitä vaadi. Honeywell on sitoutunut todella osallistavaan ja monimuotoiseen työvoimaan. Antamalla meille tasa-arvotietosi annat meille mahdollisuuden ymmärtää paremmin työntekijäprofiiliamme tasa-arvotietojen kannalta ja toimia, joita meidän on toteutettava houkutellaksemme, edistääkseen ja pitääkksemme monipuolisen työvoiman iästä, vammaisuudesta, sukupuolesta, rodusta, uskonnollisesta tai filosofisesta vakaumuksesta ja seksuaalisesta suuntautumisesta riippumatta.
(iii) Henkilötiedot, joita keräämme sinulta automaattisesti
Saatamme automaattisesti kerätä sinulta tiettyjä tietoja vierailustasi verkkosivustoillamme käyttämällä "evästeitä" ja muita vastaavia seurantatekniikoita. Lisätietoja evästeistä, joita käytämme verkkosivustolla, jonka kautta lähetät hakemuksesi, saat
evästeitä koskevasta ilmoituksestamme
.
Henkilötietojen lähteet
Voimme kerätä henkilötietojasi suoraan sinulta tai välillisesti kolmansilta osapuolilta, joilla on laillinen oikeus jakaa tietojasi kanssamme, kuten:
Työnvälitystoimistot, tausta-/työllistämistarkastusten tai henkilöllisyyden todentamispalvelujen tarjoajat;
Rekrytointitoimistot (esimerkiksi kun rekrytointitoimisto tunnistaa sinut potentiaalisena ehdokkaana);
Julkisesti saatavilla olevat tiedot sinusta esimerkiksi LinkedInin tai nykyisen työnantajasi verkkosivuston kaltaisilta sivustoilta. Voit myös halutessasi antaa meille pääsyn tiettyihin kolmansien osapuolten (esimerkiksi LinkedIn, Twitter, Google tai Facebook) tallentamiin henkilötietoihin. Antaessasi Honeywellille luvan päästä käsiksi näihin tietoihin hyväksyt, että voimme kerätä, tallentaa ja käyttää näitä tietoja tämän tietosuojailmoituksen mukaisesti;
Referenssin tai suullisen tiedon perusteella (esimerkiksi nykyisen tai entisen työntekijän suosittelemana). Kun kyseessä on suosittelu, suositteleva henkilö on vastuussa siitä, että saat suostumuksesi henkilötietojesi toimittamiseen meille.
Henkilötietojen käyttötarkoitukset
Käytämme henkilötietojasi seuraaviin tarkoituksiin:
Hakemuksesi arvioimiseksi ja työhönottopäätösten tekemiseksi;
yhteydenpito sinuun ja tiedottaminen rekrytoinnista ja/tai hakemuksestasi (hakemuksistasi) tai muusta tarvittavasta viestinnästä;
Sovellettavien oikeudellisten ja sääntelyvaatimusten noudattaminen ja oikeudellisen vaateen laatiminen, käyttäminen tai puolustaminen;
Työsuhde- ja yritysjohtaminen (esimerkiksi perustyörekisterin laatiminen, jos sinut palkataan);
Ehdokkaiden toimintatietoja koskevien yhteenlaskettujen raporttien/analyysien laatiminen (esim. urasivuston kävijämäärät, ehdokkaiden kanavointi, palkkauksen lähde, rekrytointikampanjan onnistuminen);
Vain Honeywellin työntekijöille
:
HPD 9-block -luokituksesi perusteella (jota ei koskaan paljasteta kenellekään Honeywellin ulkopuoliselle). Voit kuitenkin aina hakea suoraan mitä tahansa tarjolla olevaa työpaikkaa, ja rekrytoija harkitsee erityistilanteesi.
Vain jos asut Yhdysvalloissa
:
Erityisesti viestinnän lähettämiseksi sinulle tekstiviestillä:
(i)     1-1 tekstiviestiviestintä, joka liittyy hakemukseesi tiettyyn avoinna olevaan työpaikkaan; ja/tai
(ii)    nimenomaisella
suostumuksellasi
tekstiviestikampanjaviestintä työllistymismahdollisuuksista, työasioista ja hakuilmoitusten päivityksistä.
Voit kieltäytyä vastaanottamasta edellä mainittuja viestejä ja/tai peruuttaa suostumuksesi niiden vastaanottamiseen profiilissasi annettujen ohjeiden mukaisesti.
Jos sinulle tarjotaan työtä Honeywellin palveluksessa ja hyväksyt sen, hakemus- ja rekrytointiprosessin aikana kerätyistä tiedoista tulee osa työrekisteriasi.
Automatisoitu käsittely ja profilointi
Edellyttäen, että annat siihen nimenomaisen suostumuksesi (jonka annat vapaaehtoisesti liittyessäsi Talent-yhteisöömme tai merkitessäsi asianmukaisen suostumusruutuun hakuprosessin aikana), teemme profilointia arvioidaksemme soveltuvuuttasi tiettyihin työmahdollisuuksiin. Tässä yhteydessä käytetään algoritmia, joka pystyy arvioimaan työprofiilisi ja ennustamaan soveltuvuutesi tiettyyn työmahdollisuuteen. Suoritamme tätä automaattista käsittelyä seuraavia tarkoituksia varten:
auttaa rekrytoijia sovittamaan ehdokkaiden profiilit yhteen työtilaisuuksien kanssa ehdottamalla ehdokkaita harkittavaksi tiettyyn työtilaisuuteen; ja
henkilökohtaisten työsuositusten lähettäminen sinulle profiilisi ja/tai mieltymystesi perusteella tai muiden sinua mahdollisesti kiinnostavien tietojen, kuten Honeywellin uutisten, webinaarien ja tapahtumien, lähettäminen.
Huomaa, että tämän profiloinnin perusteella sinua ei välttämättä oteta huomioon tietyissä työmahdollisuuksissa, ellet ole hakenut niitä suoraan.
Emme tee työhönottopäätöksiä, jotka perustuvat yksinomaan automatisoituihin päätöksentekoprosesseihin ja/tai profilointiin. Henkilötietojasi koskevat inhimilliset päätökset, sillä rekrytoijat tai rekrytointipäällikkö tekevät lopullisen rekrytointipäätöksen.
Henkilökohtaisten tietojesi käsittelyn oikeusperustat
Tietyillä lainkäyttöalueilla Honeywelliltä vaaditaan oikeusperusta henkilötietojesi käsittelylle. Jos sovellettava laki edellyttää, että meidän on perusteltava käsittelytoimintamme, oikeusperustamme henkilötietojesi keräämiselle ja käyttämiselle tässä tietosuojailmoituksessa kuvatulla tavalla riippuu kyseisistä henkilötiedoista ja erityisestä asiayhteydestä, jossa keräämme niitä.
Suostumus.
Yleisesti ottaen keräämme henkilötietojasi yleensä silloin, kun meillä on siihen suostumuksesi ja kun tarvitsemme henkilötietojasi hakemuksesi käsittelyä varten. Käyttämällä verkkosivustoamme/portaaliamme, liittymällä Talent-yhteisöömme tai hakemalla johonkin työpaikkaamme annat Honeywellille suostumuksesi kerätä ja käsitellä edelleen edellä kuvattuja henkilötietoja tässä tietosuojaselosteessa kuvattuihin tarkoituksiin. Voit peruuttaa suostumuksesi milloin tahansa lähettämällä pyynnön rekisteröityjen pyyntöportaalimme kautta osoitteessa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
tai lähettämällä meille sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oikeutetut edut.
Honeywellin oikeutetut edut, eli uusien työntekijöiden rekrytointi, valinta, arviointi ja nimittäminen sekä rekrytointi- ja henkilöstöprosessin hallinta ja hallinnointi, siinä määrin kuin perusoikeutesi ja -vapauksiesi ei syrjäytä oikeutettuja etujamme.
Lakisääteiset velvoitteet
. Honeywellin lakisääteisten velvoitteiden noudattaminen silloin, kun työlainsäädäntö tai muut lait edellyttävät henkilötietojesi käsittelyä (esimerkiksi siinä määrin kuin laki edellyttää yhtäläisten mahdollisuuksien ja monimuotoisuuden seurantaa).
Elintärkeät edut.
Saatamme tarvita henkilötietojasi myös elintärkeiden etujesi suojaamiseksi (esimerkiksi terveys- ja turvallisuussyistä, jos osallistut haastatteluun toimipaikassamme).
Jos sinulla on kysyttävää tai tarvitset lisätietoja siitä, millä oikeusperustalla keräämme ja käytämme henkilötietojasi, lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Kenen kanssa jaamme henkilötietojasi
Honeywell jakaa henkilötietojasi kolmansille osapuolille vain seuraavissa tapauksissa:
Honeywell-konsernin yksiköt
. Saatamme jakaa henkilötietojasi muille konsernin yksiköille, jotka sijaitsevat eri puolilla maailmaa sijaitsevilla lainkäyttöalueilla, jotta voimme arvioida profiiliasi ja harkita mahdollisia rekrytointimahdollisuuksia konsernitasolla.
Palveluntarjoajat
Saatamme erityisesti jakaa henkilötietojasi kolmansien osapuolten palveluntarjoajille, jotka suorittavat tiettyjä palveluja puolestamme (esimerkiksi rekrytointi- ja ulkoistamispalvelujen tarjoajat ja analytiikan tarjoajat). Tällaiset kolmannet osapuolet voivat vaihdella maastasi riippuen ja muuttua aika ajoin, mutta niihin voivat kuulua Phenom People, Inc. ja Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. sekä niiden vastaavat kolmannen osapuolen palveluntarjoajat.
Honeywellin työntekijät.
Jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, ota huomioon, että jotkin profiilisi kohdat ovat julkisia ja siten kaikkien Honeywellin työntekijöiden nähtävissä (erityisesti nimesi, tittelisi, valokuvasi, taitosi, kiinnostuksen kohteesi, työkokemuksesi ja koulutuksesi). Näitä osioita voi kuitenkin muokata, ja voit valita, mitä tietoja sinusta näytetään profiilissasi. Huomioithan, että uratavoitteet, muutot ja profiilin tila "avoin uusille mahdollisuuksille" -osiot eivät ole julkisia eivätkä näin ollen näy kaikille Honeywellin työntekijöille (ainoastaan Honeywellin Talent Teamille).
Muut kolmannet osapuolet.
Honeywell voi luovuttaa henkilötietojasi toimivaltaiselle lainvalvontaviranomaiselle, sääntelyviranomaiselle, valtion virastolle, tuomioistuimelle tai kolmannelle osapuolelle, jos uskomme, että luovuttaminen on tarpeen sovellettavan lain nojalla tai jos uskomme vilpittömässä mielessä, että tällainen toiminta on tarpeen laillisten oikeuksiemme käyttämiseksi, vahvistamiseksi tai puolustamiseksi tai sinun tai jonkun muun henkilön elintärkeiden etujen suojaamiseksi. Voimme myös jakaa henkilötietojasi muiden kanssa suostumuksellasi tai ohjeistuksestasi (esim. erotuomari tai ammattiyhdistys).
Henkilötietojen kansainväliset siirrot
Honeywell on maailmanlaajuinen organisaatio, ja henkilötietojasi voidaan siirtää, säilyttää, tallentaa tai käyttää eri puolilla maailmaa, kuten Yhdysvalloissa ja Intiassa. Tämä tarkoittaa, että kun keräämme henkilötietojasi, niitä saatetaan käsitellä maissa, joiden tietosuojalainsäädäntö saattaa poiketa sinun maasi lainsäädännöstä. Honeywell ryhtyy kuitenkin aina kohtuullisiin toimenpiteisiin suojellakseen yksityisyyttäsi ja tarjotakseen henkilötietojen suojan tason, joka on verrattavissa asuinmaasi suojaan. Näihin toimenpiteisiin kuuluu
Euroopan komission vakiosopimuslausekkeiden
täytäntöönpano, jotka löytyvät komission verkkosivuilta osoitteesta
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Säilyttäminen
Säilytämme henkilötietojasi niin kauan kuin se on tarpeen tässä tietosuojailmoituksessa kuvattujen tarkoitusten toteuttamiseksi ja Honeywellin asiakirjojen säilytysaikataulun mukaisesti tai sovellettavan lain edellyttämällä tavalla.
Oikeutesi
Sovellettavasta lainsäädännöstä riippuen sinulla voi olla tiettyjä henkilötietojasi koskevia oikeuksia. Jos asut Kaliforniassa, katso alla oleva kohta “
Lisätietoja Kalifornian asukkaille
”.
Sinulla voi olla oikeus
tutustua
henkilötietoihisi,
korjata
,
päivittää
tai pyytää niiden
poistamista
;
Voit vastustaa
henkilötietojesi
käsittelyä, pyytää meitä rajoittamaan henkilötietojesi käsittelyä tai pyytää henkilötietojesi
siirrettävyyttä
;
Sinulla voi olla oikeus olla tekemättä sinusta päätöstä, joka perustuu yksinomaan automaattiseen käsittelyyn, mukaan lukien profilointi, jos kyseinen päätös tuottaa sinuun kohdistuvia oikeusvaikutuksia tai vaikuttaa sinuun merkittävästi.
Honeywell ei tee rekrytointiprosessinsa yhteydessä yksinomaan automatisoituja päätöksiä hakijoista.
Jos olemme keränneet ja käsitelleet henkilötietojasi suostumuksellasi, voit peruuttaa suostumuksesi milloin tahansa. Suostumuksesi peruuttaminen ei vaikuta ennen peruuttamistasi suorittamamme käsittelyn laillisuuteen, eikä se vaikuta henkilötietojesi käsittelyyn, joka on suoritettu muiden laillisten käsittelyperusteiden kuin suostumuksen perusteella; ja
Sinulla on oikeus valittaa tietosuojaviranomaiselle henkilötietojesi keräämisestä ja käytöstä.
Helpotamme sinua käyttämään sinua koskevia oikeuksia sovellettavan lainsäädännön mukaisesti. Jos haluat käyttää mitä tahansa henkilötietoihisi liittyviä oikeuksiasi, ota meihin yhteyttä HR Help -palvelun kautta tai rekisteröidyn pyyntöä koskevalla lomakkeella, joka löytyy osoitteesta
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
tai lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Lisätietoja Kalifornian asukkaille
Jos asut Kalifornian osavaltiossa, tämä osio täydentää Honeywellin hakijoiden tietosuojailmoitusta.
(i)      Kerättyjen ja luovutettujen henkilötietojen luokat
Honeywell on kerännyt ja luovuttanut seuraavia henkilötietoryhmiä liiketoimintatarkoituksiin edellisen kahdentoista kuukauden aikana:
Previous column
Next column
Kategoriat
Keräämme
A.
Tunnisteet, kuten nimi, syntymäaika, sukupuoli, sähköpostiosoite, puhelinnumerot, postiosoite, verkkotunnisteet, sosiaalisen median tilit ja muut tunnisteet.
Kyllä
C.
Kalifornian tai liittovaltion lainsäädännön nojalla suojattujen luokitusten piirteet, kuten rotu, etninen alkuperä, uskonnolliset tai filosofiset vakaumukset, ammattiyhdistyksen jäsenyys, terveystiedot, biometriset tiedot, geneettiset tiedot, vammaisuus, veteraaniasema, seksuaalinen suuntautuminen, henkilökohtainen posti, sähköposti- ja tekstiviestit (ellei Honeywell ole tarkoitettu vastaanottaja), julkiset tunnisteet (esim. sosiaaliturvatunnus), ajokortti, passi, rahoitus- ja pankkitiedot.
Kyllä
F.
Internetin tai muun sähköisen verkon toimintatiedot, kuten selaushistoria, vuorovaikutus Honeywellin verkkosivustojen, sähköpostin ja tekstiviestipalvelujen kanssa.
Kyllä
G.
Paikannustiedot, kuten laitteen sijainti ja IP-sijainti.
Kyllä
H.
Ääni-, elektroniset, visuaaliset, lämpö- tai muut vastaavat tiedot, kuten äänesi ja kuvasi, video- tai äänitallenteet, jos osallistut puhelin- tai videohaastatteluun tai jos vierailet toimistossamme.
Kyllä
I.
Ammatilliset tai työhön liittyvät tiedot, kuten ammatti, nykyinen tai aiemmat työnantajat, tehtävänimike, koulutushistoria, akateeminen ja ammatillinen pätevyys, ansioluettelo, työhistoria, työhönottoa koskevat suositukset, haastattelumuistiinpanot ja -arvioinnit, kielet, ammatilliset jäsenyydet, todistukset, suorituksenhallinta-arvioinnit, korvaukset, sijaintitiedot ja matkustusmieltymykset.
Kyllä
K.
Edellä luetelluista henkilötiedoista tehtävät johtopäätökset profiilin tai yhteenvedon luomiseksi esimerkiksi yksilön mieltymyksistä ja ominaisuuksista.
Kyllä
Load More
(ii)      Sinun oikeutesi
Sinulla on oikeus lähettää meille pyyntö seuraavista oikeuksista, jotka kattavat pyyntöäsi edeltävän kahdentoista kuukauden ajanjakson. Huomaa, että nämä oikeudet eivät ole ehdottomia ja että joissakin tapauksissa niihin sovelletaan sovellettavassa lainsäädännössä määriteltyjä rajoituksia:
Oikeus tietää, mitä henkilötietoja olemme keränneet sinusta, mistä lähteistä olemme keränneet henkilötietojasi, mitä liiketoiminnallista tai kaupallista tarkoitusta varten olemme keränneet henkilötietojasi ja minkälaisille kolmansille osapuolille olemme luovuttaneet henkilötietojasi;
Oikeus poistaa henkilötietosi;
Oikeus oikaista sinua koskevat virheelliset henkilötiedot;
Oikeus kieltäytyä henkilötietojesi myynnistä tai jakamisesta;
Oikeus rajoittaa arkaluonteisten henkilötietojesi käsittelyä;
Oikeus olla joutumatta laittoman syrjinnän kohteeksi käyttäessään sovellettavien lakien mukaisia oikeuksiaan.
Helpotamme sinua käyttämään sinua koskevia oikeuksia sovellettavan lainsäädännön mukaisesti, ja ottaen huomioon pyynnön kohteena olevien henkilötietojen tyypin ja arkaluonteisuuden saatamme sinun suojelemisesi vuoksi joutua pyytämään henkilöllisyytesi tarkistamista ja pyytämään sinulta lisätietoja.
Jos haluat käyttää mitä tahansa henkilötietoihisi liittyviä oikeuksiasi, ota meihin yhteyttä osoitteessa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
olevan rekisteröityjen pyyntölomakkeen kautta tai lähetä sähköpostia osoitteeseen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä, voit ottaa meihin yhteyttä osoitteessa
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Ota yhteyttä
Jos sinulla on kysymyksiä tai valituksia siitä, miten henkilötietojasi käsitellään, tai jos haluat käyttää oikeuksiasi, ota yhteyttä:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(vain jos olet jo Honeywellin työntekijä) tai tietosuojavastaavaamme osoitteessa
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Voit ottaa meihin yhteyttä myös rekisteröityjen pyyntöjen lomakkeella, joka löytyy osoitteesta
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
French
Mise à jour : 1er janvier 2023
Le présent avis de confidentialité des candidats (" avis de confidentialité ") décrit la manière dont Honeywell International, Inc. et ses
filiales
(collectivement "
Honeywell
", "
nous
" ou "
notre
") traitent vos informations personnelles lorsque vous rejoignez notre communauté de talents, recherchez ou postulez à un emploi et nous soumettez des informations personnelles via notre portail, nos sites Web ou d'autres supports de recrutement, que ce soit en ligne ou hors ligne (les "
services
"). Nous sommes les responsables du traitement de vos informations personnelles aux fins des lois applicables en matière de protection des données.
Veuillez noter que si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, vous pouvez également vous référer à la politique mondiale de confidentialité des données d'Honeywell et à l'avis de confidentialité des employés, s'il en existe un dans votre juridiction. L'objectif de cet avis de confidentialité est de vous fournir des informations plus détaillées sur le traitement de vos données personnelles dans le cadre de votre candidature.
Informations personnelles que nous recueillons
Pour traiter votre candidature, nous vous demandons de fournir des informations personnelles vous concernant, par exemple lorsque vous postulez à une offre d'emploi particulière sur notre site Web/portail ou, si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, au cours de votre relation de travail. Toutes les informations sont fournies sur une base volontaire et c'est vous qui déterminez l'étendue des informations que vous fournissez à Honeywell.
N'oubliez pas que certaines informations peuvent être nécessaires à l'évaluation de votre candidature et que, si elles ne sont pas fournies, notre capacité à examiner votre candidature peut être limitée.
(i)   Informations personnelles
Nous pouvons recueillir les informations personnelles suivantes à votre sujet :
Détails personnels et informations de contact, y compris l'adresse électronique, le(s) numéro(s) de téléphone et la photographie ;
Des informations professionnelles et éducatives liées à votre profession, telles que votre employeur actuel ou précédent, votre titre de poste ou d'autres informations sur l'organisation à laquelle vous êtes affilié(e). Vous pouvez également fournir votre CV et des informations sur vos qualifications ou votre formation, telles que vos diplômes, vos domaines d'études, les établissements que vous avez fréquentés, vos langues, vos affiliations professionnelles, vos certifications, des détails sur les évaluations de la gestion des performances et votre rémunération ;
les préférences professionnelles (par exemple, les objectifs à court et à long terme, la volonté de déménager, la date à laquelle il est possible de déménager et les préférences en matière de lieu de travail) ;
Les informations personnelles dérivées de votre participation à notre processus de recrutement, telles que, par exemple, celles obtenues lors des entretiens, les courriels que nous échangeons avec vous concernant votre candidature ou les conversations que nous avons avec vous par le biais de notre Chatbot en ligne.
Des informations audio et visuelles, telles que votre voix et votre image capturées sur des photographies, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo, ou si vous vous rendez dans nos bureaux ;
Toute autre information personnelle que vous choisissez volontairement de nous fournir.
(ii)  Informations personnelles sensibles
Nous pouvons également collecter des catégories spéciales d'informations personnelles vous concernant (également appelées "catégories spéciales d'informations personnelles") lorsque nous avons une obligation légale de le faire, ou que l'autorité compétente de l'État membre a l'intention d'utiliser ces informations. les informations sont pertinentes pour votre futur environnement de travail chez Honeywell, ou pour la fourniture future d'avantages sociaux, ou avec votre consentement explicite, comme par exemple:
Numéro d'identification délivré par le gouvernement (tel que le numéro de sécurité sociale) ;
Les informations démographiques, qui peuvent inclure des informations sur des classifications protégées, telles que l'âge, le sexe, la race, les handicaps, l'orientation sexuelle, l'état matrimonial ou le statut de vétéran ;
Informations relatives à la santé (par exemple, pour tenir compte d'un éventuel handicap ou de restrictions alimentaires) ;
Informations relatives aux opinions politiques, aux croyances religieuses ou à l'appartenance syndicale d'une personne ;
les informations relatives aux infractions ou condamnations pénales d'une personne, ainsi que toute autre information jugée sensible en vertu des lois applicables en matière de protection des données. Lorsque la loi le permet et dans la mesure où cela est applicable, Honeywell peut également avoir besoin de vérifier vos antécédents et/ou votre casier judiciaire afin de déterminer si vous êtes apte à occuper un poste vacant ou à saisir une opportunité chez Honeywell.
Nous ne vous demandons pas de nous fournir des informations personnelles sensibles, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour remplir nos obligations réglementaires (par exemple, pour le contrôle de l'égalité des chances), ou si vous avez donné votre consentement explicite. Sauf dans la mesure où la loi l'exige, la fourniture de ces informations est entièrement volontaire. Honeywell s'engage à ce que sa main-d'œuvre soit réellement inclusive et diversifiée. En nous fournissant vos données relatives à l'égalité des chances, vous nous permettez de mieux comprendre le profil de nos employés en termes de données relatives à l'égalité des chances et les mesures que nous devons prendre pour attirer, promouvoir et conserver une main-d'œuvre diversifiée, indépendamment de l'âge, du handicap, du sexe, de la race, des croyances religieuses ou philosophiques et de l'orientation sexuelle.
(iii) Informations personnelles que nous recueillons automatiquement auprès de vous
Nous pouvons collecter automatiquement certaines informations concernant votre visite sur nos sites web en utilisant des "cookies" et d'autres technologies de suivi similaires. Pour plus d'informations sur les cookies que nous utilisons sur le site web par l'intermédiaire duquel vous soumettez votre candidature, veuillez lire notre
avis sur les cookies
.
Sources d'informations personnelles
Nous pouvons collecter vos informations personnelles directement auprès de vous ou indirectement auprès de tiers qui sont légalement autorisés à partager vos informations avec nous :
Les agences pour l'emploi, les fournisseurs de services de vérification des antécédents/de l'emploi ou de l'identité ;
Agences de recrutement (par exemple, lorsqu'une agence de recrutement vous identifie comme candidat potentiel) ;
des informations publiques vous concernant provenant de sites tels que LinkedIn ou le site web de votre employeur actuel. Vous pouvez également choisir de nous donner accès à certaines informations personnelles stockées par des tiers (par exemple, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). En autorisant Honeywell à accéder à ces informations, vous acceptez que nous puissions les collecter, les stocker et les utiliser conformément au présent avis de confidentialité ;
par référence ou bouche à oreille (par exemple, par l'intermédiaire d'un employé actuel ou ancien). Dans ce cas, il incombe à la personne qui vous recommande d'obtenir votre consentement pour nous fournir vos informations personnelles.
Finalités de l'utilisation des données personnelles
Nous utilisons vos informations personnelles aux fins suivantes :
Pour évaluer votre candidature et prendre des décisions d'embauche ;
Communiquer avec vous et vous informer sur le recrutement et/ou votre/vos candidature(s) ou toute autre communication requise ;
se conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires applicables et nous permettre d'établir, d'exercer ou de défendre une réclamation légale ;
Emploi et gestion d'entreprise (par exemple, établir un dossier d'emploi de base si vous êtes embauché) ;
réaliser des rapports/analyses agrégés concernant les données d'activité des candidats (par exemple, trafic sur le site de carrière, entonnoir des candidats, source d'embauche, succès de la campagne de recrutement) ;
Réservé aux employés d'Honeywell :
Vous êtes automatiquement exclu(e) des propositions proactives faites aux recruteurs pour une offre d'emploi et vous ne pouvez pas être pris(e) en considération en fonction de votre notation actuelle (qui ne sera jamais révélée à quiconque en dehors d'Honeywell). Toutefois, vous pourrez toujours postuler directement à toute offre d'emploi disponible et votre situation spécifique sera examinée par un recruteur.
Uniquement si vous résidez aux États-Unis
: Pour vous envoyer des communications par SMS, en particulier :
(i)     1-1 les communications par SMS en rapport avec votre candidature à une offre d'emploi particulière ; et/ou
(ii)    sous réserve de votre consentement explicite, des campagnes de communication par SMS sur les possibilités d'emploi, les offres d'emploi et les mises à jour des candidatures.
Vous pourrez refuser et/ou révoquer votre consentement à recevoir les communications susmentionnées en suivant les instructions données dans votre profil.
Si Honeywell vous propose un emploi et que vous l'acceptez, les informations recueillies au cours du processus de candidature et de recrutement seront intégrées à votre dossier d'emploi.
Traitement automatisé et profilage
Sous réserve de votre consentement explicite (que vous donnez volontairement en rejoignant notre communauté de talents ou en cochant la case de consentement appropriée au cours de la procédure de candidature), nous procédons à un "profilage" pour évaluer votre aptitude à répondre à des offres d'emploi particulières. Cela implique l'utilisation d'un algorithme de correspondance capable d'évaluer votre profil professionnel et de prédire votre éligibilité à une offre d'emploi particulière. Nous effectuons ce traitement automatisé aux fins suivantes :
aider les recruteurs à faire correspondre les profils des candidats aux offres d'emploi en suggérant des candidats à prendre en considération pour une offre d'emploi spécifique ; et
vous envoyer des recommandations d'emploi personnalisées en fonction de votre profil et/ou de vos préférences ou d'autres informations susceptibles de vous intéresser, telles que les actualités, les webinaires et les événements de Honeywell.
Veuillez noter que, sur la base de ce profilage, il se peut que vous ne soyez pas pris en considération pour certaines offres d'emploi, à moins que vous n'ayez postulé directement.
Nous ne prenons pas de décisions d'embauche fondées uniquement sur des processus de prise de décision automatisés et/ou sur le profilage. Vos informations personnelles seront soumises à des décisions humaines, car la décision d'embauche finale sera prise par les recruteurs ou le responsable de l'embauche.
Bases juridiques du traitement de vos données personnelles
Certaines juridictions exigent qu'Honeywell dispose d'une base juridique pour le traitement de vos informations personnelles. Lorsque la législation applicable exige que nous justifiions nos activités de traitement, notre base juridique pour la collecte et l'utilisation de vos informations personnelles, telle que décrite dans le présent avis de confidentialité, dépendra des informations personnelles concernées et du contexte spécifique dans lequel nous les collectons.
Consentement.
En règle générale, nous recueillons des informations personnelles lorsque nous avons votre consentement et lorsque nous avons besoin de ces informations pour traiter votre candidature. En accédant à notre site/portail, en rejoignant notre communauté de talents ou en postulant à l'un de nos postes, vous donnez votre consentement à Honeywell pour collecter et traiter les informations personnelles décrites ci-dessus aux fins décrites dans le présent avis de confidentialité. Vous pouvez
retirer votre consentement à tout moment
en soumettant une demande par le biais de notre portail de demande des personnes concernées à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou en nous envoyant un courrier électronique à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intérêts légitimes.
Dans l'intérêt légitime d'Honeywell, à savoir le recrutement, la sélection, l'évaluation et la nomination de nouveaux employés, ainsi que la gestion et l'administration du processus de recrutement et de ressources humaines, dans la mesure où vos libertés et droits fondamentaux ne prévalent pas sur nos intérêts légitimes.
Obligations légales
. Respect des obligations légales d'Honeywell lorsque le droit du travail ou d'autres lois exigent le traitement de vos informations personnelles (par exemple, dans la mesure où la loi exige le contrôle de l'égalité des chances et de la diversité).
Intérêts vitaux.
Nous pouvons également avoir besoin de vos données personnelles pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux (par exemple, pour des raisons de santé et de sécurité si vous participez à un entretien sur notre site).
Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez obtenir de plus amples informations concernant la base juridique sur laquelle nous collectons et utilisons vos informations personnelles, veuillez envoyer un courrier électronique à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Avec qui partageons-nous vos informations personnelles ?
Honeywell ne partagera vos informations personnelles avec des tiers que dans les circonstances suivantes :
Entités du groupe Honeywell
. Nous pouvons partager vos informations personnelles avec d'autres entités du groupe situées dans des juridictions du monde entier afin d'évaluer votre profil et de prendre en considération toute opportunité de recrutement au niveau du groupe.
Prestataires de services
Nous pouvons spécifiquement partager vos informations personnelles avec des prestataires de services tiers qui fournissent des services spécifiques en notre nom (par exemple, des prestataires de services de recrutement et d'externalisation et des prestataires de services d'analyse). Ces tiers peuvent varier en fonction de votre pays et changer de temps à autre, mais peuvent inclure Phenom People, Inc. et Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. ainsi que leurs fournisseurs tiers respectifs.
Employés d'Honeywell.
Si vous êtes déjà un employé d'Honeywell, veuillez noter que certaines sections de votre profil sont publiques et donc visibles par tous les employés d'Honeywell (en particulier, votre nom, votre titre, votre photographie, vos compétences, vos centres d'intérêt, votre expérience professionnelle et votre formation). Toutefois, ces sections sont modifiables et vous pourrez choisir les informations vous concernant qui seront affichées dans votre profil. Veuillez noter que les informations relatives aux objectifs de carrière, aux déménagements, à la formation et à l'expérience professionnelle ne sont pas publiées dans votre profil. et le statut du profil "ouvert à de nouvelles opportunités" ne seront pas publics et, par conséquent, ne seront pas visibles par tous les employés d'Honeywell (uniquement par l'équipe "Talents" d'Honeywell).
Autres tiers.
Honeywell peut partager vos informations personnelles avec tout organisme compétent chargé de l'application de la loi, tout régulateur, toute agence gouvernementale, tout tribunal ou toute tierce partie lorsque nous estimons que la divulgation est nécessaire en vertu de la loi applicable ou lorsque nous pensons de bonne foi qu'une telle action est nécessaire pour exercer, établir ou défendre nos droits légaux ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d'une autre personne. Nous pouvons également partager vos informations personnelles avec d'autres personnes avec votre consentement ou selon vos instructions (par exemple, un arbitre ou une association professionnelle).
Transferts internationaux de données à caractère personnel
Honeywell est une organisation mondiale et vos informations personnelles peuvent être transférées, détenues, stockées ou utilisées dans différents endroits du monde, tels que les États-Unis et l'Inde. Cela signifie que lorsque nous recueillons vos informations personnelles, celles-ci peuvent être traitées dans des pays dont les lois sur la protection des données diffèrent de celles de votre pays. Cependant, Honeywell prendra toujours des mesures raisonnables pour protéger votre vie privée et assurer un niveau de protection des informations personnelles comparable à celui de votre pays de résidence, notamment en appliquant les
Clauses contractuelles types de la Commission européenne
, qui peuvent être consultées sur le site Web de la Commission à l'adresse
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Rétention
Nous conserverons vos informations personnelles aussi longtemps que nécessaire en rapport avec les objectifs décrits dans le présent avis de confidentialité et conformément au calendrier de conservation des dossiers d'Honeywell ou comme l'exige la législation en vigueur.
Vos droits
En fonction de la législation applicable, vous pouvez disposer de certains droits en ce qui concerne vos informations personnelles. Si vous êtes résident californien, veuillez vous référer à la section “
Informations supplémentaires pour les résidents californiens
” ci-dessous.
Vous pouvez avoir le droit d'accéder à vos informations personnelles,
de les corriger, de les mettre à jour
ou de demander leur
suppression
;
Vous pouvez
vous opposer
au traitement de vos données personnelles, nous demander de
restreindre le
traitement de vos données personnelles. le traitement de vos informations personnelles ou demander la
portabilité de
vos informations personnelles ;
Vous pouvez avoir le droit de refuser qu'une décision soit prise à votre sujet sur la seule base d'un traitement automatisé, y compris le profilage, si cette décision produit des effets juridiques à votre sujet ou vous affecte de manière significative.
Honeywell ne prend pas, dans le cadre de son processus de recrutement, de décisions exclusivement automatisées concernant les candidats.
De même, si nous avons recueilli et traité vos informations personnelles avec votre consentement, vous pouvez le retirer à tout moment. Le retrait de votre consentement n'affectera pas la légalité du traitement que nous avons effectué avant votre retrait, ni le traitement de vos informations à caractère personnel effectué sur la base de motifs de traitement légitimes autres que le consentement ; et
Vous avez le droit de vous plaindre auprès d'une autorité de protection des données concernant notre collecte et notre utilisation de vos informations personnelles.
Nous vous faciliterons l'exercice des droits qui vous sont applicables conformément à la législation en vigueur. Pour exercer l'un de vos droits relatifs à vos informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter par l'intermédiaire de l'aide RH ou du formulaire de demande de la personne concernée qui se trouve à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envoyez un courriel à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informations complémentaires pour les résidents de Californie
Si vous êtes résident de l'État de Californie, cette section complète l'avis de confidentialité de Honeywell à l'intention des candidats.
(i)      Catégories d'informations personnelles collectées et divulguées
Au cours des douze derniers mois, Honeywell a collecté et divulgué les catégories suivantes d'informations personnelles à des fins commerciales :
Previous column
Next column
Catégories
Nous collectons
A.
Identifiants tels que le nom, la date de naissance, le sexe, l'adresse électronique, les numéros de téléphone, l'adresse postale, les identifiants en ligne, les comptes de médias sociaux et autres identifiants.
Oui
C.
Caractéristiques des catégories protégées en vertu de la législation californienne ou fédérale, telles que la race, l'origine ethnique, les croyances religieuses ou philosophiques, l'appartenance à un syndicat, les données de santé, les informations biométriques, les données génétiques, le handicap, le statut d'ancien combattant, l'orientation sexuelle, le courrier personnel, les courriels et les messages textuels (sauf si Honeywell en est le destinataire), les identifiants gouvernementaux (par exemple, le numéro de sécurité sociale), le permis de conduire, le passeport, les informations financières et bancaires.
Oui
F.
Informations relatives à l'activité sur Internet ou sur d'autres réseaux électroniques, telles que l'historique de navigation, les interactions avec les sites Web de Honeywell, le courrier électronique et les services de messagerie textuelle.
Oui
G.
Données de géolocalisation, telles que l'emplacement de l'appareil et l'emplacement IP.
Oui
H.
Informations audio, électroniques, visuelles, thermiques ou similaires, telles que votre voix et votre image, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo ou si vous vous rendez dans nos bureaux.
Oui
I.
Informations professionnelles ou liées à l'emploi, telles que votre profession, vos employeurs actuels ou précédents, votre titre de poste, votre parcours scolaire, vos qualifications académiques et professionnelles, votre curriculum vitae, vos antécédents professionnels, vos références d'embauche, vos notes d'entretien et vos évaluations, vos langues, vos adhésions professionnelles, vos certifications, vos évaluations de gestion des performances, votre rémunération, vos préférences en matière de lieu de travail et de voyage.
Oui
K.
Déductions tirées de toute information personnelle énumérée ci-dessus pour créer un profil ou un résumé concernant, par exemple, les préférences et les caractéristiques d'une personne.
Oui
Load More
(ii)      Vos droits
Vous avez le droit de nous envoyer une demande pour les droits suivants couvrant la période de douze mois qui précède votre demande. Veuillez noter que ces droits ne sont pas absolus et que, dans certains cas, ils sont soumis aux limitations prévues par la législation applicable :
Le droit de savoir quelles informations personnelles nous avons collectées à votre sujet, les catégories de sources auprès desquelles nous avons collecté vos informations personnelles, l'objectif professionnel ou commercial pour lequel nous avons collecté vos informations personnelles, et les catégories de tiers avec lesquels nous divulguons vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de supprimer vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de corriger les informations personnelles inexactes vous concernant ;
Le droit de refuser la vente ou le partage de vos informations personnelles ;
Le droit de limiter le traitement de vos informations personnelles sensibles ;
Le droit de ne pas faire l'objet d'une discrimination illégale pour avoir exercé ses droits en vertu des lois applicables.
Nous vous faciliterons l'exercice des droits qui vous sont applicables conformément à la législation en vigueur et, compte tenu du type et de la sensibilité des informations personnelles faisant l'objet de la demande, nous pourrons être amenés, pour votre protection, à vérifier votre identité et à vous demander des informations complémentaires.
Pour exercer l'un de vos droits relatifs à vos informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande d'informations à l'adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envoyez un courrier électronique à l'adresse
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez nous contacter à l'adresse
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Nous contacter
Si vous avez des questions ou des réclamations concernant le traitement de vos informations personnelles ou si vous souhaitez exercer vos droits, veuillez contacter :
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(uniquement si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell) ou notre délégué à la protection des données à l'adresse
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Vous pouvez également nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande d'information des personnes concernées, disponible à l'adresse suivante :
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
French-Canadian
Mise à jour: 1er janvier 2023
L’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des candidats (« Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels ») décrit la façon dont Honeywell International, Inc. et ses
filiales
(collectivement «
Honeywell
», ou «
nous
» traitent vos renseignements personnels lorsque vous vous joignez à notre communauté de talents, cherchez un emploi ou postulez à un emploi et nous soumettez des renseignements personnels par l’intermédiaire de notre portail, de nos sites Web ou d’autres moyens de recrutement, que ce soit en ligne ou hors ligne [les «
Services
»]. Nous sommes les responsables du traitement de vos renseignements personnels en vertu des lois applicables sur la protection des données.
Veuillez noter que si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez également consulter la Politique mondiale sur la protection des renseignements personnels de Honeywell et l’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des employés s’il en existe un pour votre juridiction. Le but de cet Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels est de vous donner des informations plus détaillées sur le traitement de vos renseignements personnels dans le cadre de votre candidature.
Renseignements personnels que nous recueillons
Pour traiter votre candidature, nous vous demandons de fournir des renseignements à votre sujet, par exemple lorsque vous postulez à une offre d’emploi particulière par l’entremise de notre site Web/portail ou, si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, pendant votre relation d’emploi. Tous les renseignements sont fournis sur une base volontaire et vous déterminez l’étendue des informations que vous fournissez à Honeywell.
N’oubliez pas que certains renseignements peuvent être nécessaires à l’évaluation de votre candidature et que s’ils ne sont pas fournis, notre capacité à vous considérer comme un candidat peut être limitée.
(i)   Renseignements personnels
Nous pouvons recueillir les renseignements personnels suivants à votre sujet:
Renseignements personnels et coordonnées, y compris l’adresse électronique, le(s) numéro(s) de téléphone et une photographie;
Renseignements professionnels et scolaires liés à votre profession, tels que vos employeurs actuel ou précédents, votre titre de poste ou d’autres informations sur l’organisation à laquelle vous êtes affilié. Vous pouvez également fournir votre CV et des renseignements sur vos qualifications ou votre formation, tels que vos diplômes, vos domaines d’études, les établissements que vous avez fréquentés, les langues, l’adhésion à des associations professionnelles, les accréditations, les détails sur les évaluations de rendement et la rémunération;
Préférences de carrière (par ex., objectifs à court et à long terme, volonté de déménager, date disponible pour déménager et préférences en matière de lieu de travail);
Renseignements personnels découlant de votre participation à notre processus de recrutement, tels que, par exemple, ceux obtenus lors des entretiens, les courriels que nous échangeons avec vous concernant votre candidature ou les conversations que nous avons avec vous par le biais de notre boîte de clavardage en ligne.
Renseignements audio et visuels, tels que votre voix et votre apparence capturée dans des photographies, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo, ou si vous visitez nos bureaux;
Toute autre information personnelle que vous choisissez librement de nous fournir.
(ii)  Renseignements personnels sensibles
Nous pouvons également recueillir des catégories spéciales de renseignements personnels à votre sujet [également appelées « catégories spéciales de renseignements personnels »] lorsque nous sommes légalement tenus de le faire, ou que les renseignements sont pertinents pour votre futur environnement de travail chez Honeywell, ou pour la fourniture future d’avantages sociaux, ou avec votre consentement explicite, par exemple:
Un numéro d’identification émis par le gouvernement (tel qu’un numéro de sécurité sociale);
Des données démographiques, qui peuvent inclure des renseignements sur des classifications protégées, telles que votre âge, votre sexe, votre race, vos handicaps, votre orientation sexuelle, votre état civil ou votre statut de vétéran;
Des renseignements sur la santé (par exemple, pour tenir compte d’un éventuel handicap ou de restrictions alimentaires);
Des enseignements relatifs aux opinions politiques ou aux croyances religieuses d’une personne ou à son adhésion à un syndicat;
Des renseignements sur les infractions pénales ou les condamnations d’une personne, ainsi que toute autre information jugée sensible en vertu des lois applicables en matière de protection des données. Lorsque la loi l’autorise et dans la mesure où cela est applicable, Honeywell peut également avoir besoin de procéder à des vérifications d’antécédents et/ou de casier judiciaire afin de déterminer votre aptitude à occuper un poste ou une fonction à pourvoir chez Honeywell.
Nous ne vous demandons pas de nous fournir des renseignements personnels sensibles, sauf si cela est nécessaire pour nous acquitter de nos obligations réglementaires (par exemple, pour la surveillance de l’égalité des chances), ou si vous avez donné votre consentement explicite. Sauf dans la mesure où la loi l’exige, la fourniture de ces renseignements sera entièrement volontaire. Honeywell s’engage à offrir une main-d’œuvre véritablement inclusive et diversifiée. En nous fournissant vos données sur l’égalité des chances, vous nous permettez de mieux comprendre le profil de nos employés en fonction des données sur l’égalité des chances et les mesures que nous devons prendre pour attirer, promouvoir et conserver une main-d’œuvre diversifiée, indépendamment de l’âge, du handicap, du sexe, de la race, des croyances religieuses ou philosophiques et de l’orientation sexuelle.
(iii) Renseignements personnels que nous recueillons automatiquement de vous
Nous pouvons recueillir automatiquement certains renseignements concernant votre visite sur nos sites Web à l’aide de « témoins » et d’autres technologies de suivi similaires. Pour plus d’informations sur les témoins que nous utilisons sur le site Web par lequel vous soumettez votre candidature, veuillez lire notre
Avis sur les témoins
.
Sources de renseignements personnels
Nous pouvons recueillir vos renseignements personnels directement auprès de vous ou indirectement auprès de tiers qui sont légalement autorisés à transmettre ces renseignements, par exemple:
Les agences de recrutement, les fournisseurs de services de vérification des antécédents/de l’emploi ou de l’identité;
Les agences de recrutement (par exemple, lorsqu’une agence de recrutement vous désigne comme un candidat potentiel);
Les informations publiques à votre sujet provenant de sites tels que LinkedIn ou le site Web de votre employeur actuel. Vous pouvez également choisir de nous donner accès à certains renseignements personnels stockés par des tiers (par exemple, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). En autorisant Honeywell à avoir accès à ces renseignements, vous acceptez que nous puissions recueillir, stocker et utiliser ces informations conformément au présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels;
Par recommandation ou de bouche à oreille (par exemple, par le biais d’une recommandation d’un employé actuel ou ancien). Dans le cas d’une recommandation, la personne qui vous recommande sera chargée d’obtenir votre consentement pour nous fournir vos renseignements personnels.
Fins auxquelles les renseignements personnels sont utilisés
Nous utilisons vos renseignements personnels aux fins suivantes:
Pour évaluer votre candidature et prendre des décisions d’embauche;
Pour communiquer avec vous et vous informer sur le recrutement et/ou votre/vos candidature(s) ou toute autre communication requise;
Pour se conformer aux exigences légales et réglementaires applicables et pour nous permettre d’établir, d’exercer ou de défendre une réclamation fondée en droit;
Pour assurer la gestion d’emploi et générale (par exemple, établir un dossier d’emploi de base si vous êtes embauché);
Pour effectuer des rapports/analyses consolidés concernant les données d’activité des candidats (ex. (par exemple, le trafic sur le site de carrière, l’entonnoir des candidats, la source d’embauche, le succès des campagnes de recrutement);
Réservé aux employés de Honeywell:
Pour vous exclure automatiquement d’une proposition proactive aux recruteurs pour une possibilité d’emploi et si vous n’êtes pas admissible à la prise en considération selon votre évaluation 9 blocs HPD actuelle en (qui ne sera jamais révélée à quiconque hors de Honeywell). Toutefois, vous pourrez toujours postuler directement à toute offre d’emploi et votre situation précise sera examinée par un recruteur.
Seulement si vous êtes résident des États-Unis:
Pour vous envoyer des communications par message texte, notamment:
(i)     des communications par messages textes individualisées en rapport avec votre candidature à une offre d’emploi particulière; et/ou
(ii)    sous réserve de votre consentement exprès, des communications dans le cadre d’une campagne de messages textes sur les offres d’emploi, les affaires professionnelles et les dernières mises à jour des candidatures.
Vous pourrez refuser et/ou révoquer votre consentement à recevoir les communications précitées en suivant les instructions fournies dans votre profil.
Si vous êtes proposé et acceptez un emploi chez Honeywell, les renseignements recueillis au cours du processus de candidature et de recrutement feront partie de votre dossier d’emploi.
Traitement et profils automatisés
Sous réserve de votre consentement exprès (que vous donnez volontairement en vous joignant à notre communauté de talents ou en cochant la case appropriée au cours du processus de candidature), nous établissons un « profil » afin d’évaluer votre adéquation à des offres d’emploi particulières. Cela implique l’utilisation d’un algorithme de jumelage capable d’évaluer votre profil d’emploi et de prédire votre admissibilité à une offre d’emploi particulière. Nous effectuons ce traitement automatisé afin:
d’aider les recruteurs à jumeler les profils des candidats aux offres d’emploi en suggérant des candidats à prendre en considération pour une offre d’emploi spécifique; et
de vous envoyer des recommandations d’emploi personnalisées en fonction de votre profil et/ou de vos préférences ou d’autres renseignements susceptibles de vous intéresser, tels que les actualités, les webinaires et les événements de Honeywell.
Veuillez noter que, sur la base de ce profil, il se peut que vous ne soyez pas pris en considération pour certaines offres d’emploi, à moins que vous n’y ayez directement postulé.
Nous ne prenons pas de décisions d’embauche fondées uniquement sur des processus décisionnels automatisés et/ou sur le profil. Vos renseignements personnels seront soumis à des décisions humaines, car la décision finale d’embauche sera prise par les recruteurs ou le responsable du recrutement.
Motifs juridiques du traitement de vos renseignements personnels
Certaines juridictions exigent que Honeywell ait un motif juridique pour traiter vos renseignements personnels. Lorsque la loi applicable nous oblige à justifier nos activités de traitement, notre motif juridique pour la collecte et l’utilisation de vos renseignements personnels comme il est décrit dans le présent avis de confidentialité dépendra des renseignements personnels concernés et du contexte spécifique dans lequel nous les recueillons.
Consentement.
En général, nous recueillons normalement des renseignements personnels à votre sujet lorsque nous avons votre consentement pour le faire et lorsque nous en avons besoin pour traiter votre demande. En accédant à notre site Web/portail, en vous joignant à notre communauté de talents ou en soumettant votre candidature à l’un de nos postes, vous autorisez Honeywell à recueillir et à traiter les renseignements personnels décrits ci-dessus aux fins indiquées dans le présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels. Vous pouvez
retirer votre consentement
à tout moment en soumettant une demande par le biais de notre portail de demande de données à l’adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/us/en/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou en nous envoyant un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intérêts légitimes.
Nous travaillons selon les intérêts légitimes d’Honeywell, à savoir pour le recrutement, la sélection, l’évaluation et la nomination de nouveaux employés ainsi que la gestion et l’administration du recrutement et du processus RH, dans la mesure où nos intérêts légitimes ne l’emportent pas sur vos droits et libertés fondamentaux.
Obligations juridiques
. Nous respectons les obligations juridiques de Honeywell lorsque le droit du travail ou d’autres lois exigent le traitement de vos renseignements personnels (par exemple, dans la mesure où la loi exige la surveillance de l’égalité des chances et de la diversité).
Intérêts vitaux.
Nous pouvons également avoir besoin de vos renseignements personnels pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux (par exemple, pour des raisons de santé et de sécurité si vous participez à un entretien sur notre site).
Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez obtenir de plus amples renseignements concernant le motif juridique selon lequel nous recueillons et utilisons vos renseignements personnels, veuillez envoyer un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Avec qui partageons-nous vos renseignements personnels
Honeywell ne transmettra vos renseignements personnels à des tiers uniquement dans les circonstances suivantes:
Entités du groupe Honeywell
. Nous pouvons transmettre vos renseignements personnels à d’autres entités du groupe situées dans des juridictions du monde entier afin d’évaluer votre profil et d’envisager toute possibilité de recrutement au sein du groupe.
Fournisseurs de services
Nous pouvons transmettre vos renseignements personnels à des fournisseurs de services tiers qui proposent des services spécifiques en notre nom (par exemple, des fournisseurs de personnel de recrutement et de sous-traitance et des fournisseurs d’analyses). Ces tiers peuvent varier en fonction de votre pays et changeront de temps à autre, mais peuvent inclure Phenom People, Inc. et Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. et leurs fournisseurs tiers respectifs.
Employés de Honeywell.
Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, veuillez noter que certaines sections de votre profil sont publiques et, par conséquent, visibles par tous les employés de Honeywell (en particulier, votre nom, votre titre, votre photographie, vos compétences, vos centres d’intérêt, votre expérience professionnelle et votre formation). Toutefois, ces sections sont modifiables et vous pourrez choisir les renseignements à votre sujet qui figurent dans votre profil. Veuillez noter que les sections objectifs de carrière, réinstallations et statut de profil « ouvert à de nouvelles possibilités » ne seront pas publiques et, par conséquent, ne seront pas visibles par tous les employés de Honeywell (seulement par l’équipe des talents de Honeywell).
Autres tiers.
Honeywell peut transmettre vos renseignements personnels à tout organisme compétent chargé de l’application de la loi, régulateur, organisme gouvernemental, tribunal ou tiers lorsque nous estimons que la divulgation est nécessaire en vertu de la loi applicable ou lorsque nous croyons de bonne foi qu’une telle action est nécessaire pour exercer, établir ou défendre nos droits conférés par la loi ou pour protéger vos intérêts vitaux ou ceux d’une autre personne. Nous pouvons également transmettre vos renseignements personnels à d’autres personnes avec votre consentement ou sur vos instructions (par exemple, un arbitre ou une association professionnelle).
Transferts internationaux de renseignements personnels
Honeywell est une entreprise mondiale et vos renseignements personnels peuvent être transférés, conservés, stockés ou utilisés dans divers endroits du monde, comme les États-Unis et l’Inde. Cela signifie que lorsque nous recueillons vos renseignements personnels, ils peuvent être traités dans des pays dont les lois sur la protection des données peuvent être différentes de celles de votre pays. Toutefois, Honeywell prendra toujours des mesures raisonnables pour protéger vos renseignements personnels et fournir un niveau de protection des renseignements personnels comparable à celui de votre pays de résidence, ce qui inclut la mise en œuvre des
Clauses contractuelles types de la Commission européenne
qui peuvent être consultées sur le site Web de la Commission à l’adresse https://ec.europa.eu.
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Conservation
Nous conserverons vos renseignements personnels aussi longtemps que nécessaire aux fins décrites dans le présent Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels et conformément au Calendrier de conservation des dossiers de Honeywell ou aux exigences de la loi applicable.
Vos droits
En fonction de la loi applicable, vous pouvez avoir certains droits concernant vos renseignements personnels. Si vous êtes un résident californien, veuillez consulter les «
Renseignements supplémentaires pour les résidents californiens
» ci-dessous.
Vous pouvez avoir le droit d’accéder à vos renseignements personnels, de les
corriger, de les mettre à jour
ou de demander leur
suppression;
Vous pouvez vous
opposer
au traitement de vos renseignements personnels, nous demander de
restreindre
leur traitement ou demander la
portabilité
de vos renseignements personnels;
Vous pouvez avoir le droit de refuser qu’une décision soit prise à votre sujet sur la seule base d’un traitement automatisé, y compris le profilage, si cette décision produit des effets juridiques à votre sujet ou a une incidence significative sur vous.
Honeywell ne prend pas, dans le cadre de son processus de recrutement, de décisions exclusivement automatisées concernant les candidats.
De même, si nous avons recueilli et traité vos renseignements personnels avec votre consentement, vous pouvez retirer votre consentement à tout moment. Le retrait de votre consentement est sans effet sur la légalité de tout traitement que nous avons effectué avant votre retrait ni sur le traitement de vos renseignements personnels effectué sur la base de motifs de traitement légaux autres que le consentement; et
Vous avez le droit de vous plaindre auprès d’une autorité de protection des données au sujet de notre collecte et de notre utilisation de vos renseignements personnels.
Nous faciliterons l’exercice des droits qui s’appliquent à vous conformément à la loi en vigueur. Pour exercer tout droit relatif à vos renseignements personnels, veuillez nous contacter par l’intermédiaire de HR Help ou du formulaire de demande de données qui se trouve à l’adresse suivante:
https://www.honeywell.com/us/en/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou envoyez un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Renseignements supplémentaires pour les résidents de la Californie
Si vous êtes un résident de l’État de Californie, cette section complète l’Avis sur la protection des renseignements personnels des candidats de Honeywell.
(i)      Catégories de renseignements personnels recueillis et divulgués
Honeywell a recueilli et divulgué les catégories suivantes de renseignements personnels à des fins commerciales au cours des douze derniers mois:
Previous column
Next column
Catégories que nous recueillons
Recueillis
A.
Les identifiants tels que le nom, la date de naissance, le sexe, l’adresse électronique, les numéros de téléphone, l’adresse postale, les identifiants en ligne, les comptes de médias sociaux et autres identifiants.
Oui
C.
Les caractéristiques des classifications protégées par la loi californienne ou fédérale, telles que la race, l’origine ethnique, les croyances religieuses ou philosophiques, l’adhésion à un syndicat, les données de santé, les informations biométriques, les données génétiques, le handicap, le statut d’ancien combattant, l’orientation sexuelle, le courrier personnel, les courriels et les messages textes (sauf si Honeywell en est le destinataire), les identifiants gouvernementaux (par exemple, le numéro de sécurité sociale), le permis de conduire, le passeport, les informations financières et bancaires.
Oui
F.
Les informations relatives à l’activité sur Internet ou sur d’autres réseaux électroniques, telles que l’historique de navigation, les interactions avec les sites Web Honeywell, les services de messagerie électronique et d’envoi de messages textes.
Oui
G.
Les données de géolocalisation, telles que la localisation d’appareil et la localisation IP.
Oui
H.
Les informations audio, électroniques, visuelles, thermiques ou similaires, telles que votre voix et votre image, des enregistrements vidéo ou audio si vous participez à un entretien téléphonique ou vidéo ou si vous visitez nos bureaux.
Oui
I.
Les renseignements d’ordre professionnel ou liés à l’emploi, tels que votre profession, vos employeurs actuel ou précédents, votre titre de poste, vos antécédents scolaires, vos qualifications universitaires et professionnelles, votre curriculum vitae, vos antécédents professionnels, vos recommandations d’embauche, vos notes et évaluations d’entretien, vos langues, vos affiliations professionnelles, vos accréditations, vos évaluations de gestion du rendement, votre rémunération, vos préférences en matière de lieu de travail et de déplacements.
Oui
K.
Les déductions tirées de toute information personnelle énumérée ci-dessus pour créer un profil ou un résumé concernant, par exemple, les préférences et les caractéristiques d’une personne.
Oui
Load More
(ii)      Vos droits
Vous avez le droit de nous envoyer une demande pour les droits suivants couvrant la période de douze mois qui précède votre demande. Veuillez noter que ces droits ne sont pas absolus et que, dans certains cas, ils sont soumis aux limitations prévues par la loi applicable:
Le droit de savoir quels renseignements personnels nous avons recueillis à votre sujet, les catégories de sources à partir desquelles nous avons recueilli vos renseignements personnels; le motif professionnel ou commercial pour lequel nous avons recueilli vos renseignements personnels, et les catégories de tiers auxquels nous divulguons ces renseignements;
Le droit de supprimer vos renseignements personnels;
Le droit de corriger les renseignements personnels inexacts à votre sujet;
Le droit de refuser la vente ou la transmission de vos renseignements personnels;
Le droit de restreindre le traitement de vos renseignements personnels sensibles;
Le droit de ne pas subir de discrimination illégale parce que vous avez exercé vos droits en vertu des lois applicables.
Nous faciliterons l’exercice des droits qui s’appliquent à vous conformément à la loi en vigueur et, compte tenu du type de renseignements personnels faisant l’objet de la demande et de leur sensibilité, pour votre protection, il se peut que nous devions demander la vérification de votre identité et vous demander des renseignements supplémentaires.
Pour exercer tout droit relatif à vos renseignements personnels, veuillez nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande qui se trouve à l’adresse
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement#french-canadian
ou envoyer un courriel à
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell, vous pouvez nous contacter à l’adresse
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Pour nous joindre
Si vous avez des questions ou des plaintes sur la manière dont vos renseignements personnels sont traités ou si vous souhaitez exercer vos droits, veuillez contacter:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(seulement si vous êtes déjà un employé de Honeywell) ou notre responsable de la protection des données à
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Vous pouvez également nous contacter par le biais du formulaire de demande de données qui se trouve à l’adresse suivante:
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
German
Aktualisiert: 1. Januar 2023
Dieser Datenschutzhinweis für Bewerber ("Datenschutzhinweis") beschreibt, wie Honeywell International, Inc. und seine
verbundenen Unternehmen
(zusammen "
Honeywell
", "
wir
" oder "
uns
") Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, wenn Sie unserer Talent Community beitreten, eine Stelle suchen oder sich bewerben und uns über unser Portal, unsere Websites oder andere Rekrutierungsmedien personenbezogene Daten übermitteln, unabhängig davon, ob dies online oder offline geschieht (die "
Dienstleistungen
"). Wir sind die für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortlichen im Sinne der geltenden Datenschutzgesetze.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie, wenn Sie bereits bei Honeywell beschäftigt sind, auch die globalen Datenschutzrichtlinien von Honeywell und die Datenschutzhinweise für Mitarbeiter lesen können, sofern es in Ihrem Land solche gibt. Ziel dieser Datenschutzerklärung ist es, Ihnen genauere Informationen über die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung zu geben.
Von uns gesammelte persönliche Informationen
Um Ihre Bewerbung bearbeiten zu können, bitten wir Sie um die Angabe personenbezogener Daten, z. B. wenn Sie sich über unsere Website/unser Portal auf eine bestimmte Stelle bewerben oder, falls Sie bereits bei Honeywell beschäftigt sind, während Ihres Arbeitsverhältnisses. Alle Angaben erfolgen auf freiwilliger Basis, und Sie bestimmen den Umfang der Informationen, die Sie Honeywell zur Verfügung stellen.
Bitte bedenken Sie, dass wir einige Informationen benötigen, um Ihre Bewerbung zu prüfen, und dass wir Sie als Bewerber nur eingeschränkt berücksichtigen können, wenn Sie uns diese Informationen nicht zur Verfügung stellen.
(i)   Persönliche Informationen
Wir können die folgenden persönlichen Informationen über Sie sammeln:
Persönliche Angaben und Kontaktinformationen, einschließlich E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummer(n) und Foto;
Berufs- und Ausbildungsinformationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Tätigkeit, z. B. Ihre derzeitigen oder früheren Arbeitgeber, Ihre Berufsbezeichnung oder andere Informationen über die Organisation, der Sie angehören. Sie können auch Ihren Lebenslauf und Angaben zu Ihren Qualifikationen oder Ihrer Ausbildung machen, z. B. zu Ihren Abschlüssen, Studienfächern, den besuchten Einrichtungen, Sprachen, beruflichen Mitgliedschaften, Zertifizierungen, Einzelheiten zu Leistungsbewertungen und Vergütung;
Berufliche Präferenzen (z. B. kurz- und langfristige Ziele, Bereitschaft zum Umzug, verfügbares Datum für den Umzug und Standortpräferenzen);
Personenbezogene Daten, die sich aus Ihrer Teilnahme an unserem Einstellungsverfahren ergeben, wie z. B. die Daten, die wir bei Vorstellungsgesprächen erhalten, die E-Mails, die wir mit Ihnen bezüglich Ihrer Bewerbung austauschen, oder die Gespräche, die wir mit Ihnen über unseren Online-Chatbot führen.
Audio- und visuelle Informationen, wie Ihre Stimme und Ihr Bild auf Fotos, Video- oder Audioaufnahmen, wenn Sie an einem Telefon- oder Videointerview teilnehmen oder wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen;
Alle anderen persönlichen Informationen, die Sie uns freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen.
(ii)  Sensible persönliche Informationen
Wir können auch besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten über Sie erfassen (auch bekannt als "besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten"), wenn wir gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet sind oder die Informationen, die für Ihr künftiges Arbeitsumfeld bei Honeywell oder für die künftige Gewährung von Beschäftigungsleistungen relevant sind, oder mit Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung, z. B:
Eine von der Regierung ausgestellte Identifikationsnummer (z. B. eine Sozialversicherungsnummer);
Demografische Daten, die Informationen über geschützte Merkmale wie Alter, Geschlecht, Rasse, Behinderung, sexuelle Orientierung, Familienstand oder Veteranenstatus enthalten können;
Gesundheitsinformationen (z. B. zur Berücksichtigung von Behinderungen oder diätetischen Einschränkungen);
Informationen, die sich auf die politischen Meinungen oder religiösen Überzeugungen einer Person oder ihre Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft beziehen;
Informationen über Straftaten oder Verurteilungen einer Person sowie alle anderen Informationen, die nach den geltenden Datenschutzgesetzen als sensibel gelten. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, muss Honeywell ggf. auch Hintergrund- und/oder strafrechtliche Überprüfungen durchführen, um Ihre Eignung für eine offene Stelle oder Gelegenheit bei Honeywell festzustellen.
Wir verlangen von Ihnen nicht, dass Sie uns sensible personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellen, es sei denn, dies ist für die Erfüllung unserer gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen erforderlich (z. B. für die Überwachung der Chancengleichheit) oder Sie haben Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung gegeben. Sofern nicht gesetzlich vorgeschrieben, ist die Bereitstellung dieser Informationen vollkommen freiwillig. Honeywell setzt sich für eine wirklich integrative und vielfältige Belegschaft ein. Indem Sie uns Ihre Daten zur Chancengleichheit zur Verfügung stellen, ermöglichen Sie uns ein besseres Verständnis unseres Mitarbeiterprofils in Bezug auf Daten zur Chancengleichheit und der Maßnahmen, die wir ergreifen müssen, um eine vielfältige Belegschaft zu gewinnen, zu fördern und zu halten, unabhängig von Alter, Behinderung, Geschlecht, Rasse, religiösen oder philosophischen Überzeugungen und sexueller Orientierung.
(iii) Persönliche Informationen, die wir automatisch von Ihnen sammeln
Wir können automatisch bestimmte Informationen über Ihren Besuch auf unseren Websites sammeln, indem wir "Cookies" und andere ähnliche Tracking-Technologien verwenden. Weitere Informationen zu den Cookies, die wir auf der Website verwenden, über die Sie Ihre Bewerbung einreichen, finden Sie in unserem
Cookie-Hinweis
.
Quellen für persönliche Informationen
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten direkt von Ihnen oder indirekt von Dritten erheben, die rechtmäßig zur Weitergabe Ihrer Daten an uns berechtigt sind, wie z. B:
Arbeitsvermittlungsagenturen, Anbieter von Hintergrund-/Beschäftigungsprüfungen oder Identitätsüberprüfungsdiensten;
Personalvermittlungsagenturen (z. B. wenn eine Personalvermittlungsagentur Sie als potenziellen Bewerber identifiziert);
Öffentlich zugängliche Informationen über Sie von Websites wie LinkedIn oder der Website Ihres derzeitigen Arbeitgebers. Sie können uns auch Zugang zu bestimmten personenbezogenen Daten gewähren, die von Dritten gespeichert werden (z. B. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google oder Facebook). Indem Sie Honeywell den Zugriff auf diese Informationen gestatten, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass wir diese Informationen in Übereinstimmung mit diesen Datenschutzbestimmungen erfassen, speichern und nutzen dürfen;
Durch Empfehlung oder Mundpropaganda (z. B. durch eine Empfehlung eines derzeitigen oder ehemaligen Mitarbeiters). Bei Empfehlungen ist die Person, die Sie empfiehlt, für die Einholung Ihrer Zustimmung zur Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an uns verantwortlich.
Zwecke, für die persönliche Informationen verwendet werden
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für die folgenden Zwecke:
Um Ihre Bewerbung zu bewerten und Einstellungsentscheidungen zu treffen;
mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren und Sie über die Einstellung und/oder Ihre Bewerbung(en) oder andere erforderliche Mitteilungen zu informieren;
Zur Erfüllung geltender gesetzlicher und behördlicher Anforderungen sowie zur Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen;
Beschäftigung und Unternehmensführung (z. B. Erstellung eines grundlegenden Beschäftigungsnachweises, wenn Sie eingestellt werden);
Erstellung von aggregierten Berichten/Analysen zu den Aktivitätsdaten von Bewerbern (z. B. Traffic auf der Karriereseite, Kandidatentrichter, Einstellungsquelle, Erfolg von Rekrutierungskampagnen);
Nur für Honeywell-Mitarbeiter
:
Sie werden automatisch davon ausgeschlossen, dass Sie Personalvermittlern proaktiv für ein Stellenangebot vorgeschlagen werden, und kommen gemäß Ihrer aktuellen HPD 9-Block-Einstufung nicht für eine Berücksichtigung in Frage (die nie jemandem außerhalb von Honeywell mitgeteilt wird). Sie können sich jedoch jederzeit direkt auf eine verfügbare Stelle bewerben, und Ihre spezielle Situation wird von einem Personalverantwortlichen geprüft.
Nur wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz in den Vereinigten Staaten haben
:
Um Ihnen Mitteilungen per SMS zu senden, insbesondere:
(i)     1-1 SMS-Nachrichten im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung auf eine bestimmte offene Stelle; und/oder
(ii)    vorbehaltlich Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung, SMS-Kampagnenmitteilungen über Beschäftigungsmöglichkeiten, Stellenangelegenheiten und Aktualisierungen von Bewerbungen.
Sie haben die Möglichkeit, den Erhalt der oben genannten Mitteilungen abzulehnen und/oder Ihre Zustimmung zu widerrufen, indem Sie die in Ihrem Profil angegebenen Anweisungen befolgen.
Wenn Ihnen eine Beschäftigung bei Honeywell angeboten wird und Sie diese annehmen, werden die während des Bewerbungs- und Einstellungsverfahrens gesammelten Informationen Teil Ihrer Personalakte.
Automatisierte Verarbeitung und Profiling
Vorbehaltlich Ihrer ausdrücklichen Zustimmung (die Sie freiwillig erteilen, wenn Sie unserer Talent Community beitreten oder während des Bewerbungsprozesses das entsprechende Zustimmungsfeld ankreuzen), führen wir ein "Profiling" durch, um Ihre Eignung für bestimmte Stellenangebote zu bewerten. Dabei wird ein Matching-Algorithmus verwendet, der Ihr Beschäftigungsprofil auswertet und Ihre Eignung für ein bestimmtes Stellenangebot vorhersagen kann. Wir führen diese automatisierte Verarbeitung für die folgenden Zwecke durch:
Unterstützung von Personalvermittlern beim Abgleich von Bewerberprofilen mit Stellenangeboten, indem sie Kandidaten vorschlagen, die für ein bestimmtes Stellenangebot in Frage kommen; und
das Versenden von personalisierten Jobempfehlungen an Sie auf der Grundlage Ihres Profils und/oder Ihrer Präferenzen oder anderer Informationen, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten, wie z. B. Honeywell-Nachrichten, Webinare und Veranstaltungen.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie auf der Grundlage dieses Profils für bestimmte Stellen nicht berücksichtigt werden können, es sei denn, Sie haben sich direkt darauf beworben.
Wir treffen keine Einstellungsentscheidungen, die ausschließlich auf automatisierten Entscheidungsprozessen und/oder Profiling beruhen. Ihre personenbezogenen Daten werden menschlichen Entscheidungen unterworfen, da die endgültige Einstellungsentscheidung von den Personalverantwortlichen oder dem Personalleiter getroffen wird.
Die Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung Ihrer persönlichen Daten
In bestimmten Rechtsordnungen muss Honeywell eine Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben. Wenn wir nach geltendem Recht unsere Verarbeitungsaktivitäten rechtfertigen müssen, hängt unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben, von den betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten und dem spezifischen Kontext ab, in dem wir sie erfassen.
Einverständnis.
Im Allgemeinen erheben wir personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen, wenn wir Ihre Zustimmung dazu haben und wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zur Bearbeitung Ihrer Bewerbung benötigen. Indem Sie auf unsere Website/unser Portal zugreifen, unserer Talent Community beitreten oder sich auf eine unserer Stellen bewerben, geben Sie Honeywell Ihr Einverständnis, die oben beschriebenen personenbezogenen Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecken zu erfassen und weiterzuverarbeiten. Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen, indem Sie eine Anfrage über unser Portal für Datenschutzanfragen unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
einreichen oder uns eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
senden.
Berechtigte Interessen Die.
legitimen Interessen von Honeywell, nämlich die Anwerbung, Auswahl, Bewertung und Ernennung neuer Mitarbeiter sowie die Verwaltung und Administration des Einstellungs- und Personalprozesses, soweit unsere legitimen Interessen nicht durch Ihre Grundrechte und -freiheiten überlagert werden.
Gesetzliche Verpflichtungen
. Einhaltung der rechtlichen Verpflichtungen von Honeywell, wenn das Arbeitsrecht oder andere Gesetze die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten erfordern (z. B. in dem Maße, in dem das Gesetz die Überwachung von Chancengleichheit und Vielfalt vorschreibt).
Lebenswichtige Interessen.
Wir benötigen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten möglicherweise auch, um Ihre lebenswichtigen Interessen zu schützen (z. B. aus Gründen der Gesundheit und Sicherheit, wenn Sie an einem Vorstellungsgespräch bei uns teilnehmen)
Wenn Sie Fragen zu den Rechtsgrundlagen haben, auf denen wir Ihre persönlichen Daten sammeln und verwenden, oder weitere Informationen benötigen, senden Sie bitte eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Mit wem wir Ihre persönlichen Informationen teilen
Honeywell gibt Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nur unter den folgenden Umständen an Dritte weiter:
Unternehmen der Honeywell-Gruppe
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an andere Konzernunternehmen in der ganzen Welt weitergeben, um Ihr Profil zu bewerten und Sie für Einstellungsmöglichkeiten auf Konzernebene zu berücksichtigen.
Dienstleister
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speziell an Drittanbieter weitergeben, die in unserem Auftrag bestimmte Dienstleistungen erbringen (z. B. Personalvermittlungs- und Outsourcing-Anbieter und Analytik-Anbieter). Solche Drittanbieter können je nach Land variieren und werden sich von Zeit zu Zeit ändern, können aber Phenom People, Inc. und Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. sowie deren jeweilige Drittanbieter umfassen.
Honeywell-Mitarbeiter.
Wenn Sie bereits ein Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sind, beachten Sie bitte, dass einige Abschnitte Ihres Profils öffentlich und somit für alle Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sichtbar sind (insbesondere Ihr Name, Ihr Titel, Ihr Foto, Ihre Fähigkeiten, Ihre Interessengebiete, Ihre Berufserfahrung und Ihre Ausbildung). Diese Bereiche können jedoch bearbeitet werden, und Sie können wählen, welche Informationen über Sie in Ihrem Profil angezeigt werden sollen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Angaben zu Karrierezielen, Umzügenund der Profilstatus "offen für neue Angebote" sind nicht öffentlich und daher nicht für alle Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sichtbar (nur für das Talentteam von Honeywell).
Andere Drittparteien.
Honeywell kann Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an die zuständigen Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Aufsichtsbehörden, Regierungsbehörden, Gerichte oder Dritte weitergeben, wenn wir der Meinung sind, dass die Weitergabe nach geltendem Recht erforderlich ist oder wenn wir in gutem Glauben davon ausgehen, dass eine solche Maßnahme notwendig ist, um unsere gesetzlichen Rechte auszuüben, zu begründen oder zu verteidigen oder um Ihre lebenswichtigen Interessen oder die einer anderen Person zu schützen. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch mit Ihrer Zustimmung oder auf Ihre Anweisung hin an andere weitergeben (z. B. an einen Schiedsrichter oder einen Berufsverband).
Internationale Übermittlung von persönlichen Daten
Honeywell ist ein globales Unternehmen, und Ihre personenbezogenen Daten können an verschiedene Standorte weltweit, z. B. in den USA und Indien, übermittelt, dort aufbewahrt, gespeichert oder verwendet werden. Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erfassen, bedeutet dies, dass sie möglicherweise in Ländern verarbeitet werden, in denen andere Datenschutzgesetze gelten als in Ihrem Land. Honeywell wird jedoch stets angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu schützen und ein Schutzniveau für personenbezogene Daten zu gewährleisten, das mit dem Ihres Wohnsitzlandes vergleichbar ist. Dazu gehört auch die Anwendung der
Standardvertragsklauseln der Europäischen Kommission
die Sie auf der Website der Kommission unter
https://ec.europa.eu
finden.
Vorratsspeicherung
Wir werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange aufbewahren, wie es im Zusammenhang mit den in diesen Datenschutzhinweisen beschriebenen Zwecken und in Übereinstimmung mit dem Honeywell Record Retention Schedule erforderlich ist oder wie es das geltende Recht vorschreibt.
Ihre Rechte
Je nach geltendem Recht haben Sie möglicherweise bestimmte Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre persönlichen Daten. Wenn Sie in Kalifornien ansässig sind, lesen Sie bitte unten den Abschnitt “
Zusätzliche Informationen für in Kalifornien ansässige Personen
”.
Sie haben das Recht,
auf
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
zuzugreifen, sie zu korrigieren, zu aktualisieren oder ihre Löschung zu
verlangen;
Sie können der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten
widersprechen
und uns bitten,
diese einzuschränken
. die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten oder die
Übertragbarkeit
Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verlangen;
Sie haben das Recht, einer Entscheidung über Sie zu widersprechen, die ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung, einschließlich Profiling, beruht, wenn diese Entscheidung rechtliche Auswirkungen auf Sie hat oder Sie erheblich beeinträchtigt.
Honeywell trifft im Rahmen seines Einstellungsverfahrens keine ausschließlich automatisierten Entscheidungen über Bewerber.
Auch wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Einwilligung erhoben und verarbeitet haben, können Sie Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen. Der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung hat keinen Einfluss auf die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung, die wir vor Ihrem Widerruf durchgeführt haben, und auch nicht auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten, die auf der Grundlage anderer rechtmäßiger Verarbeitungsgründe als der Einwilligung erfolgt ist; und
Sie haben das Recht, sich bei einer Datenschutzbehörde über die Erhebung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns zu beschweren.
Wir unterstützen Sie bei der Ausübung der Rechte, die Ihnen nach geltendem Recht zustehen. Wenn Sie eines Ihrer Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte an uns über die HR-Hilfe oder das Antragsformular für Betroffene, das Sie unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-finden
oder senden Sie eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Zusätzliche Informationen für in Kalifornien ansässige Personen
Wenn Sie Ihren Wohnsitz im US-Bundesstaat Kalifornien haben, ergänzt dieser Abschnitt die Datenschutzhinweise für Bewerber von Honeywell.
(i)      Kategorien von gesammelten und weitergegebenen persönlichen Informationen
Honeywell hat in den vorangegangenen zwölf Monaten die folgenden Kategorien personenbezogener Daten für unsere Geschäftszwecke erfasst und weitergegeben:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorien
Wir sammeln
A.
Identifikatoren wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geschlecht, E-Mail-Adresse, Telefonnummern, Postanschrift, Online-Identifikatoren, Konten in sozialen Medien und andere Identifikatoren.
Ja
C.
Merkmale geschützter Klassifizierungen nach kalifornischem oder bundesstaatlichem Recht, wie z. B. Rasse, ethnische Zugehörigkeit, religiöse oder philosophische Überzeugungen, Gewerkschaftszugehörigkeit, Gesundheitsdaten, biometrische Informationen, genetische Daten, Behinderung, Veteranenstatus, sexuelle Orientierung, persönliche Post, E-Mails und Textnachrichten (sofern Honeywell nicht der vorgesehene Empfänger ist), staatliche Kennungen (z. B. Sozialversicherungsnummer), Führerschein, Reisepass, Finanz- und Bankdaten.
Ja
F.
Informationen über Internet- oder andere elektronische Netzwerkaktivitäten, wie z. B. Browserverlauf, Interaktionen mit Honeywell-Websites, E-Mail- und Textnachrichtendienste.
Ja
G.
Geolokalisierungsdaten, wie Gerätestandort und IP-Standort.
Ja
H.
Audio-, elektronische, visuelle, thermische oder ähnliche Informationen, wie z. B. Ihre Stimme und Ihr Bild, Video- oder Audioaufnahmen, wenn Sie an einem Telefon- oder Videointerview teilnehmen oder wenn Sie unsere Büros besuchen.
Ja
I.
Berufliche oder beschäftigungsbezogene Informationen wie z. B. Ihr Beruf, derzeitige oder frühere Arbeitgeber, Berufsbezeichnung, Bildungsweg, akademische und berufliche Qualifikationen, Lebenslauf, beruflicher Werdegang, Einstellungsreferenzen, Gesprächsnotizen und -bewertungen, Sprachen, berufliche Mitgliedschaften, Zertifizierungen, Leistungsbewertungen, Vergütung, Standortpräferenzen und Reisepräferenzen.
Ja
K.
Rückschlüsse, die aus den oben aufgeführten personenbezogenen Daten gezogen werden, um ein Profil oder eine Zusammenfassung z. B. über die Vorlieben und Eigenschaften einer Person zu erstellen.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Ihre Recht
Sie haben das Recht, die folgenden Rechte für den Zeitraum von zwölf Monaten, der Ihrem Antrag vorausgeht, bei uns geltend zu machen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Rechte nicht absolut sind und in bestimmten Fällen Einschränkungen unterliegen, die im geltenden Recht festgelegt sind:
Sie haben das Recht zu erfahren, welche persönlichen Daten wir über Sie gesammelt haben, aus welchen Quellen wir Ihre persönlichen Daten gesammelt haben, für welchen geschäftlichen oder kommerziellen Zweck wir Ihre persönlichen Daten gesammelt haben und an welche Kategorien von Dritten wir Ihre persönlichen Daten weitergeben;
Das Recht, Ihre persönlichen Daten zu löschen;
Das Recht, unrichtige personenbezogene Daten über Sie zu korrigieren;
Das Recht, dem Verkauf oder der Weitergabe Ihrer persönlichen Daten zu widersprechen;
Das Recht, die Verarbeitung Ihrer sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten einzuschränken;
Das Recht, bei der Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach geltendem Recht nicht unrechtmäßig diskriminiert zu werden.
Wir werden Ihnen die Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach geltendem Recht erleichtern, und in Anbetracht der Art und Sensibilität der personenbezogenen Daten, die Gegenstand der Anfrage sind, kann es zu Ihrem Schutz erforderlich sein, Ihre Identität zu überprüfen und zusätzliche Informationen von Ihnen anzufordern.
Wenn Sie eines Ihrer Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre persönlichen Daten ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte über das Formular zur Datenanfrage unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
an uns oder senden Sie eine E-Mail an
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Wenn Sie bereits ein Mitarbeiter von Honeywell sind, können Sie sich unter
HRhelp@honeywell.com
an uns wenden.
Kontakt
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden darüber haben, wie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet werden, oder wenn Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben möchten, wenden Sie sich bitte an
HRhelp@honeyw-ell.com
(nur, wenn Sie bereits ein Honeywell-Mitarbeiter sind) oder an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Sie können sich auch über das Formular für Anfragen von Betroffenen an uns wenden, das Sie unter
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement finden
.
Hungarian
Frissítve: január 1.
A jelen Pályázói adatvédelmi nyilatkozat ("Adatvédelmi nyilatkozat") leírja, hogy a Honeywell International, Inc. és
kapcsolt vállalkozásai
(együttesen "
Honeywell
", "
mi
" vagy "
mi
") hogyan dolgozzák fel az Ön személyes adatait, amikor Ön csatlakozik a tehetségközösségünkhöz, keres vagy jelentkezik állásra, és személyes adatokat küld nekünk a portálunkon, weboldalainkon vagy más toborzási eszközökön keresztül, akár online, akár offline (a "
Szolgáltatások
"). Az alkalmazandó adatvédelmi törvények értelmében mi vagyunk az Ön személyes adatainak kezelői.
Kérjük, vegye figyelembe, hogy ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, akkor a Honeywell globális adatvédelmi szabályzatát és a munkavállalói adatvédelmi nyilatkozatot is figyelembe veheti, amennyiben az Ön joghatósága alá tartozó területen létezik ilyen. A jelen Adatvédelmi tájékoztató célja, hogy részletesebb tájékoztatást adjon az Ön személyes adatainak az Ön jelentkezése kapcsán történő feldolgozásáról.
Az általunk gyűjtött személyes adatok
Az Ön jelentkezésének feldolgozása érdekében arra kérjük, hogy adja meg az Önre vonatkozó személyes adatokat, például amikor egy adott álláshirdetésre jelentkezik a weboldalunkon/portálunkon keresztül, vagy ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, akkor a munkaviszonya során. Minden információ megadása önkéntes alapon történik, és Ön határozza meg, hogy milyen mértékben adja meg a Honeywellnek az adatait.
Kérjük, ne feledje, hogy bizonyos információk szükségesek lehetnek az Ön jelentkezésének teljes körű értékeléséhez, és ha ezeket nem adja meg, korlátozott lehet a lehetőségünk arra, hogy Önt jelöltként figyelembe vegyük.
(i)   Személyes információk
A következő személyes adatokat gyűjthetjük Önről:
Személyes adatok és kapcsolattartási információk, beleértve az e-mail címet, telefonszám(ok)at és fényképet;
A foglalkozásával kapcsolatos szakmai és oktatási információk, például a jelenlegi vagy korábbi munkáltatói, a munkakörével kapcsolatos információk, vagy egyéb információk arról a szervezetről, amellyel kapcsolatban áll. Megadhatja önéletrajzát/önéletrajzát, valamint a képzettségére vagy az oktatására vonatkozó információkat is, például a diplomáját, a tanulmányi területeket, a tanult intézményeket, a nyelveket, a szakmai tagságokat, a tanúsítványokat, a teljesítményértékeléssel és a javadalmazással kapcsolatos részleteket;
Karrierpreferenciák (pl. rövid és hosszú távú célok, költözési hajlandóság, a költözésre rendelkezésre álló időpont és a hely preferenciái);
Az Ön toborzási folyamatunkban való részvételéből származó személyes adatok, például az interjúk során kapott adatok, az Önnel a jelentkezésével kapcsolatban váltott e-mailek vagy az online chatbotunkon keresztül folytatott beszélgetések.
Hang- és képi információk, például az Ön hangja és képmása, amelyet fényképek, videó- vagy hangfelvételek rögzítenek, ha Ön telefonos vagy videointerjún vesz részt, vagy ha felkeresi irodánkat;
Bármilyen más személyes adat, amelyet Ön önkéntesen megad nekünk.
(ii)  Érzékeny személyes adatok
A személyes adatok különleges kategóriáit is gyűjthetjük Önről (más néven "személyes adatok különleges kategóriái"), ha erre jogi kötelezettségünk van, vagy ha aaz Ön jövőbeli munkakörnyezete szempontjából fontos információk a Honeywellnél, vagy a jövőbeni foglalkoztatási juttatások biztosítása érdekében, vagy az Ön kifejezett beleegyezésével, mint például:
Kormányzati azonosító szám (például társadalombiztosítási szám);
Demográfiai adatok, amelyek tartalmazhatnak védett besorolásokra vonatkozó információkat, mint például az Ön kora, neme, faji hovatartozása, fogyatékossága, szexuális irányultsága, családi állapota vagy veterán státusza;
Egészségügyi információk (például az Ön esetleges fogyatékosságának vagy étrendi korlátozásainak figyelembevétele érdekében);
Valamely személy politikai véleményére, vallási meggyőződésére vagy szakszervezeti tagságára vonatkozó információk;
Az egyén bűncselekményeire vagy elítéléseire vonatkozó információk, valamint bármely más, az alkalmazandó adatvédelmi jogszabályok szerint érzékenynek minősülő információ. Amennyiben a törvény megengedi, és amennyiben alkalmazható, a Honeywellnek háttér- és/vagy büntetőjogi ellenőrzéseket is el kell végeznie annak megállapítása érdekében, hogy Ön alkalmas-e a Honeywellnél betöltendő pozícióra vagy lehetőségre.
Nem kérjük Öntől, hogy adjon meg érzékeny személyes adatokat, kivéve, ha ez szükséges a szabályozási kötelezettségeink teljesítéséhez (pl. az esélyegyenlőség ellenőrzéséhez), vagy ha Ön ehhez kifejezetten hozzájárult. A törvény által előírt mértéket kivéve, ezen információk megadása teljesen önkéntes. A Honeywell elkötelezett a valóban befogadó és sokszínű munkaerő mellett. Azzal, hogy megadja nekünk az esélyegyenlőségi adatait, lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy jobban megismerjük a munkavállalói profilunkat az esélyegyenlőségi adatok szempontjából, és hogy milyen intézkedéseket kell tennünk a sokszínű munkaerő vonzása, támogatása és megtartása érdekében, függetlenül a kortól, fogyatékosságtól, nemtől, nemtől, fajtól, vallási vagy filozófiai meggyőződéstől és szexuális irányultságtól.
(iii) Az Öntől automatikusan gyűjtött személyes adatok
A "cookie-k" és más hasonló nyomkövető technológiák segítségével automatikusan gyűjthetünk Öntől bizonyos információkat a weboldalainkon tett látogatásáról. A cookie-król szóló további információkért, amelyeket azon a weboldalon használunk, amelyen keresztül a pályázatát benyújtja, kérjük, olvassa el a
Cookie-nyilatkozatunkat
.
A személyes információk forrásai
Személyes adatait közvetlenül Öntől vagy közvetve olyan harmadik felektől gyűjthetjük, akik jogszerűen jogosultak arra, hogy az Ön adatait megosszák velünk, mint például:
Munkaügyi ügynökségek, háttér-/foglalkoztatás-ellenőrzési vagy személyazonosság-ellenőrzési szolgáltatók;
Munkaerő-közvetítő ügynökségek (például amikor egy munkaerő-közvetítő ügynökség potenciális jelöltként azonosítja Önt);
Nyilvánosan elérhető információk Önről olyan oldalakról, mint a LinkedIn vagy a jelenlegi munkáltatója honlapja. Ön dönthet úgy is, hogy hozzáférést biztosít számunkra bizonyos, harmadik felek (például a LinkedIn, a Twitter, a Google vagy a Facebook) által tárolt személyes adatokhoz. Azzal, hogy engedélyezi a Honeywell számára, hogy hozzáférjen ezekhez az információkhoz, Ön beleegyezik abba, hogy ezeket az információkat a jelen Adatvédelmi tájékoztatóval összhangban gyűjtsük, tároljuk és használjuk fel;
Referencia vagy szájhagyomány útján (például egy jelenlegi vagy korábbi alkalmazott ajánlásával). Ajánlás esetén az Önt ajánló személy felelős az Ön hozzájárulásának megszerzéséért, hogy személyes adatait átadja nekünk.
A személyes adatok felhasználásának céljai
Az Ön személyes adatait a következő célokra használjuk fel:
Az Ön jelentkezésének értékelése és a felvételi döntések meghozatala;
Kommunikálni Önnel, és tájékoztatni Önt a felvételi eljárásról és/vagy az Ön jelentkezési lapjáról (lapjairól), illetve bármely más szükséges kommunikációról;
Az alkalmazandó jogi és szabályozási követelményeknek való megfelelés, valamint jogi igények előterjesztése, érvényesítése vagy védelme érdekében;
Foglalkoztatás és vállalatirányítás (például alapvető foglalkoztatási nyilvántartás létrehozása, ha felveszik Önt);
Összevont jelentések / elemzések készítése a jelöltek aktivitási adataira vonatkozóan (pl. karrieroldal forgalma, jelölt-tölcsér, felvételi forrás, toborzási kampányok sikere);
Kizárólag a Honeywell alkalmazottai számára
:
Önt automatikusan kizárják abból, hogy proaktívan javasolják a toborzóknak egy álláslehetőségre, és nem jogosult a jelenlegi HPD 9 blokkos minősítése alapján (amely soha nem kerül nyilvánosságra senki számára a Honeywell-en kívül). Ugyanakkor mindig lehetősége lesz arra, hogy közvetlenül jelentkezzen bármely elérhető álláslehetőségre, és az Ön konkrét helyzetét egy toborzó figyelembe fogja venni.
Csak akkor, ha Ön az Egyesült Államokban lakik
:
SMS-ben történő kommunikáció küldése, különösen:
(i)     1-1 SMS kommunikáció egy adott álláshirdetésre való jelentkezésével kapcsolatban; és/vagy
(ii)
az
Ön kifejezett hozzájárulásától függően SMS-kampánykommunikáció a munkalehetőségekről, állásügyekről és pályázati frissítésekről.
Ön a profiljában megadott utasításokat követve lemondhat és/vagy visszavonhatja a fent említett közlemények fogadásához adott hozzájárulását.
Ha a Honeywell ajánlatot tesz Önnek, és elfogadja az állást, a jelentkezési és felvételi eljárás során gyűjtött információk az Ön foglalkoztatási nyilvántartásának részévé válnak.
Automatizált feldolgozás és profilalkotás
Az Ön kifejezett hozzájárulása esetén (amelyet Ön önkéntesen ad meg, amikor csatlakozik a tehetségközösségünkhöz, vagy amikor a jelentkezési folyamat során bejelölte a megfelelő hozzájárulási négyzetet), "profilalkotást" végzünk annak érdekében, hogy értékeljük az Ön alkalmasságát az egyes álláslehetőségekre. Ez egy olyan megfeleltetési algoritmus használatát jelenti, amely képes értékelni az Ön foglalkoztatási profilját, és megjósolni az Ön alkalmasságát egy adott álláslehetőségre. Ezt az automatizált feldolgozást a következő célokból végezzük:
a toborzók segítése a jelöltek profiljának és a munkalehetőségeknek a megfeleltetése azáltal, hogy jelölteket javasolnak egy adott munkalehetőségre; és
személyre szabott állásajánlatok küldése Önnek az Ön profilja és/vagy preferenciái alapján, illetve egyéb, az Ön számára érdekes információk, például Honeywell hírek, webináriumok és események küldése.
Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy e profilalkotás alapján előfordulhat, hogy bizonyos álláslehetőségekre nem veszik figyelembe, hacsak nem jelentkezett közvetlenül azokra.
Nem hozunk kizárólag automatizált döntéshozatali folyamatokon és/vagy profilalkotáson alapuló felvételi döntéseket. Az Ön személyes adatait emberi döntéseknek vetjük alá, mivel a végső felvételi döntést a toborzók vagy a felvételi menedzserek hozzák meg.
Az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozásának jogalapjai
Bizonyos joghatóságok megkövetelik, hogy a Honeywellnek legyen jogalapja az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozására. Amennyiben az alkalmazandó jog megköveteli, hogy igazoljuk feldolgozási tevékenységeinket, az Ön személyes adatainak a jelen Adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírtak szerinti gyűjtésére és felhasználására vonatkozó jogalapunk az érintett személyes adatoktól és attól a konkrét kontextustól függ, amelyben azokat gyűjtjük.
Hozzájárulás.
Általánosságban elmondható, hogy általában akkor gyűjtünk Öntől személyes adatokat, ha ehhez Ön hozzájárul, és ha az Ön személyes adataira az Ön jelentkezésének feldolgozásához van szükségünk. Azzal, hogy belép weboldalunkra/portálunkra, csatlakozik tehetségközösségünkhöz vagy jelentkezik valamelyik álláshelyünkre, Ön hozzájárulását adja a Honeywell számára a fent leírt személyes adatok gyűjtéséhez és további feldolgozásához a jelen adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírt célokból. Hozzájárulását bármikor visszavonhatja, ha az adatalanyok kérelmére szolgáló portálunkon keresztül a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
címen kérvényt nyújt be, vagy e-mailt küld nekünk a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
Jogos érdekek. A
Honeywell jogos érdekei, nevezetesen az új alkalmazottak felvétele, kiválasztása, értékelése és kinevezése, valamint a felvételi és a HR-folyamat irányítása és adminisztrációja, amennyiben jogos érdekeinket nem írják felül az Ön alapvető jogai és szabadságai.
Jogi kötelezettségek
. A Honeywell jogi kötelezettségeinek való megfelelés, amennyiben a munkajog vagy más törvények megkövetelik az Ön személyes adatainak feldolgozását (például amennyiben a törvény előírja az esélyegyenlőség és a sokszínűség nyomon követését).
Létfontosságú érdekek.
Az Ön személyes adataira az Ön létfontosságú érdekeinek védelme érdekében is szükségünk lehet (például egészségügyi és biztonsági okokból, ha Ön egy interjún vesz részt nálunk).
Ha bármilyen kérdése van, vagy további információra van szüksége azzal kapcsolatban, hogy milyen jogalapon gyűjtjük és használjuk fel az Ön személyes adatait, kérjük, küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
Kivel osztjuk meg személyes adatait
A Honeywell csak a következő körülmények között osztja meg az Ön személyes adatait harmadik felekkel:
Honeywell-csoporthoz tartozó egységek
. Megoszthatjuk az Ön személyes adatait a csoport más, a világ különböző joghatóságai alatt működő szervezeti egységeivel az Ön profiljának értékelése és a csoport szintű felvételi lehetőségek mérlegelése céljából.
Szolgáltatók Az
Ön személyes adatait kifejezetten megoszthatjuk olyan harmadik fél szolgáltatókkal, akik a nevünkben speciális szolgáltatásokat végeznek (például toborzási és kiszervezési személyzeti szolgáltatók és elemzési szolgáltatók). Ezek a harmadik felek az Ön országától függően változhatnak, és időről időre változnak, de lehetnek a Phenom People, Inc. és a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. és a megfelelő harmadik fél szolgáltatók.
Honeywell alkalmazottak.
Ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, kérjük, vegye figyelembe, hogy az Ön profiljának egyes részei nyilvánosak, és ezért a Honeywell összes alkalmazottja számára láthatóak (különösen az Ön neve, beosztása, fényképe, képességei, érdeklődési területei, munkatapasztalata és végzettsége). Ezek a részek azonban szerkeszthetők, és Ön választhatja ki, hogy milyen információk jelenjenek meg Önről a profiljában. Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy a karriercélok, az áthelyezésekés a "nyitott az új lehetőségek előtt" részek nem nyilvánosak, és ezért nem láthatók a Honeywell összes alkalmazottja számára (csak a Honeywell tehetséggondozó csapata számára).
Egyéb harmadik felek. A
Honeywell az Ön személyes adatait bármely illetékes bűnüldöző szervvel, szabályozó hatósággal, kormányzati szervvel, bírósággal vagy harmadik féllel megoszthatja, amennyiben úgy véljük, hogy a közzétételre az alkalmazandó jogszabályok alapján szükség van, vagy abban a jóhiszemű meggyőződésben, hogy az ilyen intézkedés szükséges törvényes jogaink gyakorlásához, megalapozásához vagy védelméhez, illetve az Ön vagy más személy létfontosságú érdekeinek védelméhez. Személyes adatait az Ön hozzájárulásával vagy az Ön utasítására másokkal is megoszthatjuk (pl. egy bíró vagy szakmai szövetség).
Személyes adatok nemzetközi továbbítása
A Honeywell egy globális szervezet, és az Ön személyes adatait világszerte különböző helyszínekre, például az Egyesült Államokba és Indiába továbbíthatják, tárolhatják vagy felhasználhatják. Ez azt jelenti, hogy amikor személyes adatait gyűjtjük, azokat olyan országokban is feldolgozhatjuk, amelyek adatvédelmi törvényei eltérhetnek az Ön országának törvényeitől. A Honeywell azonban mindig megteszi az ésszerű lépéseket az Ön adatainak védelme és az Ön lakóhelye szerinti országéhoz hasonló szintű védelem biztosítása érdekében, amely magában foglalja az
Európai Bizottság általános szerződési feltételeinek
alkalmazását, amelyek megtalálhatók a Bizottság honlapján a
https://ec.europa.eu
címen.
Megtartás
Az Ön személyes adatait addig őrizzük meg, ameddig az a jelen Adatvédelmi nyilatkozatban leírt célokkal kapcsolatban szükséges, illetve a Honeywell iratmegőrzési ütemtervének megfelelően, vagy ahogy azt a vonatkozó jogszabályok előírják.
Az Ön jogai
Az alkalmazandó jogtól függően bizonyos jogokkal rendelkezhet személyes adatai tekintetében. Ha Ön kaliforniai lakos, kérjük, olvassa el az alábbi “
További információk kaliforniai lakosok számára
” című részt.
Önnek joga van
hozzáférni, helyesbíteni, frissíteni
vagy kérheti személyes adatainak
törlését
;
Tiltakozhat
személyes adatainak feldolgozása ellen, kérheti, hogy korlátozzuk személyes adatainak feldolgozását, vagy kérheti személyes adatainak
hordozhatóságát
;
Ön jogosult lehet arra, hogy ne hozzanak Önről olyan döntést, amely kizárólag automatizált feldolgozáson alapul, ideértve a profilalkotást is, ha a döntés joghatásokat eredményez Önre nézve, vagy jelentősen érinti Önt.
A Honeywell a munkaerő-felvételi folyamat részeként nem hoz kizárólag automatizált döntéseket a jelöltekről
.
Hasonlóképpen, ha személyes adatait az Ön hozzájárulásával gyűjtöttük és dolgozzuk fel, akkor Ön bármikor visszavonhatja hozzájárulását. A hozzájárulásának visszavonása nem érinti az Ön visszavonását megelőzően végzett feldolgozás jogszerűségét, és nem érinti az Ön személyes adatainak a hozzájáruláson kívüli jogszerű feldolgozási okokra támaszkodó feldolgozását sem; és
Önnek joga van panaszt tenni egy adatvédelmi hatóságnál személyes adatainak gyűjtése és felhasználása miatt.
Az alkalmazandó joggal összhangban megkönnyítjük az Önre vonatkozó jogok gyakorlását. A személyes adataival kapcsolatos bármely jogának gyakorlásához kérjük, lépjen kapcsolatba velünk a HR Help-en keresztül, vagy az érintettek kérelmére szolgáló űrlapon, amely a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-nyilatkozaton
található, vagy küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
címre.
További információk kaliforniai lakosok számára
Ha Ön Kalifornia államban lakik, ez a szakasz kiegészíti a Honeywell Pályázói adatvédelmi nyilatkozatát.
(i)      A gyűjtött és nyilvánosságra hozott személyes adatok kategóriái
A Honeywell a következő kategóriájú személyes adatokat gyűjtötte és tette közzé üzleti céljaink érdekében az elmúlt tizenkét hónapban:
Previous column
Next column
Kategóriák
Gyűjtünk
A.
Azonosítók, mint például név, születési dátum, nem, e-mail cím, telefonszámok, postai cím, online azonosítók, közösségi média fiók és egyéb azonosítók.
Igen
C.
A kaliforniai vagy szövetségi törvények szerint védett besorolás jellemzői, mint például faji, etnikai hovatartozás, vallási vagy filozófiai meggyőződés, szakszervezeti tagság, egészségügyi adatok, biometrikus információk, genetikai adatok, fogyatékosság, veterán státusz, szexuális irányultság, személyes levelek, e-mailek és szöveges üzenetek (kivéve, ha a Honeywell a címzett), kormányzati azonosítók (pl. társadalombiztosítási szám), jogosítvány, útlevél, pénzügyi és banki információk.
Igen
F.
Internetes vagy egyéb elektronikus hálózati tevékenységekre vonatkozó információk, például böngészési előzmények, a Honeywell webhelyeivel, e-mail és szöveges üzenetküldő szolgáltatásokkal való interakciók.
Igen
G.
Geolokációs adatok, például az eszköz helyzete és az IP-helyzet.
Igen
H.
Hang-, elektronikus, vizuális, termikus vagy hasonló információk, például az Ön hangja és képe, videó- vagy hangfelvételek, ha Ön telefonos vagy videointerjún vesz részt, vagy ha felkeresi irodáinkat.
Igen
I.
Szakmai vagy foglalkoztatással kapcsolatos információk, mint például az Ön foglalkozása, jelenlegi vagy korábbi munkáltatói, munkakörének megnevezése, iskolai végzettsége, tudományos és szakmai képzettsége, önéletrajza, munkahelyi előzményei, felvételi referenciák, interjúkról készült feljegyzések és értékelések, nyelvek, szakmai tagságok, tanúsítványok, teljesítményértékelések, javadalmazás, hely- és utazási preferenciák.
Igen
K.
A fent felsorolt személyes adatok bármelyikéből levont következtetések, amelyek célja egy profil vagy összefoglaló létrehozása, például az egyén preferenciáiról és jellemzőiről.
Igen
Load More
(ii)      Az Ön jogai
Ön jogosult arra, hogy az alábbi jogokra vonatkozó kérelmet küldjön nekünk a kérelmét megelőző tizenkét hónapos időszakra vonatkozóan. Felhívjuk figyelmét, hogy ezek a jogok nem abszolút érvényűek, és bizonyos esetekben az alkalmazandó jogszabályokban meghatározott korlátozások alá esnek:
Jogunk van tudni, hogy milyen személyes adatokat gyűjtöttünk Önről, milyen kategóriájú forrásokból gyűjtöttük az Ön személyes adatait; milyen üzleti vagy kereskedelmi célból gyűjtöttük az Ön személyes adatait, és milyen kategóriájú harmadik felekkel közöljük az Ön személyes adatait;
A személyes adatok törléséhez való jog;
Az Önre vonatkozó pontatlan személyes adatok helyesbítéséhez való jog;
A személyes adatainak eladásából vagy megosztásából való kilépés joga;
Az Ön érzékeny személyes adatai feldolgozásának korlátozásához való jog;
Az alkalmazandó jogszabályok szerinti jogai gyakorlása miatt jogellenes megkülönböztetéstől való mentességhez való jog.
Az alkalmazandó joggal összhangban megkönnyítjük az Önre vonatkozó jogok gyakorlását, és a kérelem tárgyát képező személyes adatok típusát és érzékenységét figyelembe véve az Ön védelme érdekében szükség lehet arra, hogy kérvényezzük az Ön személyazonosságának ellenőrzését és további információkat kérjünk Öntől.
A személyes adataival kapcsolatos bármely jogának gyakorlásához kérjük, lépjen kapcsolatba velünk a
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
oldalon található adatkérő űrlapon keresztül, vagy küldjön e-mailt a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. címre. Ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja, a
HRhelp@honeywell.com
címen léphet kapcsolatba velünk.
Kapcsolatfelvétel
Ha bármilyen kérdése vagy panasza van személyes adatai feldolgozásával kapcsolatban, vagy ha élni kíván a jogaival, kérjük, forduljon a következő címre:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
((csak akkor, ha Ön már a Honeywell alkalmazottja) vagy adatvédelmi tisztviselőnk a
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
címen. A
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
címen található adatkérő űrlapon keresztül is kapcsolatba léphet velünk.
Italian
Aggiornato: 1 gennaio 2023
La presente Informativa sulla privacy dei candidati ("Informativa sulla privacy") descrive le modalità con cui Honeywell International, Inc. e le sue
affiliate
(collettivamente "
Honeywell
", "
noi
" o "
ci"
) trattano i dati personali dell'utente quando si iscrive alla nostra Talent Community, cerca o si candida per un posto di lavoro e ci invia informazioni personali tramite il nostro portale, i siti web o altri mezzi di reclutamento, sia online che offline (i "
Servizi
"). Siamo i responsabili del trattamento delle informazioni personali dell'utente ai fini delle leggi applicabili in materia di protezione dei dati.
Si prega di notare che se si è già un dipendente Honeywell si può fare riferimento anche alla Honeywell Global Data Privacy Policy e alla Employee Privacy Notice, se esiste per la propria giurisdizione. Lo scopo della presente Informativa sulla privacy è quello di fornire all'utente informazioni più dettagliate sul trattamento dei suoi dati personali in relazione alla sua candidatura.
Informazioni personali raccolte
Per elaborare la vostra candidatura, vi chiediamo di fornire le informazioni personali che vi riguardano, ad esempio quando vi candidate per un determinato posto di lavoro attraverso il nostro sito web/portale o, nel caso in cui siate già un dipendente Honeywell, durante il vostro rapporto di lavoro. Tutte le informazioni sono fornite su base volontaria e siete voi a determinare la quantità di informazioni che fornite a Honeywell.
Tenete presente che alcune informazioni potrebbero essere necessarie per completare la valutazione della vostra candidatura e che, in caso di mancata comunicazione, la nostra capacità di prendere in considerazione il candidato potrebbe essere limitata.
(i)   Informazioni personali
Possiamo raccogliere le seguenti informazioni personali sull'utente:
Dati personali e informazioni di contatto, tra cui indirizzo e-mail, numero/i di telefono e fotografia;
Informazioni professionali ed educative relative alla vostra occupazione, come i vostri datori di lavoro attuali o precedenti, il vostro titolo di lavoro o altre informazioni sull'organizzazione con cui siete affiliati. Potete anche fornire il vostro curriculum vitae e informazioni sulle vostre qualifiche o sulla vostra formazione, come ad esempio i vostri titoli di studio, i campi di studio, gli istituti che avete frequentato, le lingue, le appartenenze professionali, le certificazioni, i dettagli sulle valutazioni della gestione delle prestazioni e i compensi;
Preferenze di carriera (ad esempio, obiettivi a breve e a lungo termine, disponibilità a trasferirsi, data disponibile per il trasferimento e preferenze di luogo);
Informazioni personali derivanti dalla vostra partecipazione al nostro processo di reclutamento, come, ad esempio, quelle ottenute durante i colloqui, le e-mail che scambiamo con voi in merito alla vostra candidatura o le conversazioni che abbiamo con voi attraverso il nostro Chatbot online.
Informazioni audio e visive, come la vostra voce e la vostra immagine catturata in fotografie, registrazioni video o audio se partecipate a un'intervista telefonica o video, o se visitate i nostri uffici;
Qualsiasi altra informazione personale che l'utente sceglie volontariamente di fornirci.
(ii)  Informazioni personali sensibili
Possiamo anche raccogliere categorie speciali di informazioni personali su di voi (note anche come "categorie speciali di informazioni personali") laddove abbiamo l'obbligo legale di farlo, o il le informazioni sono rilevanti per il vostro futuro ambiente di lavoro presso Honeywell, o per la futura erogazione di benefici lavorativi, o con il vostro esplicito consenso, come ad esempio:
Numero di identificazione rilasciato dal governo (come il numero di previdenza sociale);
Informazioni demografiche, che possono includere informazioni su classificazioni protette, come età, sesso, razza, disabilità, orientamento sessuale, stato civile o stato di veterano;
Informazioni sulla salute (ad esempio, per soddisfare eventuali disabilità o restrizioni dietetiche);
Informazioni relative alle opinioni politiche, alle convinzioni religiose o all'appartenenza sindacale di una persona;
Informazioni su reati o condanne penali di un individuo, nonché qualsiasi altra informazione ritenuta sensibile ai sensi delle leggi vigenti in materia di protezione dei dati. Laddove consentito dalla legge e nella misura in cui ciò sia applicabile, Honeywell può anche avere la necessità di effettuare controlli sui precedenti personali e/o penali per determinare l'idoneità dell'utente a ricoprire una posizione o un'opportunità aperta presso Honeywell.
Non vi chiediamo di fornirci informazioni personali sensibili, a meno che non sia necessario per adempiere ai nostri obblighi normativi (ad esempio, per il monitoraggio delle pari opportunità), o a meno che non abbiate fornito il vostro esplicito consenso. Ad eccezione della misura richiesta dalla legge, la fornitura di queste informazioni sarà del tutto volontaria. Honeywell si impegna a creare una forza lavoro realmente inclusiva e diversificata. Fornendoci i vostri dati sulle pari opportunità, ci consentite di comprendere meglio il nostro profilo di dipendenti in termini di dati sulle pari opportunità e le azioni da intraprendere per attrarre, promuovere e mantenere una forza lavoro diversificata a prescindere da età, disabilità, sesso, razza, convinzioni religiose o filosofiche e orientamento sessuale.
(iii) Informazioni personali raccolte automaticamente dall'utente
Possiamo raccogliere automaticamente alcune informazioni sulla vostra visita ai nostri siti web utilizzando "cookie" e altre tecnologie di tracciamento simili. Per ulteriori informazioni sui cookie che utilizziamo sul sito web attraverso il quale inviate la vostra candidatura, leggete la nostra
Informativa sui cookie
Fonti di informazioni personali
Possiamo raccogliere i vostri dati personali direttamente da voi o indirettamente da terze parti che sono legittimamente autorizzate a condividere i vostri dati con noi, come ad esempio:
Agenzie di collocamento, fornitori di servizi di controllo dei precedenti e di verifica dell'identità;
Agenzie di reclutamento (ad esempio, quando un'agenzia di reclutamento vi identifica come potenziali candidati);
Informazioni pubblicamente disponibili su di voi da siti come LinkedIn o dal sito web del vostro attuale datore di lavoro. L'utente può anche scegliere di fornirci l'accesso a determinate informazioni personali archiviate da terzi (ad esempio, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google o Facebook). Autorizzando Honeywell ad accedere a tali informazioni, l'utente accetta che Honeywell possa raccogliere, conservare e utilizzare tali informazioni in conformità con la presente Informativa sulla privacy;
Tramite referenze o passaparola (ad esempio, tramite una segnalazione da parte di un dipendente attuale o precedente). Nel caso di referenze, la persona che vi ha segnalato sarà responsabile di ottenere il vostro consenso a fornirci i vostri dati personali.
Finalità di utilizzo dei dati personali
Utilizziamo i vostri dati personali per i seguenti scopi:
Per valutare la vostra candidatura e prendere decisioni in merito all'assunzione;
Comunicare con voi e informarvi sul reclutamento e/o sulla vostra candidatura o su qualsiasi altra comunicazione richiesta;
Conformarsi ai requisiti legali e normativi applicabili e al fine di stabilire, esercitare o difendere un diritto legale;
Occupazione e gestione aziendale (ad esempio, stabilire un record di occupazione di base in caso di assunzione);
Realizzare report/analisi aggregati sui dati relativi all'attività dei candidati (ad esempio, traffico del sito di carriera, funnel dei candidati, fonte di assunzione, successo della campagna di reclutamento);
Solo per i dipendenti Honeywell:
Per escludervi automaticamente dall'essere proposti in modo proattivo ai reclutatori per un'opportunità di lavoro e non siete idonei a essere presi in considerazione in base alla vostra attuale valutazione HPD 9-block (che non sarà mai rivelata a nessuno al di fuori di Honeywell). Tuttavia, potrete sempre candidarvi direttamente a qualsiasi opportunità di lavoro disponibile e la vostra situazione specifica sarà presa in considerazione da un reclutatore.
Solo se siete residenti negli Stati Uniti:
Per inviarvi comunicazioni via SMS, in particolare:
(i)     1-1 comunicazioni via SMS in relazione alla vostra candidatura a un determinato posto di lavoro; e/o
(ii)    previo consenso esplicito dell'utente
,
comunicazioni via SMS su opportunità di lavoro, questioni lavorative e aggiornamenti sulle candidature.
L'utente potrà rinunciare e/o revocare il proprio consenso a ricevere le suddette comunicazioni seguendo le istruzioni fornite nel proprio profilo.
Se vi viene offerto e accettate di lavorare con Honeywell, le informazioni raccolte durante il processo di candidatura e di assunzione diventeranno parte del vostro curriculum lavorativo.
Elaborazione e profilazione automatizzate
Previo consenso esplicito dell'utente (che fornisce volontariamente quando si iscrive alla nostra Talent Community o seleziona l'apposita casella di consenso durante il processo di candidatura), effettuiamo una "profilazione" per valutare l'idoneità dell'utente a particolari opportunità di lavoro. Ciò comporta l'utilizzo di un algoritmo di corrispondenza in grado di valutare il vostro profilo lavorativo e di prevedere la vostra idoneità per una particolare opportunità di lavoro. Effettuiamo questo trattamento automatizzato allo scopo di:
aiutare i reclutatori ad abbinare i profili dei candidati alle opportunità di lavoro, suggerendo candidati da prendere in considerazione per una specifica opportunità di lavoro; e
invio di raccomandazioni lavorative personalizzate all'utente in base al suo profilo e/o alle sue preferenze o di altre informazioni che potrebbero essere di suo interesse, come notizie, webinar ed eventi di Honeywell.
Si prega di notare che, sulla base di questa profilazione, potreste non essere presi in considerazione per determinate opportunità di lavoro, a meno che non vi siate candidati direttamente.
Non prendiamo decisioni di assunzione basate esclusivamente su processi decisionali automatizzati e/o sulla profilazione. I vostri dati personali saranno sottoposti a decisioni umane, poiché la decisione finale di assunzione sarà presa dai selezionatori o dal responsabile delle assunzioni.
Le basi legali per il trattamento dei vostri dati personali
Alcune giurisdizioni richiedono a Honeywell una base giuridica per il trattamento dei dati personali dell'utente. Laddove la legge applicabile richieda di giustificare le nostre attività di trattamento, la nostra base giuridica per la raccolta e l'utilizzo delle informazioni personali dell'utente come descritto nella presente Informativa sulla privacy dipenderà dalle informazioni personali in questione e dal contesto specifico in cui le raccogliamo.
Consenso.
IIn generale, raccoglieremo normalmente i dati personali dell'utente quando avremo il suo consenso a farlo e quando avremo bisogno dei suoi dati personali per elaborare la sua candidatura. Accedendo al nostro sito web/portale, entrando a far parte della nostra Talent Community o candidandosi a una delle nostre posizioni lavorative, l'utente fornisce il proprio consenso a Honeywell per la raccolta e l'ulteriore elaborazione dei dati personali sopra descritti per gli scopi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla privacy. L'utente può
revocare il proprio consenso
in qualsiasi momento presentando una richiesta attraverso il nostro portale per la richiesta di dati personali all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o inviandoci un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Interessi legittimi.
Nei legittimi interessi di Honeywell, vale a dire il reclutamento, la selezione, la valutazione e la nomina di nuovi dipendenti e la gestione e l'amministrazione del processo di reclutamento e delle risorse umane, nella misura in cui i nostri legittimi interessi non prevalgono sui diritti e le libertà fondamentali dell'utente.
Obblighi legali
. Conformità agli obblighi legali di Honeywell, laddove la legge sul lavoro o altre leggi richiedano l'elaborazione delle informazioni personali dell'utente (ad esempio, nella misura in cui la legge richiede il monitoraggio delle pari opportunità e della diversità).
Interessi vitali.
Potremmo anche aver bisogno dei vostri dati personali per proteggere i vostri interessi vitali (ad esempio, per motivi di salute e sicurezza se partecipate a un colloquio presso la nostra sede).
Se avete domande o necessitate di ulteriori informazioni in merito alla base legale su cui raccogliamo e utilizziamo i vostri dati personali, vi preghiamo di inviare un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Con chi condividiamo i vostri dati personali
Honeywell condividerà le informazioni personali dell'utente con terzi solo nelle seguenti circostanze:
Entità del gruppo Honeywell
. Possiamo condividere i vostri dati personali con altre entità del gruppo situate in giurisdizioni di tutto il mondo per valutare il vostro profilo e prendere in considerazione eventuali opportunità di assunzione a livello di gruppo.
Fornitori di servizi
Possiamo condividere in modo specifico i vostri dati personali con fornitori di servizi terzi che svolgono servizi specifici per nostro conto (ad esempio, fornitori di personale di reclutamento e outsourcing e fornitori di analisi). Tali terze parti possono variare a seconda del paese dell'utente e cambiano di volta in volta, ma possono includere Phenom People, Inc. e Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. e i rispettivi fornitori terzi.
Dipendenti Honeywell.
Se siete già un dipendente Honeywell, tenete presente che alcune  sezioni del vostro profilo sono pubbliche e, quindi, visibili a tutti i dipendenti Honeywell (in particolare, nome, titolo, fotografia, competenze, aree di interesse, esperienza lavorativa e formazione). Tuttavia, tali sezioni sono modificabili e l'utente potrà scegliere quali informazioni su di sé mostrare nel proprio profilo. Si prega di notare che gli obiettivi di carriera, i trasferimenti e lo stato del profilo "aperto a nuove opportunità" non saranno pubblici e, pertanto, non saranno visibili a tutti i dipendenti Honeywell (solo al Talent Team di Honeywell).
Altre terze parti.
Honeywell può condividere le informazioni personali dell'utente con qualsiasi organo competente per l'applicazione della legge, autorità di regolamentazione, agenzia governativa, tribunale o terza parte, qualora ritenga che la divulgazione sia necessaria ai sensi della legge applicabile o nella convinzione in buona fede che tale azione sia necessaria per esercitare, stabilire o difendere i nostri diritti legali o per proteggere i vostri interessi vitali o quelli di un'altra persona. Potremmo anche condividere le vostre informazioni personali con altri soggetti con il vostro consenso o su vostra indicazione (ad esempio, un arbitro o un'associazione professionale).
Trasferimenti internazionali di informazioni personali
Honeywell è un'organizzazione globale e le informazioni personali dell'utente possono essere trasferite, conservate, archiviate o utilizzate in varie località del mondo, come gli Stati Uniti e l'India. Ciò significa che quando raccogliamo le informazioni personali dell'utente, queste possono essere elaborate in paesi che possono avere leggi sulla protezione dei dati diverse da quelle del paese dell'utente. Tuttavia, Honeywell adotterà sempre misure ragionevoli per proteggere la privacy dell'utente e fornire un livello di protezione delle informazioni personali paragonabile a quello del paese di residenza dell'utente, tra cui l'attuazione delle
Clausole contrattuali standard della Commissione
europea
, disponibili sul sito web della Commissione all'indirizzo
https://ec.europa.eu.
Mantenimento
Conserveremo le informazioni personali dell'utente per tutto il tempo necessario in relazione agli scopi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla privacy e in conformità con il programma di conservazione dei documenti di Honeywell o come richiesto dalla legge applicabile.
I vostri diritti
A seconda della legge applicabile, l'utente può godere di determinati diritti in relazione alle sue informazioni personali. Se siete residenti in California, fate riferimento alla sezione "
Informazioni aggiuntive per i residenti in California
.
L'utente può avere il diritto di
accedere, correggere, aggiornare
o richiedere
la cancellazione
dei propri dati personali;
Potete
opporvi
al trattamento dei vostri dati personali, chiederci di
limitare il
trattamento dei vostri dati trattamento dei vostri dati personali o richiedere
la portabilità
dei vostri dati personali;
L'utente può avere il diritto di non essere sottoposto a una decisione basata esclusivamente su un trattamento automatizzato, compresa la profilazione, se tale decisione produce effetti legali sull'utente o lo riguarda in modo significativo.
Honeywell, nell'ambito del processo di assunzione, non prende decisioni esclusivamente automatizzate sui candidati.
Allo stesso modo, se abbiamo raccolto ed elaborato i vostri dati personali con il vostro consenso, potete ritirare il vostro consenso in qualsiasi momento. La revoca del consenso non pregiudicherà la legittimità di qualsiasi trattamento da noi effettuato prima della revoca, né pregiudicherà il trattamento dei vostri dati personali effettuato sulla base di motivi di trattamento legittimi diversi dal consenso.
Avete il diritto di presentare un reclamo a un'autorità di protezione dei dati in merito alla raccolta e all'utilizzo dei vostri dati personali da parte nostra.
Agevoleremo il vostro esercizio dei diritti che vi spettano in conformità alla legge applicabile. esercitare uno qualsiasi dei diritti relativi ai vostri dati personali, contattateci attraverso HR Help, o il modulo di richiesta di dati personali che si trova all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
oppure inviate un'e-mail a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Ulteriori informazioni per i residenti in California
Se l'utente è residente nello Stato della California, questa sezione integra l'Informativa sulla privacy dei richiedenti di Honeywell.
(i)      Categorie di informazioni personali raccolte e divulgate
Honeywell ha raccolto e divulgato le seguenti categorie di informazioni personali per i propri scopi commerciali nei dodici mesi precedenti:
Previous column
Next column
Categorie
Raccogliamo
A.
Identificatori quali nome, data di nascita, sesso, indirizzo e-mail, numeri di telefono, indirizzo postale, identificatori online, account di social media e altri identificatori.
Sì
C.
Caratteristiche di classificazioni protette dalla legge californiana o federale, quali razza, etnia, convinzioni religiose o filosofiche, appartenenza a sindacati, dati sanitari, informazioni biometriche, dati genetici, disabilità, status di veterano, orientamento sessuale, posta personale, e-mail e messaggi di testo (a meno che Honeywell non sia il destinatario), identificatori governativi (ad esempio, numero di previdenza sociale), patente di guida, passaporto, informazioni finanziarie e bancarie.
Sì
F.
Informazioni sull'attività di Internet o di altre reti elettroniche, come la cronologia di navigazione, le interazioni con i siti web di Honeywell, le e-mail e i servizi di messaggistica di testo
Sì
G.
Dati di geolocalizzazione, come la posizione del dispositivo e la posizione IP.
Sì
H.
Informazioni audio, elettroniche, visive, termiche o simili, come la vostra voce e immagine, registrazioni video o audio se partecipate a un'intervista telefonica o video o se visitate i nostri uffici.
Sì
I.
Informazioni professionali o relative all'impiego, quali l'occupazione, i datori di lavoro attuali o precedenti, il titolo di lavoro, la storia educativa, le qualifiche accademiche e professionali, il curriculum, la storia lavorativa, le referenze di assunzione, le note e le valutazioni dei colloqui, le lingue, le appartenenze professionali, le certificazioni, le valutazioni della gestione delle prestazioni, la retribuzione, le preferenze di sede e di viaggio.
Sì
K.
Inferenze tratte da una qualsiasi delle informazioni personali sopra elencate per creare un profilo o un riassunto, ad esempio, delle preferenze e delle caratteristiche di un individuo.
Sì
Load More
(ii)      I vostri diritti
L'utente ha il diritto di inviarci una richiesta per ottenere i seguenti diritti relativi al periodo di dodici mesi precedente la sua richiesta. Si noti che questi diritti non sono assoluti e in alcuni casi sono soggetti a limitazioni come specificato nella legge applicabile
Il diritto di sapere quali informazioni personali abbiamo raccolto su di voi, le categorie di fonti da cui abbiamo raccolto le vostre informazioni personali, lo scopo aziendale o commerciale per cui abbiamo raccolto le vostre informazioni personali e le categorie di terzi con cui divulghiamo le vostre informazioni personali;
Il diritto di cancellare i propri dati personali;
Il diritto di correggere le informazioni personali inesatte che vi riguardano;
Il diritto di rinunciare alla vendita o alla condivisione dei vostri dati personali;
Il diritto di rinunciare alla vendita o alla condivisione dei vostri dati personali;
Il diritto di non subire discriminazioni illegali per l'esercizio dei propri diritti ai sensi delle leggi vigenti.
Faciliteremo il vostro esercizio dei diritti che vi spettano in conformità alla legge applicabile e, considerando il tipo e la sensibilità delle informazioni personali oggetto della richiesta, per la vostra protezione, potremmo dover richiedere di verificare la vostra identità e richiedere ulteriori informazioni da parte vostra.
Per esercitare i propri diritti relativi alle informazioni personali, si prega di contattare l'azienda tramite il modulo di richiesta di dati personali disponibile all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o di inviare un'e-mail all'indirizzo
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Se siete già un dipendente Honeywell, potete contattarci all'indirizzo
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contatto
In caso di domande o reclami sulle modalità di trattamento dei propri dati personali o per esercitare i propri diritti, si prega di contattare:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(solo se siete già dipendenti Honeywell) o il nostro responsabile della protezione dei dati all'indirizzo
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
L'utente può anche contattarci attraverso il modulo di richiesta dei dati che si trova all'indirizzo
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Japanese
更新： 2023年1月1日
本応募者プライバシー通知（「プライバシー通知））では、あなたが当社のTalent Communityに参加し、求人について検索または応募し、当社のポータル、ウェブサイト、またはその他の求人媒体を通じて個人情報を当社に提出する際、Honeywell International, Inc.および
その関連会社
（総称して「
ハネウェル
」、「
当社
」、または「
弊社
」）が、オンラインまたはオフライン（「
サービス
」）であなたの個人情報をどのように処理するかについて説明しています。当社は、適用されるデータ保護法の目的で、あなたの個人情報の管理者です。
すでにハネウェル従業員である場合は、ハネウェル グローバルデータプライバシー方針と従業員プライバシー通知（あなたの管轄区域に存在する場合）を参照することもできます。本プライバシー通知の目的は、あなたの応募に関する個人情報の処理について、より詳細な情報を提供することです。
当社が収集する個人情報
当社は応募を処理するために、あなたが当社のウェブサイト/ポータルを通じて特定の求人に応募する場合、またはあなたがすでにハネウェル従業員である場合は、雇用関係にある間、あなたの個人情報の提供をお願いしています。すべての情報は任意で提供され、あなたはハネウェルに提供する情報の範囲を決定します。
一部の情報は応募内容の評価を完了するために必要となる場合があり、それが提供されない場合、候補者としての検討が制限される可能性があることをご承知おきください。
(i)   個人情報
当社は、あなたに関する以下の個人情報を収集することがあります。
電子メールアドレス、電話番号、写真などの個人情報および連絡先情報
現在または以前の雇用主、役職、または所属組織に関するその他の情報など、あなたの職業上の専門および教育に関する情報。また、履歴書や、学位、学歴、在籍機関、言語、専門職、資格、業績管理の評価や報酬の詳細など、資格や学歴に関する情報を提供することもできます。
キャリアに関する希望（短期および長期目標、転勤の意思、転勤可能な日付、勤務地に関する希望など）
例えば、面接中に入手したもの、応募に関してあなたとやり取りする電子メール、オンラインチャットボットを通じてあなたと交わした会話など、当社の採用プロセスへのあなたの参加に由来する個人情報。
電話やビデオのインタビューに参加する場合、または当社のオフィスを訪問する場合に、写真、ビデオ、または録音でキャプチャされた音声や肖像などの音声および視覚情報。
あなたが任意で当社に提供することを選択したその他の個人情報。
(ii)  機微な個人情報。
当社はまた、法的義務がある場合、または情報がハネウェルにおける将来の職場環境に関連する場合、または将来の雇用給付の提供のために、または以下のような明示的な同意を得た場合、あなたに関する特別な種類の個人情報（個人情報の特別なカテゴリーとも呼ばれます）を収集する場合があります。
政府発行の識別番号（社会保障番号など）
年齢、性別、人種、障害、性的指向、婚姻状況、退役軍人ステータスなど、保護対象の分類に関する情報を含む可能性のある人口統計学的情報
健康情報（例えば、障害や食事制限に対応するため）
個人の政治的意見、宗教的信条、労働組合への加入に関する情報
個人の刑事犯罪や有罪判決に関する情報、および適用されるデータ保護法の下で機密と見なされるその他の情報。法律で許可されている場合、また適用される範囲内で、ハネウェルは、当社で募集中の役職または機会に対するあなたの適合性を判断するために、場合によっては経歴および/または犯罪歴調査を実施する必要があります。
当社は、規制上の義務を遂行するために必要な場合（例：機会均等の監視のため）や、あなたから明示的な同意をいただいた場合を除き、あなたに機密性の高い個人情報の提供を要求しません。法律で義務付けられている場合を除き、この情報の提供は完全に任意です。ハネウェルは、真に包摂的で多様な労働力に尽力しています。平等な機会データを提供することで、平等な機会データ、および年齢、障害、性別、人種、宗教的または哲学的信念、性的指向に関係なく、多様な従業員を惹きつけ、促進し、維持するために必要な行動の観点から、従業員プロファイルをより深く理解することができます。
(iii) 当社が自動的に収集する個人情報
当社は、「クッキー」および類似の追跡技術を使用して、当社サイトへのあなたの訪問に関する特定の情報を収集します。当社があなたの応募書類を提出するウェブサイトで使用しているクッキーの詳細については、当社の
クッキーに関する通知
をお読みください。
個人情報の源
当社は、あなたの個人情報をあなたから直接、または以下を含む当社とあなたの情報を共有する法的権利を有する第三者から間接的に収集する場合があります。
人材派遣会社、身元調査/雇用調査または身元確認サービスプロバイダー
人材派遣会社（例えば、人材派遣会社が候補者としてあなたを特定する場合）
LinkedInや現在の雇用主のウェブサイトなどのサイトから公開されているあなたに関する情報。また、第三者（LinkedIn、Twitter、Google、Facebookなど）が保存している特定の個人情報へのアクセスを当社に提供することもできます。ハネウェルがこの情報にアクセスすることを許可することにより、あなたは、当社が本プライバシー通知に従ってこの情報を収集、保存、および使用する場合があることに同意するものとします。
参照または口コミによる（例えば、現従業員または元従業員からの紹介による）。推薦の場合、あなたを推薦する方が、あなたの個人情報を当社に提供するための同意をあなたから得る責任を負います。
個人情報の利用目的
当社は、以下の目的であなたの個人情報を使用します。
応募を評価し、採用を決定するため
採用および/または応募（複数可）、またはその他の必要な連絡について、あなたに連絡を取り、あなたに通知するため。
適用される法的および規制上の要件を遵守し、当社が法的請求を確立、行使、または防御するため
雇用および企業管理（例えば、雇用された場合は基本的な雇用記録を作成する）
候補者の活動データ（キャリアサイトのトラフィック、候補者ファネル、採用源、採用キャンペーンの成功など）に関する集計レポート/分析を実行するため。
ハネウェル従業員である場合：
採用担当者への採用検討のために積極的に提案されることを自動的に除外し、現在のHPD 9ブロック評価（ハネウェル社外の誰にも公開されません）では検討の対象となりません。ただし、いつでも求人に直接応募することができ、あなたの具体的な状況は採用担当者が検討します。
あなたが米国居住者である場合：
SMSで通信を送信するには、特に：
(i)     あなたの特定の求人への応募に関連する1-1のSMS通信、および/または
(ii)    あなたの明示的な同意を条件として、雇用機会、職務および応募の更新に関するSMSキャンペーンの連絡。
プロファイルに記載されている指示に従って、上記の通知を受け取ることに対する同意をオプトアウトおよび/または取り消すことができます。
ハネウェルでの雇用を申し出られ、受け入れた場合、応募および採用プロセス中に収集された情報は、雇用記録の一部となります。
自動処理とプロファイリング
あなたの明示的な同意（当社のTalent Communityへの参加時または応募プロセス中に適切な同意ボックスにチェックを入れる際にあなたが自発的に提供する同意）を条件として、当社は、特定の求人機会に対するあなたの適合性を評価するためにプロファイリングを実施します。これには、あなたの雇用プロファイルを評価し、特定の雇用機会に対するあなたの適格性を予測することができるマッチングアルゴリズムの使用が含まれます。当社は、以下の目的でこの自動処理を実施します。
採用担当者が候補者のプロファイルを求人に一致させるのを支援するため、候補者に特定の求人への検討を提案する、および
ハネウェルのニュース、ウェビナー、イベントなど、関心のあるプロファイルや好み、その他の情報に基づいて、パーソナライズされた求人提案を送信する。
このプロファイリングに基づいて、あなたが直接応募しない限り、特定の求人案件の対象とならない場合がありますのでご留意ください。
当社は、自動化された意思決定プロセスおよび/またはプロファイリングのみに基づいて採用決定を行うことはありません。最終的な採用決定は採用担当者または採用マネージャーによって行われるため、あなたの個人情報は人間による決定の対象となります。
あなたの個人情報を処理する法的根拠
一部の法域では、あなたの個人情報を処理する法的根拠をハネウェルに要求しています。適用法により、当社の処理活動を正当化することが義務付けられている場合、本プライバシー通知に記載されているあなたの個人情報の収集および使用に関する当社の法的根拠は、関連する個人情報および当社が収集する特定の状況によって異なります。
同意。
通常、当社は、あなたの同意を得ている場合、およびあなたの応募を処理するためにあなたの個人情報が必要な場合に、あなたから個人情報を収集します。当社のウェブサイト/ポータルにアクセスしたり、当社のTalent Communityに参加したり、当社の求人に応募したりすることにより、あなたはハネウェルに対し、本プライバシー通知に記載された目的のために上記の個人情報を収集し、さらに処理することに同意したものとみなされます。当社のデータ主体リクエストポータル（
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
）を通じてリクエストを提出するか、
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
宛てに電子メールを送信することにより、あなたはいつでも
同意を撤回
することができます。
正当な利益
ハネウェルの正当な利益、すなわち新入社員の採用、選定、評価および任命、ならびに当社の正当な利益があなたの基本的権利と自由によって優先されない範囲での採用と人事プロセスの管理および統制。
法的義務
雇用法またはその他の法律で個人情報の処理が義務付けられている場合のハネウェルの法的義務の遵守（例えば、機会と多様性の平等を監視することが法律で義務付けられている場合など）。
重要な関心事。
また、あなたの
重要な利益を保護するために、あなたの個人情報が必要になる場合があります（例えば、あなたが当サイトでのインタビューに出席する場合、健康と安全上の理由）。
当社があなたの個人情報を収集および使用する法的根拠についてご質問がある場合、または詳細情報が必要な場合は、
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
まで電子メールでお問い合わせください。
個人情報の共有先
ハネウェルは、以下の状況においてのみ、個人情報を第三者と共有します。
ハネウェルのグループ企業
。当社は、あなたのプロファイルを評価し、グループレベルでの採用機会を検討するために、世界中の法域に所在する他のグループ事業体とあなたの個人情報を共有する場合があります。
サービスプロバイダー
当社は、当社に代わって特定のサービスを実施する第三者サービスプロバイダー（採用およびアウトソーシングの人材派遣プロバイダーや分析プロバイダーなど）とあなたの個人情報を具体的に共有する場合があります。かかる第三者は、あなたの国によって異なり、随時変更されることがありますが、Phenom People, Inc.、Cornerstone OnDemand Inc.、およびそれぞれの第三者プロバイダーが含まれる場合があります。
ハネウェル従業員。
あなたがすでにハネウェル従業員である場合、プロファイルの一部のセクションは公開されているため、ハネウェルの全従業員が閲覧できます（特に、名前、役職、写真、スキル、関心分野、職歴、学歴）。ただし、これらのセクションは編集可能で、プロファイルに表示される情報を選択できます。キャリア目標、転勤、そして「新たな機会」に対するプロファイルステータスのセクションは公開されないため、ハネウェルの全従業員が閲覧できるわけではありません（ハネウェルのタレントチームのみ）。
その他の第三者。
ハネウェルは、適用法に基づき開示が必要であると当社が考える場合、または当社の法的権利を行使、確立、もしくは防御するため、またはあなたや他者の重大な利益を保護するためにかかる行為が必要であると誠実に信じる場合、管轄の法執行機関、規制当局、政府機関、裁判所、または第三者とあなたの個人情報を共有することがあります。また、当社は、あなたの同意を得たり、指示（例：審判員または専門団体）により、あなたの個人情報を他者と共有する場合があります。
個人情報の国際的な移行
ハネウェルはグローバルな組織であり、個人情報は、適用法に従って、米国やインドなど、世界中のさまざまな場所において転送、保持、保存、または使用される場合があります。これにより、当社があなたの個人情報を収集すると、お客様の国の法律とは異なるデータ保護法がある国で処理される場合があります。ただし、ハネウェルは、あなたのプライバシーを保護し、あなたの居住国と同等レベルの個人情報の保護を提供するために、常に合理的な措置を講じます。これには、
欧州委員会の標準契約条項
の実施が含まれます。この条項は、欧州委員会のウェブサイト、
https://ec.europa.eu
でご覧いただけます。
維持
当社は、本プライバシー通知に記載された目的に関連して、ハネウェルの記録保持スケジュールに従って、または適用法で要求される期間、あなたの個人情報を保持します。
あなたの権利
適用法によっては、個人情報に関する特定の権利があなたに付与される場合があります。カリフォルニア州にお住まいの方は、下記の「
カリフォルニア州居住者向け追加情報
」をご参照ください。
あなたは、ご自身の個人情報に対して
アクセス、コピーの要求、修正、更新
または
削除の要求
をする権利を有します。
あなたは、ご自身の個人情報の処理に
異議
を唱えること、個人情報の処理を
制限
するよう当社に依頼したり、個人情報の
ポータビリティ
を要求したりすることができます。
意思決定があなたに法的影響を与える場合、またはあなたに重大な影響を与える場合、
あなたについての説明を求める権利およびプロファイリングを含め、
自動処理のみに基づいた意思決定を受け入れない権利を有します。
ハネウェルは、採用プロセスの一環として、候補者に対して完全に自動化された意思決定を行うことはありません。
同様に、当社があなたの同意を得てお客様の個人情報を収集および処理した場合、あなたはいつでも同意を撤回することができます。同意の撤回は、撤回前に当社が行った処理の合法性に影響せず、同意以外の合法的な処理根拠に従って行われた個人情報の処理にも影響しません。
あなたは、当社があなたの個人情報を収集および使用したことについて、データ保護当局に苦情を申し立てる権利を有します。
当社は、適用される法律に従って、お客様に適用される権利が円滑に行使されるようにします。個人情報に関する権利を行使するには、HRヘルプまたは
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォーム、または
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
に電子メールにてお問い合わせください。
カリフォルニア州居住者向け追加情報
カリフォルニア州にお住まいの方は、ハネウェルの応募者プライバシー通知を補足するこのセクションをご覧ください。
(i)      収集・開示される個人情報のカテゴリー
ハネウェルは、過去12か月間に当社の事業目的で以下のカテゴリーの個人情報を収集し、開示しました。
Previous column
Next column
当社が収集した
カテゴリー
A.
氏名、生年月日、性別、Eメールアドレス、電話番号、郵送先住所、オンライン識別子、ソーシャルメディアアカウントなどの識別子。
あり
C.
人種、民族、宗教的または哲学的信条、労働組合への加入状況、健康データ、生体情報、遺伝データ、障害、退役軍人ステータス、性的指向、個人の郵便、Eメール、テキストメッセージ（ハネウェルが意図された受信者でないもの）、政府識別子（社会保障番号など）、運転免許証、パスポート、財務および銀行情報など、カリフォルニア州または連邦法の下で保護されている分類の特徴。
あり
F.
閲覧履歴、ハネウェルのウェブサイトとのやり取り、メールおよびテキストメッセージサービスなど、インターネットまたはその他の電子ネットワークの活動情報。
あり
G.
デバイスの場所やIPの場所などの位置情報データ。
あり
H.
電話やビデオのインタビューに参加する場合、または当社のオフィスを訪問する場合に、音声、写真、ビデオ、または録音でキャプチャされた音声、電子、視覚、熱、または類似の情報。
あり
I.
職業、現在または以前の雇用主、役職、学歴、学術および専門資格、履歴書、職務経歴、採用時の推薦者、面接のメモおよび評価、言語、専門職のメンバーシップ、認定資格、業績管理評価、報酬、勤務地の希望、出張の希望などの職業または雇用関連の情報。
あり
K.
個人の希望や特性などに関するプロフィールまたは概要を作成するために、上記の個人情報から引き出された推論。
あり
Load More
(ii)      お客様の権利
お客様は、ご自身に関する以下の権利について、請求日からさかのぼる12か月間を対象として、当社に請求を行う権利があります。ただし、これらの権利は絶対的なものではなく、適用法に基づく制限がある場合がありますのでご留意ください。以下の権利が含まれます。
当社がお客様に関して収集した個人情報の種類、当社がお客様の個人情報を収集した情報源のカテゴリー、当社がお客様の個人情報を収集した事業上または商業上の目的、および当社がお客様の個人情報を開示する第三者のカテゴリーを知る権利。
お客様の個人情報を削除する権利。
お客様に関する不正確な個人情報を訂正する権利。
お客様の個人情報の販売または共有をオプトアウトする権利。
お客様の機密個人情報の処理を制限する権利。
適用法に基づくお客様の権利を行使したことで違法な差別を受けない権利。
当社は、適用法に従い、お客様に適用される権利の行使を促進し、要請の対象となる個人情報の種類および機密性を考慮し、お客様の保護のために、お客様の身元確認および追加情報の請求が必要になる場合があります。
個人情報に関する権利を行使するには、
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォーム、または
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
に電子メールにてお問い合わせください。すでにハネウェル従業員である方は、
HRhelp@honeywell.com
までご連絡ください。
お問い合わせ
個人情報がどのように処理されるかについて質問や苦情がある場合、または権利を行使したい場合は、以下の宛先にご連絡ください。
HRhelp@honeywell.com
（すでにハネウェル従業員である場合のみ）または当社のデータ保護責任者
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
また、
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
にあるデータ対象リクエストフォームを通じて当社に連絡することもできます。
Korean
업데이트되었습니다: 업데이트: 2023년 1월 1일
본 지원자 개인정보 처리방침("개인정보 처리방침")은 귀하가 당사의 인재 커뮤니티에 가입하고, 당사의 포털, 웹사이트 또는 기타 온라인 또는 오프라인 채용 매체("
서비스
")를 통해 일자리를 검색 또는 지원하고, 당사에 개인정보를 제출할 때 하니웰 인터내셔널과 그
계열사
(총칭하여 "
하니웰
", "당사" 또는 "
우리
")가 귀하의 개인정보를 어떻게 처리하는지를 설명합니다. 당사는 관련 데이터 보호법의 목적에 따라 귀하의 개인정보를 처리합니다.
귀하가 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우, 해당 관할 지역에 적용되는 하니웰 글로벌 데이터 개인정보 취급방침 및 직원 개인정보 취급방침을 참조할 수도 있습니다. 본 개인정보 처리방침의 목적은 귀하의 지원과 관련하여 당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 처리하는 방법에 대한 자세한 정보를 제공하는 것입니다.
당사가 수집하는 개인 정보
당사는 귀하의 지원서를 처리하기 위해 귀하가 당사 웹사이트/포털을 통해 특정 채용 공고에 지원할 때 또는 귀하가 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우 고용 관계 중에 본인에 대한 개인 정보를 제공하도록 요청합니다. 모든 정보는 자발적으로 제공되며 귀하가 하니웰에 제공하는 정보의 범위는 귀하가 결정합니다.
지원서 평가를 완료하기 위해 일부 정보가 필요할 수 있으며, 해당 정보가 제공되지 않을 경우 지원자를 후보자로 고려하는 데 제한이 있을 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다.
(i)   개인 정보
당사는 귀하에 대해 다음과 같은 개인정보를 수집할 수 있습니다:
이메일 주소, 전화번호, 사진을 포함한 개인 정보 및 연락처 정보;
현재 또는 이전 고용주, 직책 또는 소속 조직에 대한 기타 정보 등 귀하의 직업과 관련된 전문 및 교육 정보. 또한 이력서/이력서와 학위, 전공 분야, 다닌 기관, 언어, 전문 회원 자격, 자격증, 성과 관리 등급 및 보상에 대한 세부 정보 등 자격 또는 교육에 관한 정보를 제공할 수 있습니다;
경력 선호사항(예: 단기 및 장기 목표, 이전 의향, 이전 가능한 날짜, 선호하는 위치);
예를 들어 면접 과정에서 얻은 정보, 지원과 관련하여 당사가 귀하와 주고받은 이메일 또는 온라인 챗봇을 통해 귀하와 나눈 대화 등 귀하가 당사의 채용 절차에 참여함으로써 파생되는 개인정보.
귀하가 전화 또는 화상 인터뷰에 참여하거나 당사 사무실을 방문한 경우 사진, 비디오 또는 오디오 녹음에 캡처된 귀하의 음성 및 모습과 같은 시청각 정보;
기타 귀하가 자발적으로 당사에 제공하기로 선택한 개인 정보.
(ii)
민감한 개인 정보
또한 당사는 법적 의무가 있는 경우 귀하에 대한 특수 범주의 개인정보("특수 범주 개인정보"라고도 함)를 수집할 수 있습니다. 귀하의 향후 Honeywell 근무 환경 또는 향후 고용 혜택 제공과 관련된 정보 또는 귀하의 명시적 동의가 있는 경우:
정부에서 발급한 식별 번호(예: 주민등록번호);
인구통계학적 정보에는 나이, 성별, 인종, 장애, 성적 지향, 결혼 여부 또는 군필 여부와 같은 보호 대상 분류에 대한 정보가 포함될 수 있습니다;
건강 정보(예: 장애가 있거나 식이 제한이 있는 경우);
개인의 정치적 의견이나 종교적 신념 또는 노동조합 가입과 관련된 정보;
개인의 형사 범죄 또는 유죄 판결에 관한 정보 및 관련 데이터 보호법에 따라 민감한 것으로 간주되는 기타 정보. 법이 허용하는 경우, 그리고 해당되는 범위 내에서, Honeywell은 귀하가 Honeywell의 개방형 직위 또는 기회에 적합한지 판단하기 위해 신원 및/또는 범죄 조회를 수행해야 할 수도 있습니다.
당사는 규제 의무를 이행하기 위한 목적(예: 기회 균등 모니터링)에 필요한 경우 또는 귀하가 명시적으로 동의하지 않는 한 민감한 개인정보를 당사에 제공할 것을 요구하지 않습니다. 법에서 요구하는 경우를 제외하고, 이 정보의 제공은 전적으로 자발적으로 이루어집니다. 하니웰은 진정으로 포용적이고 다양한 인력을 확보하기 위해 최선을 다하고 있습니다. 귀하는 당사에 기회 균등 데이터를 제공함으로써 연령, 장애, 성별, 인종, 종교적 또는 철학적 신념, 성적 지향에 관계없이 다양한 인력을 유치, 승진 및 유지하기 위해 취해야 할 조치와 기회 균등 데이터 측면에서 당사의 직원 프로필을 더 잘 이해할 수 있습니다.
(iii)  당사가 귀하로부터 자동으로 수집하는 개인 정보
당사는 "쿠키" 및 기타 유사한 추적 기술을 사용하여 귀하의 당사 웹사이트 방문에 관한 특정 정보를 자동으로 수집할 수 있습니다. 귀하가 지원서를 제출하는 웹사이트에서 당사가 사용하는 쿠키에 대한 자세한 내용은 당사의
쿠키 고지를
참조하시기 바랍니다.
개인 정보의 출처
당사는 귀하로부터 직접 또는 다음과 같이 합법적으로 당사와 귀하의 정보를 공유할 수 있는 제3자로부터 간접적으로 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집할 수 있습니다:
고용 대행사, 신원/고용 확인 또는 신원 확인 서비스 제공업체;
채용 에이전시(예: 채용 에이전시에서 귀하를 잠재적 후보자로 식별하는 경우);
LinkedIn 또는 현재 고용주의 웹사이트와 같은 사이트에서 공개적으로 사용 가능한 귀하에 관한 정보. 또한 귀하는 제3자(예: LinkedIn, Twitter, Google 또는 Facebook)가 저장한 특정 개인 정보에 대한 액세스를 당사에 제공하도록 선택할 수도 있습니다. 이러한 정보에 대한 액세스 권한을 Honeywell에 부여함으로써 귀하는 당사가 본 개인정보 취급방침에 따라 이러한 정보를 수집, 저장 및 사용할 수 있음에 동의하는 것입니다;
추천 또는 입소문(예: 현재 또는 전 직원의 추천을 통한 경우). 추천의 경우, 귀하를 추천하는 사람은 귀하의 개인 정보 제공에 대한 동의를 얻을 책임이 있습니다.
개인정보 사용 목적
당사는 다음과 같은 목적으로 귀하의 개인정보를 이용합니다:
지원서를 평가하고 채용 결정을 내리기 위해;
귀하와 소통하고 채용 및/또는 귀하의 지원서 또는 기타 필요한 커뮤니케이션에 대해 귀하에게 알리기 위해;
관련 법률 및 규제 요건을 준수하고 당사가 법적 청구를 설정, 행사 또는 방어하기 위한 목적;
고용 및 기업 관리(예: 고용된 경우 기본 고용 기록 수립);
후보자의 활동 데이터(예: 커리어 사이트 트래픽, 후보자 유입 경로, 채용 출처, 채용 캠페인 성공 여부)에 관한 집계 보고서/분석을 수행합니다;
하니웰 직원만 해당됩니다
:
채용 기회에 대한 채용 담당자의 사전 고려 대상에서 자동으로 제외되며, 현재 HPD 9블록 등급에 따라 고려 대상에서 제외됩니다(이 등급은 Honeywell 외부의 누구에게도 공개되지 않음). 그러나 귀하는 언제든지 가능한 모든 채용 기회에 직접 지원할 수 있으며 채용 담당자가 귀하의 특정 상황을 고려할 것입니다.
귀하가 미국 거주자인 경우에만 해당됩니다
:
T특히 SMS를 통해 커뮤니케이션을 보내기 위해:
(i)     1-1  특정 채용 공고에 대한 귀하의 지원과 관련된 SMS 통신 및/또는
(ii)    귀하의 명시적 동의가 있는 경우, 채용 기회, 직무 및 지원 업데이트에 대한 SMS 캠페인 커뮤니케이션을 제공합니다.
귀하는 프로필에 제공된 지침에 따라 위에 언급된 커뮤니케이션 수신에 대한 동의를 거부하거나 철회할 수 있습니다.
Honeywell에 채용 제안을 받고 수락하는 경우, 지원 및 채용 과정에서 수집된 정보는 고용 기록의 일부가 됩니다.
자동 처리 및 프로파일링
귀하의 명시적 동의(인재 커뮤니티 가입 시 또는 지원 과정에서 해당 동의 상자에 체크할 때 자발적으로 제공)에 따라, 당사는 특정 직무 기회에 대한 귀하의 적합성을 평가하기 위해 '프로파일링'을 실시합니다. 여기에는 귀하의 고용 프로필을 평가하고 특정 직무 기회에 대한 귀하의 적격성을 예측할 수 있는 매칭 알고리즘을 사용하는 것이 포함됩니다. 당사는 다음과 같은 목적으로 이 자동화된 처리를 수행합니다:
채용 담당자가 특정 직무 기회에 대해 고려할 후보자를 제안하여 후보자의 프로필을 직무 기회와 일치시킬 수 있도록 지원합니다.
귀하의 프로필 및/또는 선호도 또는 Honeywell 뉴스, 웨비나 및 이벤트와 같이 귀하가 관심을 가질 만한 기타 정보를 기반으로 귀하에게 맞춤화된 채용 추천을 보냅니다.
이 프로파일링에 따라 귀하가 직접 지원하지 않는 한 특정 채용 기회에 고려되지 않을 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다.
당사는 자동화된 의사결정 프로세스 및/또는 프로파일링만을 기반으로 채용 결정을 내리지 않습니다. 최종적인 채용 결정은 채용 담당자 또는 채용 관리자가 내리기 때문에 귀하의 개인정보는 사람이 내린 결정의 적용을 받습니다.
개인정보 처리의 법적 근거
특정 관할권에서는 하니웰이 귀하의 개인 정보를 처리할 수 있는 법적 근거를 요구합니다. 관련 법률에 따라 당사가 처리 활동을 정당화해야 하는 경우, 본 개인정보 취급방침에 설명된 대로 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집하고 사용하는 법적 근거는 해당 개인 정보와 당사가 개인 정보를 수집하는 특정 상황에 따라 달라집니다.
동의.
일반적으로 당사는 일반적으로 귀하의 동의가 있는 경우와 귀하의 지원서를 처리하기 위해 귀하의 개인 정보가 필요한 경우 귀하로부터 개인 정보를 수집합니다. 당사 웹사이트/포털에 액세스하거나, 인재 커뮤니티에 가입하거나, 당사의 채용 직책 중 하나에 지원함으로써 귀하는 본 개인정보 처리방침에 설명된 목적을 위해 위에 설명된 개인 정보를 수집하고 추가 처리하는 데 동의하는 것입니다. 귀하는 언제든지 데이터 주체 요청 포털(
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
)을 통해 요청을 제출하거나 이메일(
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
)을 보내
동의를 철회할
수 있습니다.
정당한 이익.
당사의 정당한 이익, 즉 신입 사원의 모집, 선발, 평가 및 임명, 채용 및 인사 프로세스의 관리 및 운영은 당사의 정당한 이익이 귀하의 기본적 권리와 자유에 의해 우선되지 않는 범위 내에서 이루어집니다.
법적 의무.
용법 또는 기타 법률에서 귀하의 개인 정보 처리를 요구하는 경우(예: 법률에서 기회 평등 및 다양성 모니터링에 대해 요구하는 범위까지) Honeywell의 법적 의무를 준수합니다.
중대한 이익.
당사는 또한 귀하의 중요한 이익을 보호하기 위해 귀하의 개인 정보가 필요할 수 있습니다(예: 귀하가 당사 사이트에서 면접에 참석하는 경우 건강 및 안전상의 이유).
당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집하고 사용하는 법적 근거에 대해 궁금한 점이 있거나 추가 정보가 필요한 경우
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주시기 바랍니다.
당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유하는 대상
하니웰은 다음과 같은 상황에서만 귀하의 개인 정보를 제3자와 공유합니다:
하니웰 그룹 법인.
당사는 귀하의 프로필을 평가하고 그룹 차원의 채용 기회를 고려하기 위해 전 세계 관할권에 위치한 다른 그룹 법인과 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유할 수 있습니다.
서비스 제공업체 당사는
당사를 대신하여 특정 서비스를 수행하는 제3자 서비스 제공업체(예: 채용 및 아웃소싱 인력 제공업체 및 분석 제공업체)와 귀하의 개인 정보를 구체적으로 공유할 수 있습니다. 이러한 제3자는 회원님의 국가에 따라 다를 수 있으며 수시로 변경될 수 있지만, Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. 및 해당 제3자 제공업체가 포함될 수 있습니다.
하니웰 직원.
이미 Honeywell 직원인 경우 프로필의 일부 섹션은 공개되어 있으므로 모든 Honeywell 직원이 볼 수 있습니다(특히 이름, 직책, 사진, 기술, 관심 분야, 업무 경력 및 교육). 그러나 이러한 섹션은 편집할 수 있으며 프로필에 표시할 자신에 대한 정보를 선택할 수 있습니다. 경력 목표, 근무지 이전 및 프로필 상태 "새로운 기회에 열려 있음" 섹션은 공개되지 않으므로 모든 Honeywell 직원에게 표시되지 않습니다(Honeywell의 인재 팀에만 표시됨).
기타 제3자.
하니웰은 관련 법률에 따라 또는 당사의 법적 권리를 행사, 확립 또는 방어하거나 귀하 또는 타인의 중대한 이익을 보호하기 위해 그러한 조치가 필요하다고 선의로 판단되는 경우 관할 법 집행 기관, 규제 기관, 정부 기관, 법원 또는 제3자와 귀하의 개인 정보를 공유할 수 있습니다. 또한 당사는 귀하의 동의 또는 귀하의 지시에 따라 귀하의 개인 정보를 다른 사람(예: 심판 또는 전문 협회)과 공유할 수 있습니다.
개인정보의 국제 전송
하니웰은 글로벌 조직이며 귀하의 개인 정보는 미국, 인도 등 전 세계 여러 지역에 이전, 보유, 저장 또는 사용될 수 있습니다. 이는 당사가 귀하의 개인 정보를 수집할 때 귀하의 국가 법률과 다른 데이터 보호법이 적용되는 국가에서 처리될 수 있음을 의미합니다. 그러나 하니웰은 항상 귀하의 개인 정보를 보호하고 귀하의 거주 국가와 유사한 수준의 개인 정보 보호를 제공하기 위해 합리적인 조치를 취할 것이며, 여기에는
유럽연합
집행위원회 웹사이트(
https://ec.europa.eu
)에서 확인할 수 있는 유럽연합 집행위원회의
표준 계약 조항을
이행하는 것이 포함됩니다.
리텐션
당사는 본 개인정보 취급방침에 설명된 목적과 관련하여 필요한 기간 동안, 그리고 Honeywell의 기록 보존 일정에 따라 또는 관련 법률에서 요구하는 기간 동안 귀하의 개인 정보를 보유합니다.
귀하의 권리
관련 법률에 따라 귀하는 귀하의 개인정보와 관련하여 특정 권리를 가질 수 있습니다. 캘리포니아 거주자인 경우 아래의 '
캘리포니아 거주자를 위한 추가 정보
'를 참조하시기 바랍니다.
귀하는 귀하의 개인 정보에
액세스
,
수정
,
업데이트
또는
삭제를
요청할 권리가 있습니다;
귀하는 귀하의 개인 정보 처리에
이의를
제기하고, 당사에 다음과 같은
제한을
요청할 수 있습니다. 개인정보 처리 또는 개인정보
이동
요청;
귀하는 귀하에 대한 결정이 귀하에 대한 법적 효력을 발생시키거나 귀하에게 중대한 영향을 미치는 경우 프로파일링을 포함하여 자동화된 처리만을 기반으로 한 귀하에 대한 결정을 거부할 권리가 있을 수 있습니다.
하니웰은 채용 프로세스의 일부로서 지원자에 대한 결정을 전적으로 자동화된 방식으로만 내리지 않습니다.
마찬가지로, 당사가 귀하의 동의를 받아 귀하의 개인정보를 수집 및 처리한 경우 귀하는 언제든지 동의를 철회할 수 있습니다. 귀하의 동의를 철회하더라도 철회 이전에 당사가 수행한 처리의 적법성에는 영향을 미치지 않으며, 동의 이외의 적법한 처리 근거에 따라 수행한 귀하의 개인정보 처리에도 영향을 미치지 않습니다.
귀하는 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집 및 사용하는 것에 대해 데이터 보호 기관에 불만을 제기할 권리가 있습니다.
당사는 관련 법률에 따라 귀하에게 적용되는 권리 행사를 용이하게 할 것입니다. 귀하의 개인 정보와 관련된 권리를 행사하려면 인사 지원팀 또는
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-성명서에
있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해 당사에 문의하거나
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주십시오.
캘리포니아 거주자를 위한 추가 정보
귀하가 캘리포니아주 거주자인 경우, 본 섹션은 하니웰의 지원자 개인정보 취급방침을 보완합니다.
(i)      수집 및 공개하는 개인정보의 범주
하니웰은 지난 12개월 동안 당사의 사업 목적으로 다음 범주의 개인 정보를 수집하고 공개했습니다:
Previous column
Next column
카테고리
수집하는 정보
A.
이름, 생년월일, 성별, 이메일 주소, 전화번호, 우편 주소, 온라인 식별자, 소셜 미디어 계정 및 기타 식별자와 같은 식별자.
예
C.
인종, 민족, 종교적 또는 철학적 신념, 노동조합 가입 여부, 건강 데이터, 생체 정보, 유전 정보, 장애, 퇴역 여부, 성적 지향, 개인 우편, 이메일 및 문자 메시지(Honeywell이 의도한 수신자가 아닌 경우), 정부 식별자(예: 사회보장번호), 운전면허증, 여권, 금융 및 은행 정보 등 캘리포니아 또는 연방법에 따라 보호되는 분류의 특성.
예
F.
인터넷 또는 기타 전자 네트워크 활동 정보(예: 검색 기록, 하니웰 웹사이트와의 상호 작용, 이메일 및 문자 메시지 서비스).
예
G.
기기 위치 및 IP 위치와 같은 지리적 위치 데이터..
예
H.
전화 또는 화상 인터뷰에 참여하거나 당사 사무실을 방문한 경우 귀하의 음성 및 이미지, 비디오 또는 오디오 녹음과 같은 오디오, 전자, 시각, 열 또는 이와 유사한 정보.
예
I.
직업, 현재 또는 이전 고용주, 직위, 학력, 학력 및 전문 자격, 이력서, 경력, 채용 추천인, 면접 메모 및 평가, 언어, 전문 회원 자격, 자격증, 성과 관리 등급, 보수, 선호 지역 및 여행 선호도 등 직업 또는 고용 관련 정보.
예
K.
위에 나열된 개인 정보로부터 도출된 추론으로 개인의 선호도 및 특성 등에 대한 프로필 또는 요약을 생성합니다.
예
Load More
(ii)     귀하의 권리
귀하는 요청 전 12개월 기간에 대해 다음과 같은 권리를 당사에 요청할 권리가 있습니다. 이러한 권리는 절대적인 것이 아니며 특정 경우에는 관련 법률에 명시된 대로 제한될 수 있다는 점에 유의하시기 바랍니다:
당사가 귀하에 대해 수집한 개인정보, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집한 출처의 범주, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 수집한 비즈니스 또는 상업적 목적, 당사가 귀하의 개인정보를 공개하는 제3자의 범주에 대해 알 권리입니다;
개인 정보를 삭제할 권리;
귀하에 대한 부정확한 개인 정보를 수정할 권리;
개인 정보의 판매 또는 공유를 거부할 권리;
민감한 개인 정보의 처리를 제한할 권리;
관련 법률에 따라 권리를 행사하는 데 있어 불법적인 차별을 받지 않을 권리.
당사는 관련 법률에 따라 귀하에게 적용되는 권리 행사를 용이하게 할 것이며, 요청 대상인 개인정보의 유형과 민감성을 고려하여 귀하의 보호를 위해 귀하의 신원 확인을 요청하고 귀하에게 추가 정보를 요청할 필요가 있을 수 있습니다.
귀하의 개인 정보와 관련된 권리를 행사하려면
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
에 있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해 당사에 문의하거나
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
으로 이메일을 보내주십시오. 이미 하니웰 직원인 경우
HRhelp@honeywell.com
으로 문의할 수 있습니다.
문의하기
개인정보 처리 방식에 대한 질문이나 불만 사항이 있거나 권리를 행사하려면 다음 연락처로 문의하시기 바랍니다:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(이미 하니웰 직원인 경우에만 해당) 또는 당사의 데이터 보호 책임자(
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
)에게 문의하십시오.
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
에있는 데이터 주체 요청 양식을 통해서도 당사에 문의할 수 있습니다.
Norwegian
Oppdatert: 1. januar 2023
Denne personvernerklæringen for søkere ("personvernerklæringen") beskriver hvordan Honeywell International, Inc. og dets
tilknyttede selskaper
(samlet kalt "
Honeywell
", "
oss"
eller "
vi
") behandler personopplysningene dine når du blir medlem av Talent Community, søker eller søker på en jobb og sender inn personopplysninger til oss via vår portal, våre nettsteder eller andre rekrutteringsmedier, enten online eller offline ("
tjenestene
"). Vi er behandlingsansvarlige for personopplysningene dine i henhold til gjeldende personvernlovgivning.
Vær oppmerksom på at hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, kan du også lese Honeywells globale retningslinjer for personvern og personvernerklæringen for ansatte der det finnes en slik for din jurisdiksjon. Formålet med denne personvernerklæringen er å gi deg mer detaljert informasjon om hvordan vi behandler personopplysningene dine i forbindelse med søknaden din.
Personopplysninger vi samler inn
For å kunne behandle søknaden din ber vi deg om å oppgi personopplysninger om deg selv, for eksempel når du søker på en bestemt ledig stilling via nettstedet/portalen vår eller, hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, i løpet av ditt ansettelsesforhold. All informasjon gis på frivillig basis, og du bestemmer selv hvor mye informasjon du gir til Honeywell.
Vær oppmerksom på at enkelte opplysninger kan være nødvendige for å kunne vurdere søknaden din, og hvis du ikke oppgir disse, kan det begrense vår mulighet til å vurdere deg som kandidat.
(i)   Personlig informasjon
Vi kan samle inn følgende personopplysninger om deg:
Personopplysninger og kontaktinformasjon, inkludert e-postadresse, telefonnummer og bilde;
Yrkes- og utdanningsinformasjon knyttet til yrket ditt, for eksempel nåværende eller tidligere arbeidsgivere, stillingstittel eller annen informasjon om organisasjonen du er tilknyttet. Du kan også oppgi CV og informasjon om kvalifikasjonene eller utdanningen din, for eksempel grader, studieretninger, hvilke institusjoner du har gått på, språk, faglige medlemskap, sertifiseringer, informasjon om prestasjonsvurderinger og kompensasjon;
Karrierepreferanser (f.eks. kortsiktige og langsiktige mål, vilje til å flytte, dato for flytting og stedspreferanser);
Personopplysninger som stammer fra din deltakelse i rekrutteringsprosessen vår, som for eksempel de som innhentes under intervjuer, e-postene vi utveksler med deg angående søknaden din eller samtalene vi har med deg gjennom vår online Chatbot.
Lyd- og bildeinformasjon, for eksempel din stemme og ditt bilde som er tatt opp på fotografier, video- eller lydopptak hvis du deltar i et telefon- eller videointervju, eller hvis du besøker våre kontorer;
Eventuelle andre personopplysninger som du frivillig velger å gi oss.
(ii)  Sensitive personopplysninger
Vi kan også samle inn spesielle kategorier av personopplysninger om deg (også kjent som "spesielle kategorier av personopplysninger") der vi har en juridisk forpliktelse til å gjøre det, eller der det er nødvendig av hensyn til informasjon som er relevant for ditt fremtidige arbeidsmiljø hos Honeywell, eller for fremtidig levering av ansettelsesfordeler, eller med ditt uttrykkelige samtykke, for eksempel:
Offentlig utstedt identifikasjonsnummer (f.eks. personnummer);
Demografisk informasjon, som kan omfatte informasjon om beskyttede klassifikasjoner, som alder, kjønn, rase, funksjonshemming, seksuell legning, sivilstatus eller veteranstatus;
Helseopplysninger (for eksempel for å imøtekomme eventuelle funksjonshemminger eller kostholdsrestriksjoner);
Opplysninger om en persons politiske meninger, religiøse overbevisning eller fagforeningsmedlemskap;
Informasjon om en persons straffbare handlinger eller domfellelser, samt annen informasjon som anses som sensitiv i henhold til gjeldende personvernlovgivning. Der loven tillater det og i den utstrekning det er relevant, kan Honeywell også ha behov for å utføre bakgrunns- og/eller kriminalsjekker for å avgjøre om du er egnet for en ledig stilling eller mulighet hos Honeywell.
Vi krever ikke at du oppgir sensitive personopplysninger med mindre det er nødvendig for å oppfylle våre lovpålagte forpliktelser (f.eks. for å overvåke likestilling), eller med mindre du har gitt ditt uttrykkelige samtykke. Med unntak av i den grad loven krever det, er det helt frivillig å oppgi disse opplysningene. Honeywell er opptatt av en inkluderende og mangfoldig arbeidsstyrke. Ved å gi oss opplysninger om likestilling gir du oss mulighet til å få en bedre forståelse av medarbeiderprofilen vår når det gjelder likestillingsdata og de tiltakene vi må iverksette for å tiltrekke oss, fremme og beholde en mangfoldig arbeidsstyrke uavhengig av alder, funksjonshemming, kjønn, rase, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning og seksuell legning.
(iii) Personopplysninger vi samler inn automatisk fra deg
Vi kan automatisk samle inn visse opplysninger fra deg om besøket ditt på nettsidene våre ved hjelp av informasjonskapsler og andre lignende sporingsteknologier. Hvis du vil ha mer informasjon om informasjonskapslene vi bruker på nettstedet der du sender inn søknaden din, kan du lese
informasjonskapselerklæringen
vår.
Kilder til personopplysninger
Vi kan samle inn personopplysningene dine direkte fra deg eller indirekte fra tredjeparter som har lovlig rett til å dele opplysningene dine med oss, for eksempel:
Bemanningsbyråer, leverandører av tjenester for bakgrunnssjekk/ansettelsessjekk eller identitetsverifisering;
Rekrutteringsbyråer (for eksempel når et rekrutteringsbyrå identifiserer deg som en potensiell kandidat);
Offentlig tilgjengelig informasjon om deg fra nettsteder som LinkedIn eller din nåværende arbeidsgivers nettsted. Du kan også velge å gi oss tilgang til visse personopplysninger som er lagret av tredjeparter (for eksempel LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Ved å gi Honeywell tilgang til denne informasjonen, samtykker du i at vi kan samle inn, lagre og bruke denne informasjonen i samsvar med denne personvernerklæringen;
Gjennom referanse eller muntlig (for eksempel gjennom en henvisning fra en nåværende eller tidligere ansatt). Ved henvisninger er personen som henviser deg, ansvarlig for å innhente ditt samtykke til å gi oss personopplysningene dine.
Formålene som personopplysningene brukes til
Vi bruker personopplysningene dine til følgende formål:
For å evaluere søknaden din og ta avgjørelser om ansettelse;
Kommunisere med deg og informere deg om rekrutteringen og/eller søknaden(e) din(e) eller annen nødvendig kommunikasjon;
Overholde gjeldende juridiske og regulatoriske krav og for at vi skal kunne etablere, utøve eller forsvare et juridisk krav;
Ansettelse og bedriftsledelse (for eksempel opprette en grunnleggende ansettelsesprotokoll hvis du blir ansatt);
Utføre aggregerte rapporter/analyser av data om kandidaters aktivitet (f.eks. trafikk på karrieresider, kandidattrakt, ansettelseskilder, vellykkede rekrutteringskampanjer);
Kun for Honeywell-ansatte
:
For automatisk å utelukke deg fra å bli foreslått proaktivt for rekrutterere for en jobbmulighet, og du er ikke kvalifisert for vurdering i henhold til din nåværende HPD 9-blokk rating (som aldri vil bli avslørt for noen utenfor Honeywell). Du vil imidlertid alltid kunne søke direkte på ledige stillinger, og din spesifikke situasjon vil bli vurdert av en rekrutterer.
Bare hvis du er bosatt i USA
:
Bare hvis du er bosatt i USA:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikasjon i forbindelse med din søknad til en bestemt ledig stilling; og/eller
(ii)    med forbehold om ditt uttrykkelige samtykke
,
SMS-kampanjekommunikasjon om ansettelsesmuligheter, jobbsaker og oppdateringer av søknader.
Du kan velge bort og/eller tilbakekalle ditt samtykke til å motta ovennevnte kommunikasjon ved å følge instruksjonene i profilen din.
Hvis du blir tilbudt og takker ja til ansettelse hos Honeywell, vil opplysningene som samles inn i løpet av søknads- og rekrutteringsprosessen, bli en del av ansettelsespapirene dine.
Automatisert behandling og profilering
Med forbehold om ditt uttrykkelige samtykke (som du frivillig gir når du melder deg inn i Talent Community eller krysser av i den aktuelle samtykkeboksen i løpet av søknadsprosessen), utfører vi "profilering" for å vurdere din egnethet for bestemte jobbmuligheter. Dette innebærer bruk av en matchingsalgoritme som er i stand til å evaluere ansettelsesprofilen din og forutsi om du er kvalifisert for en bestemt jobbmulighet. Vi utfører denne automatiserte behandlingen for følgende formål:
hjelpe rekrutteringsansvarlige med å matche kandidatprofiler med jobbmuligheter ved å foreslå kandidater som kan komme i betraktning for en bestemt jobbmulighet, og
sende personlige jobbanbefalinger til deg basert på profilen og/eller preferansene dine eller annen informasjon som kan være av interesse for deg, for eksempel Honeywell-nyheter, webinarer og arrangementer.
Vær oppmerksom på at basert på denne profileringen kan det hende at du ikke kommer i betraktning til visse stillinger med mindre du har søkt på dem direkte.
Vi tar ikke ansettelsesbeslutninger utelukkende basert på automatiserte beslutningsprosesser og/eller profilering. Personopplysningene dine vil bli gjenstand for menneskeskapte beslutninger, ettersom den endelige ansettelsesbeslutningen vil bli tatt av rekrutterere eller ansettelsesansvarlig.
Rettslig grunnlag for behandling av personopplysningene dine
Enkelte jurisdiksjoner krever at Honeywell har et rettslig grunnlag for å behandle personopplysningene dine. Der gjeldende lov krever at vi begrunner behandlingsaktivitetene våre, vil vårt rettslige grunnlag for å samle inn og bruke personopplysningene dine som beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen, avhenge av de aktuelle personopplysningene og den spesifikke konteksten vi samler dem inn i.
Samtykke.
Generelt vil vi normalt samle inn personopplysninger fra deg når vi har ditt samtykke til å gjøre det, og når vi trenger personopplysningene dine for å behandle søknaden din. Ved å gå inn på nettstedet/portalen vår, bli medlem av Talent Community eller søke på en av våre stillinger, gir du Honeywell ditt samtykke til å samle inn og behandle personopplysningene beskrevet ovenfor for de formålene som er beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen. Du kan når som helst
trekke tilbake ditt samtykke
ved å sende inn en forespørsel via vår portal for forespørsler fra registrerte på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende oss en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Berettigede interesser.
Honeywells legitime interesser, nemlig rekruttering, utvelgelse, evaluering og utnevnelse av nye ansatte og ledelse og administrasjon av rekrutterings- og HR-prosessen i den grad våre legitime interesser ikke overstyres av dine grunnleggende rettigheter og friheter.
Juridiske forpliktelser
. Overholdelse av Honeywells juridiske forpliktelser der arbeidsrett eller andre lover krever behandling av personopplysningene dine (for eksempel i den grad loven krever overvåking av like muligheter og mangfold).
Vitale interesser.
Vi kan også trenge personopplysningene dine for å beskytte dine vitale interesser (for eksempel av helse- og sikkerhetsgrunner hvis du deltar på et intervju hos oss).
Hvis du har spørsmål om eller trenger mer informasjon om det rettslige grunnlaget for innsamling og bruk av personopplysningene dine, kan du sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Hvem vi deler personopplysningene dine med
Honeywell vil bare dele personopplysningene dine med tredjeparter under følgende omstendigheter:
Enheter i Honeywell-konsernet
. Vi kan dele personopplysningene dine med andre enheter i Honeywell-konsernet i jurisdiksjoner rundt om i verden for å evaluere profilen din og vurdere eventuelle rekrutteringsmuligheter på konsernnivå.
Tjenesteleverandører
Vi kan spesifikt dele personopplysningene dine med tredjeparts tjenesteleverandører som utfører spesifikke tjenester på våre vegne (for eksempel leverandører av rekrutterings- og outsourcingstjenester og analyseleverandører). Slike tredjeparter kan variere avhengig av hvilket land du bor i, og vil endres fra tid til annen, men kan omfatte Phenom People, Inc. og Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. og deres respektive tredjepartsleverandører.
Ansatte i Honeywell.
Hvis du allerede er Honeywell-ansatt, må du være oppmerksom på at enkelte deler av profilen din er offentlige og dermed synlige for alle Honeywell-ansatte  (spesielt navn, tittel, bilde, ferdigheter, interesseområder, arbeidserfaring og utdanning). Disse delene kan imidlertid redigeres, og du kan velge hvilken informasjon om deg som skal vises i profilen din. Vær oppmerksom på at karrieremålene, flyttingene og profilstatus "åpen for nye muligheter" vil ikke være offentlige og derfor ikke synlige for alle Honeywell-ansatte (kun for Honeywells Talent Team).
Andre tredjeparter.
Honeywell kan dele personopplysningene dine med kompetente politimyndigheter, tilsynsmyndigheter, offentlige etater, domstoler eller tredjeparter der vi mener at utlevering er nødvendig i henhold til gjeldende lov eller i god tro om at en slik handling er nødvendig for å utøve, etablere eller forsvare våre juridiske rettigheter eller for å beskytte dine eller en annen persons vitale interesser. Vi kan også komme til å dele personopplysningene dine med andre med ditt samtykke eller etter din anvisning (f.eks. en dommer eller yrkesorganisasjon).
Internasjonal overføring av personopplysninger
Honeywell er en global organisasjon, og personopplysningene dine kan bli overført til, oppbevart, lagret eller brukt på ulike steder i verden, for eksempel i USA og India. Dette betyr at når vi samler inn personopplysningene dine, kan de bli behandlet i land som kan ha en annen personvernlovgivning enn den som gjelder i ditt land. Honeywell vil imidlertid alltid treffe rimelige tiltak for å beskytte personvernet ditt og sørge for et beskyttelsesnivå for personopplysninger som er sammenlignbart med det som gjelder i landet du bor i. Dette inkluderer implementering av
EU-kommisjonens standardkontraktsklausuler
, som du finner på kommisjonens nettsted på
https://ec.europa.eu.
Oppbevaring
Vi vil oppbevare personopplysningene dine så lenge det er nødvendig i forbindelse med formålene som er beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen og i samsvar med Honeywells arkivoppbevaringsplan eller i henhold til gjeldende lovgivning.
Dine rettigheter
Avhengig av gjeldende lovgivning kan du ha visse rettigheter med hensyn til personopplysningene dine. Hvis du er bosatt i California, se "
Tilleggsinformasjon for innbyggere i California
" nedenfor..
Du kan ha rett til å få
tilgang til, korrigere, oppdatere
eller be om
sletting
av personopplysningene dine;
Du kan
protestere
mot behandlingen av personopplysningene dine, be oss om å
begrense
behandling av personopplysningene dine eller be om
portabilitet
av personopplysningene dine;
Du kan ha rett til å motsette deg at det tas en avgjørelse om deg som utelukkende er basert på automatisert behandling, herunder profilering, hvis avgjørelsen har rettsvirkninger for deg eller påvirker deg i betydelig grad.
Honeywell tar ikke, som en del av rekrutteringsprosessen, utelukkende automatiserte avgjørelser om kandidater.
Hvis vi har samlet inn og behandlet personopplysningene dine med ditt samtykke, kan du når som helst trekke tilbake samtykket. Hvis du trekker tilbake samtykket ditt, vil det ikke påvirke lovligheten av behandlingen vi har utført før du trakk det tilbake, og det vil heller ikke påvirke behandlingen av personopplysningene dine som er utført på grunnlag av andre lovlige behandlingsgrunnlag enn samtykke.
Du har rett til å klage til en personvernmyndighet på vår innsamling og bruk av dine personopplysninger.
Vi vil legge til rette for at du kan utøve de rettighetene som gjelder for deg i samsvar med gjeldende lovgivning. Hvis du vil utøve noen av rettighetene dine i forbindelse med personopplysningene dine, kan du kontakte oss via HR Help eller skjemaet for forespørsler fra registrerte på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Ytterligere informasjon for innbyggere i California
Hvis du er bosatt i delstaten California, supplerer dette avsnittet Honeywells personvernerklæring for søkere.
(i)      Kategorier av personopplysninger som samles inn og utleveres
Honeywell har samlet inn og utlevert følgende kategorier av personopplysninger for våre forretningsformål i løpet av de siste tolv månedene:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi samler inn
A.
Identifikatorer som navn, fødselsdato, kjønn, e-postadresse, telefonnummer, postadresse, nettbaserte identifikatorer, kontoer på sosiale medier og andre identifikatorer.
Ja
C.
Kjennetegn ved beskyttede klassifikasjoner i henhold til californisk eller føderal lovgivning, for eksempel rase, etnisitet, religiøs eller filosofisk overbevisning, fagforeningsmedlemskap, helseopplysninger, biometriske opplysninger, genetiske opplysninger, funksjonshemming, veteranstatus, seksuell legning, personlig post, e-post og tekstmeldinger (med mindre Honeywell er den tiltenkte mottakeren), offentlige identifikatorer (f.eks. personnummer), førerkort, pass, finans- og bankopplysninger.
Ja
F.
Informasjon om Internett eller annen elektronisk nettverksaktivitet, for eksempel nettleserhistorikk, interaksjon med Honeywells nettsteder, e-post og tekstmeldingstjenester.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, for eksempel enhetens plassering og IP-posisjon.
Ja
H.
Lyd, elektronisk, visuell, termisk eller lignende informasjon, for eksempel stemme og bilde, video- eller lydopptak hvis du deltar i et telefon- eller videointervju eller hvis du besøker våre kontorer.
Ja
I.
Yrkes- eller ansettelsesrelaterte opplysninger som yrke, nåværende eller tidligere arbeidsgivere, stillingstittel, utdanningshistorikk, akademiske og faglige kvalifikasjoner, CV, jobbhistorikk, ansettelsesreferanser, intervjunotater og -vurderinger, språk, faglige medlemskap, sertifiseringer, prestasjonsvurderinger, kompensasjon, stedspreferanser og reisepreferanser.
Ja
K.
Slutninger som trekkes fra en hvilken som helst av personopplysningene som er oppført ovenfor, for å lage en profil eller et sammendrag om for eksempel en persons preferanser og egenskaper..
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dine rettigheter
Du har rett til å sende oss en forespørsel om følgende rettigheter for den tolvmånedersperioden som går forut for forespørselen din. Vær oppmerksom på at disse rettighetene ikke er absolutte, og at de i visse tilfeller er underlagt begrensninger i henhold til gjeldende lovgivning:
Retten til å få vite hvilke personopplysninger vi har samlet inn om deg, hvilke kategorier av kilder vi har samlet inn personopplysningene dine fra, hvilke forretningsmessige eller kommersielle formål vi har samlet inn personopplysningene dine for, og hvilke kategorier av tredjeparter vi utleverer personopplysningene dine til;
Retten til å slette personopplysningene dine;
Retten til å korrigere unøyaktige personopplysninger om deg;
Retten til å reservere deg mot salg eller deling av personopplysningene dine;
Retten til å begrense behandlingen av sensitive personopplysninger;
Retten til ikke å bli utsatt for ulovlig diskriminering når du utøver dine rettigheter i henhold til gjeldende lover.
Vi vil legge til rette for at du kan utøve de rettighetene som gjelder for deg i samsvar med gjeldende lov, og med tanke på typen og sensitiviteten til personopplysningene som er gjenstand for forespørselen, kan vi for å beskytte deg måtte be om å bekrefte identiteten din og be om ytterligere informasjon fra deg.
Hvis du vil utøve noen av rettighetene dine knyttet til personopplysningene dine, kan du kontakte oss via skjemaet for forespørsler om personopplysninger på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller sende en e-post til
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell, kan du kontakte oss på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt oss
Hvis du har spørsmål eller klager på hvordan personopplysningene dine behandles, eller hvis du ønsker å utøve dine rettigheter, kan du kontakte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(bare hvis du allerede er ansatt hos Honeywell) eller vårt personvernombud på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan også kontakte oss via forespørselsskjemaet som du finner på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Polish
Aktualizacja: 1 stycznia 2023 r.
Niniejsza Informacja o ochronie prywatności kandydatów ("Informacja o ochronie prywatności") opisuje, w jaki sposób Honeywell International, Inc. i jej
podmioty stowarzyszone
(łącznie "
Honeywell
", "
my
" lub "
nas
") przetwarzają dane osobowe użytkowników, którzy dołączają do naszej Społeczności talentów, wyszukują lub ubiegają się o pracę oraz przesyłają nam dane osobowe za pośrednictwem naszego portalu, stron internetowych lub innych mediów rekrutacyjnych, zarówno online, jak i offline ("
Usługi
"). Jesteśmy administratorami danych osobowych użytkownika dla celów obowiązujących przepisów o ochronie danych.
Pamiętaj, że jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell, możesz również zapoznać się z Globalną Polityką Prywatności Danych Honeywell i Informacją o Prywatności Pracowników, jeśli taka istnieje w Twojej jurysdykcji. Celem niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności jest przekazanie użytkownikowi bardziej szczegółowych informacji na temat przetwarzania przez nas jego danych osobowych w związku z jego aplikacją.
Gromadzone przez nas dane osobowe
W celu rozpatrzenia podania o pracę prosimy o podanie swoich danych osobowych, na przykład podczas ubiegania się o określone stanowisko pracy za pośrednictwem naszej strony internetowej/portalu lub, w przypadku gdy użytkownik jest już pracownikiem Honeywell, w trakcie trwania stosunku pracy. Wszystkie informacje są przekazywane dobrowolnie, a użytkownik określa zakres informacji, które przekazuje Honeywell.
Należy pamiętać, że niektóre informacje mogą być niezbędne do ukończenia oceny aplikacji, a jeśli nie zostaną dostarczone, nasza zdolność do rozważenia kandydata może być ograniczona.
(i)   Dane osobowe
Możemy gromadzić następujące dane osobowe użytkownika:
Dane osobowe i informacje kontaktowe, w tym adres e-mail, numer(y) telefonu i zdjęcie;
Informacje zawodowe i edukacyjne związane z wykonywanym zawodem, takie jak obecni lub poprzedni pracodawcy, stanowisko lub inne informacje o organizacji, z którą jesteś powiązany. Możesz również podać swoje CV/życiorys oraz informacje o swoich kwalifikacjach lub wykształceniu, takie jak stopnie naukowe, kierunki studiów, instytucje, do których uczęszczałeś, języki, członkostwo zawodowe, certyfikaty, szczegóły dotyczące ocen zarządzania wynikami i wynagrodzenia;
Preferencje dotyczące kariery zawodowej (np. cele krótko- i długoterminowe, gotowość do zmiany miejsca zamieszkania, dostępny termin zmiany miejsca zamieszkania i preferencje dotyczące lokalizacji);
Dane osobowe pochodzące z udziału użytkownika w naszym procesie rekrutacji, takie jak na przykład dane uzyskane podczas rozmów kwalifikacyjnych, wiadomości e-mail, które wymieniamy z użytkownikiem w związku z jego aplikacją lub rozmowy, które prowadzimy z użytkownikiem za pośrednictwem naszego internetowego Chatbota.
Informacje dźwiękowe i wizualne, takie jak głos i wizerunek użytkownika utrwalone na zdjęciach, nagraniach wideo lub audio w przypadku udziału w rozmowie telefonicznej lub wideo albo wizyty w naszych biurach;
Wszelkie inne dane osobowe, które użytkownik dobrowolnie zdecyduje się nam przekazać.
(ii)  Wrażliwe dane osobowe
Możemy również gromadzić specjalne kategorie danych osobowych użytkownika (znane również jako "specjalne kategorie danych osobowych"), gdy mamy do tego prawny obowiązek lub gdy informacje są istotne dla przyszłego środowiska pracy w Honeywell lub dla przyszłego zapewnienia świadczeń pracowniczych, lub za wyraźną zgodą użytkownika, np:
Numer identyfikacyjny wydany przez rząd (np. numer ubezpieczenia społecznego);
Informacje demograficzne, które mogą obejmować informacje o chronionych klasyfikacjach, takich jak wiek, płeć, rasa, niepełnosprawność, orientacja seksualna, stan cywilny lub status weterana;
Informacje o stanie zdrowia (na przykład w celu dostosowania do niepełnosprawności lub ograniczeń dietetycznych);
Informacje dotyczące poglądów politycznych, przekonań religijnych lub przynależności do związków zawodowych;
Informacje o przestępstwach lub wyrokach skazujących danej osoby, a także wszelkie inne informacje uznane za wrażliwe zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami o ochronie danych. Tam, gdzie jest to dozwolone przez prawo i w zakresie, w jakim ma to zastosowanie, Honeywell może również być zmuszony do przeprowadzenia prześwietlenia i/lub kontroli karnej w celu ustalenia, czy dana osoba nadaje się na wolne stanowisko lub do pracy w Honeywell.
Nie wymagamy od użytkownika podawania nam wrażliwych danych osobowych, chyba że jest to konieczne do celów wypełniania naszych obowiązków regulacyjnych (np. w celu monitorowania równości szans) lub jeśli użytkownik nie wyraził na to wyraźnej zgody. Z wyjątkiem zakresu wymaganego przez prawo, podanie tych informacji będzie całkowicie dobrowolne. Honeywell dąży do zapewnienia prawdziwie inkluzywnej i zróżnicowanej siły roboczej. Przekazując nam swoje dane dotyczące równych szans, umożliwiasz nam lepsze zrozumienie profilu naszych pracowników pod względem danych dotyczących równych szans oraz działań, które musimy podjąć w celu przyciągnięcia, promowania i utrzymania zróżnicowanej siły roboczej bez względu na wiek, niepełnosprawność, płeć, rasę, przekonania religijne lub filozoficzne oraz orientację seksualną.
(iii) Dane osobowe zbierane automatycznie od użytkownika
Możemy automatycznie zbierać od użytkownika pewne informacje na temat jego wizyty na naszych stronach internetowych za pomocą plików "cookie" i innych podobnych technologii śledzenia. Więcej informacji na temat plików cookie używanych na stronie internetowej, za pośrednictwem której użytkownik składa wniosek, można znaleźć w naszej
Informacji o plikach cookie
.
Źródła danych osobowych
Możemy gromadzić dane osobowe użytkownika bezpośrednio od niego lub pośrednio od stron trzecich, które zgodnie z prawem są uprawnione do udostępniania nam danych użytkownika, takich jak:
Agencje zatrudnienia, dostawcy usług sprawdzania przeszłości/ zatrudnienia lub weryfikacji tożsamości;
Agencje rekrutacyjne (na przykład, gdy agencja rekrutacyjna zidentyfikuje użytkownika jako potencjalnego kandydata);
Publicznie dostępne informacje o użytkowniku z witryn takich jak LinkedIn lub strona internetowa aktualnego pracodawcy. Użytkownik może również zdecydować się na zapewnienie nam dostępu do niektórych danych osobowych przechowywanych przez osoby trzecie (na przykład LinkedIn, Twitter, Google lub Facebook). Upoważniając Honeywell do dostępu do tych informacji, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na gromadzenie, przechowywanie i wykorzystywanie tych informacji zgodnie z niniejszą Informacją o ochronie prywatności;
Przez referencje lub ustnie (na przykład przez polecenie od obecnego lub byłego pracownika). W przypadku poleceń osoba polecająca będzie odpowiedzialna za uzyskanie zgody użytkownika na przekazanie nam jego danych osobowych.
Cele, dla których wykorzystywane są dane osobowe
Wykorzystujemy dane osobowe użytkownika do następujących celów:
Ocena aplikacji i podejmowanie decyzji o zatrudnieniu;
Komunikowanie się z użytkownikiem i informowanie go o rekrutacji i/lub zgłoszeniach lub innych wymaganych komunikatach;
Przestrzegania obowiązujących wymogów prawnych i regulacyjnych oraz w celu ustalenia, wykonania lub obrony roszczeń prawnych;
Zatrudnienie i zarządzanie firmą (na przykład ustanowienie podstawowego rejestru zatrudnienia w przypadku zatrudnienia);
Przeprowadzanie zagregowanych raportów / analiz dotyczących danych o aktywności kandydatów (np. ruch na stronie kariery, lejek kandydata, źródło zatrudnienia, sukces kampanii rekrutacyjnej);
Tylko dla pracowników Honeywell
:
Aby automatycznie wykluczyć Cię z proaktywnego sugerowania rekruterom możliwości zatrudnienia i nie kwalifikujesz się do rozważenia na podstawie Twojej aktualnej oceny HPD 9-block (która nigdy nie zostanie ujawniona nikomu spoza Honeywell). Zawsze jednak będziesz mógł bezpośrednio ubiegać się o każdą dostępną ofertę pracy, a Twoja konkretna sytuacja zostanie rozpatrzona przez rekrutera.
Tylko w przypadku, gdy użytkownik jest mieszkańcem Stanów Zjednoczonych
:
W celu wysyłania użytkownikowi wiadomości SMS, w szczególności:
(i)     1-1 wiadomości SMS w związku z aplikacją użytkownika na określone stanowisko pracy; i/lub
(ii)    pod warunkiem uzyskania wyraźnej zgody użytkownika
,
komunikaty w ramach kampanii SMS dotyczące możliwości zatrudnienia, spraw związanych z pracą i aktualizacji aplikacji.
Użytkownik będzie mógł zrezygnować i/lub odwołać swoją zgodę na otrzymywanie wyżej wymienionych wiadomości zgodnie z instrukcjami podanymi w jego profilu.
W przypadku zaoferowania i zaakceptowania zatrudnienia w Honeywell, informacje zebrane podczas procesu aplikacji i rekrutacji staną się częścią dokumentacji zatrudnienia.
Zautomatyzowane przetwarzanie i profilowanie
Z zastrzeżeniem wyraźnej zgody użytkownika (której udziela on dobrowolnie, dołączając do naszej Społeczności Talentów lub zaznaczając odpowiednie pole zgody podczas procesu aplikacyjnego), prowadzimy "profilowanie" w celu oceny przydatności użytkownika do konkretnych ofert pracy. Wiąże się to z wykorzystaniem algorytmu dopasowującego, który jest w stanie ocenić profil zatrudnienia użytkownika i przewidzieć, czy kwalifikuje się on do danej oferty pracy. Przeprowadzamy to zautomatyzowane przetwarzanie w celu:
pomaganie rekruterom w dopasowywaniu profili kandydatów do ofert pracy poprzez sugerowanie kandydatów do rozważenia na konkretne stanowisko; oraz
przesyłanie użytkownikowi spersonalizowanych rekomendacji dotyczących pracy w oparciu o jego profil i/lub preferencje lub innych informacji, które mogą być dla niego interesujące, takich jak wiadomości, webinaria i wydarzenia Honeywell.
Należy pamiętać, że w oparciu o to profilowanie, kandydat może nie być brany pod uwagę w przypadku niektórych ofert pracy, chyba że aplikował na nie bezpośrednio.
Nie podejmujemy decyzji o zatrudnieniu wyłącznie w oparciu o zautomatyzowane procesy decyzyjne i/lub profilowanie. Twoje dane osobowe będą przedmiotem decyzji podejmowanych przez człowieka, ponieważ ostateczna decyzja o zatrudnieniu zostanie podjęta przez rekruterów lub menedżerów ds. rekrutacji.
Podstawy prawne przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika
Niektóre jurysdykcje wymagają od Honeywell posiadania podstawy prawnej do przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika. Tam, gdzie obowiązujące prawo wymaga od nas uzasadnienia naszych działań związanych z przetwarzaniem, nasza podstawa prawna do gromadzenia i wykorzystywania danych osobowych użytkownika w sposób opisany w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności będzie zależeć od danych osobowych i konkretnego kontekstu, w którym je gromadzimy.
Zgoda.
Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, Honeywell będzie gromadzić dane osobowe użytkowników w przypadku, gdy uzyska na to ich zgodę i gdy będzie potrzebować ich danych osobowych w celu rozpatrzenia podania o pracę. Uzyskując dostęp do naszej strony internetowej/portalu, dołączając do naszej społeczności talentów lub ubiegając się o jedno z naszych stanowisk pracy, użytkownik wyraża zgodę na gromadzenie i dalsze przetwarzanie przez Honeywell danych osobowych opisanych powyżej w celach opisanych w niniejszej Informacji o ochronie prywatności. Użytkownik może
wycofać swoją zgodę w
dowolnym momencie, przesyłając wniosek za pośrednictwem naszego portalu wniosków dotyczących osób, których dane dotyczą, pod adresem
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysyłając nam wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Uzasadnione interesy.
W uzasadnionych interesach Honeywell, a mianowicie w rekrutacji, selekcji, ocenie i mianowaniu nowych pracowników oraz zarządzaniu i administrowaniu rekrutacją i procesem HR, w zakresie, w jakim nasze uzasadnione interesy nie są nadrzędne wobec podstawowych praw i wolności użytkownika.
Zobowiązania prawne
Zgodność ze zobowiązaniami prawnymi Honeywell, w przypadku gdy prawo pracy lub inne przepisy wymagają przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika (na przykład w zakresie, w jakim prawo wymaga monitorowania równości szans i różnorodności).
Istotne interesy
Możemy również potrzebować danych osobowych użytkownika w celu ochrony jego żywotnych interesów (na przykład ze względów zdrowotnych i bezpieczeństwa, jeśli użytkownik uczestniczy w rozmowie kwalifikacyjnej w naszym zakładzie).
W przypadku pytań lub potrzeby uzyskania dodatkowych informacji dotyczących podstawy prawnej gromadzenia i wykorzystywania przez nas danych osobowych użytkowników, prosimy o przesłanie wiadomości e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Komu udostępniamy dane osobowe użytkownika
Honeywell będzie udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika stronom trzecim wyłącznie w następujących okolicznościach:
Podmioty grupy Honeywell
. Możemy udostępniać Twoje dane osobowe innym podmiotom grupy zlokalizowanym w jurysdykcjach na całym świecie w celu oceny Twojego profilu i rozważenia możliwości rekrutacji na poziomie grupy.
Dostawcy usług
Możemy udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika zewnętrznym dostawcom usług, którzy świadczą określone usługi w naszym imieniu (na przykład dostawcom usług rekrutacyjnych i outsourcingowych oraz dostawcom usług analitycznych).  Takie podmioty zewnętrzne mogą się różnić w zależności od kraju użytkownika i będą się zmieniać od czasu do czasu, ale mogą obejmować Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. i ich odpowiednich dostawców zewnętrznych.
HPracownicy Honeywell.
Jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell, pamiętaj, że niektóre sekcje Twojego profilu są publiczne, a zatem widoczne dla wszystkich pracowników Honeywell (w szczególności imię i nazwisko, tytuł, zdjęcie, umiejętności, obszary zainteresowań, doświadczenie zawodowe i wykształcenie). Takie sekcje można jednak edytować i użytkownik może wybrać, które informacje na jego temat będą wyświetlane w profilu. Należy pamiętać, że cele zawodowe, relokacje i status profilu "otwarty na nowe możliwości" nie będą publiczne, a zatem nie będą widoczne dla wszystkich pracowników Honeywell (tylko dla zespołu ds. talentów Honeywell).
Inne strony trzecie.
Honeywell może udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika dowolnemu właściwemu organowi ścigania, organowi regulacyjnemu, agencji rządowej, sądowi lub stronie trzeciej, jeżeli uważamy, że ujawnienie jest konieczne zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem lub w dobrej wierze, że takie działanie jest niezbędne do wykonania, ustanowienia lub obrony naszych praw lub do ochrony żywotnych interesów użytkownika lub innej osoby. Możemy również udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika innym podmiotom za jego zgodą lub na jego polecenie (np. sędziom lub stowarzyszeniom zawodowym).
Międzynarodowe transfery danych osobowych
Honeywell jest organizacją globalną, a dane osobowe użytkownika mogą być przekazywane, przechowywane, przechowywane lub wykorzystywane w różnych lokalizacjach na całym świecie, takich jak USA i Indie. Oznacza to, że gdy zbieramy dane osobowe użytkownika, mogą one być przetwarzane w krajach, w których przepisy o ochronie danych osobowych mogą różnić się od przepisów obowiązujących w kraju użytkownika. Honeywell będzie jednak zawsze podejmować uzasadnione kroki w celu ochrony prywatności użytkownika i zapewnienia poziomu ochrony danych osobowych porównywalnego z poziomem obowiązującym w kraju zamieszkania użytkownika, co obejmuje wdrożenie
standardowych klauzul umownych Komisji Europejskiej
, które można znaleźć na stronie internetowej Komisji pod adresem
https://ec.europa.eu.
Zatrzymanie
We will retain your personal information for as long as necessary in connection with the purposes described in this Privacy Notice and in accordance with Honeywell's Record Retention Schedule or as required by applicable law.
Prawa użytkownika
DW zależności od obowiązującego prawa użytkownikowi mogą przysługiwać określone prawa w odniesieniu do jego danych osobowych. Jeśli jesteś mieszkańcem Kalifornii, zapoznaj się z "
Dodatkowymi informacjami dla mieszkańców Kalifornii
" poniżej.
Użytkownik może mieć prawo
dostępu do
swoich danych osobowych
, ich poprawiania, aktualizowania
lub żądania ich
usunięcia;
Użytkownik może
sprzeciwić
się przetwarzaniu jego danych osobowych, poprosić nas  o
ograniczenie
przetwarzania danych osobowych użytkownika lub zażądać
przeniesienia
swoich danych osobowych;
Użytkownik może mieć prawo do tego, aby nie podejmowano wobec niego decyzji opartej wyłącznie na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu, w tym profilowaniu, jeżeli decyzja ta wywołuje wobec niego skutki prawne lub ma na niego istotny wpływ.
W ramach procesu rekrutacji Honeywell nie podejmuje wyłącznie zautomatyzowanych decyzji dotyczących kandydatów.
Podobnie, jeśli zebraliśmy i przetwarzamy dane osobowe użytkownika za jego zgodą, może on wycofać swoją zgodę w dowolnym momencie. Wycofanie zgody nie wpłynie na zgodność z prawem przetwarzania, którego dokonaliśmy przed jej wycofaniem, ani na przetwarzanie danych osobowych użytkownika w oparciu o zgodne z prawem podstawy przetwarzania inne niż zgoda; oraz
Użytkownik ma prawo do złożenia skargi do organu ochrony danych w związku z gromadzeniem i wykorzystywaniem przez nas jego danych osobowych.
Ułatwimy użytkownikowi korzystanie z przysługujących mu praw zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem. Aby skorzystać z któregokolwiek ze swoich praw związanych z danymi osobowymi, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem Pomocy HR lub formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się pod adresem
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysłać wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Dodatkowe informacje dla mieszkańców Kalifornii
Jeśli użytkownik jest mieszkańcem stanu Kalifornia, niniejsza sekcja stanowi uzupełnienie Informacji o ochronie prywatności wnioskodawców firmy Honeywell.
(i)      Kategorie gromadzonych i ujawnianych danych osobowych
Honeywell zebrał i ujawnił następujące kategorie danych osobowych do celów biznesowych w ciągu ostatnich dwunastu miesięcy:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorie
Zbieramy
A.
Identyfikatory, takie jak imię i nazwisko, data urodzenia, płeć, adres e-mail, numery telefonów, adres pocztowy, identyfikatory internetowe, konta w mediach społecznościowych i inne identyfikatory.
Tak
C.
Cechy klasyfikacji chronionych na mocy prawa kalifornijskiego lub federalnego, takie jak rasa, pochodzenie etniczne, przekonania religijne lub filozoficzne, przynależność do związków zawodowych, dane zdrowotne, informacje biometryczne, dane genetyczne, niepełnosprawność, status weterana, orientacja seksualna, poczta osobista, wiadomości e-mail i wiadomości tekstowe (chyba że Honeywell jest zamierzonym odbiorcą), identyfikatory rządowe (np. numer ubezpieczenia społecznego), prawo jazdy, paszport, informacje finansowe i bankowe.
Tak
F.
Informacje o aktywności w Internecie lub innych sieciach elektronicznych, takie jak historia przeglądania, interakcje ze stronami internetowymi Honeywell, poczta elektroniczna i usługi przesyłania wiadomości tekstowych.
Tak
G.
Dane geolokalizacyjne, takie jak lokalizacja urządzenia i lokalizacja IP.
Tak
H.
Informacje dźwiękowe, elektroniczne, wizualne, termiczne lub podobne, takie jak głos i wizerunek użytkownika, nagrania wideo lub audio w przypadku udziału w rozmowie telefonicznej lub wideo albo wizyty w naszych biurach.
Tak
I.
Informacje zawodowe lub związane z zatrudnieniem, takie jak zawód, obecny lub poprzedni pracodawca, stanowisko, historia edukacji, kwalifikacje akademickie i zawodowe, życiorys, historia zatrudnienia, referencje dotyczące zatrudnienia, notatki z rozmów kwalifikacyjnych i oceny, języki, członkostwo zawodowe, certyfikaty, oceny zarządzania wydajnością, wynagrodzenie, preferencje dotyczące lokalizacji i preferencje dotyczące podróży.
Tak
K.
Wyciąganie wniosków na podstawie jakichkolwiek danych osobowych wymienionych powyżej w celu stworzenia profilu lub podsumowania na temat, na przykład, preferencji i cech danej osoby.
Tak
Load More
(ii)      Twoje prawa
Użytkownik ma prawo przesłać nam wniosek o przyznanie następujących praw obejmujących okres dwunastu miesięcy poprzedzających złożenie wniosku. Należy pamiętać, że prawa te nie są bezwzględne i w niektórych przypadkach podlegają ograniczeniom określonym w obowiązującym prawie:
Prawo do informacji o tym, jakie dane osobowe zebraliśmy na temat użytkownika, kategorie źródeł, z których zebraliśmy dane osobowe użytkownika, cel biznesowy lub handlowy, dla którego zebraliśmy dane osobowe użytkownika, oraz kategorie stron trzecich, którym ujawniamy dane osobowe użytkownika;
Prawo do usunięcia danych osobowych;
Prawo do poprawienia niedokładnych danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do rezygnacji ze sprzedaży lub udostępniania danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do ograniczenia przetwarzania wrażliwych danych osobowych użytkownika;
Prawo do wolności od bezprawnej dyskryminacji za korzystanie z praw przysługujących na mocy obowiązujących przepisów.
Ułatwimy użytkownikowi korzystanie z przysługujących mu praw zgodnie z obowiązującym prawem, a biorąc pod uwagę rodzaj i wrażliwość danych osobowych będących przedmiotem wniosku, w celu ochrony użytkownika może być konieczne zweryfikowanie jego tożsamości i zażądanie od niego dodatkowych informacji.
Aby skorzystać z któregokolwiek ze swoich praw związanych z danymi osobowymi, należy skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się na stronie
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
lub wysłać wiadomość e-mail na adres
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Jeśli użytkownik jest już pracownikiem Honeywell, może skontaktować się z nami pod adresem
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakt
W przypadku jakichkolwiek pytań lub skarg dotyczących sposobu przetwarzania danych osobowych lub chęci skorzystania z przysługujących praw, prosimy o kontakt:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(tylko jeśli jesteś już pracownikiem Honeywell) lub z naszym inspektorem ochrony danych pod adresem
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Można również skontaktować się z nami za pośrednictwem formularza wniosku dotyczącego osoby, której dane dotyczą, znajdującego się na stronie
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Portuguese
Atualizado: 1 de janeiro de 2023
O presente Aviso de Privacidade do Candidato ("Aviso de Privacidade") descreve a forma como a Honeywell International, Inc. e as suas
filiais
(coletivamente "
Honeywell
", "
nós
" ou "
nosso
") processam as suas informações pessoais quando se junta à nossa Comunidade de Talentos, procura ou se candidata a um emprego e nos envia informações pessoais através do nosso portal, websites ou outros meios de recrutamento, quer online quer offline (os "Serviços"). Somos os responsáveis pelo tratamento das suas informações pessoais para efeitos das leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis.
Tenha em atenção que, se já for funcionário da Honeywell, também pode consultar a Política Global de Privacidade de Dados da Honeywell e o Aviso de Privacidade do Funcionário, caso exista um para a sua jurisdição. O objetivo do presente Aviso de Privacidade é fornecer-lhe informações mais detalhadas sobre o processamento das suas informações pessoais relativamente à sua candidatura.
Informações pessoais que recolhemos
Para processar a sua candidatura, pedimos-lhe que forneça informações pessoais sobre si, por exemplo, quando se candidata a uma determinada vaga de emprego através do nosso website/portal ou, no caso de já ser funcionário da Honeywell, durante a sua relação laboral. Todas as informações são fornecidas numa base voluntária e o utilizador determina a extensão das informações que fornece à Honeywell.
Tenha em conta que algumas informações podem ser necessárias para completar a avaliação da sua candidatura e que, se não forem fornecidas, a nossa capacidade de o considerar como candidato pode ser limitada.
(i)   Informações pessoais
Podemos recolher as seguintes informações pessoais sobre o utilizador:
Dados pessoais e informações de contacto, incluindo endereço de correio eletrónico, número(s) de telefone e fotografia;
Informações profissionais e educativas relacionadas com a sua ocupação, tais como os seus empregadores actuais ou anteriores, o seu cargo ou outras informações sobre a organização a que está associado. Pode também fornecer o seu CV/currículo e informações sobre as suas qualificações ou formação, tais como os seus diplomas, áreas de estudo, instituições que frequentou, línguas, associações profissionais, certificações, pormenores sobre classificações de gestão do desempenho e remuneração;
Preferências de carreira (por exemplo, objectivos a curto e a longo prazo, vontade de mudar de residência, data disponível para mudar de residência e preferências de localização);
Informações pessoais derivadas da sua participação no nosso processo de recrutamento, como, por exemplo, as obtidas durante as entrevistas, os e-mails que trocamos consigo relativamente à sua candidatura ou as conversas que temos consigo através do nosso Chatbot online.
Informações áudio e visuais, tais como a sua voz e imagem captadas em fotografias, gravações de vídeo ou áudio, se participar numa entrevista por telefone ou vídeo, ou se visitar os nossos escritórios;
Quaisquer outras informações pessoais que o utilizador opte voluntariamente por nos fornecer.
(ii)  Informações pessoais sensíveis
Podemos também recolher categorias especiais de informações pessoais sobre o utilizador (também conhecidas como "categorias especiais de informações pessoais") quando tivermos a obrigação legal de o fazer, ou quando as informações são relevantes para o seu futuro ambiente de trabalho na Honeywell, ou para a futura prestação de benefícios laborais, ou com o seu consentimento explícito, tais como:
Government-issued identification number (such as a social security number);
Demographic information, which may include information about protected classifications, such as your age, gender, race, disabilities, sexual orientation, marital status, or veteran status;
Número de identificação emitido pelo governo (como um número de segurança social);
Informações demográficas, que podem incluir informações sobre classificações protegidas, tais como a sua idade, sexo, raça, incapacidades, orientação sexual, estado civil ou estatuto de veterano;
Informações de saúde (por exemplo, para acomodar qualquer deficiência que o utilizador possa ter ou restrições alimentares);
Informações relativas às opiniões políticas ou crenças religiosas ou à filiação sindical de uma pessoa;
Informações sobre as infracções ou condenações criminais de um indivíduo, bem como quaisquer outras informações consideradas sensíveis ao abrigo das leis de proteção de dados aplicáveis. Sempre que permitido por lei e na medida do aplicável, a Honeywell poderá também ter de efetuar verificações de antecedentes e/ou criminais para determinar a sua adequação a um cargo ou oportunidade em aberto na Honeywell.
Não exigimos que o utilizador nos forneça informações pessoais sensíveis, a menos que tal seja necessário para efeitos de cumprimento das nossas obrigações regulamentares (por exemplo, para controlo da igualdade de oportunidades) ou que o utilizador tenha dado o seu consentimento explícito. Exceto na medida em que tal seja exigido por lei, o fornecimento destas informações será totalmente voluntário. A Honeywell está empenhada numa força de trabalho verdadeiramente inclusiva e diversificada. Ao fornecer-nos os seus dados sobre igualdade de oportunidades, permite-nos compreender melhor o perfil dos nossos funcionários em termos de dados sobre igualdade de oportunidades e as medidas que temos de tomar para atrair, promover e manter uma força de trabalho diversificada, independentemente da idade, deficiência, sexo, raça, crenças religiosas ou filosóficas e orientação sexual.
(iii) Informações pessoais que recolhemos automaticamente do utilizador
Podemos recolher automaticamente determinadas informações sobre a sua visita aos nossos sítios Web utilizando "cookies" e outras tecnologias de rastreio semelhantes. Para mais informações sobre os cookies que utilizamos no sítio Web através do qual apresenta a sua candidatura, leia o nosso
Aviso sobre cookies
.
Fontes de informações pessoais
Podemos recolher as suas informações pessoais diretamente junto do utilizador ou indiretamente junto de terceiros que estejam legalmente autorizados a partilhar as suas informações connosco, tais como:
Agências de emprego, prestadores de serviços de verificação de antecedentes/emprego ou de verificação de identidade;
Agências de recrutamento (por exemplo, quando uma agência de recrutamento o identifica como potencial candidato);
Informações publicamente disponíveis sobre si em sítios como o LinkedIn ou o sítio Web do seu atual empregador. O utilizador poderá também optar por nos fornecer acesso a determinadas informações pessoais armazenadas por terceiros (por exemplo, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google ou Facebook). Ao autorizar a Honeywell a ter acesso a estas informações, o utilizador concorda que podemos recolher, armazenar e utilizar estas informações de acordo com o presente Aviso de privacidade;
Por referência ou boca a boca (por exemplo, através de uma referência de um funcionário atual ou antigo). No caso de referências, a pessoa que o está a referir será responsável por obter o seu consentimento para nos fornecer as suas informações pessoais.
Finalidades para as quais as informações pessoais são utilizadas
Utilizamos as suas informações pessoais para os seguintes fins:
Para avaliar a sua candidatura e tomar decisões de contratação;
Comunicar com o candidato e informá-lo sobre o recrutamento e/ou a(s) sua(s) candidatura(s) ou quaisquer outras comunicações necessárias;
Cumprir os requisitos legais e regulamentares aplicáveis e para que possamos estabelecer, exercer ou defender uma ação judicial;
Emprego e gestão de empresas (por exemplo, estabelecer um registo de emprego básico se for contratado);
Elaborar relatórios/análises agregados sobre os dados de atividade dos candidatos (por exemplo, tráfego do sítio de carreiras, funil de candidatos, fonte de contratação, sucesso da campanha de recrutamento);
Apenas para funcionários da Honeywell
:
Para o excluir automaticamente de ser sugerido proactivamente para consideração aos recrutadores para uma oportunidade de emprego e não é elegível para consideração de acordo com a sua atual classificação HPD de 9 blocos (que nunca será revelada a ninguém fora da Honeywell). No entanto, poderá sempre candidatar-se diretamente a qualquer oportunidade de emprego disponível e a sua situação específica será considerada por um recrutador.
Apenas se o utilizador for residente nos Estados Unidos
:
Para lhe enviar comunicações por SMS, especificamente:
(i)     1-1 comunicações SMS relacionadas com a sua candidatura a uma determinada vaga de emprego; e/ou
(ii)    mediante o seu consentimento expresso, comunicações de campanhas por SMS sobre oportunidades de emprego, assuntos relacionados com o emprego e actualizações de candidaturas.
Poderá optar por não receber e/ou revogar o seu consentimento para receber as comunicações acima referidas seguindo as instruções dadas no seu perfil.
Se lhe for proposto e aceitar um emprego na Honeywell, as informações recolhidas durante o processo de candidatura e recrutamento passarão a fazer parte do seu registo de emprego.
Processamento automatizado e definição de perfis
Sujeito ao seu consentimento expresso (que fornece voluntariamente quando se junta à nossa Comunidade de Talentos ou quando assinala a caixa de consentimento apropriada durante o processo de candidatura), efectuamos a "definição de perfis" para avaliar a sua adequação a determinadas oportunidades de emprego. Isto implica a utilização de um algoritmo de correspondência capaz de avaliar o seu perfil profissional e prever a sua elegibilidade para uma determinada oportunidade de emprego. Efectuamos este processamento automatizado para os seguintes fins
ajudar os recrutadores a fazer corresponder os perfis dos candidatos às oportunidades de emprego, sugerindo candidatos a considerar para uma oportunidade de emprego específica; e
enviar-lhe recomendações de emprego personalizadas com base no seu perfil e/ou preferências ou outras informações que possam ser do seu interesse, tais como notícias, webinars e eventos da Honeywell.
Tenha em atenção que, com base nesta definição de perfis, poderá não ser considerado para determinadas oportunidades de emprego, a menos que se tenha candidatado diretamente a elas.
Não tomamos decisões de contratação baseadas exclusivamente em processos de decisão automatizados e/ou na definição de perfis. As suas informações pessoais serão objeto de decisões humanas, uma vez que a decisão final de contratação será tomada pelos recrutadores ou pelo gestor de contratação.
As bases legais para o processamento das suas informações pessoais
Determinadas jurisdições exigem que a Honeywell tenha uma base legal para processar as informações pessoais do utilizador. Nos casos em que a lei aplicável exige que justifiquemos as nossas actividades de processamento, a nossa base legal para recolher e utilizar as suas informações pessoais, conforme descrito neste Aviso de Privacidade, dependerá das informações pessoais em questão e do contexto específico em que as recolhemos.
Consentimento.
Em geral, recolheremos normalmente informações pessoais do utilizador quando tivermos o seu consentimento para o fazer e quando necessitarmos das suas informações pessoais para processar a sua candidatura. Ao aceder ao nosso website/portal, aderir à nossa Comunidade de Talentos ou candidatar-se a um dos nossos postos de trabalho, dá o seu consentimento à Honeywell para recolher e processar as informações pessoais acima descritas para os fins descritos no presente Aviso de Privacidade. Pode retirar o seu consentimento em qualquer altura, enviando um pedido através do nosso portal de pedidos do titular dos dados em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou enviando-nos uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Interesses legítimos.
Nos interesses legítimos da Honeywell, nomeadamente o recrutamento, seleção, avaliação e nomeação de novos funcionários e a gestão e administração do recrutamento e do processo de RH, na medida em que os nossos interesses legítimos não sejam sobrepostos pelos seus direitos e liberdades fundamentais.
Obrigações legais.
Conformidade com as obrigações legais da Honeywell quando a legislação laboral ou outras leis exigem o processamento das suas informações pessoais (por exemplo, na medida em que a lei exige a monitorização da igualdade de oportunidades e diversidade).
Interesses vitais.
Também podemos precisar das suas informações pessoais para proteger os seus interesses vitais (por exemplo, razões de saúde e segurança se participar numa entrevista nas nossas instalações)
Se tiver alguma dúvida ou precisar de mais informações sobre a base jurídica em que recolhemos e utilizamos as suas informações pessoais, envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Com quem partilhamos as suas informações pessoais
A Honeywell apenas partilhará as suas informações pessoais com terceiros nas seguintes circunstâncias:
Entidades do grupo Honeywell.
Podemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com outras entidades do grupo localizadas em jurisdições de todo o mundo para avaliar o seu perfil e considerar quaisquer oportunidades de recrutamento a nível do grupo.
Prestadores de serviços
Podemos partilhar especificamente as suas informações pessoais com prestadores de serviços terceiros que executam serviços específicos em nosso nome (por exemplo, prestadores de serviços de recrutamento e subcontratação de pessoal e prestadores de serviços de análise). Esses terceiros podem variar consoante o seu país e mudarão de tempos a tempos, mas podem incluir a Phenom People, Inc., a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. e os respectivos fornecedores terceiros.
Empregados da Honeywell.
Se já é funcionário da Honeywell, tenha em atenção que algumas secções do seu perfil são públicas e, por conseguinte, visíveis para todos os funcionários da Honeywell (especificamente, o seu nome, título, fotografia, competências, áreas de interesse, experiência profissional e habilitações literárias). No entanto, essas secções são editáveis e o utilizador poderá escolher quais as informações sobre si que são apresentadas no seu perfil. Tenha em atenção que os objectivos de carreira, as deslocalizações e o estado do perfil "aberto a novas oportunidades" não serão públicos e, por conseguinte, não serão visíveis para todos os funcionários da Honeywell (apenas para a equipa de talentos da Honeywell).
Outros terceiros.
A Honeywell pode partilhar as suas informações pessoais com qualquer organismo competente de aplicação da lei, regulador, agência governamental, tribunal ou terceiro, sempre que considerar que a divulgação é necessária ao abrigo da lei aplicável ou na convicção de boa-fé de que tal ação é necessária para exercer, estabelecer ou defender os nossos direitos legais ou para proteger os seus interesses vitais ou os de outra pessoa. Também podemos partilhar as suas informações pessoais com outros com o seu consentimento ou a seu pedido (por exemplo, um árbitro ou uma associação profissional).
Transferências internacionais de informações pessoais
A Honeywell é uma organização global e as suas informações pessoais podem ser transferidas para, mantidas, armazenadas ou utilizadas em vários locais em todo o mundo, como os EUA e a Índia. Isto significa que, quando recolhemos as suas informações pessoais, estas poderão ser processadas em países que poderão ter leis de proteção de dados diferentes das leis do seu país. No entanto, a Honeywell tomará sempre medidas razoáveis para proteger a sua privacidade e fornecer um nível de proteção das informações pessoais comparável ao do seu país de residência, o que inclui a implementação
das cláusulas contratuais-tipo da Comissão
Europeia
, que podem ser consultadas no website da Comissão em
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retenção
Conservaremos as suas informações pessoais durante o tempo necessário para os fins descritos no presente Aviso de privacidade e de acordo com o Calendário de conservação de registos da Honeywell ou conforme exigido pela legislação aplicável.
Os seus direitos
Dependendo da legislação aplicável, o utilizador pode ter determinados direitos relativamente às suas informações pessoais. Se for residente na Califórnia, consulte a secção "
Informações adicionais para residentes na Califórnia
" abaixo.
O utilizador pode ter o direito de
aceder
,
corrigir
,
atualizar
ou solicitar a
eliminação
das suas informações pessoais;
Pode
opor-se
ao processamento das suas informações pessoais, pedir-nos para
restringir
processar as suas informações pessoais ou solicitar a
portabilidade
das suas informações pessoais;
O utilizador pode ter o direito de não ser objeto de uma decisão baseada exclusivamente no processamento automatizado, incluindo a definição de perfis, se essa decisão produzir efeitos legais sobre o utilizador ou o afetar significativamente.
A Honeywell não toma, no âmbito do seu processo de recrutamento, decisões exclusivamente automatizadas sobre os candidatos.
Do mesmo modo, se tivermos recolhido e processado as suas informações pessoais com o seu consentimento, pode retirar o seu consentimento em qualquer altura. Retirar o seu consentimento não afectará a legalidade de qualquer processamento que tenhamos efectuado antes da sua retirada, nem afectará o processamento das suas informações pessoais efectuado com base em fundamentos de processamento legais que não o consentimento; e
O utilizador tem o direito de apresentar queixa a uma autoridade de proteção de dados sobre a nossa recolha e utilização das suas informações pessoais.
Facilitaremos o exercício dos direitos que se aplicam ao utilizador de acordo com a legislação aplicável. Para exercer qualquer um dos seus direitos relacionados com as suas informações pessoais, contacte-nos através da Ajuda RH, ou do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados que se encontra na declaração
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informações adicionais para residentes na Califórnia
Se o utilizador residir no Estado da Califórnia, esta secção complementa o Aviso de privacidade do requerente da Honeywell.
(i)     Categorias de informações pessoais recolhidas e divulgadas
A Honeywell recolheu e divulgou as seguintes categorias de informações pessoais para fins comerciais nos últimos doze meses:
Previous column
Next column
Categorias
Recolhemos
A.
Identificadores como o nome, a data de nascimento, o sexo, o endereço de correio eletrónico, os números de telefone, o endereço postal, os identificadores em linha, a conta nas redes sociais e outros identificadores.
Sim
C.
Características de classificações protegidas ao abrigo da legislação da Califórnia ou federal, tais como raça, etnia, crenças religiosas ou filosóficas, filiação sindical, dados de saúde, informações biométricas, dados genéticos, deficiência, estatuto de veterano, orientação sexual, correio pessoal, correio eletrónico e mensagens de texto (exceto se a Honeywell for o destinatário pretendido), identificadores governamentais (por exemplo, número da segurança social), carta de condução, passaporte, informações financeiras e bancárias.
Sim
F.
Informações sobre actividades na Internet ou noutras redes electrónicas, tais como histórico de navegação, interacções com websites da Honeywell, serviços de correio eletrónico e de mensagens de texto.
Sim
G.
Dados de geolocalização, como a localização do dispositivo e a localização do IP.
Sim
H.
Informações áudio, electrónicas, visuais, térmicas ou similares, como a sua voz e imagem, gravações de vídeo ou áudio, se participar numa entrevista por telefone ou vídeo ou se visitar os nossos escritórios.
Sim
I.
Informações profissionais ou relacionadas com o emprego, tais como a sua ocupação, empregadores actuais ou anteriores, cargo, historial escolar, qualificações académicas e profissionais, currículo, historial de emprego, referências de contratação, notas e avaliações de entrevistas, línguas, associações profissionais, certificações, classificações de gestão de desempenho, remuneração, preferências de localização e preferências de viagem.
Sim
K.
Inferências tiradas de qualquer uma das informações pessoais listadas acima para criar um perfil ou resumo sobre, por exemplo, as preferências e características de um indivíduo.
Sim
Load More
(ii)      Os seus direitos
O utilizador tem o direito de nos enviar um pedido dos seguintes direitos, abrangendo o período de doze meses anterior ao seu pedido. Note-se que estes direitos não são absolutos e, em certos casos, estão sujeitos a limitações, conforme especificado na legislação aplicável:
O direito de saber quais as informações pessoais que recolhemos sobre si, as categorias de fontes a partir das quais recolhemos as suas informações pessoais; a finalidade empresarial ou comercial para a qual recolhemos as suas informações pessoais e as categorias de terceiros com os quais divulgamos as suas informações pessoais;
O direito de apagar as suas informações pessoais;
O direito de corrigir informações pessoais inexactas sobre si;
O direito de recusar a venda ou a partilha das suas informações pessoais;
O direito de limitar o tratamento das suas informações pessoais sensíveis;
O direito de não ser objeto de discriminação ilegal por exercer os seus direitos ao abrigo da legislação aplicável.
Facilitaremos o exercício dos direitos que lhe são aplicáveis em conformidade com a legislação aplicável e, tendo em conta o tipo e a sensibilidade das informações pessoais objeto do pedido, para sua proteção, poderemos ter de solicitar a verificação da sua identidade e pedir-lhe informações adicionais.
Para exercer qualquer um dos seus direitos relacionados com as suas informações pessoais, contacte-nos através do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados disponível em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
ou envie uma mensagem de correio eletrónico para
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Se já for funcionário da Honeywell, pode contactar-nos através do endereço
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Contactar-nos
Se tiver alguma questão ou reclamação sobre a forma como as suas informações pessoais são processadas ou se pretender exercer os seus direitos, contacte:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(apenas se já for funcionário da Honeywell) ou o nosso responsável pela proteção de dados em
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Também pode contactar-nos através do formulário de pedido do titular dos dados disponível em
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Romanian
Actualizat: 1 ianuarie 2023
Această Notificare privind confidențialitatea solicitanților ("Notificare privind confidențialitatea") descrie modul în care Honeywell International, Inc. și
afiliații
săi (colectiv "
Honeywell
", "
noi
" sau "
noi
") prelucrează informațiile dumneavoastră personale atunci când vă alăturați comunității noastre de talente, căutați sau aplicați pentru un loc de muncă și ne trimiteți informații personale prin intermediul portalului nostru, al site-urilor web sau al altor mijloace de recrutare, fie online sau offline (denumite "
Servicii
"). Noi suntem controlorii informațiilor dvs. personale în sensul legilor aplicabile privind protecția datelor.
Vă rugăm să rețineți că, dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell, puteți consulta, de asemenea, Politica globală de confidențialitate a datelor Honeywell și Notificarea privind confidențialitatea angajaților, dacă există una pentru jurisdicția dumneavoastră. Scopul acestei Notificări privind confidențialitatea este de a vă oferi informații mai detaliate despre prelucrarea de către noi a informațiilor dvs. personale în legătură cu candidatura dvs.
Informații personale pe care le colectăm
Pentru a vă procesa cererea, vă solicităm să furnizați informații personale despre dumneavoastră, de exemplu atunci când aplicați pentru un anumit post vacant prin intermediul site-ului/portalului nostru web sau, în cazul în care sunteți deja angajat Honeywell, în timpul relației de muncă. Toate informațiile sunt furnizate în mod voluntar și dumneavoastră stabiliți măsura în care informațiile pe care le furnizați către Honeywell.
Vă rugăm să aveți în vedere că anumite informații pot fi necesare pentru a finaliza evaluarea cererii dumneavoastră și, dacă nu le furnizați, capacitatea noastră de a vă lua în considerare ca și candidat poate fi limitată.
(i)   Informații personale
Este posibil să colectăm următoarele informații personale despre dumneavoastră:
Detalii personale și informații de contact, inclusiv adresa de e-mail, numărul (numerele) de telefon și o fotografie;
Informații profesionale și educaționale legate de ocupația dvs., cum ar fi angajatorii actuali sau anteriori, titlul postului dvs. sau alte informații despre organizația la care sunteți afiliat. De asemenea, puteți furniza CV-ul/curriculum vitae și informații despre calificările sau educația dumneavoastră, cum ar fi diplomele, domeniile de studiu, instituțiile pe care le-ați frecventat, limbile străine, afilieri profesionale, certificări, detalii despre evaluările de management al performanței și remunerare;
Preferințele în materie de carieră (de exemplu, obiectivele pe termen scurt și lung, disponibilitatea de a se reloca, data la care este disponibil să se relocheze și preferințele privind locația);
Informații personale derivate din participarea dvs. la procesul nostru de recrutare, cum ar fi, de exemplu, cele obținute în timpul interviurilor, e-mailurile pe care le schimbăm cu dvs. cu privire la candidatura dvs. sau conversațiile pe care le avem cu dvs. prin intermediul Chatbot-ului nostru online.
Informații audio și vizuale, cum ar fi vocea și înfățișarea dvs., așa cum sunt ele surprinse în fotografii, înregistrări video sau audio, dacă participați la un interviu telefonic sau video sau dacă vizitați birourile noastre;
Orice alte informații personale pe care alegeți în mod voluntar să ni le furnizați.
(ii)  Informații personale sensibile
De asemenea, este posibil să colectăm categorii speciale de informații cu caracter personal despre dvs. (cunoscute și sub denumirea de "categorii speciale de informații cu caracter personal") în cazul în care avem o obligație legală de a face acest lucru, sau în cazul în care informațiile sunt relevante pentru viitorul dvs. mediu de lucru la Honeywell sau pentru furnizarea viitoare a beneficiilor de angajare, sau cu consimțământul dvs. explicit, cum ar fi:
Numărul de identificare emis de guvern (cum ar fi un număr de securitate socială);
Informații demografice, care pot include informații despre clasificări protejate, cum ar fi vârsta, sexul, rasa, dizabilitățile, orientarea sexuală, starea civilă sau statutul de veteran;
Informații despre sănătate (de exemplu, pentru a vă adapta la orice handicap pe care îl aveți sau la restricții alimentare);
Informații referitoare la opiniile politice, convingerile religioase sau apartenența sindicală a unei persoane;
Informații despre infracțiunile sau condamnările penale ale unei persoane, precum și orice alte informații considerate sensibile în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă privind protecția datelor. În cazul în care legea permite acest lucru și în măsura în care este aplicabil, este posibil ca Honeywell să fie nevoită, de asemenea, să efectueze verificări ale antecedentelor și/sau ale cazierului judiciar pentru a stabili dacă sunteți potrivit pentru un post sau o oportunitate deschisă la Honeywell.
Nu vă solicităm să ne furnizați informații personale sensibile decât dacă acest lucru este necesar în scopul îndeplinirii obligațiilor noastre de reglementare (de exemplu, pentru monitorizarea egalității de șanse) sau dacă nu v-ați dat consimțământul explicit. Cu excepția cazului în care legea o cere, furnizarea acestor informații va fi în întregime voluntară. Honeywell se angajează să aibă o forță de muncă cu adevărat incluzivă și diversă. Furnizându-ne datele dvs. privind egalitatea de șanse, ne permiteți să înțelegem mai bine profilul nostru de angajați în ceea ce privește datele privind egalitatea de șanse și măsurile pe care trebuie să le luăm pentru a atrage, promova și păstra o forță de muncă diversă, indiferent de vârstă, handicap, sex, rasă, convingeri religioase sau filozofice și orientare sexuală.
(iii) Informații personale pe care le colectăm automat de la dumneavoastră
Este posibil să colectăm în mod automat anumite informații despre vizita dvs. pe site-urile noastre web folosind "cookie-uri" și alte tehnologii de urmărire similare. Pentru mai multe informații despre modulele cookie pe care le folosim pe site-ul web prin intermediul căruia vă depuneți candidatura, vă rugăm să citiți
Notificarea
noastră privind modulele
cookie
.
Surse de informații personale
Este posibil să colectăm informațiile dvs. personale direct de la dvs. sau indirect de la terțe părți care au dreptul legal de a ne comunica informațiile dvs., cum ar fi:
Agențiile de ocupare a forței de muncă, furnizorii de servicii de verificare a antecedentelor/verificare a angajării sau de verificare a identității;
Agențiile de recrutare (de exemplu, atunci când o agenție de recrutare vă identifică ca potențial candidat);
Informații publice disponibile despre dvs. de pe site-uri precum LinkedIn sau de pe site-ul angajatorului dvs. actual. De asemenea, puteți alege să ne oferiți acces la anumite informații personale stocate de terțe părți (de exemplu, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google sau Facebook). Autorizând Honeywell să aibă acces la aceste informații, sunteți de acord ca noi să colectăm, să stocăm și să utilizăm aceste informații în conformitate cu această Notificare de confidențialitate;
Prin referințe sau din gură în gură (de exemplu, printr-o recomandare din partea unui angajat actual sau fost). În cazul recomandărilor, persoana care vă recomandă va fi responsabilă pentru obținerea consimțământului dumneavoastră de a ne furniza informațiile dumneavoastră personale.
Scopurile pentru care sunt utilizate informațiile personale
Utilizăm informațiile dvs. personale în următoarele scopuri:
Pentru a vă evalua cererea și a lua decizii de angajare;
să comunice cu dumneavoastră și să vă informeze cu privire la recrutare și/sau la candidatura (candidaturile) dumneavoastră sau orice alte comunicări necesare;
Respectarea cerințelor legale și de reglementare aplicabile și pentru a ne permite să stabilim, să exercităm sau să ne apărăm un drept legal;
Angajarea și gestionarea corporației (de exemplu, întocmirea unui dosar de angajare de bază în cazul în care sunteți angajat);
Pentru a realiza rapoarte / analize agregate privind datele de activitate ale candidaților (de exemplu, traficul pe site-ul de carieră, pâlnia de candidați, sursa de angajare, succesul campaniei de recrutare);
Vypracovanie súhrnných správ/analýz týkajúcich sa údajov o činnosti kandidátov (napr. návštevnosť kariérnej stránky, lievik kandidátov, zdroj náboru, úspešnosť náborových kampaní);
Numai pentru angajații Honeywell:
Pentru a vă exclude în mod automat de la a fi sugerat în mod proactiv pentru a fi luat în considerare de recrutori pentru o oportunitate de angajare și nu sunteți eligibil pentru a fi luat în considerare conform ratingului dvs. actual de 9 blocuri HPD (care nu va fi dezvăluit niciodată nimănui din afara Honeywell). Cu toate acestea, veți putea întotdeauna să aplicați direct pentru orice oportunitate de angajare disponibilă, iar situația dvs. specifică va fi luată în considerare de un recrutor.
Numai dacă sunteți rezident al Statelor Unite
:
Pentru a vă trimite comunicări prin SMS, în special:
(i)     1-1 comunicări prin SMS în legătură cu candidatura dvs. la un anumit loc de muncă vacant; și/sau
(ii)    sub rezerva consimțământului dvs. expres, comunicări prin SMS privind oportunitățile de angajare, afacerile legate de locuri de muncă și actualizări ale aplicațiilor.
Veți putea să renunțați și/sau să vă retrageți consimțământul pentru primirea comunicărilor menționate mai sus, urmând instrucțiunile din profilul dumneavoastră.
În cazul în care vi se oferă și acceptați un loc de muncă la Honeywell, informațiile colectate în timpul procesului de cerere și de recrutare vor face parte din dosarul dumneavoastră de angajare.
Prelucrarea și profilarea automată
Sub rezerva consimțământului dvs. expres (pe care îl oferiți în mod voluntar atunci când vă alăturați comunității noastre de talente sau atunci când bifați căsuța de consimțământ corespunzătoare în timpul procesului de depunere a candidaturii), realizăm "crearea de profiluri" pentru a vă evalua aptitudinea pentru anumite oportunități de angajare. Acest lucru implică utilizarea unui algoritm de potrivire care este capabil să evalueze profilul dvs. de angajare și să prezică eligibilitatea dvs. pentru o anumită oportunitate de angajare. Efectuăm această prelucrare automată în scopul:
ajutând recrutorii să coreleze profilurile candidaților cu oportunitățile de angajare, sugerând candidați care să fie luați în considerare pentru o anumită oportunitate de angajare; și
trimiterea de recomandări de locuri de muncă personalizate pe baza profilului și/sau preferințelor dumneavoastră sau a altor informații care vă pot interesa, cum ar fi știri, seminarii web și evenimente Honeywell.
Vă rugăm să rețineți că, pe baza acestei profilări, este posibil să nu fiți luat în considerare pentru anumite oportunități de angajare decât dacă ați aplicat direct pentru acestea.
Nu luăm decizii de angajare bazate exclusiv pe procese decizionale automatizate și/sau pe crearea de profiluri. Informațiile dvs. personale vor fi supuse unor decizii luate de oameni, deoarece decizia finală de angajare va fi luată de recrutori sau de managerul de angajare.
Bazele legale pentru prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale
Anumite jurisdicții cer ca Honeywell să aibă un temei legal pentru prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale. În cazul în care legislația aplicabilă ne cere să ne justificăm activitățile de prelucrare, temeiul nostru juridic pentru colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor dvs. personale, așa cum este descris în această Notificare de confidențialitate, va depinde de informațiile personale în cauză și de contextul specific în care le colectăm.
Consimțământ.
În general, în mod normal, vom colecta informații personale de la dvs. atunci când avem consimțământul dvs. în acest sens și când avem nevoie de informațiile dvs. personale pentru a vă procesa cererea. Prin accesarea site-ului/portalului nostru web, prin aderarea la Comunitatea noastră de talente sau prin depunerea unei candidaturi pentru unul dintre posturile noastre de muncă, vă dați consimțământul ca Honeywell să colecteze și să prelucreze în continuare informațiile personale descrise mai sus în scopurile descrise în această Notificare de confidențialitate. Vă puteți retrage consimțământul în orice moment prin depunerea unei cereri prin intermediul portalului nostru de solicitare a persoanelor vizate, la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau trimițându-ne un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Interesele legitime.
În interesul legitim al Honeywell, și anume recrutarea, selecția, evaluarea și numirea de noi angajați, precum și gestionarea și administrarea procesului de recrutare și de resurse umane, în măsura în care interesele noastre legitime nu sunt anulate de drepturile și libertățile dumneavoastră fundamentale.
Obligațiile legale.
Respectarea obligațiilor legale ale Honeywell în cazul în care legislația privind ocuparea forței de muncă sau alte legi impun prelucrarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale (de exemplu, în măsura în care legea impune monitorizarea egalității de șanse și a diversității).
Interese vitale. De
asemenea, este posibil să avem nevoie de informațiile dvs. personale pentru a vă proteja interesele vitale (de exemplu, din motive de sănătate și siguranță dacă participați la un interviu la sediul nostru).
Dacă aveți întrebări sau aveți nevoie de informații suplimentare cu privire la temeiul juridic pe baza căruia colectăm și utilizăm informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne trimiteți un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Cu cine împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale
Honeywell va partaja informațiile dvs. personale cu terțe părți numai în următoarele circumstanțe:
Entitățile grupului Honeywell.
Este posibil să împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale cu alte entități ale grupului situate în jurisdicții din întreaga lume pentru a vă evalua profilul și pentru a vă lua în considerare pentru orice oportunități de recrutare la nivel de grup.
Furnizori de servicii Este
posibil să împărtășim în mod specific informațiile dvs. personale cu furnizori de servicii terți care prestează servicii specifice în numele nostru (de exemplu, furnizori de personal de recrutare și externalizare și furnizori de servicii de analiză). Aceste terțe părți pot varia în funcție de țara dvs. și se vor schimba din când în când, dar pot include Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. și furnizorii lor terți respectivi.
Angajații Honeywell.
Dacă sunteți deja un angajat Honeywell, vă rugăm să rețineți că  unele secțiuni din profilul dumneavoastră sunt publice și, prin urmare, vizibile pentru toți angajații Honeywell (în special, numele, titlul, fotografia, competențele, domeniile de interes, experiența profesională și educația). Cu toate acestea, aceste secțiuni sunt editabile și veți putea alege ce informații despre dvs. sunt afișate în profilul dvs. Vă rugăm să rețineți că obiectivele profesionale, relocările și statutul profilului "deschis pentru noi oportunități" nu vor fi publice și, prin urmare, nu vor fi vizibile pentru toți angajații Honeywell (doar pentru echipa de talente a Honeywell).
Alte părți terțe.
Honeywell poate împărtăși informațiile dvs. personale cu orice organism competent de aplicare a legii, autoritate de reglementare, agenție guvernamentală, instanță sau terță parte, în cazul în care considerăm că dezvăluirea este necesară în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă sau în cazul în care credem cu bună credință că o astfel de acțiune este necesară pentru a ne exercita, stabili sau apăra drepturile legale sau pentru a vă proteja interesele vitale sau pe cele ale unei alte persoane. De asemenea, este posibil să împărtășim informațiile dvs. personale cu alte persoane cu consimțământul dvs. sau la indicațiile dvs. (de exemplu, un arbitru sau o asociație profesională).
Transferurile internaționale de informații personale
Honeywell este o organizație globală, iar informațiile dvs. personale pot fi transferate, păstrate, stocate sau utilizate în diverse locații din întreaga lume, cum ar fi SUA și India. Acest lucru înseamnă că, atunci când colectăm informațiile dvs. personale, acestea pot fi procesate în țări care pot avea legi privind protecția datelor diferite de legile din țara dvs. Cu toate acestea, Honeywell va lua întotdeauna măsuri rezonabile pentru a vă proteja confidențialitatea și pentru a oferi un nivel de protecție a informațiilor personale comparabil cu cel din țara dumneavoastră de reședință, printre care se numără punerea în aplicare a
clauzelor contractuale standard
ale Comisiei
Europene
, care pot fi găsite pe site-ul web al Comisiei la adresa
https://ec.europa.eu
.
Retenție
Vom păstra informațiile dvs. personale atât timp cât este necesar în legătură cu scopurile descrise în această Notificare de confidențialitate și în conformitate cu Programul de păstrare a înregistrărilor Honeywell sau în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă.
Drepturile dumneavoastră
În funcție de legislația aplicabilă, este posibil să aveți anumite drepturi în ceea ce privește informațiile dumneavoastră personale. Dacă sunteți rezident californian, vă rugăm să consultați "
Informații suplimentare pentru rezidenții din California
" de mai jos.
Puteți avea dreptul de a
accesa
,
corecta
,
actualiza
sau solicita
ștergerea
informațiilor dumneavoastră personale;
Puteți să vă opuneți prelucrării informațiilor dvs. personale, să ne cereți să
restricționăm
prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. personale sau să solicitați
portabilitatea
informațiilor dvs. personale;
Este posibil să aveți dreptul de a refuza să se ia o decizie în ceea ce vă privește care se bazează exclusiv pe prelucrarea automatizată, inclusiv crearea de profiluri, în cazul în care decizia respectivă produce efecte juridice în ceea ce vă privește sau vă afectează în mod semnificativ.
Honeywell nu ia, în cadrul procesului de recrutare, decizii exclusiv automatizate cu privire la candidați.
În mod similar, în cazul în care am colectat și prelucrat informațiile dvs. personale cu consimțământul dvs., atunci vă puteți retrage consimțământul în orice moment. Retragerea consimțământului dvs. nu va afecta legalitatea prelucrării pe care am efectuat-o înainte de retragerea dvs. și nici nu va afecta prelucrarea informațiilor dvs. cu caracter personal efectuată în baza unor motive de prelucrare legale, altele decât consimțământul; și
Aveți dreptul de a depune o plângere la o autoritate de protecție a datelor cu privire la colectarea și utilizarea de către noi a informațiilor dumneavoastră personale.
Vă vom facilita exercitarea drepturilor care vi se aplică în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă. Pentru a vă exercita oricare dintre drepturile referitoare la informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne contactați prin intermediul Serviciului de asistență pentru resurse umane sau prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a persoanei vizate, care se găsește la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau să trimiteți un e-mail la
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Informații suplimentare pentru rezidenții din California
Dacă sunteți rezident al statului California, această secțiune completează Notificarea privind confidențialitatea solicitantului Honeywell.
(i)     Categorii de informații personale colectate și divulgate
Honeywell a colectat și dezvăluit următoarele categorii de informații personale în scop comercial în ultimele douăsprezece luni:
Previous column
Next column
Categorii
Noi colectăm
A.
Identificatori, cum ar fi numele, data nașterii, sexul, adresa de e-mail, numerele de telefon, adresa poștală, identificatorii online, contul de social media și alți identificatori.
Da
C.
Caracteristici ale clasificărilor protejate în conformitate cu legislația californiană sau federală, cum ar fi rasa, etnia, convingerile religioase sau filozofice, apartenența la un sindicat, datele de sănătate, informațiile biometrice, datele genetice, handicapul, statutul de veteran, orientarea sexuală, corespondența personală, e-mailurile și mesajele text (cu excepția cazului în care Honeywell este destinatarul), identificatorii guvernamentali (de exemplu, numărul de securitate socială), permisul de conducere, pașaportul, informațiile financiare și bancare.
Da
F.
Informații privind activitatea pe internet sau în alte rețele electronice, cum ar fi istoricul de navigare, interacțiunile cu site-urile Honeywell, serviciile de e-mail și de mesagerie text.
Da
G.
date de geolocalizare, cum ar fi locația dispozitivului și locația IP.
Da
H.
Informații audio, electronice, vizuale, termice sau similare, cum ar fi vocea și imaginea dvs., înregistrări video sau audio, dacă participați la un interviu telefonic sau video sau dacă vizitați birourile noastre.
Da
I.
Informații profesionale sau legate de locul de muncă, cum ar fi ocupația dumneavoastră, angajatorii actuali sau anteriori, titlul postului, istoricul educațional, calificările academice și profesionale, CV-ul, istoricul postului, referințele de angajare, notele și evaluările de la interviuri, limbile străine, apartenența profesională, certificările, evaluările de management al performanței, remunerarea, preferințele privind locația și preferințele de călătorie.
Da
K.
Deduceri trase din oricare dintre informațiile personale enumerate mai sus pentru a crea un profil sau un rezumat despre, de exemplu, preferințele și caracteristicile unei persoane.
Da
Load More
(ii)      Drepturile dumneavoastră
Aveți dreptul de a ne trimite o cerere pentru următoarele drepturi, care acoperă perioada de douăsprezece luni care precede cererea dumneavoastră. Vă rugăm să rețineți că aceste drepturi nu sunt absolute și, în anumite cazuri, sunt supuse unor limitări, așa cum se specifică în legislația aplicabilă:
Dreptul de a ști ce informații personale am colectat despre dumneavoastră, categoriile de surse din care am colectat informațiile personale; scopul comercial sau de afaceri pentru care am colectat informațiile personale și categoriile de terți cărora le dezvăluim informațiile personale;
Dreptul de a șterge informațiile dumneavoastră personale;
Dreptul de a corecta informațiile personale inexacte care vă privesc;
Dreptul de a renunța la vânzarea sau partajarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale;
Dreptul de a limita prelucrarea informațiilor dumneavoastră personale sensibile;
Dreptul de a nu fi discriminat în mod ilegal pentru exercitarea drepturilor dumneavoastră în temeiul legilor aplicabile.
Vă vom facilita exercitarea drepturilor care vi se aplică în conformitate cu legislația aplicabilă și, având în vedere tipul și caracterul sensibil al informațiilor personale care fac obiectul cererii, pentru protecția dumneavoastră, este posibil să fie necesar să vă solicităm verificarea identității dumneavoastră și să vă cerem informații suplimentare.
Pentru a vă exercita oricare dintre drepturile dvs. referitoare la informațiile dvs. personale, vă rugăm să ne contactați prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a datelor care se găsește la
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
sau să trimiteți un e-mail la HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com. Dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell, ne puteți contacta la adresa HRhelp@honeywell.com.
Contactați-ne
Dacă aveți întrebări sau plângeri cu privire la modul în care sunt prelucrate informațiile dvs. personale sau dacă doriți să vă exercitați drepturile, vă rugăm să contactați:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(numai dacă sunteți deja angajat al Honeywell) sau responsabilul nostru cu protecția datelor la
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. De asemenea, ne puteți contacta prin intermediul formularului de solicitare a persoanei vizate care se găsește la adresa
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Russian
Обновлено: 1 января 2023 г.
Настоящее Уведомление о конфиденциальности информации о соискателях (далее - "Уведомление о конфиденциальности") описывает, как компания Honeywell International, Inc. и ее
аффилированные лица
(далее - "
Honeywell
", "
мы
" или "
мы
") обрабатывают Вашу личную информацию, когда Вы присоединяетесь к нашему сообществу талантов, ищете или подаете заявку на работу и предоставляете нам личную информацию через наш портал, веб-сайты или другие средства найма, как онлайн, так и офлайн ("
Услуги
"). Мы являемся контролерами вашей личной информации в соответствии с действующим законодательством о защите данных.
Обратите внимание, что если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, вы также можете обратиться к Глобальной политике конфиденциальности данных Honeywell и Уведомлению о конфиденциальности сотрудников, если таковое существует в вашей юрисдикции. Цель данного Уведомления о конфиденциальности - предоставить вам более подробную информацию о том, как мы обрабатываем вашу личную информацию в связи с вашим заявлением.
Собираемая нами персональная информация
Чтобы обработать Вашу заявку, мы просим Вас предоставить личную информацию о себе, например, когда Вы подаете заявку на конкретную вакансию через наш сайт/портал или, если Вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, в ходе трудовых отношений. Вся информация предоставляется на добровольной основе, и вы сами определяете объем информации, которую вы предоставляете компании Honeywell.
Пожалуйста, имейте в виду, что некоторая информация может потребоваться для завершения оценки вашей заявки, и если она не будет предоставлена, наша возможность рассматривать вас в качестве кандидата может быть ограничена.
(i)   Персональная информация
Мы можем собирать о вас следующую личную информацию:
Личные данные и контактная информация, включая адрес электронной почты, номер (номера) телефона и фотографию;
Профессиональная и образовательная информация, связанная с Вашей профессиональной деятельностью, например, Ваши нынешние или предыдущие работодатели, Ваша должность или другая информация об организации, с которой Вы связаны. Вы также можете предоставить свое резюме/резюме и информацию о своей квалификации или образовании, например, об ученых степенях, специальностях, учебных заведениях, языках, профессиональных членствах, сертификатах, сведения об оценках по результатам работы и вознаграждении;
Карьерные предпочтения (например, краткосрочные и долгосрочные цели, готовность к переезду, дата, когда можно переехать, и предпочтения по месту работы);
Личные данные, полученные в результате вашего участия в нашем процессе найма, например, полученные в ходе собеседований, электронных писем, которыми мы обмениваемся с вами по поводу вашей заявки, или разговоров, которые мы ведем с вами через наш онлайн-чатбот.
Аудио- и визуальная информация, например, ваш голос и ваше изображение, запечатленное на фотографиях, видео- или аудиозаписях, если вы участвуете в телефонном или видеоинтервью или посещаете наши офисы;
Любая другая личная информация, которую вы добровольно решили предоставить нам.
(ii)  Чувствительная личная информация
Мы также можем собирать о вас персональные данные особых категорий (также известные как "специальные категории персональной информации"), если у нас есть юридическое обязательство делать это, или к будущему предоставлению льгот при трудоустройстве, или с вашего явного согласия, например:
Идентификационный номер, выданный государством (например, номер социального страхования);
Демографическая информация, которая может включать сведения о защищаемых классификациях, таких как ваш возраст, пол, раса, инвалидность, сексуальная ориентация, семейное положение или статус ветерана;
Информация о здоровье (например, для учета имеющихся у вас ограничений по здоровью или диетических ограничений);
Информация, касающаяся политических взглядов, религиозных убеждений или членства в профсоюзе;
Информация об уголовных преступлениях или судимостях, а также любая другая информация, считающаяся конфиденциальной в соответствии с действующим законодательством о защите данных. Если это разрешено законом и в соответствующих пределах, Honeywell может также потребоваться проведение проверки биографических данных и/или уголовных преступлений для определения вашего соответствия открытой должности или возможности работы в Honeywell.
Мы не требуем от вас предоставления конфиденциальной личной информации, за исключением случаев, когда это необходимо для выполнения наших нормативных обязательств (например, для контроля равных возможностей), или если вы не предоставили своего явного согласия. За исключением случаев, когда это требуется по закону, предоставление такой информации будет полностью добровольным. Компания Honeywell стремится к тому, чтобы персонал был действительно инклюзивным и разнообразным. Предоставляя нам свои данные о равных возможностях, вы позволяете нам лучше понять профиль наших сотрудников с точки зрения данных о равных возможностях и действия, которые нам необходимо предпринять для привлечения, продвижения и удержания разнообразного персонала, независимо от возраста, инвалидности, пола, расы, религиозных или философских убеждений и сексуальной.
(iii) Личная информация, которую мы получаем от вас автоматически
Мы можем автоматически собирать определенную информацию о посещении вами наших сайтов с помощью "cookies" и других подобных технологий отслеживания. Для получения дополнительной информации о файлах cookie, используемых нами на сайте, через который вы подаете заявку, ознакомьтесь с нашим
Уведомлением о файлах cookie
.
Источники персональной информации
Мы можем получать вашу личную информацию непосредственно от вас или косвенно от третьих лиц, которые имеют законное право передавать нам вашу информацию, например:
Агентства по трудоустройству, поставщики услуг по проверке биографических данных/рабочих мест или проверке личности;
Агентства по подбору персонала (например, когда агентство по подбору персонала идентифицирует Вас как потенциального кандидата);
Общедоступная информация о вас с таких сайтов, как LinkedIn или сайт вашего нынешнего работодателя. Вы также можете предоставить нам доступ к определенной личной информации, хранящейся у третьих лиц (например, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google или Facebook). Разрешая компании Honeywell доступ к этой информации, вы соглашаетесь с тем, что мы можем собирать, хранить и использовать эту информацию в соответствии с настоящим Уведомлением о конфиденциальности;
по рекомендации или из уст в уста (например, по рекомендации нынешнего или бывшего сотрудника). В случае рекомендации лицо, которое вас направляет, будет нести ответственность за получение вашего согласия на предоставление нам вашей личной информации.
Цели использования персональной информации
Мы используем вашу личную информацию для следующих целей:
Для оценки вашего заявления и принятия решения о приеме на работу;
Общаться с Вами и информировать Вас о наборе и/или Вашей заявке (заявках), а также о любых других необходимых сообщениях;
Выполнять применимые законодательные и нормативные требования, а также для того, чтобы мы могли установить, реализовать или защитить правовые претензии;
Трудоустройство и корпоративное управление (например, завести основную трудовую книжку при приеме на работу);
Для составления агрегированных отчетов/анализа данных о деятельности кандидатов (например, посещаемость сайта, воронка кандидатов, источник найма, успешность рекрутинговой кампании);
Только для сотрудников Honeywell
:
Чтобы автоматически исключить возможность того, что вы будете предложены рекрутерам для рассмотрения в качестве кандидата на вакансию и не будете допущены к рассмотрению в соответствии с вашим текущим рейтингом HPD 9-block (который никогда не будет раскрыт никому за пределами Honeywell). Тем не менее, вы всегда сможете напрямую подать заявку на любую имеющуюся вакансию, и ваша конкретная ситуация будет рассмотрена рекрутером.
Только в том случае, если вы являетесь резидентом США
:
Для отправки Вам сообщений через SMS, в частности:
(i)     1-1 SMS-сообщения в связи с Вашей заявкой на конкретную вакансию; и/или
(ii)    при наличии Вашего прямого согласия
-
SMS-рассылки о возможностях трудоустройства, вакансиях и обновлениях анкет.
Вы сможете отказаться и/или отозвать свое согласие на получение вышеуказанных сообщений, следуя инструкциям, указанным в Вашем профиле.
Если вам будет предложено и вы согласитесь на работу в компании Honeywell, информация, полученная в процессе подачи заявления и найма, станет частью вашей трудовой книжки.
Автоматизированная обработка и профилирование
С вашего явного согласия (которое вы добровольно предоставляете, присоединяясь к нашему сообществу талантов или отмечая соответствующее поле согласия в процессе подачи заявки) мы проводим "профилирование" для оценки вашей пригодности для конкретных вакансий. Для этого используется алгоритм, способный оценить ваш профиль занятости и предсказать ваше соответствие конкретной вакансии. Мы осуществляем такую автоматизированную обработку в следующих целях:
помощь рекрутерам в сопоставлении профилей кандидатов с вакансиями, предлагая кандидатов для рассмотрения на конкретную вакансию; и
отправка Вам персонализированных рекомендаций по работе на основе Вашего профиля и/или предпочтений, а также другой информации, которая может представлять для Вас интерес, например, новостей, вебинаров и мероприятий Honeywell.
Обратите внимание, что на основании такого профилирования вы можете быть не рассмотрены на определенные вакансии, если вы не подали на них прямое заявление.
Мы не принимаем решений о приеме на работу, основываясь исключительно на автоматизированных процессах принятия решений и/или профилировании. Ваши персональные данные будут подвергаться обработке человеком, поскольку окончательное решение о приеме на работу будет приниматься рекрутером или менеджером по подбору персонала.
Правовые основания для обработки вашей персональной информации
В некоторых юрисдикциях компания Honeywell должна иметь юридическое основание для обработки вашей личной информации. Если действующее законодательство требует от нас обоснования действий по обработке, то наше правовое основание для сбора и использования Вашей личной информации, как описано в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности, будет зависеть от конкретной личной информации и контекста, в котором мы ее собираем.
Согласие.
Как правило, мы собираем личную информацию о Вас, если имеем на это Ваше согласие и если Ваша личная информация необходима нам для обработки Вашего заявления. Посещая наш сайт/портал, присоединяясь к нашему сообществу талантов или подавая заявку на одну из наших вакансий, вы даете свое согласие компании Honeywell на сбор и дальнейшую обработку вышеуказанной личной информации в целях, описанных в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности. Вы можете в любое время
отозвать свое согласие,
направив запрос через наш портал запросов субъектов данных по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
или отправив нам электронное письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Законные интересы.
В законных интересах компании Honeywell, а именно в связи с наймом, отбором, оценкой и назначением новых сотрудников, а также в связи с управлением и администрированием процесса найма и работы с персоналом в той мере, в какой наши законные интересы не противоречат вашим основным правам и свободам.
Юридические обязательства.
Выполнение юридических обязательств компании Honeywell, когда трудовое законодательство или другие законы требуют обработки вашей личной информации (например, в той мере, в какой закон требует отслеживания равенства возможностей и разнообразия).
VЖизненно важные интересы.
Ваша личная информация может понадобиться нам для защиты ваших жизненно важных интересов (например, по соображениям охраны здоровья и безопасности, если вы проходите собеседование на нашем объекте)
Если у вас возникли вопросы или вам необходима дополнительная информация о правовых основаниях, на которых мы собираем и используем вашу личную информацию, пожалуйста, отправьте письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
С кем мы передаем вашу личную информацию
Компания Honeywell будет передавать вашу личную информацию третьим лицам только в следующих случаях:
Предприятия группы Honeywell.
Мы можем передавать вашу личную информацию другим предприятиям группы, расположенным в юрисдикциях по всему миру, для оценки вашей анкеты и рассмотрения возможности найма на работу на уровне группы.
Поставщики услуг
Мы можем специально передавать вашу личную информацию  сторонним поставщикам услуг, которые выполняют определенные услуги от нашего имени (например, поставщикам услуг по подбору и аутсорсингу персонала и поставщикам аналитических услуг). Такие третьи стороны могут варьироваться в зависимости от страны, в которой вы проживаете, и время от времени меняться, но могут включать компании Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. и их соответствующих сторонних поставщиков.
Сотрудники компании Honeywell.
Если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, обратите внимание, что некоторые разделы вашего профиля являются открытыми и, следовательно, видны всем сотрудникам Honeywell (в частности, ваше имя, должность, фотография, навыки, сферы интересов, опыт работы и образование). Однако эти разделы можно редактировать, и вы сами сможете выбирать, какая информация о вас будет отображаться в вашем профиле. Обратите внимание, что карьерные цели, переезды
Другие третьи стороны.
Honeywell может передавать Вашу личную информацию любому компетентному правоохранительному органу, регулятору, государственному учреждению, суду или третьей стороне, если мы считаем, что раскрытие информации необходимо в соответствии с действующим законодательством или по добросовестному убеждению, что такие действия необходимы для осуществления, установления или защиты наших законных прав или для защиты Ваших жизненных интересов или интересов другого лица. Мы также можем передавать вашу личную информацию другим лицам с вашего согласия или по вашему указанию (например, судье или профессиональной ассоциации).
Международные переводы персональной информации
HКомпания Honeywell является глобальной организацией, и ваша личная информация может передаваться, храниться и использоваться в различных странах мира, таких как США и Индия. Это означает, что когда мы собираем вашу личную информацию, она может обрабатываться в странах, законы о защите данных которых могут отличаться от законов вашей страны. Однако Honeywell всегда будет предпринимать разумные меры для защиты вашей конфиденциальности и обеспечения уровня защиты личной информации, сопоставимого с уровнем защиты в стране вашего проживания, включая применение
Стандартных договорных положений
Европейской
комиссии
, с которыми можно ознакомиться на сайте Комиссии https://ec.europa.eu.
Удержание
Мы будем хранить Вашу личную информацию столько, сколько необходимо для достижения целей, описанных в настоящем Уведомлении о конфиденциальности, в соответствии с графиком хранения записей Honeywell или в соответствии с требованиями действующего законодательства.
Ваши права
В зависимости от действующего законодательства вы можете иметь определенные права в отношении вашей личной информации. Если вы являетесь жителем Калифорнии, обратитесь к разделу “
Дополнительная информация для жителей Калифорнии
” ниже.
Вы имеете право на
доступ, исправление, обновление
или запрос на
удаление
вашей личной информации;
Вы можете
возразить
против обработки вашей личной информации, попросить нас
ограничить
pобработку вашей личной информации или запросить
перенос
вашей личной информации;
Вы можете иметь право не принимать в отношении вас решение, основанное исключительно на автоматизированной обработке, включая профилирование, если такое решение порождает в отношении вас юридические последствия или существенно влияет на вас.
Компания Honeywell не принимает в рамках процесса подбора персонала исключительно автоматизированных решений в отношении кандидатов.
Аналогичным образом, если мы собирали и обрабатывали ваши персональные данные с вашего согласия, вы можете отозвать свое согласие в любое время. Отзыв вашего согласия не повлияет на законность любой обработки, проведенной нами до вашего отзыва, а также не повлияет на обработку вашей личной информации, проведенную на законных основаниях, отличных от согласия; и
Вы имеете право подать жалобу в орган по защите данных на сбор и использование нами вашей личной информации.
Мы будем способствовать осуществлению вами прав, относящихся к вам, в соответствии с действующим законодательством. Чтобы воспользоваться любым из ваших прав, касающихся вашей личной информации, свяжитесь с нами через HR Help или форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную на сайте
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, или отправьте письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Дополнительная информация для жителей Калифорнии
Если вы являетесь резидентом штата Калифорния, данный раздел дополняет Уведомление о конфиденциальности для заявителей компании Honeywell.
(i)      Категории собираемой и раскрываемой персональной информации
В течение последних двенадцати месяцев компания Honeywell собирала и раскрывала следующие категории личной информации для наших коммерческих целей:
Previous column
Next column
Категории
Мы собираем
A.
Идентификаторы, такие как имя, дата рождения, пол, адрес электронной почты, номера телефонов, почтовый адрес, онлайн-идентификаторы, учетные записи в социальных сетях и другие идентификаторы.
Да
C.
Характеристики, относящиеся к защищаемой классификации в соответствии с калифорнийским или федеральным законодательством, такие как раса, этническая принадлежность, религиозные или философские убеждения, членство в профсоюзе, медицинские данные, биометрическая информация, генетические данные, инвалидность, статус ветерана, сексуальная ориентация, личная почта, электронная почта и текстовые сообщения (если только компания Honeywell не является предполагаемым получателем), государственные идентификаторы (например, номер социального страхования), водительские права, паспорт, финансовая и банковская информация.
Да
F.
Информация об активности в Интернете или других электронных сетях, например, история просмотра веб-страниц, взаимодействие с веб-сайтами Honeywell, электронной почтой и службами обмена текстовыми сообщениями..
Да
G.
Геолокационные данные, такие как местоположение устройства и местоположение IP-адреса.
Да
H.
Аудио-, электронная, визуальная, тепловая или аналогичная информация, например, ваш голос и изображение, видео- или аудиозаписи, если вы участвуете в телефонном или видеоинтервью или посещаете наши офисы.
Да
I.
Профессиональная или связанная с работой информация, такая как род занятий, текущий или предыдущий работодатель, должность, история образования, академическая и профессиональная квалификация, резюме, история работы, рекомендации при приеме на работу, записи и оценки собеседований, языки, профессиональные членства, сертификаты, оценки эффективности работы, компенсация, предпочтения в отношении места работы и поездок.
Да
K.
Выводы, сделанные на основе любой из перечисленных выше персональных данных, для создания профиля или резюме, например, о предпочтениях и характеристиках человека.
Да
Load More
(ii)      Ваши права
Вы имеете право направить нам запрос о предоставлении следующих прав, охватывающих двенадцатимесячный период, предшествующий Вашему запросу. Обратите внимание, что эти права не являются абсолютными и в некоторых случаях подлежат ограничениям, предусмотренным действующим законодательством:
Право знать, какую личную информацию о вас мы собрали, из каких источников мы  собрали вашу личную информацию, с какой деловой или коммерческой целью мы собрали вашу личную информацию, а также с какими третьими лицами мы раскрываем вашу личную информацию;
Право на удаление своей личной информации;
Право на исправление неточной личной информации о вас;
Право отказаться от продажи или передачи вашей личной информации;
Право на ограничение обработки вашей чувствительной личной информации;
Право не подвергаться незаконной дискриминации за осуществление своих прав в соответствии с действующим законодательством.
Мы будем способствовать осуществлению применимых к вам прав в соответствии с действующим законодательством и, учитывая тип и чувствительность персональной информации, являющейся предметом запроса, для вашей защиты нам может потребоваться запросить проверку вашей личности и запросить у вас дополнительную информацию.
Чтобы воспользоваться любыми своими правами, связанными с персональной информацией, свяжитесь с нами через форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, или отправьте электронное письмо по адресу
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell, вы можете связаться с нами по адресу
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Свяжитесь с нами
Если у вас возникли вопросы или жалобы по поводу обработки вашей личной информации или вы хотите воспользоваться своими правами, обращайтесь по адресу:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(только если вы уже являетесь сотрудником Honeywell) или к нашему специалисту по защите данных по адресу
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Вы также можете связаться с нами через форму запроса субъекта данных, расположенную по адресу
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Slovak
Aktualizované: 1. januára 2023
Toto oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov uchádzačov (ďalej len "oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov") opisuje, ako spoločnosť Honeywell International, Inc. a jej
pridružené spoločnosti
(ďalej spoločne len "
Honeywell
", "
my
" alebo "
nás
") spracúvajú vaše osobné údaje, keď sa pripojíte k našej komunite talentov, hľadáte alebo sa uchádzate o zamestnanie a poskytujete nám osobné údaje prostredníctvom nášho portálu, webových stránok alebo iných náborových médií, či už online alebo offline (ďalej len "
služby
"). Na účely platných zákonov o ochrane údajov sme správcami vašich osobných údajov.
Upozorňujeme, že ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, môžete si prečítať aj Globálne zásady ochrany osobných údajov spoločnosti Honeywell a Oznámenie o ochrane osobných údajov zamestnancov, ak existuje pre vašu jurisdikciu. Cieľom tohto oznámenia o ochrane osobných údajov je poskytnúť vám podrobnejšie informácie o spracovaní vašich osobných údajov v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou.
Osobné údaje, ktoré zhromažďujeme
Aby sme mohli spracovať vašu žiadosť, požiadame vás o poskytnutie osobných údajov o vás, napríklad keď sa uchádzate o konkrétne voľné pracovné miesto prostredníctvom našej webovej stránky/portálu alebo v prípade, že ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, počas vášho pracovného pomeru. Všetky informácie sa poskytujú dobrovoľne a vy určujete rozsah informácií, ktoré spoločnosti Honeywell poskytnete.
Majte na pamäti, že niektoré informácie môžu byť potrebné na dokončenie hodnotenia vašej žiadosti a v prípade ich neposkytnutia môže byť naša schopnosť posúdiť vás ako kandidáta obmedzená.
(i)   Osobné informácie
Môžeme o vás zhromažďovať tieto osobné údaje:
Osobné údaje a kontaktné informácie vrátane e-mailovej adresy, telefónneho čísla (čísel) a fotografie;
Profesijné a vzdelanostné informácie súvisiace s vaším povolaním, ako sú vaši súčasní alebo predchádzajúci zamestnávatelia, vaša pracovná pozícia alebo iné informácie o organizácii, s ktorou ste spätí. Môžete tiež poskytnúť svoj životopis/životopis a informácie o svojej kvalifikácii alebo vzdelaní, ako sú tituly, študijné odbory, inštitúcie, ktoré ste navštevovali, jazyky, profesijné členstvo, certifikáty, podrobnosti o hodnotení riadenia výkonnosti a odmeňovaní;
Kariérne preferencie (napr. krátkodobé a dlhodobé ciele, ochota presťahovať sa, termín presťahovania a preferencie miesta);
Osobné údaje získané z vašej účasti v našom náborovom procese, ako sú napríklad údaje získané počas pohovorov, e-maily, ktoré si s vami vymieňame v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou, alebo konverzácie, ktoré s vami vedieme prostredníctvom nášho online chatbota.
Zvukové a vizuálne informácie, napríklad váš hlas a podobizeň zachytené na fotografiách, videozáznamoch alebo zvukových nahrávkach, ak sa zúčastníte telefonického alebo videorozhovoru alebo ak navštívite naše kancelárie;
Akékoľvek iné osobné údaje, ktoré sa nám dobrovoľne rozhodnete poskytnúť.
(ii)  Citlivé osobné údaje
Môžeme o vás zhromažďovať aj osobitné kategórie osobných údajov (známe aj ako "osobitné kategórie osobných údajov"), ak máme zákonnú povinnosť tak urobiť alebo ak informácie sú dôležité pre vaše budúce pracovné prostredie v spoločnosti Honeywell alebo pre budúce poskytovanie zamestnaneckých výhod, alebo s vaším výslovným súhlasom, ako napríklad:G
Identifikačné číslo vydané vládou (napríklad číslo sociálneho poistenia);
Demografické údaje, ktoré môžu zahŕňať informácie o chránených klasifikáciách, ako je váš vek, pohlavie, rasa, zdravotné postihnutie, sexuálna orientácia, rodinný stav alebo status veterána;
informácie o zdravotnom stave (napríklad na prispôsobenie sa vášmu zdravotnému postihnutiu alebo stravovacím obmedzeniam);
Informácie týkajúce sa politických názorov, náboženského presvedčenia alebo členstva v odboroch;
Informácie o trestných činoch alebo odsúdeniach jednotlivca, ako aj akékoľvek iné informácie považované za citlivé podľa platných zákonov o ochrane údajov. Ak to povoľuje zákon a v príslušnom rozsahu, spoločnosť Honeywell môže tiež potrebovať vykonať previerky minulosti a/alebo trestnej zodpovednosti, aby určila vašu vhodnosť pre otvorenú pozíciu alebo príležitosť v spoločnosti Honeywell.
Nevyžadujeme od vás, aby ste nám poskytli citlivé osobné údaje, pokiaľ to nie je potrebné na účely plnenia našich regulačných povinností (napr. na monitorovanie rovnosti príležitostí) alebo pokiaľ ste nám na to neposkytli svoj výslovný súhlas. S výnimkou rozsahu vyžadovaného zákonom bude poskytnutie týchto informácií úplne dobrovoľné. Spoločnosť Honeywell sa zaviazala k skutočnej inkluzívnej a rôznorodej pracovnej sile. Poskytnutím vašich údajov o rovnosti príležitostí nám umožníte lepšie pochopiť profil našich zamestnancov z hľadiska údajov o rovnosti príležitostí a opatrení, ktoré musíme prijať na prilákanie, podporu a udržanie rôznorodej pracovnej sily bez ohľadu na vek, zdravotné postihnutie, pohlavie, rasu, náboženské alebo filozofické presvedčenie a sexuálnu orientáciu.
(iii) Osobné údaje, ktoré od vás zhromažďujeme automaticky
Môžeme od vás automaticky zhromažďovať určité informácie o vašej návšteve našich webových stránok pomocou súborov cookie a iných podobných technológií sledovania. Ďalšie informácie o súboroch cookie, ktoré používame na webovej lokalite, prostredníctvom ktorej podávate žiadosť, nájdete v našom
oznámení o súboroch cookie
.
Zdroje osobných informácií
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme získavať priamo od vás alebo nepriamo od tretích strán, ktoré sú oprávnené zdieľať vaše údaje s nami, ako napríklad:
Pracovné agentúry, poskytovatelia služieb overovania minulosti/zamestnania alebo overovania totožnosti;
personálne agentúry (napríklad keď vás personálna agentúra identifikuje ako potenciálneho kandidáta);
Verejne dostupné informácie o vás z webových stránok, ako je LinkedIn alebo webová stránka vášho súčasného zamestnávateľa. Môžete sa tiež rozhodnúť, že nám poskytnete prístup k určitým osobným informáciám uloženým tretími stranami (napríklad LinkedIn, Twitter, Google alebo Facebook). Povolením prístupu k týmto informáciám spoločnosti Honeywell súhlasíte s tým, že môžeme tieto informácie zhromažďovať, uchovávať a používať v súlade s týmto oznámením o ochrane osobných údajov;
na základe referencie alebo ústneho podania (napríklad na základe odporúčania od súčasného alebo bývalého zamestnanca). V prípade odporúčaní je osoba, ktorá vás odporúča, zodpovedná za získanie vášho súhlasu s poskytnutím vašich osobných údajov.
Účely, na ktoré sa osobné údaje používajú
Vaše osobné údaje používame na tieto účely:
vyhodnotiť vašu žiadosť a prijať rozhodnutie o prijatí do zamestnania;
komunikovať s vami a informovať vás o nábere a/alebo vašej prihláške (prihláškach) alebo o akejkoľvek inej požadovanej komunikácii;
dodržiavanie platných zákonných a regulačných požiadaviek a na to, aby sme mohli preukázať, uplatniť alebo obhájiť právny nárok;
Zamestnanie a riadenie spoločnosti (napríklad vytvorenie základného záznamu o zamestnaní, ak vás zamestnajú);
Vypracovanie súhrnných správ/analýz týkajúcich sa údajov o činnosti kandidátov (napr. návštevnosť kariérnej stránky, lievik kandidátov, zdroj náboru, úspešnosť náborových kampaní);
Len pre zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell
:
Aby ste boli automaticky vylúčení z proaktívneho navrhovania náborovým pracovníkom pre pracovné príležitosti a neboli oprávnení na posúdenie podľa vášho aktuálneho hodnotenia HPD 9-block (ktoré nebude nikdy odhalené nikomu mimo spoločnosti Honeywell). Vždy sa však budete môcť priamo uchádzať o akúkoľvek dostupnú pracovnú príležitosť a vaša konkrétna situácia bude náborovým pracovníkom zvážená.
Iba v prípade, že máte trvalý pobyt v Spojených štátoch
:
Na zasielanie správ prostredníctvom SMS, konkrétne:
(i)     1-1 SMS komunikácia v súvislosti s vašou žiadosťou o konkrétne voľné pracovné miesto a/alebo
(ii)    na základe vášho výslovného súhlasu, komunikácia prostredníctvom SMS kampaní o pracovných príležitostiach, pracovných záležitostiach a aktualizáciách žiadostí.
Svoj súhlas so zasielaním vyššie uvedených správ budete môcť odmietnuť a/alebo odvolať podľa pokynov uvedených vo vašom profile.
Ak dostanete ponuku a prijmete zamestnanie v spoločnosti Honeywell, informácie zhromaždené počas procesu podávania žiadosti a náboru sa stanú súčasťou vášho pracovného záznamu.
Automatizované spracovanie a profilovanie
Na základe vášho výslovného súhlasu (ktorý dobrovoľne poskytnete pri vstupe do našej komunity talentov alebo pri zaškrtnutí príslušného políčka súhlasu počas procesu podávania žiadosti) vykonávame "profilovanie" s cieľom vyhodnotiť vašu vhodnosť pre konkrétne pracovné príležitosti. Ide o použitie algoritmu na porovnávanie, ktorý dokáže vyhodnotiť váš pracovný profil a predpovedať vašu vhodnosť pre konkrétnu pracovnú príležitosť. Toto automatizované spracovanie vykonávame na účely:
pomoc náborovým pracovníkom pri zosúlaďovaní profilov uchádzačov s pracovnými príležitosťami prostredníctvom navrhovania kandidátov, ktorí by mali byť zaradení na konkrétnu pracovnú príležitosť, a
zasielanie personalizovaných odporúčaní pracovných miest na základe vášho profilu a/alebo preferencií alebo iných informácií, ktoré vás môžu zaujímať, ako sú novinky, webové semináre a podujatia spoločnosti Honeywell.
Upozorňujeme, že na základe tohto profilovania nemusíte byť zaradení do výberu určitých pracovných príležitostí, pokiaľ ste sa o ne priamo neuchádzali.
Nerobíme rozhodnutia o prijímaní zamestnancov výlučne na základe automatizovaných rozhodovacích procesov a/alebo profilovania. Vaše osobné údaje budú podliehať ľudským rozhodnutiam, keďže konečné rozhodnutie o prijatí do zamestnania urobia náboroví pracovníci alebo vedúci náboru.
Právne základy spracovania vašich osobných údajov
Niektoré jurisdikcie vyžadujú, aby spoločnosť Honeywell mala právny základ na spracovanie vašich osobných údajov. Ak platné právne predpisy vyžadujú, aby sme zdôvodnili naše činnosti spracovania, náš právny základ na zhromažďovanie a používanie vašich osobných údajov, ako je opísané v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov, bude závisieť od príslušných osobných údajov a konkrétneho kontextu, v ktorom ich zhromažďujeme.
Súhlas.
Vo všeobecnosti platí, že osobné údaje od vás zhromažďujeme, ak na to máme váš súhlas a ak vaše osobné údaje potrebujeme na spracovanie vašej žiadosti. Prístupom na našu webovú stránku/portál, vstupom do našej komunity talentov alebo podaním žiadosti o jednu z našich pracovných pozícií udeľujete spoločnosti Honeywell súhlas so zhromažďovaním a ďalším spracovaním vyššie uvedených osobných údajov na účely opísané v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov. Svoj súhlas môžete kedykoľvek odvolať podaním žiadosti prostredníctvom nášho portálu pre žiadosti subjektov údajov na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
alebo zaslaním e-mailu na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Oprávnené záujmy.
Oprávnené záujmy spoločnosti Honeywell, konkrétne nábor, výber, hodnotenie a menovanie nových zamestnancov a riadenie a správa náborového a personálneho procesu v rozsahu, v akom nad našimi oprávnenými záujmami neprevažujú vaše základné práva a slobody.
Právne povinnosti.
Dodržiavanie zákonných povinností spoločnosti Honeywell v prípadoch, keď pracovné právo alebo iné zákony vyžadujú spracovanie vašich osobných údajov (napríklad v rozsahu, v akom zákon vyžaduje monitorovanie rovnosti príležitostí a rozmanitosti).
Životne dôležité záujmy.
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme potrebovať aj na ochranu vašich životne dôležitých záujmov (napríklad z dôvodov ochrany zdravia a bezpečnosti, ak sa zúčastníte na pohovore na našom pracovisku).
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo potrebujete ďalšie informácie týkajúce sa právneho základu, na základe ktorého zhromažďujeme a používame vaše osobné údaje, pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
S kým zdieľame vaše osobné údaje
Spoločnosť Honeywell bude zdieľať vaše osobné údaje s tretími stranami len za nasledujúcich okolností:
Subjekty skupiny Honeywell.
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme zdieľať s inými subjektmi skupiny, ktoré sa nachádzajú v jurisdikciách po celom svete, aby sme mohli posúdiť váš profil a zvážiť prípadné možnosti náboru na úrovni skupiny.
Poskytovatelia služieb
Vaše osobné údaje môžeme osobitne zdieľať s externými poskytovateľmi služieb, ktorí v našom mene vykonávajú špecifické služby (napríklad poskytovatelia náboru a outsourcingu zamestnancov a poskytovatelia analytických služieb). Takéto tretie strany sa môžu líšiť v závislosti od vašej krajiny a z času na čas sa budú meniť, ale môžu zahŕňať spoločnosti Phenom People, Inc. a Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. a ich príslušných poskytovateľov tretích strán.
Zamestnanci spoločnosti Honeywell.
Ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, upozorňujeme, že niektoré časti vášho profilu sú verejné, a teda viditeľné pre všetkých zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell (konkrétne vaše meno, titul, fotografia, zručnosti, oblasti záujmov, pracovné skúsenosti a vzdelanie). Takéto časti sú však editovateľné a budete si môcť vybrať, ktoré informácie o vás sa vo vašom profile zobrazia. Upozorňujeme, že kariérne ciele, premiestnenie a sekcie stavu profilu "otvorené pre nové príležitosti" nebudú verejné, a preto nebudú viditeľné pre všetkých zamestnancov spoločnosti Honeywell (iba pre tím talentov spoločnosti Honeywell).
Ostatné tretie strany.
Spoločnosť Honeywell môže poskytnúť vaše osobné údaje akémukoľvek príslušnému orgánu činnému v trestnom konaní, regulačnému orgánu, vládnej agentúre, súdu alebo tretej strane, ak sa domnievame, že takéto poskytnutie je nevyhnutné podľa platných právnych predpisov alebo v dobrej viere, že takéto konanie je nevyhnutné na uplatnenie, stanovenie alebo obhajobu našich zákonných práv alebo na ochranu vašich životných záujmov alebo záujmov inej osoby. Vaše osobné údaje môžeme tiež poskytnúť iným osobám s vaším súhlasom alebo na váš pokyn (napr. rozhodcovi alebo profesijnému združeniu).
Medzinárodné prenosy osobných údajov
Spoločnosť Honeywell je globálna organizácia a vaše osobné údaje sa môžu prenášať, uchovávať, uchovávať alebo používať na rôznych miestach na svete, napríklad v USA a Indii. To znamená, že keď zhromažďujeme vaše osobné údaje, môžu byť spracované v krajinách, ktoré môžu mať zákony o ochrane údajov odlišné od zákonov vašej krajiny. Spoločnosť Honeywell však vždy podnikne primerané kroky na ochranu vášho súkromia a na zabezpečenie úrovne ochrany osobných údajov, ktorá je porovnateľná s úrovňou ochrany vo vašej krajine bydliska, čo zahŕňa implementáciu
štandardných zmluvných doložiek
Európskej
komisie
, ktoré možno nájsť na webovej stránke Komisie na adrese https://ec.europa.eu.
Zadržanie
Vaše osobné údaje budeme uchovávať tak dlho, ako to bude potrebné v súvislosti s účelmi opísanými v tomto oznámení o ochrane osobných údajov a v súlade s harmonogramom uchovávania záznamov spoločnosti Honeywell alebo v súlade s platnými zákonmi.
Vaše práva
V závislosti od platných zákonov môžete mať určité práva týkajúce sa vašich osobných údajov. Ak ste obyvateľom Kalifornie, pozrite si nižšie uvedené "
Ďalšie informácie pre obyvateľov Kalifornie
".
Môžete mať právo na
prístup k
svojim osobným údajom, ich
opravu
,
aktualizáciu
alebo
vymazanie
;
Môžete
namietať proti
spracovaniu vašich osobných údajov, požiadať nás o
obmedzenie
spracovanie vašich osobných údajov alebo požiadať o
prenosnosť
vašich osobných údajov;
Môžete mať právo na to, aby o vás nebolo prijaté rozhodnutie, ktoré je založené výlučne na automatizovanom spracovaní vrátane profilovania, ak toto rozhodnutie má pre vás právne účinky alebo vás významne ovplyvňuje.
Spoločnosť Honeywell v rámci svojho náborového procesu nevykonáva výlučne automatizované rozhodovanie o uchádzačoch.
Podobne, ak sme vaše osobné údaje zhromažďovali a spracúvali s vaším súhlasom, môžete ho kedykoľvek odvolať. Odvolanie vášho súhlasu neovplyvní zákonnosť akéhokoľvek spracovania, ktoré sme vykonali pred vaším odvolaním, ani neovplyvní spracovanie vašich osobných údajov vykonané na základe iných zákonných dôvodov spracovania, ako je súhlas, a
Máte právo podať sťažnosť orgánu na ochranu údajov v súvislosti s naším zhromažďovaním a používaním vašich osobných údajov.
Uľahčíme vám uplatnenie práv, ktoré sa na vás vzťahujú, v súlade s platnými zákonmi. Ak chcete uplatniť ktorékoľvek zo svojich práv týkajúcich sa vašich osobných údajov, kontaktujte nás prostredníctvom služby HR Help alebo formulára žiadosti subjektu údajov, ktorý nájdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, alebo pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Ďalšie informácie pre obyvateľov Kalifornie
Ak ste obyvateľom štátu Kalifornia, táto časť dopĺňa oznámenie spoločnosti Honeywell o ochrane osobných údajov žiadateľov.
(i)      Kategórie zhromažďovaných a zverejňovaných osobných údajov
Spoločnosť Honeywell v predchádzajúcich dvanástich mesiacoch zhromaždila a zverejnila nasledujúce kategórie osobných údajov na naše obchodné účely:
Previous column
Next column
Kategórie
Zbierame
A.
Identifikátory, ako je meno, dátum narodenia, pohlavie, e-mailová adresa, telefónne čísla, poštová adresa, online identifikátory, účet na sociálnej sieti a iné identifikátory.
Áno
C.
Charakteristiky chránených klasifikácií podľa kalifornských alebo federálnych zákonov, ako sú rasa, etnický pôvod, náboženské alebo filozofické presvedčenie, členstvo v odboroch, zdravotné údaje, biometrické informácie, genetické údaje, zdravotné postihnutie, status veterána, sexuálna orientácia, osobná pošta, e-mailové a textové správy (pokiaľ spoločnosť Honeywell nie je ich príjemcom), vládne identifikátory (napr. číslo sociálneho poistenia), vodičský preukaz, pas, finančné a bankové informácie.
Áno
F.
informácie o aktivitách na internete alebo iných elektronických sieťach, ako je história prehliadania, interakcie s webovými stránkami spoločnosti Honeywell, e-mailové služby a služby textových správ.
Áno
G.
Geolokačné údaje, ako je poloha zariadenia a poloha IP.
Áno
H.
Zvukové, elektronické, vizuálne, tepelné alebo podobné informácie, ako je váš hlas a obraz, videozáznam alebo zvukový záznam, ak sa zúčastníte na telefonickom alebo videorozhovore alebo ak navštívite naše kancelárie.
Áno
I.
Profesijné informácie alebo informácie týkajúce sa zamestnania, ako je vaše povolanie, súčasný alebo predchádzajúci zamestnávateľ, názov pracovnej pozície, história vzdelania, akademická a odborná kvalifikácia, životopis, história zamestnania, referencie o prijatí do zamestnania, poznámky a hodnotenia z pohovoru, jazyky, členstvo v profesijných organizáciách, certifikáty, hodnotenie riadenia výkonnosti, odmeňovanie, preferencie týkajúce sa miesta a preferencie týkajúce sa cestovania.
Áno
K.
Závery vyvodené z akýchkoľvek vyššie uvedených osobných údajov s cieľom vytvoriť profil alebo zhrnutie, napríklad o preferenciách a vlastnostiach jednotlivca.
Áno
Load More
(ii)      Vaše práva
Máte právo poslať nám žiadosť o nasledujúce práva, ktoré sa vzťahujú na dvanásťmesačné obdobie, ktoré predchádza vašej žiadosti. Upozorňujeme, že tieto práva nie sú absolútne a v niektorých prípadoch podliehajú obmedzeniam uvedeným v platných právnych predpisoch:
Právo vedieť, aké osobné údaje sme o vás zhromaždili, kategórie zdrojov, z ktorých sme vaše osobné údaje zhromaždili, obchodné alebo komerčné účely, na ktoré sme vaše osobné údaje zhromaždili, a kategórie tretích strán, ktorým vaše osobné údaje poskytujeme;
Právo na vymazanie vašich osobných údajov;
Právo na opravu nepresných osobných údajov o vás;
Právo odmietnuť predaj alebo zdieľanie vašich osobných údajov;
Právo obmedziť spracovanie vašich citlivých osobných údajov;
Právo nebyť nezákonne diskriminovaný pri uplatňovaní svojich práv podľa platných zákonov.
Uľahčíme vám uplatnenie práv, ktoré sa na vás vzťahujú, v súlade s platnými právnymi predpismi a vzhľadom na typ a citlivosť osobných údajov, ktoré sú predmetom žiadosti, môžeme v záujme vašej ochrany požiadať o overenie vašej totožnosti a vyžiadať si od vás ďalšie informácie.
Ak chcete uplatniť akékoľvek svoje právo týkajúce sa vašich osobných údajov, kontaktujte nás prostredníctvom formulára žiadosti o poskytnutie údajov, ktorý nájdete na
adrese https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
, alebo nám pošlite e-mail na adresu
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell, môžete nás kontaktovať na adrese
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontaktujte nás
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo sťažnosti týkajúce sa spôsobu spracovania vašich osobných údajov alebo chcete uplatniť svoje práva, obráťte sa na:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(len ak ste už zamestnancom spoločnosti Honeywell) alebo nášho úradníka pre ochranu údajov na adrese
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
. Môžete nás kontaktovať aj prostredníctvom formulára žiadosti o poskytnutie údajov, ktorý nájdete na adrese
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Spanish
Actualizado: 1 de enero de 2023
Este Aviso de privacidad del solicitante ("Aviso de privacidad") describe cómo Honeywell International, Inc. y sus
filiales
(colectivamente "
Honeywell
", "
nosotros
") procesan su información personal cuando usted se une a nuestra Comunidad de talentos, busca o solicita un empleo y nos envía información personal a través de nuestro portal, sitios Web u otros medios de contratación, ya sea en línea o fuera de línea (los "
Servicios
"). Somos los responsables del tratamiento de su información personal a efectos de la legislación aplicable en materia de protección de datos.
Tenga en cuenta que si ya es empleado de Honeywell, también puede consultar la Política Global de Privacidad de Datos de Honeywell y el Aviso de Privacidad para Empleados, en caso de que exista uno para su jurisdicción. El objetivo de este Aviso de privacidad es proporcionarle información más detallada sobre nuestro procesamiento de su información personal en relación con su solicitud.
Información personal que recopilamos
Para procesar su solicitud, le pedimos que proporcione información personal sobre usted, por ejemplo, cuando se postula para una vacante en particular a través de nuestro sitio Web/portal o, en caso de que ya sea empleado de Honeywell, durante su relación laboral. Toda la información se proporciona de forma voluntaria y usted determina el alcance de la información que proporciona a Honeywell.
Tenga en cuenta que algunos datos pueden ser necesarios para completar la evaluación de su solicitud y que, si no los facilita, nuestra capacidad para considerarle candidato puede verse limitada.
(i)   Información personal
Podemos recopilar la siguiente información personal sobre usted:
Datos personales e información de contacto, como dirección de correo electrónico, número(s) de teléfono y fotografía;
Información profesional y educativa relacionada con su ocupación, como sus empleadores actuales o anteriores, su cargo u otra información sobre la organización a la que está afiliado. También puede facilitar su currículum vítae e información sobre sus cualificaciones o su formación, como títulos, campos de estudio, instituciones a las que ha asistido, idiomas, afiliaciones profesionales, certificaciones, detalles sobre las calificaciones de la gestión del rendimiento y la remuneración;
Preferencias profesionales (por ejemplo, objetivos a corto y largo plazo, disposición a trasladarse, fecha disponible para trasladarse y preferencias de ubicación);
Datos personales derivados de su participación en nuestro proceso de contratación, como, por ejemplo, los obtenidos durante las entrevistas, los correos electrónicos que intercambiamos con usted en relación con su solicitud o las conversaciones que mantenemos con usted a través de nuestro Chatbot en línea.
Información sonora y visual, como su voz e imagen captadas en fotografías, grabaciones de vídeo o audio si participa en una entrevista telefónica o de vídeo, o si visita nuestras oficinas;
Cualquier otra información personal que decida proporcionarnos voluntariamente.
(ii)  Información personal sensible
También podemos recopilar categorías especiales de información personal sobre usted (también conocidas como "categorías especiales de información personal")  cuando tengamos la obligación legal de hacerlo, o lala información es relevante para su futuro entorno de trabajo en Honeywell, o para la futura provisión de beneficios laborales, o con su consentimiento explícito, como por ejemplo:
Número de identificación emitido por el gobierno (como el número de la seguridad social);
Información demográfica, que puede incluir información sobre clasificaciones protegidas, como su edad, sexo, raza, discapacidad, orientación sexual, estado civil o condición de veterano;
Información sanitaria (por ejemplo, para adaptarse a cualquier discapacidad que pueda tener o a restricciones dietéticas);
Información relativa a las opiniones políticas, creencias religiosas o afiliación sindical de una persona;
Información sobre delitos o condenas penales de un individuo, así como cualquier otra información considerada sensible según las leyes de protección de datos aplicables. Cuando la ley lo permita y en la medida en que corresponda, Honeywell también puede necesitar realizar verificaciones de antecedentes y/o penales para determinar su idoneidad para un puesto vacante u oportunidad en Honeywell.
No le pedimos que nos proporcione información personal sensible a menos que sea necesario para cumplir nuestras obligaciones reglamentarias (por ejemplo, para el control de la igualdad de oportunidades), o a menos que nos haya dado su consentimiento explícito. Excepto en la medida en que lo exija la ley, el suministro de esta información será totalmente voluntario. Honeywell está comprometida con una verdadera fuerza laboral inclusiva y diversa. Al proporcionarnos sus datos de igualdad de oportunidades, nos permite comprender mejor el perfil de nuestros empleados en términos de datos de igualdad de oportunidades y las medidas que debemos tomar para atraer, promover y retener una fuerza laboral diversa independientemente de la edad, discapacidad, sexo, raza, creencias religiosas o filosóficas y orientación sexual.
(iii) Información personal que recopilamos automáticamente de usted
Podemos recopilar automáticamente cierta información sobre su visita a nuestros sitios web utilizando "cookies" y otras tecnologías de seguimiento similares. Para más información sobre las cookies que utilizamos en el sitio web a través del cual presenta su solicitud, lea nuestro
Aviso sobre cookies
.
Fuentes de información personal
Podemos recabar sus datos personales directamente de usted o indirectamente de terceros que estén legalmente autorizados a compartir su información con nosotros, como por ejemplo
Agencias de empleo, proveedores de servicios de verificación de antecedentes/empleo o de identidad;
Agencias de contratación (por ejemplo, cuando una agencia de contratación le identifica como posible candidato);
Información pública sobre usted procedente de sitios como LinkedIn o el sitio web de su empleador actual. También puede optar por proporcionarnos acceso a cierta información personal almacenada por terceros (por ejemplo, LinkedIn, Twitter, Google o Facebook). Al autorizar a Honeywell a tener acceso a esta información, usted acepta que podamos recopilar, almacenar y utilizar esta información de acuerdo con este Aviso de privacidad;
Por referencia o de boca en boca (por ejemplo, a través de una recomendación de un empleado actual o anterior). En el caso de las referencias, la persona que le recomiende , será responsable de obtener su consentimiento para facilitarnos sus datos personales.
Fines para los que se utilizan los datos personales
Utilizamos su información personal para los siguientes fines:
Para evaluar su solicitud y tomar decisiones de contratación;
Comunicarnos con usted e informarle sobre la contratación y/o su(s) candidatura(s) o cualquier otra comunicación necesaria;
Cumplir con los requisitos legales y reglamentarios aplicables y para que podamos establecer, ejercer o defender una reclamación legal;
Empleo y gestión empresarial (por ejemplo, establecer un historial laboral básico si se le contrata);
Realizar informes/análisis agregados relativos a los datos de actividad de los candidatos (por ejemplo, tráfico del sitio de empleo, embudo de candidatos, fuente de contratación, éxito de la campaña de contratación);
Sólo para empleados de Honeywell
:
Para excluirlo automáticamente de ser sugerido proactivamente para consideración de los reclutadores para una oportunidad de trabajo y no es elegible para consideración por su calificación actual de HPD de 9 bloques (que nunca será revelada a nadie fuera de Honeywell). Sin embargo, siempre podrá solicitar directamente cualquier oportunidad de trabajo disponible y su situación específica será considerada por un reclutador.
Únicamente si reside en Estados Unidos
:
Para enviarle comunicaciones por SMS, en concreto:
(i)     1-1 comunicaciones por SMS en relación con su candidatura a una determinada oferta de empleo; y/o
(ii)    previo consentimiento expreso por su parte
,
comunicaciones de campañas por SMS sobre oportunidades de empleo, asuntos laborales y actualizaciones de solicitudes.
Podrá darse de baja y/o revocar su consentimiento para recibir las comunicaciones mencionadas siguiendo las instrucciones que figuran en su perfil.
Si se le ofrece y acepta un empleo en Honeywell, la información recopilada durante el proceso de solicitud y contratación formará parte de su registro de empleo.
Tratamiento automatizado y elaboración de perfiles
Sujeto a su consentimiento expreso (que usted proporciona voluntariamente al unirse a nuestra Comunidad de Talentos o al marcar la casilla de consentimiento correspondiente durante el proceso de solicitud), realizamos "perfiles" para evaluar su idoneidad para determinadas oportunidades de empleo. Esto implica el uso de un algoritmo de comparación capaz de evaluar su perfil laboral y predecir su idoneidad para una determinada oportunidad de empleo. Llevamos a cabo este tratamiento automatizado con los siguientes fines:
ayudar a los responsables de la selección de personal a adecuar los perfiles de los candidatos a las oportunidades de empleo, sugiriendo candidatos a tener en cuenta para una oportunidad de empleo concreta; y
enviarle recomendaciones de trabajo personalizadas basadas en su perfil y/o  preferencias u otra información que pueda ser de su interés, como noticias, seminarios web y eventos de Honeywell.
Tenga en cuenta que, sobre la base de este perfil, es posible que no se le tenga en cuenta para determinadas oportunidades de empleo a menos que las haya solicitado directamente.
No tomamos decisiones de contratación basadas únicamente en procesos automatizados de toma de decisiones y/o elaboración de perfiles. Sus datos personales se someterán a decisiones humanas, ya que la decisión final de contratación la tomarán los responsables de contratación.
Bases jurídicas del tratamiento de sus datos personales
Ciertas jurisdicciones exigen que Honeywell tenga una base legal para procesar su información personal. Cuando la legislación aplicable nos exija justificar nuestras actividades de procesamiento, nuestra base legal para recopilar y utilizar su información personal según se describe en este Aviso de privacidad dependerá de la información personal en cuestión y del contexto específico en el que la recopilamos.
Consentimiento.
En general, normalmente recopilaremos su información personal cuando tengamos su consentimiento para hacerlo y cuando necesitemos su información personal para procesar su solicitud. Al acceder a nuestro sitio Web/portal, unirse a nuestra Comunidad de Talentos o solicitar uno de nuestros puestos de trabajo, usted otorga su consentimiento a Honeywell para recopilar y procesar la información personal descrita anteriormente para los fines descritos en este Aviso de Privacidad. Puede
retirar su consentimiento en
cualquier momento enviando una solicitud a través de nuestro portal de solicitud de datos en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o enviándonos un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Intereses legítimos.
En los intereses legítimos de Honeywell, a saber, la contratación, selección, evaluación y nombramiento de nuevos empleados y la gestión y administración de la contratación y el proceso de RR.HH. en la medida en que nuestros intereses legítimos no se vean anulados por sus derechos y libertades fundamentales.
Obligaciones legales.
Cumplimiento de las obligaciones legales de Honeywell cuando la legislación laboral u otras leyes exijan el procesamiento de su información personal (por ejemplo, en la medida en que la ley exija el control de la igualdad de oportunidades y la diversidad).
Intereses vitales.
También podemos necesitar sus datos personales para proteger sus intereses vitales (por ejemplo, por motivos de salud y seguridad si acude a una entrevista en nuestras instalaciones).
Si tiene alguna pregunta o necesita más información sobre la base jurídica en la que recogemos y utilizamos sus datos personales, envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com.
Con quién compartimos sus datos personales
Honeywell sólo compartirá su información personal con terceros en las siguientes circunstancias:
Entidades del grupo Honeywell
. Podemos compartir su información personal con otras entidades del grupo ubicadas en jurisdicciones de todo el mundo para evaluar su perfil y considerarlo para cualquier oportunidad de contratación a nivel de grupo.
Proveedores de servicios
Podemos compartir específicamente su información personal con terceros proveedores de servicios que prestan servicios específicos en nuestro nombre (por ejemplo, proveedores de contratación y externalización de personal y proveedores de análisis). Dichos terceros pueden variar en función de su país y cambiarán de vez en cuando, pero pueden incluir a Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. y sus respectivos proveedores externos.
Empleados de Honeywell.
ISi ya es empleado de Honeywell, tenga en cuenta que algunas secciones de su perfil son públicas y, por lo tanto, visibles para todos los empleados de Honeywell (específicamente, su nombre, cargo, fotografía, habilidades, áreas de interés, experiencia laboral y educación). Sin embargo, dichas secciones son editables y usted podrá elegir qué información sobre usted se muestra en su perfil. Tenga en cuenta que los objetivos profesionales, traslados y las secciones de estado del perfil "abierto a nuevas oportunidades" no serán públicas y, por lo tanto, no serán visibles para todos los empleados de Honeywell (sólo para el Equipo de Talento de Honeywell).
Otros terceros.
Honeywell puede compartir su información personal con cualquier organismo competente de aplicación de la ley, regulador, agencia gubernamental, tribunal o tercero cuando creamos que la divulgación es necesaria según la ley aplicable o en la creencia de buena fe de que dicha acción es necesaria para ejercer, establecer o defender nuestros derechos legales o para proteger sus intereses vitales o los de otra persona. También podemos compartir su información personal con terceros con su consentimiento o por indicación suya (por ejemplo, un árbitro o una asociación profesional).
Transferencias internacionales de datos personales
HHoneywell es una organización global y su información personal puede transferirse, guardarse, almacenarse o utilizarse en varios lugares del mundo, como EE.UU. e India. Esto significa que cuando recopilamos su información personal, ésta puede ser procesada en países que pueden tener leyes de protección de datos diferentes a las leyes de su país. Sin embargo, Honeywell siempre tomará medidas razonables para proteger su privacidad y proporcionar un nivel de protección de la información personal que sea comparable al de su país de residencia, lo que incluye la implementación de las
Cláusulas Contractuales Tipo de la Comisión
Europea
que se pueden encontrar en el sitio Web de la Comisión en
https://ec.europa.eu.
Retención
Conservaremos su información personal durante el tiempo que sea necesario en relación con los fines descritos en este Aviso de privacidad y de acuerdo con el Programa de conservación de registros de Honeywell o según lo exija la legislación aplicable.
Sus derechos
Dependiendo de la legislación aplicable, usted puede tener ciertos derechos con respecto a su información personal. Si reside en California, consulte la sección "
Información adicional para residentes en California
" que figura a continuación.
Usted puede tener derecho a
acceder, corregir, actualizar
o solicitar la
supresión
de su información personal;
Puede oponerse al tratamiento de sus datos personales, pedirnos que
restrinjamos
el tratamiento de sus datos personales o solicitar
la portabilidad
de los mismos;
Puede tener derecho a que no se tome una decisión sobre usted basada únicamente en un tratamiento automatizado, incluida la elaboración de perfiles, si dicha decisión produce efectos jurídicos sobre usted o le afecta de forma significativa.
Honeywell no toma, como parte de su proceso de selección de personal, decisiones sobre los candidatos basadas únicamente en tratamientos automatizados.
Del mismo modo, si hemos recopilado y procesado su información personal con su consentimiento, puede retirarlo en cualquier momento. La retirada de su consentimiento no afectará a la legalidad de cualquier tratamiento que hayamos realizado antes de su retirada, ni afectará al tratamiento de su información personal realizado sobre la base de motivos legales de tratamiento distintos del consentimiento; y
Tiene derecho a presentar una reclamación ante una autoridad de protección de datos sobre la recogida y el uso que hacemos de su información personal.
Le facilitaremos el ejercicio de los derechos que le correspondan de conformidad con la legislación aplicable. Para ejercer cualquiera de sus derechos relativos a su información personal, póngase en contacto con nosotros a través de HR Help, o del formulario de solicitud del interesado que encontrará en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Información adicional para residentes en California
Si usted reside en el Estado de California, esta sección complementa el Aviso de privacidad para solicitantes de Honeywell.
(i)      Categorías de información personal recopilada y divulgada
Honeywell ha recopilado y divulgado las siguientes categorías de información personal para nuestros fines comerciales en los doce meses anteriores:
Previous column
Next column
Categorías
Recogemos
A.
Identificadores como nombre, fecha de nacimiento, sexo, dirección de correo electrónico, números de teléfono, dirección postal, identificadores en línea, cuenta de redes sociales y otros identificadores.
Sí
C.
Características de clasificaciones protegidas según las leyes federales o de California, como raza, origen étnico, creencias religiosas o filosóficas, afiliación sindical, datos de salud, información biométrica, datos genéticos, discapacidad, condición de veterano, orientación sexual, correo personal, correo electrónico y mensajes de texto (a menos que Honeywell sea el destinatario), identificadores gubernamentales (por ejemplo, número de seguro social), licencia de conducir, pasaporte, información financiera y bancaria.
Sí
F.
Información de actividad en Internet u otras redes electrónicas, como historial de navegación, interacciones con sitios Web de Honeywell, correo electrónico y servicios de mensajería de texto.
Sí
G.
Datos de geolocalización, como la ubicación del dispositivo y la ubicación IP.
Sí
H.
Información sonora, electrónica, visual, térmica o similar, como su voz e imagen, grabaciones de vídeo o audio si participa en una entrevista telefónica o por vídeo o si visita nuestras oficinas.
Sí
I.
Información profesional o relacionada con el empleo, como su ocupación, empleadores actuales o anteriores, cargo, historial educativo, cualificaciones académicas y profesionales, currículum vitae, historial laboral, referencias de contratación, notas y evaluaciones de entrevistas, idiomas, afiliaciones profesionales, certificaciones, calificaciones de gestión del rendimiento, remuneración, preferencias de ubicación y preferencias de viaje.
Sí
K.
Inferencias extraídas de cualquiera de los datos personales enumerados anteriormente para crear un perfil o resumen sobre, por ejemplo, las preferencias y características de un individuo.
Sí
Load More
(ii)      Sus derechos
Tiene derecho a solicitarnos los siguientes derechos para el periodo de doce meses anterior a su solicitud. Tenga en cuenta que estos derechos no son absolutos y que, en determinados casos, están sujetos a las limitaciones especificadas en la legislación aplicable:
El derecho a saber qué información personal hemos recopilado sobre usted, las categorías de fuentes de las que hemos recopilado su información personal; la finalidad empresarial o comercial para la que hemos recopilado su información personal, y las categorías de terceros con los que revelamos su información personal;
Derecho a suprimir sus datos personales;
Derecho a corregir la información personal inexacta sobre usted;
Derecho a optar por no vender o compartir su información personal;
Derecho a limitar el tratamiento de sus datos personales sensibles;
Derecho a no ser discriminado ilegalmente por ejercer los derechos que le otorga la legislación vigente.
Le facilitaremos el ejercicio de los derechos que le correspondan de conformidad con la legislación aplicable y, teniendo en cuenta el tipo y la sensibilidad de la información personal objeto de la solicitud, para su protección, es posible que tengamos que solicitar que se verifique su identidad y pedirle información adicional.
Para ejercer cualquiera de sus derechos relacionados con su Información personal, póngase en contacto con nosotros a través del formulario de solicitud del interesado que se encuentra en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
o envíe un correo electrónico a
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Si ya es empleado de Honeywell, puede ponerse en contacto con nosotros en
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Póngase en contacto con nosotros
Si tiene alguna pregunta o queja sobre cómo se procesa su información personal o desea ejercer sus derechos, póngase en contacto con:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(sólo si ya es empleado de Honeywell) o con nuestro Responsable de Protección de Datos en
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
También puede ponerse en contacto con nosotros a través del formulario de solicitud del interesado que encontrará en
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Swedish
Uppdaterad: 1 januari 2023
Detta integritetsmeddelande för sökande ("integritetsmeddelande") beskriver hur Honeywell International, Inc. och dess
dotterbolag
(tillsammans "
Honeywell
",
"
oss
" eller "
vi
") behandlar dina personuppgifter när du går med i vår Talent Community, söker eller ansöker om ett jobb och skickar personuppgifter till oss via vår portal, webbplatser eller andra rekryteringsmedier, oavsett om de är online eller offline ("
tjänsterna
"). Vi är personuppgiftsansvariga för dina personuppgifter i enlighet med tillämpliga dataskyddslagar.
Observera att om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell kan du även läsa Honeywells globala integritetspolicy och integritetsmeddelandet för anställda om det finns ett sådant för din jurisdiktion. Syftet med detta integritetsmeddelande är att ge dig mer detaljerad information om vår behandling av dina personuppgifter i samband med din ansökan.
Personuppgifter som vi samlar in
För att behandla din ansökan ber vi dig att lämna personuppgifter om dig själv, till exempel när du söker en viss ledig tjänst via vår webbplats/portal eller, om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell, under ditt anställningsförhållande. All information lämnas på frivillig basis och du bestämmer själv i vilken utsträckning du lämnar information till Honeywell.
Tänk på att vissa uppgifter kan vara nödvändiga för att vi ska kunna utvärdera din ansökan, och om de inte lämnas kan vår möjlighet att överväga dig som kandidat vara begränsad.
(i)   Personlig information
Vi kan samla in följande personuppgifter om dig:
Personuppgifter och kontaktinformation, inklusive e-postadress, telefonnummer och foto;
Yrkes- och utbildningsinformation relaterad till ditt yrke, såsom din nuvarande eller tidigare arbetsgivare, din jobbtitel eller annan information om den organisation som du är ansluten till. Du kan också lämna ditt CV och information om dina kvalifikationer eller din utbildning, t.ex. dina examina, studieinriktningar, vilka institutioner du har gått på, språk, yrkesmässiga medlemskap, certifieringar, uppgifter om resultatbedömningar och ersättning;
Karriärpreferenser (t.ex. kortsiktiga och långsiktiga mål, villighet att omplacera, datum för omplacering och ortspreferenser);
Personuppgifter som härrör från ditt deltagande i vår rekryteringsprocess, t.ex. de som erhålls under intervjuer, de e-postmeddelanden vi utbyter med dig angående din ansökan eller de samtal vi har med dig via vår Chatbot online.
Ljud- och bildinformation, t.ex. din röst och bild som fångats på fotografier, video- eller ljudinspelningar om du deltar i en telefon- eller videointervju eller om du besöker våra kontor;
Alla andra personuppgifter som du frivilligt väljer att lämna till oss.
(ii)  Känslig personlig information
Vi kan också samla in särskilda kategorier av personuppgifter om dig (även kallade "särskilda kategorier av personuppgifter") om vi har en rättslig skyldighet att göra det, eller om informationen är relevant för din framtida arbetsmiljö på Honeywell, eller för framtida tillhandahållande av anställningsförmåner, eller med ditt uttryckliga samtycke, t.ex:
Statligt utfärdat identifikationsnummer (t.ex. ett socialförsäkringsnummer);
Demografisk information, som kan innehålla information om skyddade klassificeringar, såsom din ålder, kön, ras, funktionshinder, sexuella läggning, civilstånd eller veteranstatus;
Hälsouppgifter (t.ex. för att ta hänsyn till eventuella funktionshinder eller dietrestriktioner);
Information om en persons politiska åsikter, religiösa övertygelse eller medlemskap i fackförening;
Information om en individs brott eller fällande domar, samt all annan information som anses vara känslig enligt gällande dataskyddslagar. Där det är tillåtet enligt lag och i tillämplig utsträckning kan Honeywell också behöva utföra bakgrunds- och/eller brottskontroller för att avgöra din lämplighet för en öppen position eller möjlighet hos Honeywell.
Vi kräver inte att du förser oss med känsliga personuppgifter om det inte är nödvändigt för att uppfylla våra lagstadgade skyldigheter (t.ex. för övervakning av lika möjligheter) eller om du inte har gett ditt uttryckliga samtycke. Förutom i den utsträckning som krävs enligt lag kommer tillhandahållandet av denna information att vara helt frivilligt. Honeywell har åtagit sig att ha en verkligt inkluderande och mångfaldig arbetsstyrka. Genom att förse oss med dina uppgifter om lika möjligheter gör du det möjligt för oss att bättre förstå vår medarbetarprofil när det gäller uppgifter om lika möjligheter och de åtgärder vi behöver vidta för att attrahera, främja och behålla en mångsidig arbetsstyrka oavsett ålder, funktionshinder, kön, ras, religiös eller filosofisk övertygelse och sexuell läggning.
(iii) Personuppgifter som vi samlar in automatiskt från dig
Vi kan automatiskt samla in viss information från dig om ditt besök på våra webbplatser med hjälp av "cookies" och andra liknande spårningstekniker. För mer information om de cookies vi använder på den webbplats där du skickar in din ansökan, läs vårt
meddelande om cookies
.
Källor till personlig information
Vi kan samla in dina personuppgifter direkt från dig eller indirekt från tredje parter som har laglig rätt att dela dina uppgifter med oss, t.ex:
Arbetsförmedlingar, leverantörer av tjänster för bakgrunds-/anställningskontroller eller identitetsverifiering;
Rekryteringsbyråer (t.ex. när en rekryteringsbyrå identifierar dig som en potentiell kandidat);
Allmänt tillgänglig information om dig från webbplatser som LinkedIn eller din nuvarande arbetsgivares webbplats. Du kan också välja att ge oss tillgång till viss personlig information som lagras av tredje part (t.ex. LinkedIn, Twitter, Google eller Facebook). Genom att tillåta Honeywell att få tillgång till denna information samtycker du till att vi får samla in, lagra och använda denna information i enlighet med detta integritetsmeddelande;
Genom referens eller muntligt (till exempel genom en hänvisning från en nuvarande eller tidigare anställd). För hänvisningar kommer den person som hänvisar dig att vara ansvarig för att få ditt samtycke till att förse oss med dina personuppgifter.
Ändamål för vilka personuppgifter används
Vi använder dina personuppgifter för följande ändamål:
För att utvärdera din ansökan och fatta anställningsbeslut;
Kommunicera med dig och informera dig om rekryteringen och/eller din/dina ansökan/ansökningar eller annan nödvändig kommunikation;
Följa tillämpliga rättsliga och regulatoriska krav och för att vi ska kunna fastställa, utöva eller försvara ett rättsligt anspråk;
Anställning och företagsledning (t.ex. upprätta ett grundläggande anställningsregister om du anställs);
För att utföra aggregerade rapporter/analyser avseende kandidaternas aktivitetsdata (t.ex. trafik till karriärsajten, kandidattrappa, anställningskälla, rekryteringskampanjens framgång);
Endast för anställda på Honeywell
:
För att automatiskt utesluta dig från att proaktivt föreslås för övervägande till rekryterare för en jobbmöjlighet och är inte berättigad till övervägande enligt din nuvarande HPD 9-block rating (som aldrig kommer att avslöjas för någon utanför Honeywell). Du kommer dock alltid att kunna ansöka direkt till alla lediga jobb och din specifika situation kommer att övervägas av en rekryterare.
Endast om du är bosatt i USA
: För att skicka meddelanden till dig via SMS, specifikt:
(i)     1-1 SMS-kommunikation i samband med din ansökan till en viss ledig tjänst och/eller
(ii)    med förbehåll för ditt uttryckliga samtycke, SMS-kampanjkommunikation om anställningsmöjligheter, jobbfrågor och uppdateringar av ansökningar.
Du kommer att kunna välja bort och/eller återkalla ditt samtycke till att ta emot ovannämnda meddelanden genom att följa instruktionerna i din profil.
Om du erbjuds och accepterar anställning hos Honeywell kommer den information som samlats in under ansöknings- och rekryteringsprocessen att bli en del av din anställningshistorik.
Automatiserad behandling och profilering
Med förbehåll för ditt uttryckliga samtycke (som du frivilligt ger när du går med i vår Talent Community eller när du markerar lämplig samtyckesruta under ansökningsprocessen) utför vi "profilering" för att utvärdera din lämplighet för särskilda jobbmöjligheter. Detta innebär att vi använder en matchningsalgoritm som kan utvärdera din anställningsprofil och förutsäga din lämplighet för en viss jobbmöjlighet. Vi utför denna automatiserade behandling i syfte att:
hjälpa rekryterare att matcha kandidaternas profiler med lediga jobb genom att föreslå kandidater som kan komma ifråga för ett specifikt jobb, och
skicka personliga jobbrekommendationer till dig baserat på din profil och/eller dina preferenser eller annan information som kan vara av intresse för dig, till exempel Honeywell-nyheter, webbseminarier och evenemang.
Observera att du på grund av denna profilering kanske inte kommer att beaktas för vissa jobbmöjligheter om du inte har sökt dem direkt.
Vi fattar inga anställningsbeslut som enbart baseras på automatiserade beslutsprocesser och/eller profilering. Dina personuppgifter kommer att bli föremål för mänskliga beslut eftersom det slutliga anställningsbeslutet kommer att fattas av rekryterarna eller den anställande chefen.
De rättsliga grunderna för behandling av dina personuppgifter
Vissa jurisdiktioner kräver att Honeywell har en rättslig grund för att behandla din personliga information. Om tillämplig lag kräver att vi motiverar våra behandlingsaktiviteter, beror vår rättsliga grund för insamling och användning av dina personuppgifter enligt beskrivningen i detta integritetsmeddelande på vilka personuppgifter det gäller och det specifika sammanhang i vilket vi samlar in dem.
Samtycke.
I allmänhet kommer vi normalt att samla in personuppgifter från dig där vi har ditt samtycke till att göra det och där vi behöver dina personuppgifter för att behandla din ansökan. Genom att besöka vår webbplats/portal, gå med i vår Talent Community eller ansöka om en av våra tjänster ger du ditt samtycke till Honeywell att samla in och vidare behandla de personuppgifter som beskrivs ovan för de ändamål som beskrivs i detta sekretessmeddelande. Du kan när som helst
återkalla ditt samtycke
genom att skicka in en begäran via vår portal för begäran från registrerade på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Berättigade intressen.
I Honeywells legitima intressen, nämligen rekrytering, urval, utvärdering och anställning av nya medarbetare samt hantering och administration av rekryteringen och HR-processen i den utsträckning våra legitima intressen inte åsidosätts av dina grundläggande rättigheter och friheter.
Rättsliga skyldigheter.
Överensstämmelse med Honeywells rättsliga skyldigheter där arbetsrätt eller andra lagar kräver behandling av dina personuppgifter (till exempel i den utsträckning lagen kräver övervakning av lika möjligheter och mångfald).
Vitala intressen.
Vi kan också behöva dina personuppgifter för att skydda dina vitala intressen (t.ex. hälso- och säkerhetsskäl om du deltar i en intervju på vår webbplats)
Om du har några frågor om eller behöver ytterligare information om den rättsliga grund på vilken vi samlar in och använder dina personuppgifter, vänligen skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
Vem vi delar din personliga information med
Honeywell kommer endast att dela din personliga information med tredje part under följande omständigheter:
Enheter inom Honeywell-koncernen.
Vi kan komma att dela dina personuppgifter med andra koncernenheter i jurisdiktioner runt om i världen för att utvärdera din profil och överväga eventuella rekryteringsmöjligheter på koncernnivå.
Tjänsteleverantörer
Vi kan specifikt dela din personliga information med tredjepartsleverantörer som utför specifika tjänster för vår räkning (till exempel rekrytering och outsourcing av bemanningsleverantörer och analysleverantörer). Sådana tredje parter kan variera beroende på ditt land och kommer att ändras från tid till annan men kan inkludera Phenom People, Inc, Cornerstone OnDemand Inc, och deras respektive tredjepartsleverantörer.
Anställda på Honeywell.
Om du redan är anställd hos Honeywell, observera att vissa avsnitt i din profil är offentliga och därför synliga för alla Honeywell-anställda (särskilt ditt namn, titel, foto, färdigheter, intresseområden, arbetslivserfarenhet och utbildning). Sådana avsnitt är dock redigerbara och du kommer att kunna välja vilken information om dig som ska visas i din profil. Observera att karriärmål, omplaceringar  och profilstatus "öppen för nya möjligheter" kommer inte att vara offentliga och därför inte synliga för alla Honeywell-anställda (endast för Honeywells Talent Team).
Andra tredje parter.
Honeywell kan dela dina personuppgifter med behöriga brottsbekämpande organ, tillsynsmyndigheter, myndigheter, domstolar eller tredje part om vi anser att utlämnandet är nödvändigt enligt tillämplig lag eller i god tro att en sådan åtgärd är nödvändig för att utöva, fastställa eller försvara våra juridiska rättigheter eller för att skydda dina vitala intressen eller någon annan persons intressen. Vi kan också dela dina personuppgifter med andra med ditt samtycke eller på din anvisning (t.ex. en domare eller yrkesförening).
Internationell överföring av personuppgifter
Honeywell är en global organisation och dina personuppgifter kan överföras till, förvaras, lagras eller användas på olika platser i världen, t.ex. i USA och Indien. Detta innebär att när vi samlar in dina personuppgifter kan de behandlas i länder som kan ha dataskyddslagar som skiljer sig från lagarna i ditt land. Honeywell kommer dock alltid att vidta rimliga åtgärder för att skydda din integritet och tillhandahålla en skyddsnivå för personuppgifter som är jämförbar med den i ditt hemland, vilket inkluderar implementering av
Europeiska
kommissionens standardavtalsklausuler
som kan hittas på kommissionens webbplats på
https://ec.europa.eu.
Bevarande
Vi behåller dina personuppgifter så länge det är nödvändigt i samband med de syften som beskrivs i detta integritetsmeddelande och i enlighet med Honeywells schema för bevarande av uppgifter eller enligt vad som krävs i tillämplig lag.
Dina rättigheter
Beroende på tillämplig lag kan du ha vissa rättigheter med avseende på dina personuppgifter. Om du är bosatt i Kalifornien, se "
Ytterligare information för personer bosatta i Kalifornien
" nedan.
Du kan ha rätt att få
tillgång till
,
korrigera
,
uppdatera
eller begära
radering
av dina personuppgifter;
Du kan
invända
mot behandlingen av dina personuppgifter, be oss att
begränsa
behandling av dina personuppgifter eller begära
portabilitet
av dina personuppgifter;
Du kan ha rätt att inte få ett beslut fattat om dig som enbart baseras på automatiserad behandling, inklusive profilering, om det beslutet ger rättsliga effekter om dig eller påverkar dig avsevärt.
Honeywell fattar inte, som en del av sin rekryteringsprocess, enbart automatiserade beslut om kandidater.
På samma sätt, om vi har samlat in och behandlat dina personuppgifter med ditt samtycke, kan du när som helst återkalla ditt samtycke. Att dra tillbaka ditt samtycke påverkar inte lagligheten av någon behandling som vi utförde före ditt tillbakadragande, och det påverkar inte heller behandlingen av dina personuppgifter som utförs i förlitan på andra lagliga behandlingsgrunder än samtycke; och
Du har rätt att klaga till en dataskyddsmyndighet om vår insamling och användning av dina personuppgifter.
Vi kommer att underlätta ditt utövande av de rättigheter som gäller för dig i enlighet med tillämplig lag. Om du vill utöva någon av dina rättigheter avseende dina personuppgifter kan du kontakta oss via HR Help eller via formuläret för begäran från den registrerade som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
.
Ytterligare information för invånare i Kalifornien
Om du är bosatt i delstaten Kalifornien kompletterar detta avsnitt Honeywells sekretessmeddelande för sökande.
(i)    Kategorier av personuppgifter som samlas in och lämnas ut
Honeywell har samlat in och lämnat ut följande kategorier av personuppgifter för våra affärssyften under de senaste tolv månaderna:
Previous column
Next column
Kategorier
Vi samlar in
A.
Identifierare såsom namn, födelsedatum, kön, e-postadress, telefonnummer, postadress, online-identifierare, konto på sociala medier och andra identifierare.
Ja
C.
Egenskaper hos skyddade klassificeringar enligt kalifornisk eller federal lag, såsom ras, etnicitet, religiös eller filosofisk övertygelse, medlemskap i fackförening, hälsouppgifter, biometrisk information, genetiska uppgifter, funktionshinder, veteranstatus, sexuell läggning, personlig post, e-post och textmeddelanden (om inte Honeywell är den avsedda mottagaren), statliga identifierare (t.ex. socialförsäkringsnummer), körkort, pass, ekonomisk information och bankinformation.
Ja
F.
Information om aktiviteter på Internet eller andra elektroniska nätverk, t.ex. webbläsarhistorik, interaktioner med Honeywells webbplatser, e-post och textmeddelandetjänster.
Ja
G.
Geolokaliseringsdata, t.ex. enhetens position och IP-position.
Ja
H.
Ljud, elektronisk, visuell, termisk eller liknande information, t.ex. din röst och bild, video- eller ljudinspelningar om du deltar i en telefon- eller videointervju eller om du besöker våra kontor.
Ja
I.
Yrkes- eller anställningsrelaterade uppgifter såsom yrke, nuvarande eller tidigare arbetsgivare, befattning, utbildning, akademiska och yrkesmässiga kvalifikationer, CV, arbetshistorik, anställningsreferenser, intervjuanteckningar och bedömningar, språk, yrkesmässiga medlemskap, certifieringar, prestationsbedömningar, ersättning, plats- och resepreferenser.
Ja
K.
Slutsatser som dras från någon av de personuppgifter som anges ovan för att skapa en profil eller sammanfattning om t.ex. en individs preferenser och egenskaper.
Ja
Load More
(ii)      Dina rättigheter
Du har rätt att skicka en begäran till oss om följande rättigheter under den tolvmånadersperiod som föregår din begäran. Observera att dessa rättigheter inte är absoluta och att de i vissa fall är föremål för begränsningar i enlighet med tillämplig lag:
Rätt att få veta vilka personuppgifter vi har samlat in om dig, från vilka kategorier av källor vi har samlat in dina personuppgifter, för vilka affärs- eller kommersiella ändamål vi har samlat in dina personuppgifter och vilka kategorier av tredje parter som vi lämnar ut dina personuppgifter till;
Rätt att radera dina personuppgifter;
Rätt att korrigera felaktiga personuppgifter om dig;
Rätten att välja bort försäljning eller delning av dina personuppgifter;
Rätten att begränsa behandlingen av dina känsliga personuppgifter;
Rätten att inte utsättas för olaglig diskriminering när du utövar dina rättigheter enligt gällande lagar.
Vi kommer att underlätta ditt utövande av de rättigheter som gäller för dig i enlighet med tillämplig lag och, med tanke på typen och känsligheten hos de personuppgifter som omfattas av begäran, för ditt skydd, kan vi behöva begära att verifiera din identitet och begära ytterligare information från dig.
Om du vill utöva någon av dina rättigheter i samband med dina personuppgifter kan du kontakta oss via formuläret för begäran om uppgifter som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
eller skicka ett e-postmeddelande till
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
. Om du redan är anställd av Honeywell kan du kontakta oss på
HRhelp@honeywell.com
.
Kontakta oss
Om du har några frågor eller klagomål om hur dina personuppgifter behandlas eller vill utöva dina rättigheter, vänligen kontakta:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(endast om du redan är anställd av Honeywell) eller vårt dataskyddsombud på
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com.
Du kan också kontakta oss via formuläret för begäran från den registrerade som finns på
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
.
Turkish
Güncellenmiştir: 1 Ocak 2023
Bu Başvuru Sahibi Gizlilik Bildirimi ("Gizlilik Bildirimi"), Honeywell International, Inc. ve
bağlı kuruluş
larının (topluca "
Honeywell
", "
biz
" veya "
biz
") Yetenek Topluluğumuza katıldığınızda, bir iş aradığınızda veya başvurduğunuzda ve portalımız, web sitelerimiz veya diğer işe alım ortamları aracılığıyla çevrimiçi veya çevrimdışı olarak kişisel bilgilerinizi bize gönderdiğinizde ("
Hizmetler
") kişisel bilgilerinizi nasıl işlediğini açıklamaktadır. Geçerli veri koruma yasalarının amaçları doğrultusunda kişisel bilgilerinizin kontrolörleri biziz.
Halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız, Honeywell Global Veri Gizliliği Politikasına ve yargı alanınız için varsa Çalışan Gizliliği Bildirimine de başvurabileceğinizi lütfen unutmayın. Bu Gizlilik Bildiriminin amacı, başvurunuzla ilgili olarak kişisel bilgilerinizi işlememiz hakkında size daha ayrıntılı bilgi vermektir.
Topladığımız Kişisel Bilgiler
Başvurunuzu işleme koymak için, örneğin web sitemiz/portalımız aracılığıyla belirli bir iş ilanına başvurduğunuzda veya halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanı olmanız durumunda, istihdam ilişkiniz sırasında kendinizle ilgili kişisel bilgileri sağlamanızı isteriz. Tüm bilgiler gönüllülük esasına göre sağlanır ve Honeywell'e verdiğiniz bilgilerin kapsamını siz belirlersiniz.
Başvurunuzun değerlendirilmesini tamamlamak için bazı bilgilerin gerekli olabileceğini ve bu bilgilerin sağlanmaması halinde sizi aday olarak değerlendirme imkanımızın sınırlı olabileceğini lütfen unutmayın.
(i)  Kişisel bilgiler
Sizin hakkınızda aşağıdaki kişisel bilgileri toplayabiliriz:
E-posta adresi, telefon numarası/numaraları ve fotoğraf dahil olmak üzere kişisel bilgiler ve iletişim bilgileri;
Mevcut veya önceki işverenleriniz, iş unvanınız veya bağlı olduğunuz kuruluşla ilgili diğer bilgiler gibi mesleğinizle ilgili mesleki ve eğitim bilgileri. Ayrıca CV/özgeçmişinizi ve dereceleriniz, çalışma alanlarınız, katıldığınız kurumlar, diller, mesleki üyelikler, sertifikalar, performans yönetimi derecelendirmeleri ve ücretlendirme ile ilgili ayrıntılar gibi nitelikleriniz veya eğitiminiz hakkında bilgi sağlayabilirsiniz;
Kariyer tercihleri (örneğin, kısa ve uzun vadeli hedefler, yer değiştirme isteği, yer değiştirme için uygun tarih ve yer tercihleri);
Örneğin mülakatlar sırasında elde edilenler, başvurunuzla ilgili olarak sizinle paylaştığımız e-postalar veya çevrimiçi Sohbet Robotumuz aracılığıyla sizinle yaptığımız konuşmalar gibi işe alım sürecimize katılımınızdan elde edilen kişisel bilgiler.
Bir telefon veya video görüşmesine katılmanız veya ofislerimizi ziyaret etmeniz halinde fotoğraf, video veya ses kayıtlarında yakalanan sesiniz ve benzerliğiniz gibi işitsel ve görsel bilgiler;
Bize gönüllü olarak vermeyi seçtiğiniz diğer kişisel bilgiler.
(ii)  Hassas kişisel bilgiler
Ayrıca, yasal bir zorunluluğumuz olduğunda veya aşağıdaki durumlarda hakkınızda özel kişisel bilgi kategorileri ("özel kişisel bilgi kategorileri" olarak da bilinir) toplayabiliriz bilgiler Honeywell'deki gelecekteki çalışma ortamınızla veya gelecekte istihdam avantajlarının sağlanmasıyla ilgilidir veya açık izninizle, örneğin:
Devlet tarafından verilen kimlik numarası (sosyal güvenlik numarası gibi);
Yaşınız, cinsiyetiniz, ırkınız, engellilik durumunuz, cinsel yöneliminiz, medeni durumunuz veya gazilik durumunuz gibi korunan sınıflandırmalarla ilgili bilgileri içerebilecek demografik bilgiler;
Sağlık bilgileri (örneğin, sahip olabileceğiniz herhangi bir engele veya diyet kısıtlamalarına uyum sağlamak için);
Bir kişinin siyasi görüşleri veya dini inançları ya da sendika üyeliği ile ilgili bilgiler;
Bir bireyin cezai suçları veya mahkumiyetleri hakkındaki bilgilerin yanı sıra geçerli veri koruma yasaları kapsamında hassas kabul edilen diğer bilgiler. Yasaların izin verdiği durumlarda ve uygulanabilir olduğu ölçüde, Honeywell'in Honeywell'deki açık bir pozisyon veya fırsat için uygunluğunuzu belirlemek amacıyla geçmiş ve/veya cezai kontroller yapması da gerekebilir.
Düzenleyici yükümlülüklerimizi yerine getirmek için gerekli olmadıkça (örneğin, fırsat eşitliği denetimi için) veya açık rızanızı vermediğiniz sürece bize hassas kişisel bilgilerinizi vermenizi istemeyiz. Yasaların gerektirdiği durumlar dışında, bu bilgilerin sağlanması tamamen gönüllülük esasına dayanacaktır. Honeywell gerçek anlamda kapsayıcı ve çeşitlilik içeren bir iş gücüne kendini adamıştır. Bize fırsat eşitliği verilerinizi sağlayarak, fırsat eşitliği verileri açısından çalışan profilimizi ve yaş, engellilik, cinsiyet, ırk, dini veya felsefi inançlar ve cinsel yönelimden bağımsız olarak çeşitli bir işgücünü çekmek, teşvik etmek ve elde tutmak için atmamız gereken adımları daha iyi anlamamızı sağlarsınız.
(iii) Sizden otomatik olarak topladığımız kişisel bilgiler
"Çerezler" ve diğer benzer izleme teknolojilerini kullanarak web sitelerimizi ziyaretiniz hakkında sizden belirli bilgileri otomatik olarak toplayabiliriz. Başvurunuzu gönderdiğiniz web sitesinde kullandığımız çerezler hakkında daha fazla bilgi için lütfen
Çerez Bildirimimizi
okuyun.
Kişisel Bilgi Kaynakları
Kişisel bilgilerinizi doğrudan sizden veya dolaylı olarak bilgilerinizi bizimle paylaşmaya yasal olarak yetkili olan üçüncü taraflardan toplayabiliriz, örneğin
İş bulma kurumları, geçmiş/istihdam kontrolü veya kimlik doğrulama hizmeti sağlayıcıları;
İşe alım ajansları (örneğin, bir işe alım ajansı sizi potansiyel bir aday olarak tanımladığında);
LinkedIn veya mevcut işvereninizin web sitesi gibi sitelerden sizin hakkınızda kamuya açık bilgiler. Ayrıca bize üçüncü taraflarca (örneğin LinkedIn, Twitter, Google veya Facebook) saklanan belirli kişisel bilgilere erişim sağlamayı da seçebilirsiniz. Honeywell'e bu bilgilere erişim yetkisi vererek, bu bilgileri bu Gizlilik Bildirimine uygun olarak toplayabileceğimizi, saklayabileceğimizi ve kullanabileceğimizi kabul etmiş olursunuz;
Referans veya kulaktan kulağa (örneğin, mevcut veya eski bir çalışanın yönlendirmesi yoluyla). Yönlendirmelerde, kişisel bilgilerinizi bize sağlamak için onayınızı almaktan sizi yönlendiren kişi sorumlu olacaktır.
Kişisel Bilgilerin Kullanıldığı Amaçlar
Kişisel bilgilerinizi aşağıdaki amaçlar için kullanırız:
Başvurunuzu değerlendirmek ve işe alım kararı vermek için;
Sizinle iletişim kurmak ve işe alım ve/veya başvuru(larınız) veya diğer gerekli iletişimler hakkında sizi bilgilendirmek;
Yürürlükteki yasal ve düzenleyici gerekliliklere uymak ve yasal bir hak talebinde bulunmamız, bu talebi yerine getirmemiz veya savunmamız için;
İstihdam ve kurumsal yönetim (örneğin, işe alınmanız halinde temel bir istihdam kaydı oluşturun);
Adayların faaliyet verilerine ilişkin toplu raporlar / analizler yapmak (örneğin, kariyer sitesi trafiği, aday hunisi, işe alım kaynağı, işe alım kampanyası başarısı);
Yalnızca Honeywell çalışanları içindir
:
Sizi bir iş fırsatı için işe alım uzmanlarına proaktif olarak önerilmekten otomatik olarak hariç tutmak ve mevcut HPD 9 blok derecelendirmenize göre değerlendirmeye uygun olmamanız (Honeywell dışında kimseye asla açıklanmayacaktır). Bununla birlikte, mevcut herhangi bir iş fırsatına her zaman doğrudan başvurabileceksiniz ve özel durumunuz bir işe alım görevlisi tarafından değerlendirilecektir.
Yalnızca Amerika Birleşik Devletleri'nde ikamet ediyorsanız
:
Size özellikle SMS yoluyla iletişim göndermek için:
(i)     1-1 Belirli bir iş ilanına başvurunuzla bağlantılı olarak SMS iletişimleri; ve/veya
(ii)    açık rızanıza tabi olarak
,
istihdam fırsatları, iş ilişkileri ve başvuru güncellemeleri hakkında SMS kampanya iletişimleri.
Profilinizde verilen talimatları izleyerek yukarıda belirtilen iletişimleri alma izninizi devre dışı bırakabilir ve/veya iptal edebilirsiniz.
Honeywell'den iş teklifi alır ve kabul ederseniz, başvuru ve işe alım sürecinde toplanan bilgiler istihdam kaydınızın bir parçası haline gelecektir.
Otomatik İşleme ve Profil Oluşturma
Açık rızanıza tabi olarak (Yetenek Topluluğumuza katılırken veya başvuru sürecinde uygun onay kutusunu işaretlerken gönüllü olarak verdiğiniz), belirli iş fırsatlarına uygunluğunuzu değerlendirmek için 'profilleme' yapıyoruz. Bu, istihdam profilinizi değerlendirebilen ve belirli bir iş fırsatı için uygunluğunuzu tahmin edebilen bir eşleştirme algoritması kullanmayı içerir. Bu otomatik işlemeyi şu amaçlarla gerçekleştiriyoruz:
belirli bir iş fırsatı için değerlendirilmek üzere adaylar önererek işe alım uzmanlarının adayların profillerini iş fırsatlarıyla eşleştirmesine yardımcı olmak; ve
profilinize ve/veya tercihlerinize veya Honeywell haberleri, web seminerleri ve etkinlikleri gibi ilginizi çekebilecek diğer bilgilere dayalı olarak size kişiselleştirilmiş iş önerileri göndermek.
Bu profillemeye dayanarak, doğrudan başvurmadığınız sürece belirli iş fırsatları için değerlendirilmeyebileceğinizi lütfen unutmayın. İşe alma kararlarını yalnızca otomatik karar verme süreçlerine ve/veya profil oluşturmaya dayalı olarak vermiyoruz. Nihai işe alım kararı işe alım görevlileri veya işe alım müdürü tarafından verileceğinden, kişisel bilgileriniz insan yapımı kararlara tabi olacaktır.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizin İşlenmesinin Yasal Dayanakları
Bazı yargı bölgeleri, Honeywell'in kişisel bilgilerinizi işlemek için yasal bir dayanağa sahip olmasını gerektirir. Yürürlükteki yasaların işleme faaliyetlerimizi gerekçelendirmemizi gerektirdiği durumlarda, kişisel bilgilerinizi bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklandığı şekilde toplamak ve kullanmak için yasal dayanağımız, ilgili kişisel bilgilere ve bunları topladığımız özel bağlama bağlı olacaktır.
Onay.
Genel olarak, normalde sizin onayınızı aldığımız ve başvurunuzu işleme koymak için kişisel bilgilerinize ihtiyaç duyduğumuz durumlarda sizden kişisel bilgilerinizi toplayacağız. Web sitemize/portalımıza erişerek, Yetenek Topluluğumuza katılarak veya iş pozisyonlarımızdan birine başvurarak, Honeywell'in bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklanan amaçlar doğrultusunda yukarıda açıklanan kişisel bilgileri toplamasına ve daha fazla işlemesine izin vermiş olursunuz.
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresindeki veri sahibi talep portalımız üzerinden bir talepte bulunarak veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta göndererek onayınızı istediğiniz zaman
geri çekebilirsiniz
.
Meşru menfaatler.
Honeywell'in meşru menfaatleri, yani yeni çalışanların işe alınması, seçilmesi, değerlendirilmesi ve atanması ve meşru menfaatlerimizin temel hak ve özgürlükleriniz tarafından geçersiz kılınmadığı ölçüde işe alım ve İK sürecinin yönetimi ve idaresi.
Yasal yükümlülükler.
İş kanunu veya diğer kanunların kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesini gerektirdiği durumlarda Honeywell'in yasal yükümlülüklerine uygunluk (örneğin, kanun fırsat eşitliği ve çeşitliliğin izlenmesini gerektirdiği ölçüde).
Hayati çıkarlar.
Kişisel bilgilerinize hayati çıkarlarınızı korumak için de ihtiyaç duyabiliriz (örneğin, tesisimizde bir görüşmeye katılmanız durumunda sağlık ve güvenlik nedenleri)
Kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımız ve kullandığımız yasal dayanak hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz varsa veya daha fazla bilgiye ihtiyacınız varsa, lütfen
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizi Kiminle Paylaşıyoruz
Honeywell kişisel bilgilerinizi yalnızca aşağıdaki durumlarda üçüncü taraflarla paylaşacaktır:
Honeywell grup kuruluşları
. Kişisel bilgilerinizi, profilinizi değerlendirmek ve grup düzeyinde herhangi bir işe alım fırsatını değerlendirmek için dünyanın dört bir yanındaki yargı bölgelerinde bulunan diğer grup kuruluşlarıyla paylaşabiliriz.
Hizmet sağlayıcılar
Kişisel bilgilerinizi, bizim adımıza belirli hizmetleri gerçekleştiren üçüncü taraf hizmet sağlayıcılarla (örneğin, işe alım ve dış kaynak personel sağlayıcıları ve analiz sağlayıcıları) özel olarak paylaşabiliriz. Bu tür üçüncü taraflar ülkenize bağlı olarak değişebilir ve zaman zaman değişebilir, ancak Phenom People, Inc., Cornerstone OnDemand Inc. ve ilgili üçüncü taraf sağlayıcılarını içerebilir.
Honeywell çalışanları.
Zaten bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız, profilinizdeki bazı bölümlerin herkese açık olduğunu ve bu nedenle tüm Honeywell çalışanları tarafından görülebileceğini lütfen unutmayın (özellikle adınız, unvanınız, fotoğrafınız, becerileriniz, ilgi alanlarınız, iş deneyiminiz ve eğitiminiz). Ancak, bu bölümler düzenlenebilir ve profilinizde sizinle ilgili hangi bilgilerin gösterileceğini seçebileceksiniz. Lütfen kariyer hedeflerinin, yer değiştirmelerin ve profil durumu "yeni fırsatlara açık" bölümleri herkese açık olmayacak ve bu nedenle tüm Honeywell çalışanları tarafından görülemeyecektir (yalnızca Honeywell'in Yetenek Ekibi tarafından).
Diğer üçüncü taraflar.
Honeywell, ifşanın yürürlükteki yasalar uyarınca gerekli olduğuna inandığımız veya yasal haklarımızı kullanmak, tesis etmek veya savunmak ya da sizin veya başka bir kişinin hayati çıkarlarını korumak için bu tür bir eylemin gerekli olduğuna iyi niyetle inandığımız durumlarda kişisel bilgilerinizi herhangi bir yetkili kolluk kuvveti, düzenleyici, devlet kurumu, mahkeme veya üçüncü tarafla paylaşabilir. Kişisel bilgilerinizi sizin izninizle veya sizin talimatınızla başkalarıyla da paylaşabiliriz (örneğin bir hakem veya meslek birliği).
Kişisel Bilgilerin Uluslararası Aktarımı
Honeywell küresel bir kuruluştur ve kişisel bilgileriniz ABD ve Hindistan gibi dünya çapında çeşitli konumlara aktarılabilir, tutulabilir, saklanabilir veya kullanılabilir. Bu, kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımızda, ülkenizin yasalarından farklı veri koruma yasalarına sahip olabilecek ülkelerde işlenebileceği anlamına gelir. Ancak Honeywell, gizliliğinizi korumak ve ikamet ettiğiniz ülkedekiyle karşılaştırılabilir bir kişisel bilgi koruma düzeyi sağlamak için her zaman makul adımlar atacaktır; bu adımlar arasında Komisyonun
https://ec.europa.eu
adresindeki web sitesinde bulunabilecek
Avrupa
Komisyonu Standart Sözleşme Maddelerinin
uygulanması da yer almaktadır.
Elde tutma
Kişisel bilgilerinizi, bu Gizlilik Bildiriminde açıklanan amaçlarla bağlantılı olarak gerekli olduğu sürece ve Honeywell'in Kayıt Saklama Programına uygun olarak veya geçerli yasaların gerektirdiği şekilde saklayacağız.
Sizin Haklarınız
Yürürlükteki yasalara bağlı olarak, kişisel bilgilerinizle ilgili belirli haklara sahip olabilirsiniz. Kaliforniya'da ikamet ediyorsanız lütfen aşağıdaki "
Kaliforniya'da İkamet Edenler için Ek Bilgiler
" bölümüne bakın.
Kişisel bilgilerinize
erişme, düzeltme, güncelleme
veya
silinmesini
talep etme hakkına sahip olabilirsiniz;
Kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesine
itiraz
edebilir,
kısıtlamamızı
isteyebilir kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesi veya kişisel bilgilerinizin
taşınabilirliğini
talep etme;
Hakkınızda, profil oluşturma da dahil olmak üzere, yalnızca otomatik işlemeye dayalı bir karar verilmesini, bu kararın hakkınızda yasal etkiler doğurması veya sizi önemli ölçüde etkilemesi durumunda istememe hakkına sahip olabilirsiniz.
Honeywell, işe alım sürecinin bir parçası olarak adaylar hakkında yalnızca otomatik kararlar almaz.
Benzer şekilde, kişisel bilgilerinizi sizin izninizle toplamış ve işlemişsek, izninizi istediğiniz zaman geri çekebilirsiniz. Onayınızı geri çekmeniz, geri çekmenizden önce gerçekleştirdiğimiz herhangi bir işlemin yasallığını etkilemeyeceği gibi, kişisel bilgilerinizin onay dışındaki yasal işleme gerekçelerine dayanılarak işlenmesini de etkilemeyecektir; ve
Kişisel bilgilerinizi toplamamız ve kullanmamız hakkında bir veri koruma yetkilisine şikayette bulunma hakkına sahipsiniz.
Geçerli yasalara uygun olarak sizin için geçerli olan hakları kullanmanızı kolaylaştıracağız. Kişisel bilgilerinizle ilgili haklarınızdan herhangi birini kullanmak için lütfen İK Yardımı veya
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri sahibi talep formu aracılığıyla bizimle iletişime geçin veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin.
Kaliforniya'da İkamet Edenler İçin Ek Bilgiler
Kaliforniya Eyaleti'nde ikamet ediyorsanız, bu bölüm Honeywell'in Başvuru Sahibi Gizlilik Bildirimi'ni tamamlar.
(i)     Toplanan ve İfşa Edilen Kişisel Bilgi Kategorileri
Honeywell, önceki on iki ay içinde iş amaçlarımız için aşağıdaki kişisel bilgi kategorilerini toplamış ve ifşa etmiştir:
Previous column
Next column
Kategoriler
Biz topluyoruz
A.
İsim, doğum tarihi, cinsiyet, e-posta adresi, telefon numaraları, posta adresi, çevrimiçi tanımlayıcılar, sosyal medya hesabı ve diğer tanımlayıcılar gibi tanımlayıcılar.
Evet
C.
Irk, etnik köken, dini veya felsefi inançlar, sendika üyeliği, sağlık verileri, biyometrik bilgiler, genetik veriler, engellilik, gazilik durumu, cinsel yönelim, kişisel posta, e-posta ve kısa mesajlar (amaçlanan alıcı Honeywell olmadığı sürece), devlet tanımlayıcıları (ör. sosyal güvenlik numarası), ehliyet, pasaport, finans ve bankacılık bilgileri gibi Kaliforniya veya federal yasalar kapsamında korunan sınıflandırmaların özellikleri.
Evet
F.
Tarama geçmişi, Honeywell web siteleri, e-posta ve metin mesajlaşma hizmetleri ile etkileşimler gibi İnternet veya diğer elektronik ağ etkinlik bilgileri.
Evet
G.
Cihaz konumu ve IP konumu gibi coğrafi konum verileri.
Evet
H.
Bir telefon veya video görüşmesine katılmanız veya ofislerimizi ziyaret etmeniz halinde sesiniz ve görüntünüz, video veya ses kayıtları gibi sesli, elektronik, görsel, termal veya benzeri bilgiler.
Evet
I.
Mesleğiniz, mevcut veya önceki işverenleriniz, iş unvanınız, eğitim geçmişiniz, akademik ve mesleki nitelikleriniz, özgeçmişiniz, iş geçmişiniz, işe alma referanslarınız, mülakat notlarınız ve değerlendirmeleriniz, dilleriniz, mesleki üyelikleriniz, sertifikalarınız, performans yönetimi derecelendirmeleriniz, tazminatınız, konum tercihleriniz ve seyahat tercihleriniz gibi mesleki veya istihdamla ilgili bilgiler.
Evet
K.
Örneğin bir bireyin tercihleri ve özellikleri hakkında bir profil veya özet oluşturmak için yukarıda listelenen kişisel bilgilerden herhangi birinden yapılan çıkarımlar.
Evet
Load More
(ii)    Sizin haklarınız
Talebinizden önceki on iki aylık dönemi kapsayan aşağıdaki haklar için bize bir talep gönderme hakkına sahipsiniz. Bu hakların mutlak olmadığını ve bazı durumlarda yürürlükteki yasalarda belirtilen sınırlamalara tabi olduğunu lütfen unutmayın:
Hakkınızda hangi kişisel bilgileri topladığımızı, kişisel bilgilerinizi topladığımız kaynak kategorilerini; kişisel bilgilerinizi hangi iş veya ticari amaç için topladığımızı ve kişisel bilgilerinizi ifşa ettiğimiz üçüncü taraf kategorilerini bilme hakkı;
Kişisel bilgilerinizi silme hakkı;
Hakkınızdaki yanlış kişisel bilgileri düzeltme hakkı;
Kişisel bilgilerinizin satışından veya paylaşımından vazgeçme hakkı;
Hassas kişisel bilgilerinizin işlenmesini sınırlandırma hakkı;
Yürürlükteki yasalar kapsamındaki haklarınızı kullandığınız için yasadışı ayrımcılığa maruz kalmama hakkı.
Yürürlükteki yasalara uygun olarak sizin için geçerli olan hakları kullanmanızı kolaylaştıracağız ve talebe konu olan kişisel bilgilerin türü ve hassasiyetini göz önünde bulundurarak, korunmanız için kimliğinizin doğrulanmasını talep etmemiz ve sizden ek bilgi talep etmemiz gerekebilir.
Kişisel Bilgilerinizle ilgili haklarınızdan herhangi birini kullanmak için lütfen
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri konusu talep formu aracılığıyla bizimle iletişime geçin veya
HoneywellPrivacy@honeywell.com
adresine bir e-posta gönderin. Halihazırda bir Honeywell çalışanıysanız
HRhelp@honeywell.com
adresinden bizimle iletişime geçebilirsiniz.
Bize Ulaşın
Kişisel bilgilerinizin nasıl işlendiği hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz veya şikayetiniz varsa veya haklarınızı kullanmak istiyorsanız, lütfen iletişime geçin:
HRhelp@honeywell.com
(yalnızca zaten bir Honeywell çalışanı iseniz) veya
Honeywellprivacy@honeywell.com
adresinden Veri Koruma Görevlimiz. Ayrıca
https://www.honeywell.com/en-us/privacy-statement
adresinde bulunan veri sahibi talep formu aracılığıyla da bizimle iletişime geçebilirsiniz.
Sub-policy 1
https://honeywellhub.secure.force.com/PrivacyInformationRequestForm?lang=en:
Submit a Privacy Request
Welcome to Honeywell Privacy Portal!
We value the trust that you place in us when you give us personal information.
You can make certain requests regarding our collection, use, and sharing of your personal information. The requests available to you may vary by state or country. Please tell us your location so we may facilitate the exercise of your rights in accordance with applicable law.
If you wish to unsubscribe from all marketing communications from Honeywell International Inc. and its
affiliates and subsidiaries
,
click here.
For general questions,
click here.
Location / Country *
--None--
Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Plurinational State of Bolivia
Sint Eustatius and Saba Bonaire
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
the Democratic Republic of the Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Curaçao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Islamic Republic of Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Democratic People's Republic of Korea
Republic of Korea
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macao
the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Republic of Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Ascension and Tristan da Cunha Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin (French part)
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten (Dutch part)
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan
Tajikistan
United Republic of Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Bolivarian Republic of Venezuela
Vietnam
British Virgin Islands
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Request type *
--None--
Data Access
Data Erasure
Objection to Data Profiling
Data Portability
Data Correction
Restriction of Data Processing
First Name *
Last Name *
Email Address *
Phone Number
Relationship with Honeywell? *
--None--
Customer of Honeywell products or solutions
Distributor
Reseller
Manufacturer
Contractor
Employee / Former Employee
Employment Candidate
Did you buy the product from Honeywell directly?
--None--
Directly
Distributor
Please specify the distributor you bought the product from
Company Name
Description of Request *
Submit Information Request
Reset
*Indicates mandatory fields
We use cookies to improve website performance, facilitate information sharing on social media and offer advertising tailored to your interests. For more information, see our
Cookie Notice
. You can also customize your browser’s cookie settings. Please note that if you refuse cookies, it may affect site functionality and performance.
Manage Cookies
Reject All
Accept All
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel